Ohio, session 136, SB197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 109.32, 109.572, 119.12, 121.95, 61
131.02, 173.121, 718.031, 959.05, 1309.109, 1711.09, 1716.21, 62
2915.01, 2915.02, 2915.06, 2915.061, 2915.08, 2915.081, 63
2915.082, 2915.09, 2915.091, 2915.092, 2915.093, 2915.094, 64
2915.095, 2915.10, 2915.101, 2915.11, 2915.12, 2915.13, 2915.14, 65
2915.15, 2923.121, 2927.21, 2933.51, 3123.89, 3123.90, 3517.091, 66
3763.01, 3769.03, 3769.031, 3769.04, 3769.041, 3769.05, 3769.06, 67
3769.07, 3769.071, 3769.072, 3769.08, 3769.082, 3769.083, 68
3769.084, 3769.085, 3769.087, 3769.089, 3769.0810, 3769.09, 69
3769.091, 3769.10, 3769.101, 3769.12, 3769.13, 3769.131, 70
3769.14, 3769.20, 3769.201, 3769.21, 3769.22, 3769.25, 3769.26, 71
3769.27, 3770.02, 3770.03, 3770.05, 3770.06, 3770.07, 3770.071, 72
3770.072, 3770.073, 3770.08, 3770.10, 3770.13, 3770.21, 3770.24, 73
3770.25, 3770.99, 3772.01, 3772.02, 3772.03, 3772.031, 3772.04, 74
3772.062, 3772.07, 3772.09, 3772.091, 3772.10, 3772.13, 75
3772.131, 3772.15, 3772.16, 3772.17, 3772.18, 3772.23, 3772.31, 76
3772.37, 3772.99, 3774.01, 3774.02, 3774.03, 3774.04, 3774.09, 77
3775.01, 3775.02, 3775.03, 3775.06, 3775.09, 3775.10, 3775.11, 78
3775.13, 3775.99, 4301.03, 4301.58, 4303.17, 5701.11, 5747.01, 79
5747.02, 5747.062, 5747.063, 5747.08, 5747.12, 5747.20, 5751.01, 80
5753.01, 5753.021, 5753.03, 5753.031, and 5907.18 be amended; 81
sections 173.121 (3768.20), 2915.06 (3777.03), 2915.061 82
(3777.04), 2915.07 (3768.18), 2915.08 (3768.04), 2915.081 83
(3768.16), 2915.082 (3768.17), 2915.09 (3768.05), 2915.091 84
(3768.06), 2915.092 (3768.02), 2915.093 (3768.07), 2915.094 85

S. B. No. 197 Page 4
As Introduced
(3768.08), 2915.095 (3768.09), 2915.10 (3768.14), 2915.101 86
(3768.13), 2915.11 (3768.15), 2915.12 (3768.19), 2915.13 87
(3768.10), 2915.14 (3768.11), 2915.15 (3768.12), 3769.01 88
(3769.02), 3770.01 (3770.011), 3770.10 (3770.01), and 5907.18 89
(3768.21) be amended for the purpose of adopting new section 90
numbers as indicated in parentheses; and new section 3769.01 and 91
sections 3768.01, 3768.03, 3768.22, 3768.23, 3769.081, 3769.11, 92
3769.99, 3770.211, 3770.212, 3770.213, 3770.214, 3770.26, 93
3771.01, 3771.02, 3771.03, 3771.04, 3771.05, 3771.06, 3771.07, 94
3771.08, 3771.09, 3771.10, 3771.11, 3771.12, 3771.13, 3771.99, 95
3772.113, 3772.132, 3772.221, 3772.231, 3772.28, 3772.281, 96
3772.311, 3772.312, 3772.313, 3772.314, 3772.315, 3772.316, 97
3772.317, 3772.38, 3772.39, 3772.40, 3772.41, 3772.98, 3777.01, 98
3777.02, 3777.05, 3777.06, 5753.022, and 5753.032 of the Revised 99
Code be enacted to read as follows: 100
Sec. 109.32. (A) All The charitable law fund is created in 101
state treasury. The fund consists of all of the following: 102
(1) All annual filing fees obtained by the attorney 103
general pursuant to section 109.31 of the Revised Code, all 104
receipts obtained from the sale of the charitable foundations 105
directory, all registration fees received by the attorney 106
general, all bond forfeitures, awards of costs and attorney's 107
fees, and civil penalties assessed under Chapter 1716. of the 108
Revised Code, all license fees received by the attorney general 109
under section 2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of the Revised 110
Code, all fees received by the attorney general under section 111
2915.15 of the Revised Code, and all filing fees received by the 112
attorney general under divisions (F) and (G) of section 2915.02 113
of the Revised Code, which shall be paid into the state treasury 114
to the credit of the charitable law fund; 115

S. B. No. 197 Page 5
As Introduced
(2) All amounts transferred to the fund from the 116
charitable gaming fund established under section 3768.23 of the 117
Revised Code. 118
(B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (B)(2) 119
and (3) of this section, the (B) The charitable law fund shall 120
be used insofar as its moneys are available for the expenses of 121
the charitable law section of the office of the attorney 122
general. 123
(2) All annual license fees that are received by the 124
attorney general under section 2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of 125
the Revised Code, and all filing fees received by the attorney 126
general under divisions (F) and (G) of section 2915.02 of the 127
Revised Code, that are credited to the fund shall be used by the 128
attorney general, or any law enforcement agency in cooperation 129
with the attorney general, for the purposes specified in 130
division (H) of section 2915.10 of the Revised Code and to 131
administer and enforce Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code. 132
(3) All fees received by the attorney general under 133
section 2915.15 of the Revised Code that are credited to the 134
fund shall be used for the purposes specified in that section. 135
(C) The expenses of the charitable law section in excess 136
of moneys available in the charitable law fund shall be paid out 137
of regular appropriations to the office of the attorney general. 138
Sec. 109.572. (A)(1) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to 139
section 121.08, 3301.32, 3301.541, or 3319.39 of the Revised 140
Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of 141
this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in 142
the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the 143
superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and 144

S. B. No. 197 Page 6
As Introduced
investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the 145
manner described in division (B) of this section to determine 146
whether any information exists that indicates that the person 147
who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted 148
of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: 149
(a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 150
2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 151
2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 152
2905.32, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 153
2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.25, 154
2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 155
2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 156
2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.17, 2923.21, 2923.42, 2925.02, 157
2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.13, 2925.22, 158
2925.23, 2925.24, 2925.31, 2925.32, 2925.36, 2925.37, or 3716.11 159
of the Revised Code, felonious sexual penetration in violation 160
of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a violation of 161
section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 162
1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that 163
would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised 164
Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been 165
committed prior to that date, or a violation of section 2925.11 166
of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense; 167
(b) A violation of an existing or former law of this 168
state, any other state, or the United States that is 169
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in 170
division (A)(1)(a) of this section; 171
(c) If the request is made pursuant to section 3319.39 of 172
the Revised Code for an applicant who is a teacher, any offense 173
specified under section 9.79 of the Revised Code or in section 174

S. B. No. 197 Page 7
As Introduced
3319.31 of the Revised Code. 175
(2) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3712.09 or 176
3721.121 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed 177
pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of 178
fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in 179
division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 180
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 181
conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person who 182
has applied for employment in a position for which a criminal 183
records check is required by those sections. The superintendent 184
shall conduct the criminal records check in the manner described 185
in division (B) of this section to determine whether any 186
information exists that indicates that the person who is the 187
subject of the request previously has been convicted of or 188
pleaded guilty to any of the following: 189
(a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 190
2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 191
2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.05, 192
2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.12, 2907.25, 2907.31, 193
2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 194
2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.11, 195
2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.40, 2913.43, 2913.47, 2913.51, 2919.25, 196
2921.36, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.11, 197
2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code; 198
(b) An existing or former law of this state, any other 199
state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to 200
any of the offenses listed in division (A)(2)(a) of this 201
section. 202
(3) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 173.27, 203
173.38, 173.381, 3740.11, 5119.34, 5164.34, 5164.341, 5164.342, 204

S. B. No. 197 Page 8
As Introduced
5123.081, or 5123.169 of the Revised Code, a completed form 205
prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a 206
set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described 207
in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 208
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 209
conduct a criminal records check of the person for whom the 210
request is made. The superintendent shall conduct the criminal 211
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 212
section to determine whether any information exists that 213
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request 214
previously has been convicted of, has pleaded guilty to, or 215
(except in the case of a request pursuant to section 5164.34, 216
5164.341, or 5164.342 of the Revised Code) has been found 217
eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for any of the 218
following, regardless of the date of the conviction, the date of 219
entry of the guilty plea, or (except in the case of a request 220
pursuant to section 5164.34, 5164.341, or 5164.342 of the 221
Revised Code) the date the person was found eligible for 222
intervention in lieu of conviction: 223
(a) A violation of section 959.13, 959.131, 2903.01, 224
2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 225
2903.15, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.211, 2903.22, 2903.34, 2903.341, 226
2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2905.32, 2905.33, 227
2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 228
2907.09, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.24, 2907.25, 2907.31, 229
2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2907.33, 2909.02, 230
2909.03, 2909.04, 2909.22, 2909.23, 2909.24, 2911.01, 2911.02, 231
2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.05, 232
2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.32, 2913.40, 2913.41, 2913.42, 233
2913.43, 2913.44, 2913.441, 2913.45, 2913.46, 2913.47, 2913.48, 234
2913.49, 2913.51, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2917.03, 2917.31, 2919.12, 235

S. B. No. 197 Page 9
As Introduced
2919.121, 2919.123, 2919.124, 2919.22, 2919.23, 2919.24, 236
2919.25, 2921.03, 2921.11, 2921.12, 2921.13, 2921.21, 2921.24, 237
2921.32, 2921.321, 2921.34, 2921.35, 2921.36, 2921.51, 2923.12, 238
2923.122, 2923.123, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.162, 2923.21, 239
2923.32, 2923.42, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 240
2925.06, 2925.09, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.14, 2925.22, 2925.23, 241
2925.24, 2925.36, 2925.55, 2925.56, 2927.12, or 3716.11 of the 242
Revised Code; 243
(b) Felonious sexual penetration in violation of former 244
section 2907.12 of the Revised Code; 245
(c) A violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as 246
it existed prior to July 1, 1996; 247
(d) A violation of section 2923.01, 2923.02, or 2923.03 of 248
the Revised Code when the underlying offense that is the object 249
of the conspiracy, attempt, or complicity is one of the offenses 250
listed in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (c) of this section; 251
(e) A violation of an existing or former municipal 252
ordinance or law of this state, any other state, or the United 253
States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses 254
listed in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (d) of this section. 255
(4) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 2151.86, 256
2151.904, or 5103.053 of the Revised Code, a completed form 257
prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a 258
set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described 259
in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 260
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 261
conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in 262
division (B) of this section to determine whether any 263
information exists that indicates that the person who is the 264

S. B. No. 197 Page 10
As Introduced
subject of the request previously has been convicted of or 265
pleaded guilty to any of the following: 266
(a) A violation of section 959.13, 2151.421, 2903.01, 267
2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.11, 268
2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.15, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.211, 2903.22, 269
2903.32, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.32, 2907.02, 270
2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 271
2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 272
2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2909.02, 2909.03, 2909.22, 273
2909.23, 2909.24, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2913.49, 274
2917.01, 2917.02, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 275
2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.17, 2923.21, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 276
2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.24, 277
2925.31, 2925.32, 2925.36, 2925.37, 2927.12, or 3716.11 of the 278
Revised Code, a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code 279
as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 280
2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of 281
section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 282
1, 1996, had the violation been committed prior to that date, a 283
violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a 284
minor drug possession offense, two or more OVI or OVUAC 285
violations committed within the three years immediately 286
preceding the submission of the application or petition that is 287
the basis of the request, or felonious sexual penetration in 288
violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, or a 289
violation of Chapter 2919. of the Revised Code that is a felony; 290
(b) A violation of an existing or former law of this 291
state, any other state, or the United States that is 292
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in 293
division (A)(4)(a) of this section. 294

S. B. No. 197 Page 11
As Introduced
(5) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 5104.013 295
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to 296
division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint 297
impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) 298
of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 299
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 300
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 301
section to determine whether any information exists that 302
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request has 303
been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: 304
(a) A violation of section 2151.421, 2903.01, 2903.02, 305
2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 306
2903.22, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.32, 307
2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 308
2907.09, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.24, 2907.25, 309
2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2909.02, 310
2909.03, 2909.04, 2909.05, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 311
2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.041, 2913.05, 2913.06, 2913.11, 312
2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.32, 2913.33, 2913.34, 2913.40, 2913.41, 313
2913.42, 2913.43, 2913.44, 2913.441, 2913.45, 2913.46, 2913.47, 314
2913.48, 2913.49, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2917.03, 2917.31, 2919.12, 315
2919.22, 2919.224, 2919.225, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2921.03, 2921.11, 316
2921.13, 2921.14, 2921.34, 2921.35, 2923.01, 2923.12, 2923.13, 317
2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, or 318
3716.11 of the Revised Code, felonious sexual penetration in 319
violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a 320
violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed 321
prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the 322
Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 323
of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the 324
violation been committed prior to that date, a violation of 325

S. B. No. 197 Page 12
As Introduced
section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug 326
possession offense, a violation of section 2923.02 or 2923.03 of 327
the Revised Code that relates to a crime specified in this 328
division, or a second violation of section 4511.19 of the 329
Revised Code within five years of the date of application for 330
licensure or certification. 331
(b) A violation of an existing or former law of this 332
state, any other state, or the United States that is 333
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses or violations 334
described in division (A)(5)(a) of this section. 335
(6) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 5153.111 336
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to 337
division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint 338
impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) 339
of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 340
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 341
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 342
section to determine whether any information exists that 343
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request 344
previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the 345
following: 346
(a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 347
2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 348
2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 349
2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 350
2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 351
2909.02, 2909.03, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.12, 352
2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 353
2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, or 3716.11 of the Revised 354
Code, felonious sexual penetration in violation of former 355

S. B. No. 197 Page 13
As Introduced
section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 356
2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, 357
a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would 358
have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as 359
it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been 360
committed prior to that date, or a violation of section 2925.11 361
of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense; 362
(b) A violation of an existing or former law of this 363
state, any other state, or the United States that is 364
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in 365
division (A)(6)(a) of this section. 366
(7) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check 367
from an individual pursuant to section 4749.03 or 4749.06 of the 368
Revised Code, accompanied by a completed copy of the form 369
prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section and a set of 370
fingerprint impressions obtained in a manner described in 371
division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 372
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 373
conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in 374
division (B) of this section to determine whether any 375
information exists indicating that the person who is the subject 376
of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any 377
criminal offense in this state or in any other state. If the 378
individual indicates that a firearm will be carried in the 379
course of business, the superintendent shall require information 380
from the federal bureau of investigation as described in 381
division (B)(2) of this section. Subject to division (F) of this 382
section, the superintendent shall report the findings of the 383
criminal records check and any information the federal bureau of 384
investigation provides to the director of public safety. 385

S. B. No. 197 Page 14
As Introduced
(8) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 1321.37, 386
1321.53, or 4763.05 of the Revised Code, a completed form 387
prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a 388
set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described 389
in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 390
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 391
conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person who 392
has applied for a license, permit, or certification from the 393
department of commerce or a division in the department. The 394
superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in the 395
manner described in division (B) of this section to determine 396
whether any information exists that indicates that the person 397
who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted 398
of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state, any 399
other state, or the United States. 400
(9) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check 401
from the treasurer of state under section 113.041 of the Revised 402
Code or from an individual under section 928.03, 4701.08, 403
4715.101, 4717.061, 4725.121, 4725.501, 4729.071, 4729.53, 404
4729.90, 4729.92, 4730.101, 4730.14, 4730.28, 4731.081, 4731.15, 405
4731.171, 4731.222, 4731.281, 4731.531, 4732.091, 4734.202, 406
4740.061, 4741.10, 4747.051, 4751.20, 4751.201, 4751.21, 407
4753.061, 4755.70, 4757.101, 4759.061, 4760.032, 4760.06, 408
4761.051, 4762.031, 4762.06, 4774.031, 4774.06, 4776.021, 409
4778.04, 4778.07, 4779.091, or 4783.04 of the Revised Code, 410
accompanied by a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) 411
of this section and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in 412
the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the 413
superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and 414
investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the 415
manner described in division (B) of this section to determine 416

S. B. No. 197 Page 15
As Introduced
whether any information exists that indicates that the person 417
who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or 418
pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state or any 419
other state. Subject to division (F) of this section, the 420
superintendent shall send the results of a check requested under 421
section 113.041 of the Revised Code to the treasurer of state 422
and shall send the results of a check requested under any of the 423
other listed sections to the licensing board specified by the 424
individual in the request. 425
(10) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 124.74, 426
718.131, 1121.23, 1315.141, 1733.47, or 1761.26 of the Revised 427
Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of 428
this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in 429
the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the 430
superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and 431
investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the 432
manner described in division (B) of this section to determine 433
whether any information exists that indicates that the person 434
who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted 435
of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense under any existing 436
or former law of this state, any other state, or the United 437
States. 438
(11) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check 439
from an appointing or licensing authority under section 3772.07 440
or 3772.132 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed 441
under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint 442
impressions obtained in the manner prescribed in division (C)(2) 443
of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 444
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 445
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 446
section to determine whether any information exists that 447

S. B. No. 197 Page 16
As Introduced
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request 448
previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or no contest 449
to any offense under any existing or former law of this state, 450
any other state, or the United States that makes the person 451
ineligible for appointment or retention under section 3772.07 of 452
the Revised Code or that is a disqualifying offense as defined 453
in that section or substantially equivalent to a disqualifying 454
offense, as applicable. 455
(12) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 2151.33 456
or 2151.412 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed 457
pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of 458
fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in 459
division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 460
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 461
conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person for 462
whom a criminal records check is required under that section. 463
The superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in 464
the manner described in division (B) of this section to 465
determine whether any information exists that indicates that the 466
person who is the subject of the request previously has been 467
convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: 468
(a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 469
2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 470
2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.05, 471
2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.12, 2907.25, 2907.31, 472
2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 473
2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.11, 474
2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.40, 2913.43, 2913.47, 2913.51, 2919.25, 475
2921.36, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.11, 476
2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code; 477

S. B. No. 197 Page 17
As Introduced
(b) An existing or former law of this state, any other 478
state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to 479
any of the offenses listed in division (A)(12)(a) of this 480
section. 481
(13) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3796.12 482
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to 483
division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint 484
impressions obtained in a manner described in division (C)(2) of 485
this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 486
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 487
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 488
section to determine whether any information exists that 489
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request 490
previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a 491
disqualifying offense as specified in rules adopted under 492
section 9.79 and division (B)(2)(b) of section 3796.03 of the 493
Revised Code if the person who is the subject of the request is 494
an administrator or other person responsible for the daily 495
operation of, or an owner or prospective owner, officer or 496
prospective officer, or board member or prospective board member 497
of, an entity seeking a license from the department of commerce 498
under Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code. 499
(14) On receipt of a request required by section 3796.13 500
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to 501
division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint 502
impressions obtained in a manner described in division (C)(2) of 503
this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 504
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 505
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 506
section to determine whether any information exists that 507
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request 508

S. B. No. 197 Page 18
As Introduced
previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a 509
disqualifying offense as specified in rules adopted under 510
division (B)(14)(a) of section 3796.03 of the Revised Code if 511
the person who is the subject of the request is seeking 512
employment with an entity licensed by the department of commerce 513
under Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code. 514
(15) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 4768.06 515
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division 516
(C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions 517
obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this 518
section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 519
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 520
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 521
section to determine whether any information exists indicating 522
that the person who is the subject of the request has been 523
convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this 524
state or in any other state. 525
(16) On receipt of a request pursuant to division (B) of 526
section 4764.07 or division (A) of section 4735.143 of the 527
Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) 528
of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained 529
in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the 530
superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and 531
investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the 532
manner described in division (B) of this section to determine 533
whether any information exists indicating that the person who is 534
the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded 535
guilty to any criminal offense in any state or the United 536
States. 537
(17) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check 538

S. B. No. 197 Page 19
As Introduced
under section 147.022 of the Revised Code, a completed form 539
prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of 540
fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner prescribed in 541
division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 542
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 543
conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in 544
division (B) of this section to determine whether any 545
information exists that indicates that the person who is the 546
subject of the request previously has been convicted of or 547
pleaded guilty or no contest to any criminal offense under any 548
existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the 549
United States. 550
(18) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to division (F) of 551
section 2915.081 3768.16 or division (E) of section 2915.082 552
3768.17 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under 553
division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint 554
impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) 555
of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 556
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 557
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 558
section to determine whether any information exists indicating 559
that the person who is the subject of the request has been 560
convicted of or pleaded guilty or no contest to any offense that 561
is a violation of Chapter 2915. or 3768. of the Revised Code or 562
to any offense under any existing or former law of this state, 563
any other state, or the United States that is substantially 564
equivalent to such an offense. 565
(19) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3771.03 566
or 3775.03 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed 567
under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint 568
impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) 569

S. B. No. 197 Page 20
As Introduced
of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 570
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 571
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 572
section and shall request information from the federal bureau of 573
investigation to determine whether any information exists 574
indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has 575
been convicted of any offense under any existing or former law 576
of this state, any other state, or the United States that is a 577
disqualifying offense as defined in section 3772.07 of the 578
Revised Code. 579
(B) Subject to division (F) of this section, the 580
superintendent shall conduct any criminal records check to be 581
conducted under this section as follows: 582
(1) The superintendent shall review or cause to be 583
reviewed any relevant information gathered and compiled by the 584
bureau under division (A) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code 585
that relates to the person who is the subject of the criminal 586
records check, including, if the criminal records check was 587
requested under section 113.041, 121.08, 124.74, 173.27, 173.38, 588
173.381, 718.131, 928.03, 1121.23, 1315.141, 1321.37, 1321.53, 589
1733.47, 1761.26, 2151.86, 3301.32, 3301.541, 3319.39, 3740.11, 590
3712.09, 3721.121, 3771.03, 3772.07, 3772.132, 3775.03, 3796.12, 591
3796.13, 4729.071, 4729.53, 4729.90, 4729.92, 4749.03, 4749.06, 592
4763.05, 4764.07, 4768.06, 5103.053, 5104.013, 5164.34, 593
5164.341, 5164.342, 5123.081, 5123.169, or 5153.111 of the 594
Revised Code, any relevant information contained in records that 595
have been sealed under section 2953.32 of the Revised Code; 596
(2) If the request received by the superintendent asks for 597
information from the federal bureau of investigation, the 598
superintendent shall request from the federal bureau of 599

S. B. No. 197 Page 21
As Introduced
investigation any information it has with respect to the person 600
who is the subject of the criminal records check, including 601
fingerprint-based checks of national crime information databases 602
as described in 42 U.S.C. 671 if the request is made pursuant to 603
section 2151.86, 5103.053, or 5104.013 of the Revised Code or if 604
any other Revised Code section requires fingerprint-based checks 605
of that nature, and shall review or cause to be reviewed any 606
information the superintendent receives from that bureau. If a 607
request under section 3319.39 of the Revised Code asks only for 608
information from the federal bureau of investigation, the 609
superintendent shall not conduct the review prescribed by 610
division (B)(1) of this section. 611
(3) The superintendent or the superintendent's designee 612
may request criminal history records from other states or the 613
federal government pursuant to the national crime prevention and 614
privacy compact set forth in section 109.571 of the Revised 615
Code. 616
(4) The superintendent shall include in the results of the 617
criminal records check a list or description of the offenses 618
listed or described in the relevant provision of division (A) of 619
this section. The superintendent shall exclude from the results 620
any information the dissemination of which is prohibited by 621
federal law. 622
(5) The superintendent shall send the results of the 623
criminal records check to the person to whom it is to be sent 624
not later than the following number of days after the date the 625
superintendent receives the request for the criminal records 626
check, the completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of 627
this section, and the set of fingerprint impressions obtained in 628
the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section: 629

S. B. No. 197 Page 22
As Introduced
(a) If the superintendent is required by division (A) of 630
this section (other than division (A)(3) of this section) to 631
conduct the criminal records check, thirty; 632
(b) If the superintendent is required by division (A)(3) 633
of this section to conduct the criminal records check, sixty. 634
(C)(1) The superintendent shall prescribe a form to obtain 635
the information necessary to conduct a criminal records check 636
from any person for whom a criminal records check is to be 637
conducted under this section. The form that the superintendent 638
prescribes pursuant to this division may be in a tangible 639
format, in an electronic format, or in both tangible and 640
electronic formats. 641
(2) The superintendent shall prescribe standard impression 642
sheets to obtain the fingerprint impressions of any person for 643
whom a criminal records check is to be conducted under this 644
section. Any person for whom a records check is to be conducted 645
under this section shall obtain the fingerprint impressions at a 646
county sheriff's office, municipal police department, or any 647
other entity with the ability to make fingerprint impressions on 648
the standard impression sheets prescribed by the superintendent. 649
The office, department, or entity may charge the person a 650
reasonable fee for making the impressions. The standard 651
impression sheets the superintendent prescribes pursuant to this 652
division may be in a tangible format, in an electronic format, 653
or in both tangible and electronic formats. 654
(3) Subject to division (D) of this section, the 655
superintendent shall prescribe and charge a reasonable fee for 656
providing a criminal records check under this section. The 657
person requesting the criminal records check shall pay the fee 658
prescribed pursuant to this division. In the case of a request 659

S. B. No. 197 Page 23
As Introduced
under section 1121.23, 1155.03, 1163.05, 1315.141, 1733.47, 660
1761.26, 2151.33, 2151.412, or 5164.34 of the Revised Code, the 661
fee shall be paid in the manner specified in that section. 662
(4) The superintendent of the bureau of criminal 663
identification and investigation may prescribe methods of 664
forwarding fingerprint impressions and information necessary to 665
conduct a criminal records check, which methods shall include, 666
but not be limited to, an electronic method. 667
(D) The results of a criminal records check conducted 668
under this section, other than a criminal records check 669
specified in division (A)(7) of this section, are valid for the 670
person who is the subject of the criminal records check for a 671
period of one year from the date upon which the superintendent 672
completes the criminal records check. If during that period the 673
superintendent receives another request for a criminal records 674
check to be conducted under this section for that person, the 675
superintendent shall provide the results from the previous 676
criminal records check of the person at a lower fee than the fee 677
prescribed for the initial criminal records check. 678
(E) When the superintendent receives a request for 679
information from a registered private provider, the 680
superintendent shall proceed as if the request was received from 681
a school district board of education under section 3319.39 of 682
the Revised Code. The superintendent shall apply division (A)(1) 683
(c) of this section to any such request for an applicant who is 684
a teacher. 685
(F)(1) Subject to division (F)(2) of this section, all 686
information regarding the results of a criminal records check 687
conducted under this section that the superintendent reports or 688
sends under division (A)(7) or (9) of this section to the 689

S. B. No. 197 Page 24
As Introduced
director of public safety, the treasurer of state, or the 690
person, board, or entity that made the request for the criminal 691
records check shall relate to the conviction of the subject 692
person, or the subject person's plea of guilty to, a criminal 693
offense. 694
(2) Division (F)(1) of this section does not limit, 695
restrict, or preclude the superintendent's release of 696
information that relates to the arrest of a person who is 697
eighteen years of age or older, to an adjudication of a child as 698
a delinquent child, or to a criminal conviction of a person 699
under eighteen years of age in circumstances in which a release 700
of that nature is authorized under division (E)(2), (3), or (4) 701
of section 109.57 of the Revised Code pursuant to a rule adopted 702
under division (E)(1) of that section. 703
(G) As used in this section: 704
(1) "Criminal records check" means any criminal records 705
check conducted by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 706
identification and investigation in accordance with division (B) 707
of this section. 708
(2) "Minor drug possession offense" has the same meaning 709
as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. 710
(3) "OVI or OVUAC violation" means a violation of section 711
4511.19 of the Revised Code or a violation of an existing or 712
former law of this state, any other state, or the United States 713
that is substantially equivalent to section 4511.19 of the 714
Revised Code. 715
(4) "Registered private provider" means a nonpublic school 716
or entity registered with the department of education and 717
workforce under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code to 718

S. B. No. 197 Page 25
As Introduced
participate in the autism scholarship program or section 3310.58 719
of the Revised Code to participate in the Jon Peterson special 720
needs scholarship program. 721
Sec. 119.12. (A) Any party adversely affected by any order 722
of an agency issued pursuant to an adjudication may appeal from 723
the order of the agency to the court of common pleas of the 724
county designated in division (B) of this section. 725
(B) An appeal from an order described in division (A) of 726
this section shall be filed in the county designated as follows: 727
(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of 728
this section, an appeal from an order of an agency issued 729
pursuant to an adjudication denying an applicant admission to an 730
examination, denying the issuance or renewal of a license or 731
registration of a licensee, revoking or suspending a license, or 732
allowing the payment of a forfeiture under section 4301.252 of 733
the Revised Code shall be filed in the county in which the place 734
of business of the licensee is located or the county in which 735
the licensee is a resident. 736
(2) An appeal from an order issued by any of the following 737
agencies shall be made to the court of common pleas of Franklin 738
county or the court of common pleas in the county in which the 739
place of business of the licensee is located or the county in 740
which the licensee is a resident: 741
(a) The liquor control commission; 742
(b) The Ohio casino control commission; 743
(c) The state medical board; 744
(d) The state chiropractic board; 745
(e) The board of nursing; 746

S. B. No. 197 Page 26
As Introduced
(f) The bureau of workers' compensation regarding 747
participation in the health partnership program created in 748
sections 4121.44 and 4121.441 of the Revised Code. 749
(3) Appeals from orders of the fire marshal issued under 750
Chapter 3737. of the Revised Code shall be to the court of 751
common pleas of the county in which the building of the 752
aggrieved person is located. 753
(4) Appeals under division (B) of section 124.34 of the 754
Revised Code from a decision of the state personnel board of 755
review or a municipal or civil service township civil service 756
commission shall be taken to the court of common pleas of the 757
county in which the appointing authority is located or, in the 758
case of an appeal by the department of rehabilitation and 759
correction, to the court of common pleas of Franklin county. 760
(5) If any party appealing from an order described in 761
division (B)(1), (2), or (6) of this section is not a resident 762
of and has no place of business in this state, the party shall 763
appeal to the court of common pleas of Franklin county. 764
(6) Any party adversely affected by any order of an agency 765
issued pursuant to any other adjudication may appeal to the 766
court of common pleas of Franklin county or the court of common 767
pleas of the county in which the business of the party is 768
located or in which the party is a resident. 769
(C) This section does not apply to appeals from the 770
department of taxation. 771
(D) Any party desiring to appeal shall file a notice of 772
appeal with the agency setting forth the order appealed from and 773
stating that the agency's order is not supported by reliable, 774
probative, and substantial evidence and is not in accordance 775

S. B. No. 197 Page 27
As Introduced
with law. The notice of appeal may, but need not, set forth the 776
specific grounds of the party's appeal beyond the statement that 777
the agency's order is not supported by reliable, probative, and 778
substantial evidence and is not in accordance with law. The 779
notice of appeal shall also be filed by the appellant with the 780
court. In filing a notice of appeal with the agency or court, 781
the notice that is filed may be either the original notice or a 782
copy of the original notice. Unless otherwise provided by law 783
relating to a particular agency, notices of appeal shall be 784
filed within fifteen days after the service of the notice of the 785
agency's order as provided in section 119.05 of the Revised 786
Code. For purposes of this paragraph, an order includes a 787
determination appealed pursuant to division (C) of section 788
119.092 of the Revised Code. The amendments made to this 789
paragraph by Sub. H.B. 215 of the 128th general assembly are 790
procedural, and this paragraph as amended by those amendments 791
shall be applied retrospectively to all appeals pursuant to this 792
paragraph filed before September 13, 2010, but not earlier than 793
May 7, 2009, which was the date the supreme court of Ohio 794
released its opinion and judgment in Medcorp, Inc. v. Ohio 795
Dep't. of Job and Family Servs. (2009), 121 Ohio St.3d 622. 796
(E) The filing of a notice of appeal shall not 797
automatically operate as a suspension of the order of an agency. 798
If it appears to the court that an unusual hardship to the 799
appellant will result from the execution of the agency's order 800
pending determination of the appeal, the court may grant a 801
suspension and fix its terms. If an appeal is taken from the 802
judgment of the court and the court has previously granted a 803
suspension of the agency's order as provided in this section, 804
the suspension of the agency's order shall not be vacated and 805
shall be given full force and effect until the matter is finally 806

S. B. No. 197 Page 28
As Introduced
adjudicated. No renewal of a license or permit shall be denied 807
by reason of the suspended order during the period of the appeal 808
from the decision of the court of common pleas. In the case of 809
an appeal from the Ohio casino control commission, the state 810
medical board, or the state chiropractic board, the court may 811
grant a suspension and fix its terms if it appears to the court 812
that an unusual hardship to the appellant will result from the 813
execution of the agency's order pending determination of the 814
appeal and the health, safety, and welfare of the public will 815
not be threatened by suspension of the order. This provision 816
shall not be construed to limit the factors the court may 817
consider in determining whether to suspend an order of any other 818
agency pending determination of an appeal. 819
(F) The final order of adjudication may apply to any 820
renewal of a license or permit which has been granted during the 821
period of the appeal. 822
(G) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, 823
any order issued by a court of common pleas or a court of 824
appeals suspending the effect of an order of the liquor control 825
commission issued pursuant to Chapter 4301. or 4303. of the 826
Revised Code that suspends, revokes, or cancels a permit issued 827
under Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code or that allows the 828
payment of a forfeiture under section 4301.252 of the Revised 829
Code shall terminate not more than six months after the date of 830
the filing of the record of the liquor control commission with 831
the clerk of the court of common pleas and shall not be 832
extended. The court of common pleas, or the court of appeals on 833
appeal, shall render a judgment in that matter within six months 834
after the date of the filing of the record of the liquor control 835
commission with the clerk of the court of common pleas. A court 836
of appeals shall not issue an order suspending the effect of an 837

S. B. No. 197 Page 29
As Introduced
order of the liquor control commission that extends beyond six 838
months after the date on which the record of the liquor control 839
commission is filed with a court of common pleas. 840
(H) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, 841
any order issued by a court of common pleas or a court of 842
appeals suspending the effect of an order of the Ohio casino 843
control commission issued under Chapter 3769., 3771., 3772., or 844
3775. or sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code that 845
limits, conditions, restricts, suspends, revokes, denies, not 846
renews, fines, or otherwise penalizes an applicant, a licensee, 847
or a person excluded or ejected from a casino facility gaming in 848
accordance with section 3772.031 of the Revised Code shall 849
terminate not more than six months after the date of the filing 850
of the record of the Ohio casino control commission with the 851
clerk of the court of common pleas and shall not be extended. 852
The court of common pleas, or the court of appeals on appeal, 853
shall render a judgment in that matter within six months after 854
the date of the filing of the record of the Ohio casino control 855
commission with the clerk of the court of common pleas. A court 856
of appeals shall not issue an order suspending the effect of an 857
order of the Ohio casino control commission that extends beyond 858
six months after the date on which the record of the Ohio casino 859
control commission is filed with the clerk of a court of common 860
pleas. 861
(I) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, 862
any order issued by a court of common pleas suspending the 863
effect of an order of the state medical board or state 864
chiropractic board that limits, revokes, suspends, places on 865
probation, or refuses to register or reinstate a certificate 866
issued by the board or reprimands the holder of the certificate 867
shall terminate not more than fifteen months after the date of 868

S. B. No. 197 Page 30
As Introduced
the filing of a notice of appeal in the court of common pleas, 869
or upon the rendering of a final decision or order in the appeal 870
by the court of common pleas, whichever occurs first. 871
(J) Within thirty days after receipt of a notice of appeal 872
from an order in any case in which a hearing is required by 873
sections 119.01 to 119.13 of the Revised Code, the agency shall 874
prepare and certify to the court a complete record of the 875
proceedings in the case. Failure of the agency to comply within 876
the time allowed, upon motion, shall cause the court to enter a 877
finding in favor of the party adversely affected. Additional 878
time, however, may be granted by the court, not to exceed thirty 879
days, when it is shown that the agency has made substantial 880
effort to comply. The record shall be prepared and transcribed, 881
and the expense of it shall be taxed as a part of the costs on 882
the appeal. The appellant shall provide security for costs 883
satisfactory to the court of common pleas. Upon demand by any 884
interested party, the agency shall furnish at the cost of the 885
party requesting it a copy of the stenographic report of 886
testimony offered and evidence submitted at any hearing and a 887
copy of the complete record. 888
(K) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, 889
any party desiring to appeal an order or decision of the state 890
personnel board of review shall, at the time of filing a notice 891
of appeal with the board, provide a security deposit in an 892
amount and manner prescribed in rules that the board shall adopt 893
in accordance with this chapter. In addition, the board is not 894
required to prepare or transcribe the record of any of its 895
proceedings unless the appellant has provided the deposit 896
described above. The failure of the board to prepare or 897
transcribe a record for an appellant who has not provided a 898
security deposit shall not cause a court to enter a finding 899

S. B. No. 197 Page 31
As Introduced
adverse to the board. 900
(L) Unless otherwise provided by law, in the hearing of 901
the appeal, the court is confined to the record as certified to 902
it by the agency. Unless otherwise provided by law, the court 903
may grant a request for the admission of additional evidence 904
when satisfied that the additional evidence is newly discovered 905
and could not with reasonable diligence have been ascertained 906
prior to the hearing before the agency. 907
(M) The court shall conduct a hearing on the appeal and 908
shall give preference to all proceedings under sections 119.01 909
to 119.13 of the Revised Code, over all other civil cases, 910
irrespective of the position of the proceedings on the calendar 911
of the court. An appeal from an order of the state medical board 912
issued pursuant to division (G) of either section 4730.25 or 913
4731.22 of the Revised Code, the state chiropractic board issued 914
pursuant to section 4734.37 of the Revised Code, the liquor 915
control commission issued pursuant to Chapter 4301. or 4303. of 916
the Revised Code, or the Ohio casino control commission issued 917
pursuant to Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code shall be set down 918
for hearing at the earliest possible time and takes precedence 919
over all other actions. The hearing in the court of common pleas 920
shall proceed as in the trial of a civil action, and the court 921
shall determine the rights of the parties in accordance with the 922
laws applicable to a civil action. At the hearing, counsel may 923
be heard on oral argument, briefs may be submitted, and evidence 924
may be introduced if the court has granted a request for the 925
presentation of additional evidence. 926
(N) The court may affirm the order of the agency 927
complained of in the appeal if it finds, upon consideration of 928
the entire record and any additional evidence the court has 929

S. B. No. 197 Page 32
As Introduced
admitted, that the order is supported by reliable, probative, 930
and substantial evidence and is in accordance with law. In the 931
absence of this finding, it may reverse, vacate, or modify the 932
order or make such other ruling as is supported by reliable, 933
probative, and substantial evidence and is in accordance with 934
law. The court shall award compensation for fees in accordance 935
with section 2335.39 of the Revised Code to a prevailing party, 936
other than an agency, in an appeal filed pursuant to this 937
section. 938
(O) The judgment of the court shall be final and 939
conclusive unless reversed, vacated, or modified on appeal. 940
These appeals may be taken either by the party or the agency, 941
shall proceed as in the case of appeals in civil actions, and 942
shall be pursuant to the Rules of Appellate Procedure and, to 943
the extent not in conflict with those rules, Chapter 2505. of 944
the Revised Code. An appeal by the agency shall be taken on 945
questions of law relating to the constitutionality, 946
construction, or interpretation of statutes and rules of the 947
agency, and, in the appeal, the court may also review and 948
determine the correctness of the judgment of the court of common 949
pleas that the order of the agency is not supported by any 950
reliable, probative, and substantial evidence in the entire 951
record. 952
The court shall certify its judgment to the agency or take 953
any other action necessary to give its judgment effect. 954
Sec. 121.95. (A) As used in sections 121.95, 121.951, 955
121.952, 121.953, and 121.954 of the Revised Code, "state 956
agency" means an administrative department created under section 957
121.02 of the Revised Code, an administrative department head 958
appointed under section 121.03 of the Revised Code, and a state 959

S. B. No. 197 Page 33
As Introduced
agency organized under an administrative department or 960
administrative department head. "State agency" also includes the 961
department of education and workforce, the state lottery 962
commission, the Ohio casino control commission, the state racing 963
commission, and the public utilities commission of Ohio. Rules 964
adopted by an otherwise independent official or entity organized 965
under a state agency shall be attributed to the agency under 966
which the official or entity is organized for the purposes of 967
sections 121.95, 121.951, 121.952, 121.953, and 121.954 of the 968
Revised Code. 969
(B) Not later than December 31, 2019, a state agency shall 970
review its existing rules to identify rules having one or more 971
regulatory restrictions that require or prohibit an action and 972
prepare a base inventory of the regulatory restrictions in its 973
existing rules. Rules that include the words "shall," "must," 974
"require," "shall not," "may not," and "prohibit" shall be 975
considered to contain regulatory restrictions. 976
(C) In the base inventory, the state agency shall indicate 977
all of the following concerning each regulatory restriction: 978
(1) A description of the regulatory restriction; 979
(2) The rule number of the rule in which the regulatory 980
restriction appears; 981
(3) The statute under which the regulatory restriction was 982
adopted; 983
(4) Whether state or federal law expressly and 984
specifically requires the agency to adopt the regulatory 985
restriction or the agency adopted the regulatory restriction 986
under the agency's general authority; 987
(5) Whether removing the regulatory restriction would 988

S. B. No. 197 Page 34
As Introduced
require a change to state or federal law, provided that removing 989
a regulatory restriction adopted under a law granting the agency 990
general authority shall be presumed not to require a change to 991
state or federal law; 992
(6) Any other information the joint committee on agency 993
rule review considers necessary. 994
(D) The state agency shall compute and state the total 995
number of regulatory restrictions indicated in the base 996
inventory, shall post the base inventory on its web site, and 997
shall electronically transmit a copy of the inventory to the 998
joint committee. The joint committee shall review the base 999
inventory, then transmit it electronically to the speaker of the 1000
house of representatives and the president of the senate. 1001
(E) The following types of rules or regulatory 1002
restrictions are not required to be included in a state agency's 1003
inventory of regulatory restrictions: 1004
(1) An internal management rule; 1005
(2) An emergency rule; 1006
(3) A rule that state or federal law requires the state 1007
agency to adopt verbatim; 1008
(4) A regulatory restriction contained in materials or 1009
documents incorporated by reference into a rule pursuant to 1010
sections 121.71 to 121.75 of the Revised Code; 1011
(5) A rule adopted pursuant to section 1347.15 of the 1012
Revised Code; 1013
(6) A rule concerning instant lottery games; 1014
(7) A rule adopted by the Ohio casino control commission 1015

S. B. No. 197 Page 35
As Introduced
or the state lottery commission concerning sports gaming; 1016
(8) Any other rule that is not subject to review under 1017
Chapter 106. of the Revised Code; 1018
(9) Any rule that is adopted as a requirement for the 1019
state agency to obtain or maintain accreditation or 1020
certification from a multistate organization consisting of at 1021
least forty-five participating states. 1022
(F) Beginning on October 17, 2019, and ending on June 30, 1023
2025, a state agency may not adopt a new regulatory restriction 1024
unless it simultaneously removes two or more other existing 1025
regulatory restrictions. The state agency may not satisfy this 1026
section by merging two or more existing regulatory restrictions 1027
into a single surviving regulatory restriction. 1028
Sec. 131.02. (A) Except as otherwise provided in section 1029
4123.37, section 5703.061, and division (K) of section 4123.511 1030
of the Revised Code, whenever any amount is payable to the 1031
state, the officer, employee, or agent responsible for 1032
administering the law under which the amount is payable shall 1033
immediately proceed to collect the amount or cause the amount to 1034
be collected and shall pay the amount into the state treasury or 1035
into the appropriate custodial fund in the manner set forth 1036
pursuant to section 113.08 of the Revised Code. Except as 1037
otherwise provided in this division, if the amount is not paid 1038
within forty-five days after payment is due, the officer, 1039
employee, or agent shall certify the amount due to the attorney 1040
general, in the form and manner prescribed by the attorney 1041
general. In the case of an amount payable by a student enrolled 1042
in a state institution of higher education, the amount shall be 1043
certified within the later of forty-five days after the amount 1044
is due or the tenth day after the beginning of the next academic 1045

S. B. No. 197 Page 36
As Introduced
semester, quarter, or other session following the session for 1046
which the payment is payable. The attorney general may assess 1047
the collection cost to the amount certified in such manner and 1048
amount as prescribed by the attorney general. If an amount 1049
payable to a political subdivision is past due, the political 1050
subdivision may, with the approval of the attorney general, 1051
certify the amount to the attorney general pursuant to this 1052
section. 1053
For the purposes of this section, the attorney general and 1054
the officer, employee, or agent responsible for administering 1055
the law under which the amount is payable shall agree on the 1056
time a payment is due, and that agreed upon time shall be one of 1057
the following times: 1058
(1) If a law, including an administrative rule, of this 1059
state prescribes the time a payment is required to be made or 1060
reported, when the payment is required by that law to be paid or 1061
reported. 1062
(2) If the payment is for services rendered, when the 1063
rendering of the services is completed. 1064
(3) If the payment is reimbursement for a loss, when the 1065
loss is incurred. 1066
(4) In the case of a fine or penalty for which a law or 1067
administrative rule does not prescribe a time for payment, when 1068
the fine or penalty is first assessed. 1069
(5) If the payment arises from a legal finding, judgment, 1070
or adjudication order, when the finding, judgment, or order is 1071
rendered or issued. 1072
(6) If the payment arises from an overpayment of money by 1073
the state to another person, when the overpayment is discovered. 1074

S. B. No. 197 Page 37
As Introduced
(7) The date on which the amount for which an individual 1075
is personally liable under section 5735.35, section 5739.33, or 1076
division (G) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code is 1077
determined. 1078
(8) Upon proof of claim being filed in a bankruptcy case. 1079
(9) Any other appropriate time determined by the attorney 1080
general and the officer, employee, or agent responsible for 1081
administering the law under which the amount is payable on the 1082
basis of statutory requirements or ordinary business processes 1083
of the agency, institution, or political subdivision to which 1084
the payment is owed. 1085
(B)(1) The attorney general shall give immediate notice by 1086
mail or otherwise to the party indebted of the nature and amount 1087
of the indebtedness. 1088
(2) If the amount payable to this state arises from a tax 1089
levied under Chapter 5733., 5739., 5741., 5747., or 5751. of the 1090
Revised Code, the notice also shall specify all of the 1091
following: 1092
(a) The assessment or case number; 1093
(b) The tax pursuant to which the assessment is made; 1094
(c) The reason for the liability, including, if 1095
applicable, that a penalty or interest is due; 1096
(d) An explanation of how and when interest will be added 1097
to the amount assessed; 1098
(e) That the attorney general and tax commissioner, acting 1099
together, have the authority, but are not required, to 1100
compromise the claim and accept payment over a reasonable time, 1101
if such actions are in the best interest of the state. 1102

S. B. No. 197 Page 38
As Introduced
(C) The attorney general shall collect the claim or secure 1103
a judgment and issue an execution for its collection. 1104
(D) Each claim shall bear interest, from the day on which 1105
the claim became due, at the rate per annum required by section 1106
5703.47 of the Revised Code. 1107
(E) The attorney general and the chief officer of the 1108
agency reporting a claim, acting together, may do any of the 1109
following if such action is in the best interests of the state: 1110
(1) Compromise the claim; 1111
(2) Extend for a reasonable period the time for payment of 1112
the claim by agreeing to accept monthly or other periodic 1113
payments. The agreement may require security for payment of the 1114
claim. 1115
(3) Add fees to recover the cost of processing checks or 1116
other draft instruments returned for insufficient funds and the 1117
cost of providing electronic payment options. 1118
(F)(1) Except as provided in division (F)(2) of this 1119
section, if the attorney general finds, after investigation, 1120
that any claim due and owing to the state is uncollectible, the 1121
attorney general, with the consent of the chief officer of the 1122
agency reporting the claim, may do the following: 1123
(a) Sell, convey, or otherwise transfer the claim to one 1124
or more private entities for collection; 1125
(b) Cancel the claim or cause it to be canceled. 1126
(2) The attorney general shall cancel or cause to be 1127
canceled an unsatisfied claim on the date that is forty years 1128
after the date the claim is certified, unless the attorney 1129
general has adopted a rule under division (F)(5) of this section 1130

S. B. No. 197 Page 39
As Introduced
shortening this time frame with respect to a subset of claims. 1131
(3) No initial action shall be commenced to collect any 1132
tax payable to the state that is administered by the tax 1133
commissioner, whether or not such tax is subject to division (B) 1134
of this section, or any penalty, interest, or additional charge 1135
on such tax, after the expiration of the period ending on the 1136
later of the dates specified in divisions (F)(3)(a) and (b) of 1137
this section, provided that such period shall be extended by the 1138
period of any stay to such collection or by any other period to 1139
which the parties mutually agree. If the initial action in aid 1140
of execution is commenced before the later of the dates 1141
specified in divisions (F)(3)(a) and (b) of this section, any 1142
and all subsequent actions may be pursued in aid of execution of 1143
judgment for as long as the debt exists. 1144
(a) Seven years after the assessment of the tax, penalty, 1145
interest, or additional charge is issued. 1146
(b) Four years after the assessment of the tax, penalty, 1147
interest, or additional charge becomes final. For the purposes 1148
of division (F)(3)(b) of this section, the assessment becomes 1149
final at the latest of the following: upon expiration of the 1150
period to petition for reassessment, or if applicable, to appeal 1151
a final determination of the commissioner or decision of the 1152
board of tax appeals or a court, or, if applicable, upon 1153
decision of the United States supreme court. 1154
For the purposes of division (F)(3) of this section, an 1155
initial action to collect a tax debt is commenced at the time 1156
when a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making an 1157
assessment final has been filed in the office of the clerk of 1158
court of common pleas in the county in which the taxpayer 1159
resides or has its principal place of business in this state, or 1160

S. B. No. 197 Page 40
As Introduced
in the office of the clerk of court of common pleas of Franklin 1161
county, as provided in section 5739.13, 5741.14, 5747.13, or 1162
5751.09 of the Revised Code or in any other applicable law 1163
requiring such a filing. If an assessment has not been issued 1164
and there is no time limitation on the issuance of an assessment 1165
under applicable law, an action to collect a tax debt commences 1166
when the action is filed in the courts of this state to collect 1167
the liability. 1168
(4) If information contained in a claim that is sold, 1169
conveyed, or transferred to a private entity pursuant to this 1170
section is confidential pursuant to federal law or a section of 1171
the Revised Code that implements a federal law governing 1172
confidentiality, such information remains subject to that law 1173
during and following the sale, conveyance, or transfer. 1174
(5) The attorney general may adopt rules to aid in the 1175
implementation of this section. 1176
(G) The attorney general shall develop and implement a 1177
real time data match program and make it available to all of the 1178
following persons to identify patrons who owe amounts to the 1179
state or a political subdivision pursuant to sections 3770.073 1180
and 3772.37 of the Revised Code: 1181
(1) Each permit holder operating under Chapter 3769. of 1182
the Revised Code; 1183
(2) The state lottery commission; 1184
(3) Each video lottery sales agent operating under 1185
sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code; 1186
(4) Each internet gambling operator operating under 1187
Chapter 3771. of the Revised Code; 1188

S. B. No. 197 Page 41
As Introduced
(5) Each casino operator and management company operating 1189
under Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code; 1190
(6) Each sports gaming proprietor operating under Chapter 1191
3775. of the Revised Code. 1192
Sec. 718.031. As used in this section, "sports : 1193
"Permit holder" and "track" have the same meanings as in 1194
section 3769.01 of the Revised Code. 1195
"Sports gaming facility" and "type B sports gaming 1196
proprietor" have the same meanings as in section 3775.01 of the 1197
Revised Code and "lottery . 1198
"Lottery sports gaming," has "video lottery terminal," and 1199
"video lottery sales agent" have the same meaning meanings as in 1200
section 3770.23 3770.01 of the Revised Code. 1201
"Casino facility" and "casino operator" have the same 1202
meanings as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. 1203
(A) A municipal corporation shall require the following 1204
persons to withhold and remit municipal income tax with respect 1205
to amounts other than qualifying wages as provided in this 1206
section: 1207
(1) A casino facility or a casino operator, as defined in 1208
Section 6(C)(9) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution, and section 1209
3772.01 of the Revised Code, respectively with respect to 1210
winnings from casino gaming; 1211
(2) A lottery sales agent conducting video lottery 1212
terminals on behalf of the state sales agent, with respect to 1213
winnings from a video lottery terminal at a track; 1214
(3) A type B sports gaming proprietor offering , with 1215

S. B. No. 197 Page 42
As Introduced
respect to winnings from sports gaming conducted at a sports 1216
gaming facility; 1217
(4) A permit holder, with respect to winnings from pari- 1218
mutuel wagering on horse racing conducted in person at a track. 1219
(B) If a person's winnings at a casino facility or sports 1220
gaming facility described in division (A) of this section are an 1221
amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of 1222
the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue 1223
Code, as amended, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor 1224
the applicable person described in division (A) of this section 1225
shall deduct and withhold municipal income tax from the person's 1226
winnings at the rate of the tax imposed by the municipal 1227
corporation in which the casino facility or , sports gaming 1228
facility, or track is located. 1229
(C) Amounts deducted and withheld by a casino operator or 1230
sports gaming proprietor under this section are held in trust 1231
for the benefit of the municipal corporation to which the tax is 1232
owed. 1233
(1) On or before the tenth day of each month, the casino 1234
operator or sports gaming proprietor person conducting the 1235
withholding shall file a return electronically with the tax 1236
administrator of the municipal corporation, providing the name, 1237
address, and social security number of the person from whose 1238
winnings amounts were deducted and withheld, the amount of each 1239
such deduction and withholding during the preceding calendar 1240
month, the amount of the winnings from which each such amount 1241
was withheld, the type of casino gaming or sports gaming that 1242
resulted in such winnings, and any other information required by 1243
the tax administrator. With this return, the casino operator or 1244
sports gaming proprietor person conducting the withholding shall 1245

S. B. No. 197 Page 43
As Introduced
remit electronically to the municipal corporation all amounts 1246
deducted and withheld during the preceding month. 1247
(2) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of 1248
January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor the 1249
person conducting the withholding shall file an annual return 1250
electronically with the tax administrator of the municipal 1251
corporation in which the casino facility or , sports gaming 1252
facility, or track is located, indicating the total amount 1253
deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The 1254
casino operator or sports gaming proprietor person conducting 1255
the withholding shall remit electronically with the annual 1256
return any amount that was deducted and withheld and that was 1257
not previously remitted. If the name, address, or social 1258
security number of a person or the amount deducted and withheld 1259
with respect to that person was omitted on a monthly return for 1260
that reporting period, that information shall be indicated on 1261
the annual return. 1262
(3) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of 1263
January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor the 1264
person conducting the withholding shall issue an information 1265
return to each person with respect to whom an amount has been 1266
deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The 1267
information return shall show the total amount of municipal 1268
income tax deducted from the person's winnings during the 1269
preceding year. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor 1270
person conducting the withholding shall provide to the tax 1271
administrator a copy of each information return issued under 1272
this division. The administrator may require that such copies be 1273
transmitted electronically. 1274
(4) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor person 1275

S. B. No. 197 Page 44
As Introduced
described in division (A) of this section that fails to file a 1276
return and remit the amounts deducted and withheld shall be 1277
personally liable for the amount withheld and not remitted. Such 1278
personal liability extends to any penalty and interest imposed 1279
for the late filing of a return or the late payment of tax 1280
deducted and withheld. 1281
(5) If a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor 1282
person described in division (A) of this section sells the 1283
casino facility or , sports gaming facility, or track or 1284
otherwise quits the casino or sports gaming applicable business, 1285
the amounts deducted and withheld along with any penalties and 1286
interest thereon are immediately due and payable. The successor 1287
shall withhold an amount of the purchase money that is 1288
sufficient to cover the amounts deducted and withheld along with 1289
any penalties and interest thereon until the predecessor casino 1290
operator or sports gaming proprietor produces either of the 1291
following: 1292
(a) A receipt from the tax administrator showing that the 1293
amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon 1294
have been paid; 1295
(b) A certificate from the tax administrator indicating 1296
that no amounts are due. 1297
If the successor fails to withhold purchase money, the 1298
successor is personally liable for the payment of the amounts 1299
deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon. 1300
(6) The failure of a casino operator or sports gaming 1301
proprietor person described in division (A) of this section to 1302
deduct and withhold the required amount from a person's winnings 1303
does not relieve that person from liability for the municipal 1304

S. B. No. 197 Page 45
As Introduced
income tax with respect to those winnings. 1305
(D) If a person's prize award from a video lottery 1306
terminal or from lottery sports gaming offered in a video 1307
lottery terminal facility is an amount for which reporting to 1308
the internal revenue service is required by section 6041 of the 1309
Internal Revenue Code, as amended, the video lottery sales agent 1310
shall deduct and withhold municipal income tax from the person's 1311
prize award at the rate of the tax imposed by the municipal 1312
corporation in which the video lottery terminal facility is 1313
located. 1314
(E) Amounts deducted and withheld by a video lottery sales 1315
agent are held in trust for the benefit of the municipal 1316
corporation to which the tax is owed. 1317
(1) The video lottery sales agent shall issue to a person 1318
from whose prize award an amount has been deducted and withheld 1319
a receipt for the amount deducted and withheld, and shall obtain 1320
from the person receiving a prize award the person's name, 1321
address, and social security number in order to facilitate the 1322
preparation of returns required by this section. 1323
(2) On or before the tenth day of each month, the video 1324
lottery sales agent shall file a return electronically with the 1325
tax administrator of the municipal corporation providing the 1326
names, addresses, and social security numbers of the persons 1327
from whose prize awards amounts were deducted and withheld, the 1328
amount of each such deduction and withholding during the 1329
preceding calendar month, the amount of the prize award from 1330
which each such amount was withheld, and any other information 1331
required by the tax administrator. With the return, the video 1332
lottery sales agent shall remit electronically to the tax 1333
administrator all amounts deducted and withheld during the 1334

S. B. No. 197 Page 46
As Introduced
preceding month. 1335
(3) A video lottery sales agent shall maintain a record of 1336
all receipts issued under division (E) of this section and shall 1337
make those records available to the tax administrator upon 1338
request. Such records shall be maintained in accordance with 1339
section 5747.17 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted 1340
pursuant thereto. 1341
(4) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of 1342
January, each video lottery terminal sales agent shall file an 1343
annual return electronically with the tax administrator of the 1344
municipal corporation in which the facility is located 1345
indicating the total amount deducted and withheld during the 1346
preceding calendar year. The video lottery sales agent shall 1347
remit electronically with the annual return any amount that was 1348
deducted and withheld and that was not previously remitted. If 1349
the name, address, or social security number of a person or the 1350
amount deducted and withheld with respect to that person was 1351
omitted on a monthly return for that reporting period, that 1352
information shall be indicated on the annual return. 1353
(5) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of 1354
January, a video lottery sales agent shall issue an information 1355
return to each person with respect to whom an amount has been 1356
deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The 1357
information return shall show the total amount of municipal 1358
income tax deducted and withheld from the person's prize award 1359
by the video lottery sales agent during the preceding year. A 1360
video lottery sales agent shall provide to the tax administrator 1361
of the municipal corporation a copy of each information return 1362
issued under this division. The tax administrator may require 1363
that such copies be transmitted electronically. 1364

S. B. No. 197 Page 47
As Introduced
(6) A video lottery sales agent who fails to file a return 1365
and remit the amounts deducted and withheld is personally liable 1366
for the amount deducted and withheld and not remitted. Such 1367
personal liability extends to any penalty and interest imposed 1368
for the late filing of a return or the late payment of tax 1369
deducted and withheld. 1370
(F) If a video lottery sales agent ceases to operate video 1371
lottery terminals, the amounts deducted and withheld along with 1372
any penalties and interest thereon are immediately due and 1373
payable. The successor of the video lottery sales agent that 1374
purchases the video lottery terminals from the agent shall 1375
withhold an amount from the purchase money that is sufficient to 1376
cover the amounts deducted and withheld and any penalties and 1377
interest thereon until the predecessor video lottery sales agent 1378
operator produces either of the following: 1379
(1) A receipt from the tax administrator showing that the 1380
amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon 1381
have been paid; 1382
(2) A certificate from the tax administrator indicating 1383
that no amounts are due. 1384
If the successor fails to withhold purchase money, the 1385
successor is personally liable for the payment of the amounts 1386
deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon. 1387
(G) The failure of a video lottery sales agent to deduct 1388
and withhold the required amount from a person's prize award 1389
does not relieve that person from liability for the municipal 1390
income tax with respect to that prize award. 1391
(H) If a casino operator, sports gaming proprietor, or 1392
lottery sales agent person described in division (A) of this 1393

S. B. No. 197 Page 48
As Introduced
section files a return late, fails to file a return, remits 1394
amounts deducted and withheld late, or fails to remit amounts 1395
deducted and withheld as required under this section, the tax 1396
administrator of a municipal corporation may impose the 1397
following applicable penalty: 1398
(1) For the late remittance of, or failure to remit, tax 1399
deducted and withheld under this section, a penalty equal to 1400
fifty per cent of the tax deducted and withheld; 1401
(2) For the failure to file, or the late filing of, a 1402
monthly or annual return, a penalty of five hundred dollars for 1403
each return not filed or filed late. Interest shall accrue on 1404
past due amounts deducted and withheld at the rate prescribed in 1405
section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. 1406
(I) (E) Amounts deducted and withheld on behalf of a 1407
municipal corporation shall be allowed as a credit against 1408
payment of the tax imposed by the municipal corporation and 1409
shall be treated as taxes paid for purposes of section 718.08 of 1410
the Revised Code. This division applies only to the person for 1411
whom the amount is deducted and withheld. 1412
(J) (F) The tax administrator shall prescribe the forms of 1413
the receipts and returns required under this section. 1414
Sec. 959.05. No person shall administer to any animal 1415
within forty-eight hours prior to the time that the animal 1416
competes at a fair or exhibition conducted by a county or 1417
independent agricultural society authorized under Chapter 1711. 1418
of the Revised Code or by the Ohio expositions commission any 1419
drug or medicament not specifically permitted under rules of the 1420
state racing Ohio casino control commission promulgated pursuant 1421
to Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code or under rules of the 1422

S. B. No. 197 Page 49
As Introduced
society, in respect to a county or independent agricultural 1423
society, or of the Ohio expositions commission, in respect to 1424
the Ohio state fair. This section does not apply to any horse 1425
racing meeting conducted under a permit issued pursuant to 1426
Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code. 1427
Sec. 1309.109. (A) Except as otherwise provided in 1428
divisions (C) and (D) of this section, this chapter applies to 1429
the following: 1430
(1) A transaction, regardless of its form, that creates a 1431
security interest in personal property or fixtures by contract; 1432
(2) An agricultural lien; 1433
(3) A sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment 1434
intangibles, or promissory notes; 1435
(4) A consignment; 1436
(5) A security interest arising under section 1302.42 or 1437
1302.49, division (C) of section 1302.85, or division (E) of 1438
section 1310.54 of the Revised Code, as provided in section 1439
1309.110 of the Revised Code; and 1440
(6) A security interest arising under section 1304.20 or 1441
1305.18 of the Revised Code. 1442
(B) The application of this chapter to a security interest 1443
in a secured obligation is not affected by the fact that the 1444
obligation is itself secured by a transaction or interest to 1445
which this chapter does not apply. 1446
(C) This chapter does not apply to the extent that: 1447
(1) A statute, regulation, or treaty of the United States 1448
preempts this chapter; or 1449

S. B. No. 197 Page 50
As Introduced
(2) The rights of a transferee beneficiary or nominated 1450
person under a letter of credit are independent and superior 1451
under section 1305.13 of the Revised Code. 1452
(D) This chapter does not apply to the following: 1453
(1) A landlord's lien, other than an agricultural lien; 1454
(2)(a) A lien, not enumerated in division (D)(2) of this 1455
section and other than an agricultural lien, given by statute or 1456
other rule of law for services or materials, including any lien 1457
created under any provision of Chapter 926., sections 1311.55 to 1458
1311.57, sections 1311.71 to 1311.80, section 1701.66, or 1459
Chapter 4585. of the Revised Code; 1460
(b) Notwithstanding division (D)(2)(a) of this section, 1461
section 1309.333 of the Revised Code applies with respect to 1462
priority of the lien. 1463
(3) An assignment of a claim for wages, salary, or other 1464
compensation of an employee; 1465
(4) A sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment 1466
intangibles, or promissory notes as part of a sale of the 1467
business out of which they arose; 1468
(5) An assignment of accounts, chattel paper, payment 1469
intangibles, or promissory notes that is for the purpose of 1470
collection only; 1471
(6) An assignment of a right to payment under a contract 1472
to an assignee that is also obligated to perform under the 1473
contract; 1474
(7) An assignment of a single account, payment intangible, 1475
or promissory note to an assignee in full or partial 1476
satisfaction of a preexisting indebtedness; 1477

S. B. No. 197 Page 51
As Introduced
(8) A transfer of an interest in or an assignment of a 1478
claim under a policy of insurance, other than an assignment by 1479
or to a health-care provider of a health-care-insurance 1480
receivable and any subsequent assignment of the right to 1481
payment, but sections 1309.315 and 1309.322 of the Revised Code 1482
apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds; 1483
(9) An assignment of a right represented by a judgment, 1484
other than a judgment taken on a right to payment that was 1485
collateral; 1486
(10) A right of recoupment or set-off, but: 1487
(a) Section 1309.340 of the Revised Code applies with 1488
respect to the effectiveness of rights of recoupment or set-off 1489
against deposit accounts; and 1490
(b) Section 1309.404 of the Revised Code applies with 1491
respect to defenses or claims of an account debtor. 1492
(11) The creation or transfer of an interest in or lien on 1493
real property, including a lease or rents under a lease, except 1494
to the extent that provision is made for: 1495
(a) Liens on real property in sections 1309.203 and 1496
1309.308 of the Revised Code; 1497
(b) Fixtures in section 1309.334 of the Revised Code; 1498
(c) Fixture filings in sections 1309.501, 1309.502, 1499
1309.512, 1309.516, and 1309.519 of the Revised Code; and 1500
(d) Security agreements covering personal and real 1501
property in section 1309.604 of the Revised Code. 1502
(12) An assignment of a claim arising in tort, other than 1503
a commercial tort claim, but sections 1309.315 and 1309.322 of 1504

S. B. No. 197 Page 52
As Introduced
the Revised Code apply with respect to proceeds and priorities 1505
in proceeds; 1506
(13) An assignment of a deposit account in a consumer 1507
transaction, but sections 1309.315 and 1309.322 of the Revised 1508
Code apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds; 1509
or 1510
(14) A transfer by a government, state, or governmental 1511
unit. 1512
(E) The granting of a security interest in all or any part 1513
of a lottery prize award for consideration is subject to the 1514
prohibition of division (C) of section 3770.07 of the Revised 1515
Code. The sale, assignment, or other redirection of a lottery 1516
prize award for consideration is subject to the provisions of 1517
division (D) of section 3770.07 and sections 3770.10 3770.11 to 1518
3770.14 of the Revised Code. 1519
Sec. 1711.09. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this 1520
section, county agricultural societies, independent agricultural 1521
societies, and the Ohio expositions commission shall not permit 1522
during any fair, or for one week before or three days after any 1523
fair, any dealing in spirituous liquors, or at any time allow or 1524
tolerate immoral shows, lottery devices, games of chance, or 1525
gambling of any kind, including pool selling and paddle wheels, 1526
anywhere on the fairground. 1527
(B) A county or independent agricultural society or the 1528
Ohio expositions commission shall not permit a person at any 1529
time to operate any side show, amusement, game, or device, or 1530
offer for sale any novelty by auction or solicitation, on the 1531
fairground who has not first obtained from the director of 1532
agriculture a license under section 1711.11 of the Revised Code. 1533

S. B. No. 197 Page 53
As Introduced
(C) This section does not prohibit the sale of lottery 1534
tickets by the state lottery commission pursuant to Chapter 1535
3770. of the Revised Code at the state fairground during the 1536
state fair. In addition, a county or independent agricultural 1537
society may permit, at any time except during a fair or for one 1538
week before or three days after a fair, a charitable 1539
organization to conduct in accordance with Chapter 2915. 3768. 1540
of the Revised Code games of chance or bingo on the fairground 1541
of any county. A charitable organization may lease all or part 1542
of the fairground from the agricultural society for that 1543
purpose. 1544
(D) Any sales of intoxicating liquor transacted on the 1545
fairground is subject to Chapters 4301., 4303., and 4399. of the 1546
Revised Code. 1547
Sec. 1716.21. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (B) of 1548
this section or as specifically required or authorized by 1549
federal law, no agency or official of this state shall impose 1550
any filing or reporting requirement on a charitable 1551
organization, regulated or specifically exempted from regulation 1552
under Chapter 1716. of the Revised Code, that is more stringent, 1553
restrictive, or expansive than the requirements explicitly 1554
authorized by the Revised Code. 1555
(2) Division (A)(1) of this section shall not be construed 1556
as repealing or otherwise negating any rule or requirement 1557
already in existence as of the effective date of this section 1558
September 30, 2021. 1559
(3) Division (A)(1) of this section shall not be construed 1560
as negating or limiting any of the following: 1561
(a) Any civil or criminal right, claim, or defense that 1562

S. B. No. 197 Page 54
As Introduced
the attorney general may assert under the Revised Code or common 1563
law; 1564
(b) The authority of the attorney general to institute and 1565
prosecute an action to enforce any provision of the Revised Code 1566
the attorney general is authorized to enforce; 1567
(c) The independent authority of the attorney general to 1568
protect charitable assets in this state. 1569
(B) This section does not apply to any of the following: 1570
(1) State grants and contracts; 1571
(2) Fraud investigations; 1572
(3) Any enforcement action taken against a specific 1573
charitable organization; 1574
(4) Settlement agreements; 1575
(5) Assurances of discontinuance; 1576
(6) Court judgments; 1577
(7) Entities operating under Chapter 2915. 3768. of the 1578
Revised Code. 1579
Sec. 2915.01. As used in this chapter: 1580
(A) "Bookmaking" means the business of receiving or paying 1581
off bets. 1582
(B) "Bet" means the hazarding of anything of value upon 1583
the result of an event, undertaking, or contingency, but does 1584
not include a bona fide business risk. 1585
(C) "Scheme of chance" means a slot machine unless 1586
authorized under Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code, lottery 1587
unless authorized under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, 1588

S. B. No. 197 Page 55
As Introduced
numbers game, pool conducted for profit, or other scheme in 1589
which a participant gives a valuable consideration for a chance 1590
to win a prize, but does not include bingo, a skill-based 1591
amusement machine, internet gambling authorized under Chapter 1592
3771. of the Revised Code, or a pool not conducted for profit. 1593
"Scheme of chance" includes the use of an electronic device to 1594
reveal the results of a game entry if valuable consideration is 1595
paid, directly or indirectly, for a chance to win a prize. 1596
Valuable consideration is deemed to be paid for a chance to win 1597
a prize in the following instances: 1598
(1) Less than fifty per cent of the goods or services sold 1599
by a scheme of chance operator in exchange for game entries are 1600
used or redeemed by participants at any one location; 1601
(2) Less than fifty per cent of participants who purchase 1602
goods or services at any one location do not accept, use, or 1603
redeem the goods or services sold or purportedly sold; 1604
(3) More than fifty per cent of prizes at any one location 1605
are revealed to participants through an electronic device 1606
simulating a game of chance or a "casino game" as defined in 1607
section 3772.01 of the Revised Code; 1608
(4) The good or service sold by a scheme of chance 1609
operator in exchange for a game entry cannot be used or redeemed 1610
in the manner advertised; 1611
(5) A participant pays more than fair market value for 1612
goods or services offered by a scheme of chance operator in 1613
order to receive one or more game entries; 1614
(6) A participant may use the electronic device to 1615
purchase additional game entries; 1616
(7) A participant may purchase additional game entries by 1617

S. B. No. 197 Page 56
As Introduced
using points or credits won as prizes while using the electronic 1618
device; 1619
(8) A scheme of chance operator pays out in prize money 1620
more than twenty per cent of the gross revenue received at one 1621
location; or 1622
(9) A participant makes a purchase or exchange in order to 1623
obtain any good or service that may be used to facilitate play 1624
on the electronic device. 1625
As used in this division, "electronic device" means a 1626
mechanical, video, digital, or electronic machine or device that 1627
is capable of displaying information on a screen or other 1628
mechanism and that is owned, leased, or otherwise possessed by 1629
any person conducting a scheme of chance, or by that person's 1630
partners, affiliates, subsidiaries, or contractors. "Electronic 1631
device" does not include an electronic instant bingo system. 1632
(D) "Game of chance" means poker, craps, roulette, or 1633
other game in which a player gives anything of value in the hope 1634
of gain, the outcome of which is determined largely by chance, 1635
but does not include bingo. 1636
(E) "Game of chance conducted for profit" means any game 1637
of chance designed to produce income for the person who conducts 1638
or operates the game of chance, but does not include bingo. 1639
(F) "Gambling device" means any of the following: 1640
(1) A book, totalizer, or other equipment for recording 1641
bets; 1642
(2) A ticket, token, or other device representing a 1643
chance, share, or interest in a scheme of chance or evidencing a 1644
bet; 1645

S. B. No. 197 Page 57
As Introduced
(3) A deck of cards, dice, gaming table, roulette wheel, 1646
slot machine, or other apparatus designed for use in connection 1647
with a game of chance; 1648
(4) Any equipment, device, apparatus, or paraphernalia 1649
specially designed for gambling purposes; 1650
(5) Bingo supplies sold or otherwise provided, or used, in 1651
violation of this chapter Chapter 3768. of the Revised Code. 1652
(G) "Gambling offense" means any of the following: 1653
(1) A violation of this chapter; 1654
(2) A violation of an existing or former municipal 1655
ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United States 1656
substantially equivalent to any provision of this chapter or a 1657
violation of section 2915.06 of the Revised Code as it existed 1658
prior to July 1, 1996; 1659
(3) An offense under an existing or former municipal 1660
ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United 1661
States, of which gambling is an element; 1662
(4) A conspiracy or attempt to commit, or complicity in 1663
committing, any offense under division (G)(1), (2), or (3) of 1664
this section. 1665
(H) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, 1666
"charitable organization" means either of the following: 1667
(1) An organization that is exempt from federal income 1668
taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 1669
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; 1670
(2) A volunteer rescue service organization, volunteer 1671
firefighter's organization, veteran's organization, fraternal 1672

S. B. No. 197 Page 58
As Introduced
organization, or sporting organization that is exempt from 1673
federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(4), (c)(7), (c) 1674
(8), (c)(10), or (c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code. 1675
To qualify as a "charitable organization," an organization 1676
shall have been in continuous existence as such in this state 1677
for a period of two years immediately preceding either the 1678
making of an application for a bingo license under section 1679
2915.08 of the Revised Code or the conducting of any game of 1680
chance as provided in division (D) of section 2915.02 of the 1681
Revised Code. 1682
(I) "Religious organization" means any church, body of 1683
communicants, or group that is not organized or operated for 1684
profit and that gathers in common membership for regular worship 1685
and religious observances. 1686
(J) "Veteran's organization" means any individual post or 1687
state headquarters of a national veteran's association or an 1688
auxiliary unit of any individual post of a national veteran's 1689
association, which post, state headquarters, or auxiliary unit 1690
is incorporated as a nonprofit corporation and either has 1691
received a letter from the state headquarters of the national 1692
veteran's association indicating that the individual post or 1693
auxiliary unit is in good standing with the national veteran's 1694
association or has received a letter from the national veteran's 1695
association indicating that the state headquarters is in good 1696
standing with the national veteran's association. As used in 1697
this division, "national veteran's association" means any 1698
veteran's association that has been in continuous existence as 1699
such for a period of at least five years and either is 1700
incorporated by an act of the United States congress or has a 1701
national dues-paying membership of at least five thousand 1702

S. B. No. 197 Page 59
As Introduced
persons. 1703
(K) "Volunteer firefighter's organization" means any 1704
organization of volunteer firefighters, as defined in section 1705
146.01 of the Revised Code, that is organized and operated 1706
exclusively to provide financial support for a volunteer fire 1707
department or a volunteer fire company and that is recognized or 1708
ratified by a county, municipal corporation, or township. 1709
(L) "Fraternal organization" means any society, order, 1710
state headquarters, or association within this state, except a 1711
college or high school fraternity, that is not organized for 1712
profit, that is a branch, lodge, or chapter of a national or 1713
state organization, that exists exclusively for the common 1714
business or sodality of its members. 1715
(M) "Volunteer rescue service organization" means any 1716
organization of volunteers organized to function as an emergency 1717
medical service organization, as defined in section 4765.01 of 1718
the Revised Code. 1719
(N) "Charitable bingo game" means any bingo game described 1720
in division (O)(1) or (2) of this section that is conducted by a 1721
charitable organization that has obtained a license pursuant to 1722
section 2915.08 of the Revised Code and the proceeds of which 1723
are used for a charitable purpose. 1724
(O) "Bingo" means either of the following: 1725
(1) A game with all of the following characteristics: 1726
(a) The participants use bingo cards or sheets, including 1727
paper formats and electronic representation or image formats, 1728
that are divided into twenty-five spaces arranged in five 1729
horizontal and five vertical rows of spaces, with each space, 1730
except the central space, being designated by a combination of a 1731

S. B. No. 197 Page 60
As Introduced
letter and a number and with the central space being designated 1732
as a free space. 1733
(b) The participants cover the spaces on the bingo cards 1734
or sheets that correspond to combinations of letters and numbers 1735
that are announced by a bingo game operator. 1736
(c) A bingo game operator announces combinations of 1737
letters and numbers that appear on objects that a bingo game 1738
operator selects by chance, either manually or mechanically, 1739
from a receptacle that contains seventy-five objects at the 1740
beginning of each game, each object marked by a different 1741
combination of a letter and a number that corresponds to one of 1742
the seventy-five possible combinations of a letter and a number 1743
that can appear on the bingo cards or sheets. 1744
(d) The winner of the bingo game includes any participant 1745
who properly announces during the interval between the 1746
announcements of letters and numbers as described in division 1747
(O)(1)(c) of this section, that a predetermined and preannounced 1748
pattern of spaces has been covered on a bingo card or sheet 1749
being used by the participant. 1750
(2) Instant bingo, electronic instant bingo, and raffles, 1751
"instant bingo ticket dispenser," "electronic instant bingo 1752
system," and "Internal Revenue Code" have the same meanings as 1753
in section 3768.01 of the Revised Code. 1754
(P) (I) "Conduct" means to back, promote, organize, 1755
manage, carry on, sponsor, or prepare for the operation of bingo 1756
or a game of chance, or a scheme of chance, or a sweepstakes. 1757
(Q) "Bingo game operator" means any person, except 1758
security personnel, who performs work or labor at the site of 1759
bingo, including, but not limited to, collecting money from 1760

S. B. No. 197 Page 61
As Introduced
participants, handing out bingo cards or sheets or objects to 1761
cover spaces on bingo cards or sheets, selecting from a 1762
receptacle the objects that contain the combination of letters 1763
and numbers that appear on bingo cards or sheets, calling out 1764
the combinations of letters and numbers, distributing prizes, 1765
selling or redeeming instant bingo tickets or cards, selling or 1766
redeeming electronic instant bingo tickets, credits, or 1767
vouchers, accessing an electronic instant bingo system other 1768
than as a participant, supervising the operation of a punch 1769
board, selling raffle tickets, selecting raffle tickets from a 1770
receptacle and announcing the winning numbers in a raffle, and 1771
preparing, selling, and serving food or beverages. "Bingo game 1772
operator" does not include a person who is installing, 1773
maintaining, updating, or repairing an electronic instant bingo 1774
system. 1775
(R) "Participant" means any person who plays bingo. 1776
(S) "Bingo session" means a period that includes both of 1777
the following: 1778
(1) Not to exceed five continuous hours for the conduct of 1779
one or more games described in division (O)(1) of this section, 1780
instant bingo, and electronic instant bingo; 1781
(2) A period for the conduct of instant bingo and 1782
electronic instant bingo for not more than two hours before and 1783
not more than two hours after the period described in division 1784
(S)(1) of this section. 1785
(T) "Gross receipts" means all money or assets, including 1786
admission fees, that a person receives from bingo without the 1787
deduction of any amounts for prizes paid out or for the expenses 1788
of conducting bingo. "Gross receipts" does not include any money 1789

S. B. No. 197 Page 62
As Introduced
directly taken in from the sale of food or beverages by a 1790
charitable organization conducting bingo, or by a bona fide 1791
auxiliary unit or society of a charitable organization 1792
conducting bingo, provided all of the following apply: 1793
(1) The auxiliary unit or society has been in existence as 1794
a bona fide auxiliary unit or society of the charitable 1795
organization for at least two years prior to conducting bingo. 1796
(2) The person who purchases the food or beverage receives 1797
nothing of value except the food or beverage and items 1798
customarily received with the purchase of that food or beverage. 1799
(3) The food and beverages are sold at customary and 1800
reasonable prices. 1801
(U) "Security personnel" includes any person who either is 1802
a sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy marshal, township 1803
constable, or member of an organized police department of a 1804
municipal corporation or has successfully completed a peace 1805
officer's training course pursuant to sections 109.71 to 109.79 1806
of the Revised Code and who is hired to provide security for the 1807
premises on which bingo is conducted. 1808
(V) "Charitable purpose" means that the net profit of 1809
bingo, other than instant bingo or electronic instant bingo, is 1810
used by, or is given, donated, or otherwise transferred to, any 1811
of the following: 1812
(1) Any organization that is described in subsection 1813
509(a)(1), 509(a)(2), or 509(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code 1814
and is either a governmental unit or an organization that is tax 1815
exempt under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 1816
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; 1817
(2) A veteran's organization that is a post, chapter, or 1818

S. B. No. 197 Page 63
As Introduced
organization of veterans, or an auxiliary unit or society of, or 1819
a trust or foundation for, any such post, chapter, or 1820
organization organized in the United States or any of its 1821
possessions, at least seventy-five per cent of the members of 1822
which are veterans and substantially all of the other members of 1823
which are individuals who are spouses, widows, or widowers of 1824
veterans, or such individuals, provided that no part of the net 1825
earnings of such post, chapter, or organization inures to the 1826
benefit of any private shareholder or individual, and further 1827
provided that the net profit is used by the post, chapter, or 1828
organization for the charitable purposes set forth in division 1829
(B)(12) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, is used for 1830
awarding scholarships to or for attendance at an institution 1831
mentioned in division (B)(12) of section 5739.02 of the Revised 1832
Code, is donated to a governmental agency, or is used for 1833
nonprofit youth activities, the purchase of United States or 1834
Ohio flags that are donated to schools, youth groups, or other 1835
bona fide nonprofit organizations, promotion of patriotism, or 1836
disaster relief; 1837
(3) A fraternal organization that has been in continuous 1838
existence in this state for fifteen years and that uses the net 1839
profit exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, 1840
literary, or educational purposes, or for the prevention of 1841
cruelty to children or animals, if contributions for such use 1842
would qualify as a deductible charitable contribution under 1843
subsection 170 of the Internal Revenue Code; 1844
(4) A volunteer firefighter's organization that uses the 1845
net profit for the purposes set forth in division (K) of this 1846
section. 1847
(W) "Internal Revenue Code" means the "Internal Revenue 1848

S. B. No. 197 Page 64
As Introduced
Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as now or hereafter 1849
amended. 1850
(X) "Youth athletic organization" means any organization, 1851
not organized for profit, that is organized and operated 1852
exclusively to provide financial support to, or to operate, 1853
athletic activities for persons who are twenty-one years of age 1854
or younger by means of sponsoring, organizing, operating, or 1855
contributing to the support of an athletic team, club, league, 1856
or association. 1857
(Y) "Youth athletic park organization" means any 1858
organization, not organized for profit, that satisfies both of 1859
the following: 1860
(1) It owns, operates, and maintains playing fields that 1861
satisfy both of the following: 1862
(a) The playing fields are used for athletic activities by 1863
one or more organizations, not organized for profit, each of 1864
which is organized and operated exclusively to provide financial 1865
support to, or to operate, athletic activities for persons who 1866
are eighteen years of age or younger by means of sponsoring, 1867
organizing, operating, or contributing to the support of an 1868
athletic team, club, league, or association. 1869
(b) The playing fields are not used for any profit-making 1870
activity at any time during the year. 1871
(2) It uses the proceeds of bingo it conducts exclusively 1872
for the operation, maintenance, and improvement of its playing 1873
fields of the type described in division (Y)(1) of this section. 1874
(Z) "Bingo supplies" means bingo cards or sheets; instant 1875
bingo tickets or cards; electronic bingo aids; raffle tickets; 1876
punch boards; seal cards; instant bingo ticket dispensers; 1877

S. B. No. 197 Page 65
As Introduced
electronic instant bingo systems; and devices for selecting or 1878
displaying the combination of bingo letters and numbers or 1879
raffle tickets. Items that are "bingo supplies" are not gambling 1880
devices if sold or otherwise provided, and used, in accordance 1881
with this chapter. For purposes of this chapter, "bingo 1882
supplies" are not to be considered equipment used to conduct a 1883
bingo game. 1884
(AA) "Instant bingo" means a form of bingo that shall use 1885
folded or banded tickets or paper cards with perforated break- 1886
open tabs, a face of which is covered or otherwise hidden from 1887
view to conceal a number, letter, or symbol, or set of numbers, 1888
letters, or symbols, some of which have been designated in 1889
advance as prize winners, and may also include games in which 1890
some winners are determined by the random selection of one or 1891
more bingo numbers by the use of a seal card or bingo blower. 1892
"Instant bingo" also includes a punch board game. In all 1893
"instant bingo" the prize amount and structure shall be 1894
predetermined. "Instant bingo" does not include electronic 1895
instant bingo or any device that is activated by the insertion 1896
of a coin, currency, token, or an equivalent, and that contains 1897
as one of its components a video display monitor that is capable 1898
of displaying numbers, letters, symbols, or characters in 1899
winning or losing combinations. 1900
(BB) "Seal card" means a form of instant bingo that uses 1901
instant bingo tickets in conjunction with a board or placard 1902
that contains one or more seals that, when removed or opened, 1903
reveal predesignated winning numbers, letters, or symbols. 1904
(CC) "Raffle" means a form of bingo in which the one or 1905
more prizes are won by one or more persons who have purchased a 1906
raffle ticket. The one or more winners of the raffle are 1907

S. B. No. 197 Page 66
As Introduced
determined by drawing a ticket stub or other detachable section 1908
from a receptacle containing ticket stubs or detachable sections 1909
corresponding to all tickets sold for the raffle. "Raffle" does 1910
not include the drawing of a ticket stub or other detachable 1911
section of a ticket purchased to attend a professional sporting 1912
event if both of the following apply: 1913
(1) The ticket stub or other detachable section is used to 1914
select the winner of a free prize given away at the professional 1915
sporting event; and 1916
(2) The cost of the ticket is the same as the cost of a 1917
ticket to the professional sporting event on days when no free 1918
prize is given away. 1919
(DD) "Punch board" means a form of instant bingo that uses 1920
a board containing a number of holes or receptacles of uniform 1921
size in which are placed, mechanically and randomly, serially 1922
numbered slips of paper that may be punched or drawn from the 1923
hole or receptacle. A player may punch or draw the numbered 1924
slips of paper from the holes or receptacles and obtain the 1925
prize established for the game if the number drawn corresponds 1926
to a winning number or, if the punch board includes the use of a 1927
seal card, a potential winning number. 1928
(EE) "Gross profit" means gross receipts minus the amount 1929
actually expended for the payment of prize awards. 1930
(FF) "Net profit" means gross profit minus expenses. 1931
(GG) "Expenses" means the reasonable amount of gross 1932
profit actually expended for all of the following: 1933
(1) The purchase or lease of bingo supplies; 1934
(2) The annual license fee required under section 2915.08 1935

S. B. No. 197 Page 67
As Introduced
of the Revised Code; 1936
(3) Bank fees and service charges for a bingo session or 1937
game account described in section 2915.10 of the Revised Code; 1938
(4) Audits and accounting services; 1939
(5) Safes; 1940
(6) Cash registers; 1941
(7) Hiring security personnel; 1942
(8) Advertising bingo; 1943
(9) Renting premises in which to conduct a bingo session; 1944
(10) Tables and chairs; 1945
(11) Expenses for maintaining and operating a charitable 1946
organization's facilities, including, but not limited to, a post 1947
home, club house, lounge, tavern, or canteen and any grounds 1948
attached to the post home, club house, lounge, tavern, or 1949
canteen; 1950
(12) Payment of real property taxes and assessments that 1951
are levied on a premises on which bingo is conducted; 1952
(13) Any other product or service directly related to the 1953
conduct of bingo that is authorized in rules adopted by the 1954
attorney general under division (F)(1) of section 2915.08 of the 1955
Revised Code. 1956
(HH) (J) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 1.59 1957
of the Revised Code and includes any firm or any other legal 1958
entity, however organized. 1959
(II) "Revoke" means to void permanently all rights and 1960
privileges of the holder of a license issued under section 1961

S. B. No. 197 Page 68
As Introduced
2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of the Revised Code or a 1962
charitable gaming license issued by another jurisdiction. 1963
(JJ) "Suspend" means to interrupt temporarily all rights 1964
and privileges of the holder of a license issued under section 1965
2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of the Revised Code or a 1966
charitable gaming license issued by another jurisdiction. 1967
(KK) "Distributor" means any person who purchases or 1968
obtains bingo supplies and who does either of the following: 1969
(1) Sells, offers for sale, or otherwise provides or 1970
offers to provide the bingo supplies to another person for use 1971
in this state; 1972
(2) Modifies, converts, adds to, or removes parts from the 1973
bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale for use in 1974
this state. 1975
(LL) "Manufacturer" means any person who assembles 1976
completed bingo supplies from raw materials, other items, or 1977
subparts or who modifies, converts, adds to, or removes parts 1978
from bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale. 1979
(MM) "Gross annual revenues" means the annual gross 1980
receipts derived from the conduct of bingo described in division 1981
(O)(1) of this section plus the annual net profit derived from 1982
the conduct of bingo described in division (O)(2) of this 1983
section. 1984
(NN) "Instant bingo ticket dispenser" means a mechanical 1985
device that dispenses an instant bingo ticket or card as the 1986
sole item of value dispensed and that has the following 1987
characteristics: 1988
(1) It is activated upon the insertion of United States 1989

S. B. No. 197 Page 69
As Introduced
currency. 1990
(2) It performs no gaming functions. 1991
(3) It does not contain a video display monitor or 1992
generate noise. 1993
(4) It is not capable of displaying any numbers, letters, 1994
symbols, or characters in winning or losing combinations. 1995
(5) It does not simulate or display rolling or spinning 1996
reels. 1997
(6) It is incapable of determining whether a dispensed 1998
bingo ticket or card is a winning or nonwinning ticket or card 1999
and requires a winning ticket or card to be paid by a bingo game 2000
operator. 2001
(7) It may provide accounting and security features to aid 2002
in accounting for the instant bingo tickets or cards it 2003
dispenses. 2004
(8) It is not part of an electronic network and is not 2005
interactive. 2006
(OO)(1) "Electronic bingo aid" means an electronic device 2007
used by a participant to monitor bingo cards or sheets purchased 2008
at the time and place of a bingo session and that does all of 2009
the following: 2010
(a) It provides a means for a participant to input numbers 2011
and letters announced by a bingo caller. 2012
(b) It compares the numbers and letters entered by the 2013
participant to the bingo faces previously stored in the memory 2014
of the device. 2015
(c) It identifies a winning bingo pattern. 2016

S. B. No. 197 Page 70
As Introduced
(2) "Electronic bingo aid" does not include any device 2017
into which a coin, currency, token, or an equivalent is inserted 2018
to activate play. 2019
(PP) "Deal" means a single game of instant bingo tickets, 2020
or a single game of electronic instant bingo tickets, all with 2021
the same serial number. 2022
(QQ)(1) (K)(1) "Slot machine" means either of the 2023
following: 2024
(a) Any mechanical, electronic, video, or digital device 2025
that is capable of accepting anything of value, directly or 2026
indirectly, from or on behalf of a player who gives the thing of 2027
value in the hope of gain; 2028
(b) Any mechanical, electronic, video, or digital device 2029
that is capable of accepting anything of value, directly or 2030
indirectly, from or on behalf of a player to conduct bingo or a 2031
scheme or game of chance. 2032
(2) "Slot machine" does not include a skill-based 2033
amusement machine, an instant bingo ticket dispenser, or an 2034
electronic instant bingo system, or an internet gambling system 2035
authorized under Chapter 3771. of the Revised Code. 2036
(RR) "Net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant 2037
bingo or electronic instant bingo" means gross profit minus the 2038
ordinary, necessary, and reasonable expense expended for the 2039
purchase of bingo supplies for the purpose of conducting instant 2040
bingo or electronic instant bingo, and, in the case of instant 2041
bingo or electronic instant bingo conducted by a veteran's, 2042
fraternal, or sporting organization, minus the payment by that 2043
organization of real property taxes and assessments levied on a 2044
premises on which instant bingo or electronic instant bingo is 2045

S. B. No. 197 Page 71
As Introduced
conducted. 2046
(SS) "Charitable instant bingo organization" means an 2047
organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under 2048
subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the 2049
Internal Revenue Code and is a charitable organization as 2050
defined in this section. A "charitable instant bingo 2051
organization" does not include a charitable organization that is 2052
exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and 2053
described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code 2054
and that is created by a veteran's organization, a fraternal 2055
organization, or a sporting organization in regards to bingo 2056
conducted or assisted by a veteran's organization, a fraternal 2057
organization, or a sporting organization pursuant to section 2058
2915.13 of the Revised Code. 2059
(TT) "Game flare" means the board or placard, or 2060
electronic representation of a board or placard, that 2061
accompanies each deal of instant bingo or electronic instant 2062
bingo tickets and that includes the following information for 2063
the game: 2064
(1) The name of the game; 2065
(2) The manufacturer's name or distinctive logo; 2066
(3) The form number; 2067
(4) The ticket count; 2068
(5) The prize structure, including the number of winning 2069
tickets by denomination and the respective winning symbol or 2070
number combinations for the winning tickets; 2071
(6) The cost per play; 2072
(7) The serial number of the game. 2073

S. B. No. 197 Page 72
As Introduced
(UU)(1) (L) "Skill-based amusement machine" means a 2074
mechanical, video, digital, or electronic device that rewards 2075
the player or players, if at all, only with merchandise prizes 2076
or with redeemable vouchers redeemable only for merchandise 2077
prizes, provided that with respect to rewards for playing the 2078
game all of the following apply: 2079
(a) The wholesale value of a merchandise prize awarded as 2080
a result of the single play of a machine does not exceed ten 2081
dollars; 2082
(b) Redeemable vouchers awarded for any single play of a 2083
machine are not redeemable for a merchandise prize with a 2084
wholesale value of more than ten dollars; 2085
(c) Redeemable vouchers are not redeemable for a 2086
merchandise prize that has a wholesale value of more than ten 2087
dollars times the fewest number of single plays necessary to 2088
accrue the redeemable vouchers required to obtain that prize; 2089
and 2090
(d) Any redeemable vouchers or merchandise prizes are 2091
distributed at the site of the skill-based amusement machine at 2092
the time of play has the same meaning as in section 3777.01 of 2093
the Revised Code. 2094
A card for the purchase of gasoline is a redeemable 2095
voucher for purposes of division (UU)(1) of this section even if 2096
the skill-based amusement machine for the play of which the card 2097
is awarded is located at a place where gasoline may not be 2098
legally distributed to the public or the card is not redeemable 2099
at the location of, or at the time of playing, the skill-based 2100
amusement machine. 2101
(2) A device shall not be considered a skill-based 2102

S. B. No. 197 Page 73
As Introduced
amusement machine and shall be considered a slot machine if it 2103
pays cash or one or more of the following apply: 2104
(a) The ability of a player to succeed at the game is 2105
impacted by the number or ratio of prior wins to prior losses of 2106
players playing the game. 2107
(b) Any reward of redeemable vouchers is not based solely 2108
on the player achieving the object of the game or the player's 2109
score; 2110
(c) The outcome of the game, or the value of the 2111
redeemable voucher or merchandise prize awarded for winning the 2112
game, can be controlled by a source other than any player 2113
playing the game. 2114
(d) The success of any player is or may be determined by a 2115
chance event that cannot be altered by player actions. 2116
(e) The ability of any player to succeed at the game is 2117
determined by game features not visible or known to the player. 2118
(f) The ability of the player to succeed at the game is 2119
impacted by the exercise of a skill that no reasonable player 2120
could exercise. 2121
(3) All of the following apply to any machine that is 2122
operated as described in division (UU)(1) of this section: 2123
(a) As used in division (UU) of this section, "game" and 2124
"play" mean one event from the initial activation of the machine 2125
until the results of play are determined without payment of 2126
additional consideration. An individual utilizing a machine that 2127
involves a single game, play, contest, competition, or 2128
tournament may be awarded redeemable vouchers or merchandise 2129
prizes based on the results of play. 2130

S. B. No. 197 Page 74
As Introduced
(b) Advance play for a single game, play, contest, 2131
competition, or tournament participation may be purchased. The 2132
cost of the contest, competition, or tournament participation 2133
may be greater than a single noncontest, competition, or 2134
tournament play. 2135
(c) To the extent that the machine is used in a contest, 2136
competition, or tournament, that contest, competition, or 2137
tournament has a defined starting and ending date and is open to 2138
participants in competition for scoring and ranking results 2139
toward the awarding of redeemable vouchers or merchandise prizes 2140
that are stated prior to the start of the contest, competition, 2141
or tournament. 2142
(4) For purposes of division (UU)(1) of this section, the 2143
mere presence of a device, such as a pin-setting, ball- 2144
releasing, or scoring mechanism, that does not contribute to or 2145
affect the outcome of the play of the game does not make the 2146
device a skill-based amusement machine. 2147
(VV) "Merchandise prize" means any item of value, but 2148
shall not include any of the following: 2149
(1) Cash, gift cards, or any equivalent thereof; 2150
(2) Plays on games of chance, state lottery tickets, or 2151
bingo; 2152
(3) Firearms, tobacco, or alcoholic beverages; or 2153
(4) A redeemable voucher that is redeemable for any of the 2154
items listed in division (VV)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. 2155
(WW) "Redeemable voucher" means any ticket, token, coupon, 2156
receipt, or other noncash representation of value. 2157
(XX) (M) "Pool not conducted for profit" means a scheme in 2158

S. B. No. 197 Page 75
As Introduced
which a participant gives a valuable consideration for a chance 2159
to win a prize and the total amount of consideration wagered is 2160
distributed to a participant or participants. 2161
(YY) "Sporting organization" means a hunting, fishing, or 2162
trapping organization, other than a college or high school 2163
fraternity or sorority, that is not organized for profit, that 2164
is affiliated with a state or national sporting organization, 2165
including but not limited to, the league of Ohio sportsmen, and 2166
that has been in continuous existence in this state for a period 2167
of three years. 2168
(ZZ) "Community action agency" has the same meaning as in 2169
section 122.66 of the Revised Code. 2170
(AAA)(1) "Sweepstakes terminal device" means a mechanical, 2171
video, digital, or electronic machine or device that is owned, 2172
leased, or otherwise possessed by any person conducting a 2173
sweepstakes, or by that person's partners, affiliates, 2174
subsidiaries, or contractors, that is intended to be used by a 2175
sweepstakes participant, and that is capable of displaying 2176
information on a screen or other mechanism. A device is a 2177
sweepstakes terminal device if any of the following apply: 2178
(a) The device uses a simulated game terminal as a 2179
representation of the prizes associated with the results of the 2180
sweepstakes entries. 2181
(b) The device utilizes software such that the simulated 2182
game influences or determines the winning of or value of the 2183
prize. 2184
(c) The device selects prizes from a predetermined finite 2185
pool of entries. 2186
(d) The device utilizes a mechanism that reveals the 2187

S. B. No. 197 Page 76
As Introduced
content of a predetermined sweepstakes entry. 2188
(e) The device predetermines the prize results and stores 2189
those results for delivery at the time the sweepstakes entry 2190
results are revealed. 2191
(f) The device utilizes software to create a game result. 2192
(g) The device reveals the prize incrementally, even 2193
though the device does not influence the awarding of the prize 2194
or the value of any prize awarded. 2195
(h) The device determines and associates the prize with an 2196
entry or entries at the time the sweepstakes is entered. 2197
(2) As used in this division and in section 2915.02 of the 2198
Revised Code: 2199
(a) "Enter" means the act by which a person becomes 2200
eligible to receive any prize offered in a sweepstakes. 2201
(b) "Entry" means one event from the initial activation of 2202
the sweepstakes terminal device until all the sweepstakes prize 2203
results from that activation are revealed. 2204
(c) "Prize" means any gift, award, gratuity, good, 2205
service, credit, reward, or any other thing of value that may be 2206
transferred to a person, whether possession of the prize is 2207
actually transferred, or placed on an account or other record as 2208
evidence of the intent to transfer the prize. 2209
(d) "Sweepstakes terminal device facility" means any 2210
location in this state where a sweepstakes terminal device is 2211
provided to a sweepstakes participant, except as provided in 2212
division (G) of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code. 2213
(BBB) "Sweepstakes" means any game, contest, advertising 2214

S. B. No. 197 Page 77
As Introduced
scheme or plan, or other promotion where consideration is not 2215
required for a person to enter to win or become eligible to 2216
receive any prize, the determination of which is based upon 2217
chance. "Sweepstakes" does not include bingo as authorized under 2218
this chapter, pari-mutuel wagering as authorized by Chapter 2219
3769. of the Revised Code, lotteries conducted by the state 2220
lottery commission as authorized by Chapter 3770. of the Revised 2221
Code, and casino gaming as authorized by Chapter 3772. of the 2222
Revised Code. 2223
(CCC)(1) "Electronic instant bingo" means a form of bingo 2224
that consists of an electronic or digital representation of 2225
instant bingo in which a participant wins a prize if the 2226
participant's electronic instant bingo ticket contains a 2227
combination of numbers or symbols that was designated in advance 2228
as a winning combination, and to which all of the following 2229
apply: 2230
(a) Each deal has a predetermined, finite number of 2231
winning and losing tickets and a predetermined prize amount and 2232
deal structure, provided that there may be multiple winning 2233
combinations in each deal and multiple winning tickets. 2234
(b) Each electronic instant bingo ticket within a deal has 2235
a unique serial number that is not regenerated. 2236
(c) Each electronic instant bingo ticket within a deal is 2237
sold for the same price. 2238
(d) After a participant purchases an electronic instant 2239
bingo ticket, the combination of numbers or symbols on the 2240
ticket is revealed to the participant. 2241
(e) The reveal of numbers or symbols on the ticket may 2242
incorporate an entertainment or bonus theme, provided that the 2243

S. B. No. 197 Page 78
As Introduced
reveal does not include spinning reels that resemble a slot 2244
machine. 2245
(f) The reveal theme, if any, does not require additional 2246
consideration or award any prize other than any predetermined 2247
prize associated with the electronic instant bingo ticket. 2248
(2) "Electronic instant bingo" shall not include any of 2249
the following: 2250
(a) Any game, entertainment, or bonus theme that 2251
replicates or simulates any of the following: 2252
(i) The gambling games of keno, blackjack, roulette, 2253
poker, craps, other casino-style table games; 2254
(ii) Horse racing; 2255
(iii) Gambling games offered in this state on slot 2256
machines or video lottery terminals. As used in this division, 2257
"video lottery terminal" has the same meaning as in section 2258
3770.21 of the Revised Code. 2259
(b) Any device operated by dropping one or more coins or 2260
tokens into a slot and pulling a handle or pushing a button or 2261
touchpoint on a touchscreen to activate one to three or more 2262
rotating reels marked into horizontal segments by varying 2263
symbols, where the predetermined prize amount depends on how and 2264
how many of the symbols line up when the rotating reels come to 2265
a rest; 2266
(c) Any device that includes a coin or token slot, tray, 2267
or hopper and the ability to dispense coins, cash, tokens, or 2268
anything of value other than a credit ticket voucher. 2269
(DDD) "Electronic instant bingo system" means both of the 2270
following: 2271

S. B. No. 197 Page 79
As Introduced
(1) A mechanical, electronic, digital, or video device and 2272
associated software to which all of the following apply: 2273
(a) It is used by not more than one player at a time to 2274
play electronic instant bingo on a single screen that is 2275
physically connected to the device; 2276
(b) It is located on the premises of the principal place 2277
of business of a veteran's or fraternal organization that holds 2278
a type II or type III bingo license to conduct electronic 2279
instant bingo at that location issued under section 2915.08 of 2280
the Revised Code. 2281
(2) Any associated equipment or software used to manage, 2282
monitor, or document any aspect of electronic instant bingo. 2283
Sec. 2915.02. (A) No person shall do any of the following: 2284
(1) Engage in bookmaking, or knowingly engage in conduct 2285
that facilitates bookmaking; 2286
(2) Establish, promote, or operate or knowingly engage in 2287
conduct that facilitates any game of chance conducted for profit 2288
or any scheme of chance; 2289
(3) Knowingly procure, transmit, exchange, or engage in 2290
conduct that facilitates the procurement, transmission, or 2291
exchange of information for use in establishing odds or 2292
determining winners in connection with bookmaking or with any 2293
game of chance conducted for profit or any scheme of chance; 2294
(4) Engage in betting or in playing any scheme or game of 2295
chance as a substantial source of income or livelihood; 2296
(5) Conduct, or participate in the conduct of, a 2297
sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal device at a 2298
sweepstakes terminal device facility and either: 2299

S. B. No. 197 Page 80
As Introduced
(a) Give to another person any item described in division 2300
(VV)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code 2301
as a prize for playing or participating in a sweepstakes; or 2302
(b) Give to another person any merchandise prize, or a 2303
redeemable voucher for a merchandise prize, the wholesale value 2304
of which is in excess of ten dollars and which is awarded as a 2305
single entry for playing or participating in a sweepstakes. 2306
Redeemable vouchers shall not be redeemable for a merchandise 2307
prize that has a wholesale value of more than ten dollars. 2308
(6) Conduct, or participate in the conduct of, a 2309
sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal device at a 2310
sweepstakes terminal device facility without first obtaining a 2311
current annual "certificate of registration" from the attorney 2312
general as required by division (F) of this section; 2313
(7) With purpose to violate division (A)(1), (2), (3), or 2314
(4), (5), or (6) of this section or division (A)(1) or (2) of 2315
section 3777.02 of the Revised Code, acquire, possess, control, 2316
or operate any gambling device. 2317
(B) For purposes of division (A)(1) of this section, a 2318
person facilitates bookmaking if the person in any way knowingly 2319
aids an illegal bookmaking operation, including, without 2320
limitation, placing a bet with a person engaged in or 2321
facilitating illegal bookmaking. For purposes of division (A)(2) 2322
of this section, a person facilitates a game of chance conducted 2323
for profit or a scheme of chance if the person in any way 2324
knowingly aids in the conduct or operation of any such game or 2325
scheme, including, without limitation, playing any such game or 2326
scheme. 2327
(C) This section does not prohibit conduct in connection 2328

S. B. No. 197 Page 81
As Introduced
with gambling expressly permitted by law. 2329
(D) This section does not apply to any either of the 2330
following: 2331
(1) Games of chance, if all of the following apply: 2332
(a) The games of chance are not craps for money or 2333
roulette for money. 2334
(b) The games of chance are conducted by a charitable 2335
organization that is, and has received from the internal revenue 2336
service a determination letter that is currently in effect, 2337
stating that the organization is, exempt from federal income 2338
taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 2339
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 2340
(c) The games of chance are conducted at festivals of the 2341
charitable organization that are conducted not more than a total 2342
of five days a calendar year, and are conducted on premises 2343
owned by the charitable organization for a period of no less 2344
than one year immediately preceding the conducting of the games 2345
of chance, on premises leased from a governmental unit, or on 2346
premises that are leased from a veteran's or fraternal 2347
organization and that have been owned by the lessor veteran's or 2348
fraternal organization for a period of no less than one year 2349
immediately preceding the conducting of the games of chance. 2350
A charitable organization shall not lease premises from a 2351
veteran's or fraternal organization to conduct a festival 2352
described in division (D)(1)(c) of this section if the veteran's 2353
or fraternal organization already has leased the premises twelve 2354
times during the preceding year to charitable organizations for 2355
that purpose. If a charitable organization leases premises from 2356
a veteran's or fraternal organization to conduct a festival 2357

S. B. No. 197 Page 82
As Introduced
described in division (D)(1)(c) of this section, the charitable 2358
organization shall not pay a rental rate for the premises per 2359
day of the festival that exceeds the rental rate per bingo 2360
session that a charitable organization may pay under division 2361
(B)(1) of section 2915.09 of the Revised Code when it leases 2362
premises from another charitable organization to conduct bingo 2363
games. 2364
(d) All of the money or assets received from the games of 2365
chance after deduction only of prizes paid out during the 2366
conduct of the games of chance are used by, or given, donated, 2367
or otherwise transferred to, any organization that is described 2368
in subsection 509(a)(1), 509(a)(2), or 509(a)(3) of the Internal 2369
Revenue Code and is either a governmental unit or an 2370
organization that is tax exempt under subsection 501(a) and 2371
described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; 2372
(e) The games of chance are not conducted during, or 2373
within ten hours of, a bingo game conducted for amusement 2374
purposes only pursuant to section 2915.12 of the Revised Code. 2375
No person shall receive any commission, wage, salary, 2376
reward, tip, donation, gratuity, or other form of compensation, 2377
directly or indirectly, for operating or assisting in the 2378
operation of any game of chance. 2379
(2) Any tag fishing tournament operated under a permit 2380
issued under section 1533.92 of the Revised Code, as "tag 2381
fishing tournament" is defined in section 1531.01 of the Revised 2382
Code; 2383
(3) (2) Bingo or games of chance conducted by a charitable 2384
organization that holds a license issued under section 2915.08 2385
in accordance with Chapter 3768. of the Revised Code. 2386

S. B. No. 197 Page 83
As Introduced
(E) Division (D) of this section shall not be construed to 2387
authorize the sale, lease, or other temporary or permanent 2388
transfer of the right to conduct games of chance, as granted by 2389
that division, by any charitable organization that is granted 2390
that right. 2391
(F) Any person desiring to conduct, or participate in the 2392
conduct of, a sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal 2393
device at a sweepstakes terminal device facility shall first 2394
register with the office of the attorney general and obtain an 2395
annual certificate of registration by providing a filing fee of 2396
two hundred dollars and all information as required by rule 2397
adopted under division (H) of this section. Not later than the 2398
tenth day of each month, each sweepstakes terminal device 2399
operator shall file a sweepstakes terminal device monthly report 2400
with the attorney general and provide a filing fee of fifty 2401
dollars and all information required by rule adopted under 2402
division (H) of this section. All information provided to the 2403
attorney general under this division shall be available to law 2404
enforcement upon request. 2405
(G) A person may apply to the attorney general, on a form 2406
prescribed by the attorney general, for a certificate of 2407
compliance that the person is not operating a sweepstakes 2408
terminal device facility. The form shall require the person to 2409
include the address of the business location where sweepstakes 2410
terminal devices will be used and to make the following 2411
certifications: 2412
(1) That the person will not use more than two sweepstakes 2413
terminal devices at the business location; 2414
(2) That the retail value of sweepstakes prizes to be 2415
awarded at the business location using sweepstakes terminal 2416

S. B. No. 197 Page 84
As Introduced
devices during a reporting period will be less than three per 2417
cent of the gross revenue received at the business location 2418
during the reporting period; 2419
(3) That no other form of gaming except lottery ticket 2420
sales as authorized under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code will 2421
be conducted at the business location or in an adjoining area of 2422
the business location; 2423
(4) That any sweepstakes terminal device at the business 2424
location will not allow any deposit of any money, coin, or 2425
token, or the use of any credit card, debit card, prepaid card, 2426
or any other method of similar payment to be used, directly or 2427
indirectly, to participate in a sweepstakes; 2428
(5) That notification of any prize will not take place on 2429
the same day as a participant's sweepstakes entry; and 2430
(6) That the person consents to provide any other 2431
information to the attorney general as required by rule adopted 2432
under division (H) of this section. 2433
The filing fee for a certificate of compliance is two 2434
hundred fifty dollars. The attorney general may charge up to an 2435
additional two hundred fifty dollars for reasonable expenses 2436
resulting from any investigation related to an application for a 2437
certificate of compliance. 2438
A certificate of compliance is effective for one year. The 2439
certificate holder may reapply for a certificate of compliance. 2440
A person issued a certificate of compliance shall file 2441
semiannual reports with the attorney general stating the number 2442
of sweepstakes terminal devices at the business location and 2443
that the retail value of prizes awarded at the business location 2444
using sweepstakes terminal devices is less than three per cent 2445

S. B. No. 197 Page 85
As Introduced
of the gross revenue received at the business location. 2446
(H) The attorney general shall adopt rules setting forth: 2447
(1) The required information to be submitted by persons 2448
conducting a sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal 2449
device at a sweepstakes terminal device facility as described in 2450
division (F) of this section; and 2451
(2) The requirements pertaining to a certificate of 2452
compliance under division (G) of this section, which shall 2453
provide for a person to file a consolidated application and a 2454
consolidated semiannual report if a person has more than one 2455
business location. 2456
The attorney general shall issue a certificate of 2457
registration or a certificate of compliance to all persons who 2458
have successfully satisfied the applicable requirements of this 2459
section. The attorney general shall post online a registry of 2460
all properly registered and certified sweepstakes terminal 2461
device operators. 2462
(I) The attorney general may refuse to issue an annual 2463
certificate of registration or certificate of compliance to any 2464
person or, if one has been issued, the attorney general may 2465
revoke a certificate of registration or a certificate of 2466
compliance if the applicant has provided any information to the 2467
attorney general as part of a registration, certification, 2468
monthly report, semiannual report, or any other information that 2469
is materially false or misleading, or if the applicant or any 2470
officer, partner, or owner of five per cent or more interest in 2471
the applicant has violated any provision of this chapter. 2472
(J) The attorney general may take any necessary and 2473
reasonable action to determine a violation of this chapter, 2474

S. B. No. 197 Page 86
As Introduced
including requesting documents and information, performing 2475
inspections of premises, or requiring the attendance of any 2476
person at an examination under oath. 2477
(K) (F) Whoever violates this section is guilty of 2478
gambling, a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender 2479
previously has been convicted of any gambling offense, gambling 2480
is a felony of the fifth degree. Notwithstanding this division, 2481
failing to file a sweepstakes terminal device monthly report as 2482
required by division (F) of this section or the semiannual 2483
report required by division (G) of this section is a misdemeanor 2484
of the first degree. 2485
Sec. 2923.121. (A) No person shall possess a firearm in 2486
any room in which any person is consuming beer or intoxicating 2487
liquor in a premises for which a D permit has been issued under 2488
Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code or in an open air arena for 2489
which a permit of that nature has been issued. 2490
(B)(1) This section does not apply to any of the 2491
following: 2492
(a) An officer, agent, or employee of this or any other 2493
state or the United States, or a law enforcement officer, who is 2494
authorized to carry firearms and is acting within the scope of 2495
the officer's, agent's, or employee's duties; 2496
(b) A law enforcement officer or investigator who is 2497
authorized to carry firearms but is not acting within the scope 2498
of the officer's or investigator's duties, as long as all of the 2499
following apply: 2500
(i) The officer or investigator is carrying validating 2501
identification. 2502
(ii) If the firearm the officer or investigator possesses 2503

S. B. No. 197 Page 87
As Introduced
is a firearm issued or approved by the law enforcement agency 2504
served by the officer or by the bureau of criminal 2505
identification and investigation with respect to an 2506
investigator, the agency or bureau does not have a restrictive 2507
firearms carrying policy. 2508
(iii) The officer or investigator is not consuming beer or 2509
intoxicating liquor and is not under the influence of alcohol or 2510
a drug of abuse. 2511
(c) Any room used for the accommodation of guests of a 2512
hotel, as defined in section 4301.01 of the Revised Code; 2513
(d) The principal holder of a D permit issued for a 2514
premises or an open air arena under Chapter 4303. of the Revised 2515
Code while in the premises or open air arena for which the 2516
permit was issued if the principal holder of the D permit also 2517
has been issued a concealed handgun license that is valid at the 2518
time in question and as long as the principal holder is not 2519
consuming beer or intoxicating liquor or under the influence of 2520
alcohol or a drug of abuse, or any agent or employee of that 2521
holder who also is a peace officer, as defined in section 2522
2151.3515 of the Revised Code, who is off duty, and who 2523
otherwise is authorized to carry firearms while in the course of 2524
the officer's official duties and while in the premises or open 2525
air arena for which the permit was issued and as long as the 2526
agent or employee of that holder is not consuming beer or 2527
intoxicating liquor or under the influence of alcohol or a drug 2528
of abuse. 2529
(e) Any person who has been issued a concealed handgun 2530
license that is valid at the time in question or any person who 2531
is an active duty member of the armed forces of the United 2532
States and is carrying a valid military identification card and 2533

S. B. No. 197 Page 88
As Introduced
documentation of successful completion of firearms training that 2534
meets or exceeds the training requirements described in division 2535
(G)(1) of section 2923.125 of the Revised Code, as long as the 2536
person is not consuming beer or intoxicating liquor or under the 2537
influence of alcohol or a drug of abuse. 2538
(2) This section does not prohibit any person who is a 2539
member of a veteran's organization, as defined in section 2540
2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code, from possessing a rifle in 2541
any room in any premises owned, leased, or otherwise under the 2542
control of the veteran's organization, if the rifle is not 2543
loaded with live ammunition and if the person otherwise is not 2544
prohibited by law from having the rifle. 2545
(3) This section does not apply to any person possessing 2546
or displaying firearms in any room used to exhibit unloaded 2547
firearms for sale or trade in a soldiers' memorial established 2548
pursuant to Chapter 345. of the Revised Code, in a convention 2549
center, or in any other public meeting place, if the person is 2550
an exhibitor, trader, purchaser, or seller of firearms and is 2551
not otherwise prohibited by law from possessing, trading, 2552
purchasing, or selling the firearms. 2553
(C) It is an affirmative defense to a charge under this 2554
section of illegal possession of a firearm in a liquor permit 2555
premises that involves the possession of a firearm other than a 2556
handgun, that the actor was not otherwise prohibited by law from 2557
having the firearm, and that any of the following apply: 2558
(1) The firearm was carried or kept ready at hand by the 2559
actor for defensive purposes, while the actor was engaged in or 2560
was going to or from the actor's lawful business or occupation, 2561
which business or occupation was of such character or was 2562
necessarily carried on in such manner or at such a time or place 2563

S. B. No. 197 Page 89
As Introduced
as to render the actor particularly susceptible to criminal 2564
attack, such as would justify a prudent person in going armed. 2565
(2) The firearm was carried or kept ready at hand by the 2566
actor for defensive purposes, while the actor was engaged in a 2567
lawful activity, and had reasonable cause to fear a criminal 2568
attack upon the actor or a member of the actor's family, or upon 2569
the actor's home, such as would justify a prudent person in 2570
going armed. 2571
(D) No person who is charged with a violation of this 2572
section shall be required to obtain a concealed handgun license 2573
as a condition for the dismissal of the charge. 2574
(E) Whoever violates this section is guilty of illegal 2575
possession of a firearm in a liquor permit premises. Except as 2576
otherwise provided in this division, illegal possession of a 2577
firearm in a liquor permit premises is a felony of the fifth 2578
degree. If the offender commits the violation of this section by 2579
knowingly carrying or having the firearm concealed on the 2580
offender's person or concealed ready at hand, illegal possession 2581
of a firearm in a liquor permit premises is a felony of the 2582
third degree. 2583
(F) As used in this section: 2584
(1) "Beer" and "intoxicating liquor" have the same 2585
meanings as in section 4301.01 of the Revised Code. 2586
(2) "Investigator" has the same meaning as in section 2587
109.541 of the Revised Code. 2588
(3) "Restrictive firearms carrying policy" means a 2589
specific policy of a law enforcement agency or the bureau of 2590
criminal identification and investigation that prohibits all 2591
officers of the agency or all investigators of the bureau, while 2592

S. B. No. 197 Page 90
As Introduced
not acting within the scope of the officer's or investigator's 2593
duties, from doing either of the following: 2594
(a) Carrying a firearm issued or approved by the agency or 2595
bureau in any room, premises, or arena described in division (A) 2596
of this section; 2597
(b) Carrying a firearm issued or approved by the agency or 2598
bureau in premises described in division (A) of section 2599
2923.1214 of the Revised Code. 2600
(4) "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as in 2601
section 9.69 of the Revised Code. 2602
(5) "Validating identification" means one of the 2603
following: 2604
(a) Photographic identification issued by the law 2605
enforcement agency for which an individual serves as a law 2606
enforcement officer that identifies the individual as a law 2607
enforcement officer of the agency; 2608
(b) Photographic identification issued by the bureau of 2609
criminal identification and investigation that identifies an 2610
individual as an investigator of the bureau. 2611
Sec. 2927.21. (A) As used in this section: 2612
(1) "Offense subject to forfeiture proceedings" means any 2613
of the following: 2614
(a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2615
2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.05, 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.09, 2903.11, 2616
2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.14, 2903.15, 2903.16, 2903.21, or 2617
2903.211 of the Revised Code; 2618
(b) A violation of section 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.03, 2619

S. B. No. 197 Page 91
As Introduced
2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.32, or 2905.33 of the Revised Code; 2620
(c) A violation of section 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2621
2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.321, 2622
2907.322, or 2907.323 of the Revised Code; 2623
(d) A violation of section 2909.02, 2909.03, 2909.22, 2624
2909.23, 2909.24, 2909.26, 2909.27, 2909.28, or 2909.29 of the 2625
Revised Code; 2626
(e) A violation of section 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2627
2911.12, or 2911.13 of the Revised Code; 2628
(f) A violation of section 2915.02, 2915.03, 2915.04, or 2629
2915.05, or 3777.02 of the Revised Code; 2630
(g) A violation of section 2921.02, 2921.03, 2921.04, 2631
2921.05, 2921.11, 2921.12, or 2921.41 of the Revised Code; 2632
(h) A violation of section 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2633
2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.09, or 2925.11 of the Revised 2634
Code; 2635
(i) A conspiracy or attempt to commit, or complicity in 2636
committing, any offense under division (A)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), 2637
(e), (f), (g), or (h) of this section. 2638
(2) "Proceeds" has the same meaning as in section 2981.01 2639
of the Revised Code. 2640
(3) "Vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4501.01 2641
of the Revised Code. 2642
(B) No person shall receive, retain, possess, or dispose 2643
of proceeds knowing or having reasonable cause to believe that 2644
the proceeds were derived from the commission of an offense 2645
subject to forfeiture proceedings. 2646

S. B. No. 197 Page 92
As Introduced
(C) It is not a defense to a charge of receiving proceeds 2647
of an offense subject to forfeiture proceedings in violation of 2648
this section that the proceeds were derived by means other than 2649
the commission of an offense subject to forfeiture proceedings 2650
if the property was explicitly represented to the accused person 2651
as having been derived from the commission of an offense subject 2652
to forfeiture proceedings. 2653
(D) A person shall be considered to have received, 2654
retained, possessed, or disposed of proceeds if the proceeds are 2655
found anywhere in a vehicle and the person was the last person 2656
who operated the vehicle immediately prior to the search of the 2657
vehicle by the law enforcement officer who found the proceeds. 2658
(E) Whoever violates this section is guilty of receiving 2659
proceeds of an offense subject to forfeiture proceedings. If the 2660
value of the proceeds involved is less than one thousand 2661
dollars, receiving proceeds of an offense subject to forfeiture 2662
proceedings is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the value 2663
of the proceeds involved is one thousand dollars or more and is 2664
less than twenty-five thousand dollars, receiving proceeds of an 2665
offense subject to forfeiture proceedings is a felony of the 2666
fifth degree. If the value of the proceeds involved is twenty- 2667
five thousand dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty 2668
thousand dollars, receiving proceeds of an offense subject to 2669
forfeiture proceedings is a felony of the fourth degree. If the 2670
value of the proceeds involved is one hundred fifty thousand 2671
dollars or more, receiving proceeds of an offense subject to 2672
forfeiture proceedings is a felony of the third degree. 2673
Sec. 2933.51. As used in sections 2933.51 to 2933.66 of 2674
the Revised Code: 2675
(A) "Wire communication" means an aural transfer that is 2676

S. B. No. 197 Page 93
As Introduced
made in whole or in part through the use of facilities for the 2677
transmission of communications by the aid of wires or similar 2678
methods of connecting the point of origin of the communication 2679
and the point of reception of the communication, including the 2680
use of a method of connecting the point of origin and the point 2681
of reception of the communication in a switching station, if the 2682
facilities are furnished or operated by a person engaged in 2683
providing or operating the facilities for the transmission of 2684
communications. "Wire communication" includes an electronic 2685
storage of a wire communication. 2686
(B) "Oral communication" means an oral communication 2687
uttered by a person exhibiting an expectation that the 2688
communication is not subject to interception under circumstances 2689
justifying that expectation. "Oral communication" does not 2690
include an electronic communication. 2691
(C) "Intercept" means the aural or other acquisition of 2692
the contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication 2693
through the use of an interception device. 2694
(D) "Interception device" means an electronic, mechanical, 2695
or other device or apparatus that can be used to intercept a 2696
wire, oral, or electronic communication. "Interception device" 2697
does not mean any of the following: 2698
(1) A telephone or telegraph instrument, equipment, or 2699
facility, or any of its components, if the instrument, 2700
equipment, facility, or component is any of the following: 2701
(a) Furnished to the subscriber or user by a provider of 2702
wire or electronic communication service in the ordinary course 2703
of its business and being used by the subscriber or user in the 2704
ordinary course of its business; 2705

S. B. No. 197 Page 94
As Introduced
(b) Furnished by a subscriber or user for connection to 2706
the facilities of a provider of wire or electronic communication 2707
service and used in the ordinary course of that subscriber's or 2708
user's business; 2709
(c) Being used by a provider of wire or electronic 2710
communication service in the ordinary course of its business or 2711
by an investigative or law enforcement officer in the ordinary 2712
course of the officer's duties that do not involve the 2713
interception of wire, oral, or electronic communications. 2714
(2) A hearing aid or similar device being used to correct 2715
subnormal hearing to not better than normal. 2716
(E) "Investigative officer" means any of the following: 2717
(1) An officer of this state or a political subdivision of 2718
this state, who is empowered by law to conduct investigations or 2719
to make arrests for a designated offense; 2720
(2) A person described in divisions (A)(11)(a) and (b) of 2721
section 2901.01 of the Revised Code; 2722
(3) An attorney authorized by law to prosecute or 2723
participate in the prosecution of a designated offense; 2724
(4) A secret service officer appointed pursuant to section 2725
309.07 of the Revised Code; 2726
(5) An officer of the United States, a state, or a 2727
political subdivision of a state who is authorized to conduct 2728
investigations pursuant to the "Electronic Communications 2729
Privacy Act of 1986," 100 Stat. 1848-1857, 18 U.S.C. 2510-2521 2730
(1986), as amended. 2731
(F) "Interception warrant" means a court order that 2732
authorizes the interception of wire, oral, or electronic 2733

S. B. No. 197 Page 95
As Introduced
communications and that is issued pursuant to sections 2933.53 2734
to 2933.56 of the Revised Code. 2735
(G) "Contents," when used with respect to a wire, oral, or 2736
electronic communication, includes any information concerning 2737
the substance, purport, or meaning of the communication. 2738
(H) "Communications common carrier" means a person who is 2739
engaged as a common carrier for hire in intrastate, interstate, 2740
or foreign communications by wire, radio, or radio transmission 2741
of energy. "Communications common carrier" does not include, to 2742
the extent that the person is engaged in radio broadcasting, a 2743
person engaged in radio broadcasting. 2744
(I) "Designated offense" means any of the following: 2745
(1) A felony violation of section 1315.53, 1315.55, 2746
2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.11, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.11, 2905.22, 2747
2905.32, 2907.02, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2909.02, 2909.03, 2909.04, 2748
2909.22, 2909.23, 2909.24, 2909.26, 2909.27, 2909.28, 2909.29, 2749
2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2913.02, 2913.04, 2913.42, 2750
2913.51, 2915.02, 2915.03, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2921.02, 2921.03, 2751
2921.04, 2921.32, 2921.34, 2923.20, 2923.32, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2752
2925.05, or 2925.06, or 3777.02 or of division (B) of section 2753
2915.05 or of division (E) or (G) of section 3772.99 of the 2754
Revised Code; 2755
(2) A violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code 2756
that, had it occurred prior to July 1, 1996, would have been a 2757
violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed 2758
prior to that date; 2759
(3) A felony violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised 2760
Code that is not a minor drug possession offense, as defined in 2761
section 2925.01 of the Revised Code; 2762

S. B. No. 197 Page 96
As Introduced
(4) Complicity in the commission of a felony violation of 2763
a section listed in division (I)(1), (2), or (3) of this 2764
section; 2765
(5) An attempt to commit, or conspiracy in the commission 2766
of, a felony violation of a section listed in division (I)(1), 2767
(2), or (3) of this section, if the attempt or conspiracy is 2768
punishable by a term of imprisonment of more than one year. 2769
(J) "Aggrieved person" means a person who was a party to 2770
an intercepted wire, oral, or electronic communication or a 2771
person against whom the interception of the communication was 2772
directed. 2773
(K) "Person" means a person, as defined in section 1.59 of 2774
the Revised Code, or a governmental officer, employee, or 2775
entity. 2776
(L) "Special need" means a showing that a licensed 2777
physician, licensed practicing psychologist, attorney, 2778
practicing cleric, journalist, or either spouse is personally 2779
engaging in continuing criminal activity, was engaged in 2780
continuing criminal activity over a period of time, or is 2781
committing, has committed, or is about to commit, a designated 2782
offense, or a showing that specified public facilities are being 2783
regularly used by someone who is personally engaging in 2784
continuing criminal activity, was engaged in continuing criminal 2785
activity over a period of time, or is committing, has committed, 2786
or is about to commit, a designated offense. 2787
(M) "Journalist" means a person engaged in, connected 2788
with, or employed by, any news media, including a newspaper, 2789
magazine, press association, news agency, or wire service, a 2790
radio or television station, or a similar media, for the purpose 2791

S. B. No. 197 Page 97
As Introduced
of gathering, processing, transmitting, compiling, editing, or 2792
disseminating news for the general public. 2793
(N) "Electronic communication" means a transfer of a sign, 2794
signal, writing, image, sound, datum, or intelligence of any 2795
nature that is transmitted in whole or in part by a wire, radio, 2796
electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or photo-optical system. 2797
"Electronic communication" does not mean any of the following: 2798
(1) A wire or oral communication; 2799
(2) A communication made through a tone-only paging 2800
device; 2801
(3) A communication from an electronic or mechanical 2802
tracking device that permits the tracking of the movement of a 2803
person or object. 2804
(O) "User" means a person or entity that uses an 2805
electronic communication service and is duly authorized by the 2806
provider of the service to engage in the use of the electronic 2807
communication service. 2808
(P) "Electronic communications system" means a wire, 2809
radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or photo-optical 2810
facility for the transmission of electronic communications, and 2811
a computer facility or related electronic equipment for the 2812
electronic storage of electronic communications. 2813
(Q) "Electronic communication service" means a service 2814
that provides to users of the service the ability to send or 2815
receive wire or electronic communications. 2816
(R) "Readily accessible to the general public" means, with 2817
respect to a radio communication, that the communication is none 2818
of the following: 2819

S. B. No. 197 Page 98
As Introduced
(1) Scrambled or encrypted; 2820
(2) Transmitted using a modulation technique, the 2821
essential parameters of which have been withheld from the public 2822
with the intention of preserving the privacy of the 2823
communication; 2824
(3) Carried on a subcarrier or other signal subsidiary to 2825
a radio transmission; 2826
(4) Transmitted over a communications system provided by a 2827
communications common carrier, unless the communication is a 2828
tone-only paging system communication; 2829
(5) Transmitted on a frequency allocated under part 25, 2830
subpart D, E, or F of part 74, or part 94 of the Rules of the 2831
Federal Communications Commission, as those provisions existed 2832
on July 1, 1996, unless, in the case of a communication 2833
transmitted on a frequency allocated under part 74 that is not 2834
exclusively allocated to broadcast auxiliary services, the 2835
communication is a two-way voice communication by radio. 2836
(S) "Electronic storage" means a temporary, intermediate 2837
storage of a wire or electronic communication that is incidental 2838
to the electronic transmission of the communication, and a 2839
storage of a wire or electronic communication by an electronic 2840
communication service for the purpose of backup protection of 2841
the communication. 2842
(T) "Aural transfer" means a transfer containing the human 2843
voice at a point between and including the point of origin and 2844
the point of reception. 2845
(U) "Pen register" means a device that records or decodes 2846
electronic impulses that identify the numbers dialed, pulsed, or 2847
otherwise transmitted on telephone lines to which the device is 2848

S. B. No. 197 Page 99
As Introduced
attached. 2849
(V) "Trap and trace device" means a device that captures 2850
the incoming electronic or other impulses that identify the 2851
originating number of an instrument or device from which a wire 2852
communication or electronic communication was transmitted but 2853
that does not intercept the contents of the wire communication 2854
or electronic communication. 2855
(W) "Judge of a court of common pleas" means a judge of 2856
that court who is elected or appointed as a judge of general 2857
jurisdiction or as a judge who exercises both general 2858
jurisdiction and probate, domestic relations, or juvenile 2859
jurisdiction. "Judge of a court of common pleas" does not mean a 2860
judge of that court who is elected or appointed specifically as 2861
a probate, domestic relations, or juvenile judge. 2862
(X) "Electronic user data" means any data or records that 2863
are stored, collected, used, or safeguarded by a service or 2864
program that stores electronic data. This includes data stored 2865
on a computer, computer network, or computer system. 2866
(Y) "Remote computing service" means the provision of 2867
computer storage or processing services to the public through an 2868
electronic communication service. 2869
Sec. 3123.89. (A) The department of job and family 2870
services shall develop and implement a real time data match 2871
program with the state lottery commission and its lottery sales 2872
agents and lottery agents to identify obligors who are subject 2873
to a final and enforceable determination of default made under 2874
sections 3123.01 to 3123.07 of the Revised Code. 2875
(B) Upon the data match program's implementation, the 2876
department, in consultation with the commission, shall 2877

S. B. No. 197 Page 100
As Introduced
promulgate rules to facilitate withholding, in appropriate 2878
circumstances and in accordance with section 3770.071 of the 2879
Revised Code, by the commission or its lottery sales agents or 2880
lottery agents of an amount sufficient to satisfy any past due 2881
support owed by an obligor from a lottery prize award owed to 2882
the obligor up to the amount of the award. The rules shall 2883
describe an expedited method for withholding, and the time frame 2884
for transmission of the amount withheld to the department. 2885
(C) As used in this section, "lottery prize award" has the 2886
same meaning as in section 3770.10 3770.01 of the Revised Code. 2887
Sec. 3123.90. (A) As used in this section: 2888
(1) "Permit holder" has the same meaning as in section 2889
3769.01 of the Revised Code. 2890
(2) "Video lottery sales agent" has the same meaning as in 2891
section 3770.01 of the Revised Code. 2892
(3) "Internet gambling operator" has the same meaning as 2893
in section 3771.01 of the Revised Code. 2894
(4) "Casino facility," "casino operator," and "management 2895
company" have the meanings defined in section 3772.01 of the 2896
Revised Code. 2897
(2) (5) "Sports gaming proprietor" has and "type C sports 2898
gaming proprietor" have the meaning defined same meanings as in 2899
section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. 2900
(B) The department of job and family services shall 2901
develop and implement a real time data match program with each 2902
casino facility's casino operator or management company and with 2903
each sports gaming proprietor of the following persons to 2904
identify obligors who are subject to a final and enforceable 2905

S. B. No. 197 Page 101
As Introduced
determination of default made under sections 3123.01 to 3123.07 2906
of the Revised Code: 2907
(1) A permit holder, with respect to winnings from pari- 2908
mutuel wagering on horse racing; 2909
(2) A video lottery sales agent, with respect to winnings 2910
from a video lottery terminal; 2911
(3) An internet gambling operator, with respect to 2912
winnings from internet gambling; 2913
(4) A casino operator or management company, with respect 2914
to casino winnings; 2915
(5) A sports gaming proprietor, with respect to winnings 2916
from sports gaming, except as otherwise provided regarding a 2917
type C sports gaming proprietor by rule of the state lottery 2918
commission adopted under section 3770.03 of the Revised Code. 2919
(C) Upon the data match program's implementation, if a 2920
person patron receives a payout of winnings at a casino facility 2921
or from sports gaming described in division (B) of this section 2922
in an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service 2923
of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal 2924
Revenue Code, as amended, the casino operator, management 2925
company, or sports gaming proprietor applicable person described 2926
in division (B) of this section shall refer to the data match 2927
program to determine if the person entitled to the winnings is 2928
in default under a support order. If the data match program 2929
indicates that the person is in default, the casino operator, 2930
management company, or sports gaming proprietor applicable 2931
person described in division (B) of this section shall withhold 2932
from the person's winnings an amount sufficient to satisfy any 2933
past due support owed by the obligor identified in the data 2934

S. B. No. 197 Page 102
As Introduced
match up to the amount of the winnings. 2935
(D) Not later than fourteen days after withholding the 2936
amount, the casino operator, management company, or sports 2937
gaming proprietor person conducting the withholding shall 2938
electronically transmit any amount withheld to the department as 2939
payment on the support obligation. 2940
(E) The department, in consultation with the Ohio casino 2941
control commission, may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the 2942
Revised Code as are necessary for implementation of this 2943
section. 2944
Sec. 3517.091. (A) Except as otherwise provided in 2945
division (E) of this section, any person or organization that 2946
makes door-to-door solicitations for contributions to influence 2947
legislation, for contributions to influence the actions of any 2948
regulatory agency, or for contributions to support or oppose the 2949
campaign of any candidate for political office shall report in 2950
writing to the secretary of state by the thirty-first day of 2951
July of each year with regard to actions taken during the first 2952
six months of that calendar year, and by the thirty-first day of 2953
January of each year with regard to actions taken during the 2954
second six months of the previous calendar year, all of the 2955
following: 2956
(1) The name and address of the solicitor and of the 2957
organization, if any, for which the solicitation is made, and 2958
the name and address of the organization's director or chief 2959
executive officer; 2960
(2) The name and address of each person or organization 2961
from which it received one or more contributions, and the amount 2962
and date of each such contribution; 2963

S. B. No. 197 Page 103
As Introduced
(3) A complete list of all receipts and expenditures it 2964
has made to influence legislation, to influence the actions of 2965
any regulatory agency, or to support or oppose the campaign of 2966
any candidate for political office. 2967
(B) Before making any solicitation described in division 2968
(A) of this section, the solicitor shall give the person being 2969
solicited a written notice that contains all of the following: 2970
(1) The information described in division (A)(1) of this 2971
section; 2972
(2) A list of any purposes for which money contributed 2973
might be used; 2974
(3) The amount of compensation, if any, being paid to the 2975
solicitor; 2976
(4) A statement that the person being solicited may refuse 2977
to make a contribution without suffering any reprisal. 2978
(C) No person or organization shall fail to comply with 2979
the requirements of division (A) or (B) of this section. 2980
(D) This section does not apply to the solicitation 2981
activities of any charitable organization as defined in division 2982
(H) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code. 2983
Sec. 3763.01. (A) All promises, agreements, notes, bills, 2984
bonds, or other contracts, mortgages, or other securities, when 2985
the whole or part of the consideration thereof is for money or 2986
other valuable thing won or lost, laid, staked, or betted at or 2987
upon a game of any kind, or upon a horse race or cockfights, 2988
sport or pastime, or on a wager, or for the repayment of money 2989
lent or advanced at the time of a game, play, or wager, for the 2990
purpose of being laid, betted, staked, or wagered, are void. 2991

S. B. No. 197 Page 104
As Introduced
(B) Sections 3763.01 to 3763.08 of the Revised Code do not 2992
apply to bingo as defined in section 2915.01 3768.01 of the 2993
Revised Code or to any game of chance that is not subject to 2994
criminal penalties under section 2915.02 of the Revised Code. 2995
Sec. 3768.01. As used in this chapter : 2996
(A) "Bingo" means either of the following: 2997
(1) A game with all of the following characteristics: 2998
(a) The participants use bingo cards or sheets, including 2999
paper formats and electronic representation or image formats, 3000
that are divided into twenty-five spaces arranged in five 3001
horizontal and five vertical rows of spaces, with each space, 3002
except the central space, being designated by a combination of a 3003
letter and a number and with the central space being designated 3004
as a free space. 3005
(b) The participants cover the spaces on the bingo cards 3006
or sheets that correspond to combinations of letters and numbers 3007
that are announced by a bingo game operator. 3008
(c) A bingo game operator announces combinations of 3009
letters and numbers that appear on objects that a bingo game 3010
operator selects by chance, either manually or mechanically, 3011
from a receptacle that contains seventy-five objects at the 3012
beginning of each game, each object marked by a different 3013
combination of a letter and a number that corresponds to one of 3014
the seventy-five possible combinations of a letter and a number 3015
that can appear on the bingo cards or sheets. 3016
(d) The winner of the bingo game includes any participant 3017
who properly announces during the interval between the 3018
announcements of letters and numbers as described in division 3019
(A)(1)(c) of this section, that a predetermined and preannounced 3020

S. B. No. 197 Page 105
As Introduced
pattern of spaces has been covered on a bingo card or sheet 3021
being used by the participant. 3022
(2) Instant bingo, electronic instant bingo, and raffles. 3023
(B) "Bingo game operator" means any person, except 3024
security personnel, who performs work or labor at the site of 3025
bingo, including, but not limited to, collecting money from 3026
participants, handing out bingo cards or sheets or objects to 3027
cover spaces on bingo cards or sheets, selecting from a 3028
receptacle the objects that contain the combination of letters 3029
and numbers that appear on bingo cards or sheets, calling out 3030
the combinations of letters and numbers, distributing prizes, 3031
selling or redeeming instant bingo tickets or cards, selling or 3032
redeeming electronic instant bingo tickets, credits, or 3033
vouchers, accessing an electronic instant bingo system other 3034
than as a participant, supervising the operation of a punch 3035
board, selling raffle tickets, selecting raffle tickets from a 3036
receptacle and announcing the winning numbers in a raffle, and 3037
preparing, selling, and serving food or beverages. "Bingo game 3038
operator" does not include a person who is installing, 3039
maintaining, updating, or repairing an electronic instant bingo 3040
system. 3041
(C) "Bingo session" means a period that includes both of 3042
the following: 3043
(1) Not to exceed five continuous hours for the conduct of 3044
one or more games described in division (A)(1) of this section, 3045
instant bingo, and electronic instant bingo; 3046
(2) A period for the conduct of instant bingo and 3047
electronic instant bingo for not more than two hours before and 3048
not more than two hours after the period described in division 3049

S. B. No. 197 Page 106
As Introduced
(C)(1) of this section. 3050
(D) "Bingo supplies" means bingo cards or sheets; instant 3051
bingo tickets or cards; electronic bingo aids; raffle tickets; 3052
punch boards; seal cards; instant bingo ticket dispensers; 3053
electronic instant bingo systems; and devices for selecting or 3054
displaying the combination of bingo letters and numbers or 3055
raffle tickets. Items that are "bingo supplies" are not gambling 3056
devices, as defined in section 2915.01 of the Revised Code, if 3057
sold or otherwise provided, and used, in accordance with this 3058
chapter. For purposes of this chapter, "bingo supplies" are not 3059
to be considered equipment used to conduct a bingo game. 3060
(E) "Charitable bingo game" means any bingo game described 3061
in division (A)(1) or (2) of this section that is conducted by a 3062
charitable organization that has obtained a license pursuant to 3063
section 3768.04 of the Revised Code and the proceeds of which 3064
are used for a charitable purpose. 3065
(F) "Charitable instant bingo organization" means an 3066
organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under 3067
subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the 3068
Internal Revenue Code and is a charitable organization as 3069
defined in this section. A "charitable instant bingo 3070
organization" does not include a charitable organization that is 3071
exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and 3072
described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code 3073
and that is created by a veteran's organization, a fraternal 3074
organization, or a sporting organization in regards to bingo 3075
conducted or assisted by a veteran's organization, a fraternal 3076
organization, or a sporting organization pursuant to section 3077
3768.10 of the Revised Code. 3078
(G) "Charitable gaming" means bingo or games of chance 3079

S. B. No. 197 Page 107
As Introduced
conducted under this chapter. 3080
(H)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, 3081
"charitable organization" means either of the following: 3082
(a) An organization that is exempt from federal income 3083
taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 3084
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; 3085
(b) A volunteer rescue service organization, volunteer 3086
firefighter's organization, veteran's organization, fraternal 3087
organization, or sporting organization that is exempt from 3088
federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(4), (c)(7), (c) 3089
(8), (c)(10), or (c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code. 3090
(2) To qualify as a "charitable organization," an 3091
organization shall have been in continuous existence as such in 3092
this state for a period of two years immediately preceding 3093
either the making of an application for a bingo license under 3094
section 3768.04 of the Revised Code or the conducting of any 3095
game of chance as provided in section 3768.03 of the Revised 3096
Code. 3097
(I) "Charitable purpose" means that the net profit of 3098
bingo, other than instant bingo or electronic instant bingo, is 3099
used by, or is given, donated, or otherwise transferred to, any 3100
of the following: 3101
(1) Any organization that is described in subsection 3102
509(a)(1), 509(a)(2), or 509(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code 3103
and is either a governmental unit or an organization that is tax 3104
exempt under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 3105
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; 3106
(2) A veteran's organization that is a post, chapter, or 3107
organization of veterans, or an auxiliary unit or society of, or 3108

S. B. No. 197 Page 108
As Introduced
a trust or foundation for, any such post, chapter, or 3109
organization organized in the United States or any of its 3110
possessions, at least seventy-five per cent of the members of 3111
which are veterans and substantially all of the other members of 3112
which are individuals who are spouses, widows, or widowers of 3113
veterans, or such individuals, provided that no part of the net 3114
earnings of such post, chapter, or organization inures to the 3115
benefit of any private shareholder or individual, and further 3116
provided that the net profit is used by the post, chapter, or 3117
organization for the charitable purposes set forth in division 3118
(B)(12) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, is used for 3119
awarding scholarships to or for attendance at an institution 3120
mentioned in division (B)(12) of section 5739.02 of the Revised 3121
Code, is donated to a governmental agency, or is used for 3122
nonprofit youth activities, the purchase of United States or 3123
Ohio flags that are donated to schools, youth groups, or other 3124
bona fide nonprofit organizations, promotion of patriotism, or 3125
disaster relief; 3126
(3) A fraternal organization that has been in continuous 3127
existence in this state for fifteen years and that uses the net 3128
profit exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, 3129
literary, or educational purposes, or for the prevention of 3130
cruelty to children or animals, if contributions for such use 3131
would qualify as a deductible charitable contribution under 3132
subsection 170 of the Internal Revenue Code; 3133
(4) A volunteer firefighter's organization that uses the 3134
net profit for the purposes set forth in division (OO) of this 3135
section. 3136
(J) "Commission" means the Ohio casino control commission 3137
established under section 3772.02 of the Revised Code. 3138

S. B. No. 197 Page 109
As Introduced
(K) "Community action agency" has the same meaning as in 3139
section 122.66 of the Revised Code. 3140
(L) "Conduct" means to back, promote, organize, manage, 3141
carry on, sponsor, or prepare for the operation of bingo or a 3142
game of chance. 3143
(M) "Deal" means a single game of instant bingo tickets, 3144
or a single game of electronic instant bingo tickets, all with 3145
the same serial number. 3146
(N) "Distributor" means any person who purchases or 3147
obtains bingo supplies and who does either of the following: 3148
(1) Sells, offers for sale, or otherwise provides or 3149
offers to provide the bingo supplies to another person for use 3150
in this state; 3151
(2) Modifies, converts, adds to, or removes parts from the 3152
bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale for use in 3153
this state. 3154
(O)(1) "Electronic bingo aid" means an electronic device 3155
used by a participant to monitor bingo cards or sheets purchased 3156
at the time and place of a bingo session and that does all of 3157
the following: 3158
(a) It provides a means for a participant to input numbers 3159
and letters announced by a bingo caller. 3160
(b) It compares the numbers and letters entered by the 3161
participant to the bingo faces previously stored in the memory 3162
of the device. 3163
(c) It identifies a winning bingo pattern. 3164
(2) "Electronic bingo aid" does not include any device 3165

S. B. No. 197 Page 110
As Introduced
into which a coin, currency, token, or an equivalent is inserted 3166
to activate play. 3167
(P)(1) "Electronic instant bingo" means a form of bingo 3168
that consists of an electronic or digital representation of 3169
instant bingo in which a participant wins a prize if the 3170
participant's electronic instant bingo ticket contains a 3171
combination of numbers or symbols that was designated in advance 3172
as a winning combination, and to which all of the following 3173
apply: 3174
(a) Each deal has a predetermined, finite number of 3175
winning and losing tickets and a predetermined prize amount and 3176
deal structure, provided that there may be multiple winning 3177
combinations in each deal and multiple winning tickets. 3178
(b) Each electronic instant bingo ticket within a deal has 3179
a unique serial number that is not regenerated. 3180
(c) Each electronic instant bingo ticket within a deal is 3181
sold for the same price. 3182
(d) After a participant purchases an electronic instant 3183
bingo ticket, the combination of numbers or symbols on the 3184
ticket is revealed to the participant. 3185
(e) The reveal of numbers or symbols on the ticket may 3186
incorporate an entertainment or bonus theme, provided that the 3187
reveal does not include spinning reels that resemble a slot 3188
machine. 3189
(f) The reveal theme, if any, does not require additional 3190
consideration or award any prize other than any predetermined 3191
prize associated with the electronic instant bingo ticket. 3192
(2) "Electronic instant bingo" shall not include any of 3193

S. B. No. 197 Page 111
As Introduced
the following: 3194
(a) Any game, entertainment, or bonus theme that 3195
replicates or simulates any of the following: 3196
(i) The gambling games of keno, blackjack, roulette, 3197
poker, craps, or other casino-style table games; 3198
(ii) Horse racing; 3199
(iii) Gambling games offered in this state on slot 3200
machines or video lottery terminals. As used in this division, 3201
"video lottery terminal" has the same meaning as in section 3202
3770.01 of the Revised Code. 3203
(b) Any device operated by dropping one or more coins or 3204
tokens into a slot and pulling a handle or pushing a button or 3205
touchpoint on a touchscreen to activate one to three or more 3206
rotating reels marked into horizontal segments by varying 3207
symbols, where the predetermined prize amount depends on how and 3208
how many of the symbols line up when the rotating reels come to 3209
a rest; 3210
(c) Any device that includes a coin or token slot, tray, 3211
or hopper and the ability to dispense coins, cash, tokens, or 3212
anything of value other than a credit ticket voucher. 3213
(Q) "Electronic instant bingo system" means both of the 3214
following: 3215
(1) A mechanical, electronic, digital, or video device and 3216
associated software to which all of the following apply: 3217
(a) It is used by not more than one player at a time to 3218
play electronic instant bingo on a single screen that is 3219
physically connected to the device; 3220

S. B. No. 197 Page 112
As Introduced
(b) It is located on the premises of the principal place 3221
of business of a veteran's or fraternal organization that holds 3222
a type II or type III bingo license to conduct electronic 3223
instant bingo at that location issued under section 3768.04 of 3224
the Revised Code. 3225
(2) Any associated equipment or software used to manage, 3226
monitor, or document any aspect of electronic instant bingo. 3227
(R) "Expenses" means the reasonable amount of gross profit 3228
actually expended for all of the following: 3229
(1) The purchase or lease of bingo supplies; 3230
(2) The annual license fee required under section 3768.04 3231
of the Revised Code; 3232
(3) Bank fees and service charges for a bingo session or 3233
game account described in section 3768.14 of the Revised Code; 3234
(4) Audits and accounting services; 3235
(5) Safes; 3236
(6) Cash registers; 3237
(7) Hiring security personnel; 3238
(8) Advertising bingo; 3239
(9) Renting premises in which to conduct a bingo session; 3240
(10) Tables and chairs; 3241
(11) Expenses for maintaining and operating a charitable 3242
organization's facilities, including, but not limited to, a post 3243
home, club house, lounge, tavern, or canteen and any grounds 3244
attached to the post home, club house, lounge, tavern, or 3245
canteen; 3246

S. B. No. 197 Page 113
As Introduced
(12) Payment of real property taxes and assessments that 3247
are levied on a premises on which bingo is conducted; 3248
(13) Any other product or service directly related to the 3249
conduct of bingo that is authorized in rules adopted by the 3250
commission under division (F)(1) of section 3768.04 of the 3251
Revised Code. 3252
(S) "Fraternal organization" means any society, order, 3253
state headquarters, or association within this state, except a 3254
college or high school fraternity, that is not organized for 3255
profit, that is a branch, lodge, or chapter of a national or 3256
state organization, that exists exclusively for the common 3257
business or sodality of its members. 3258
(T) "Gambling offense" and "game of chance" have the same 3259
meanings as in section 2915.01 of the Revised Code. 3260
(U) "Game flare" means the board or placard, or electronic 3261
representation of a board or placard, that accompanies each deal 3262
of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo tickets and that 3263
includes the following information for the game: 3264
(1) The name of the game; 3265
(2) The manufacturer's name or distinctive logo; 3266
(3) The form number; 3267
(4) The ticket count; 3268
(5) The prize structure, including the number of winning 3269
tickets by denomination and the respective winning symbol or 3270
number combinations for the winning tickets; 3271
(6) The cost per play; 3272
(7) The serial number of the game. 3273

S. B. No. 197 Page 114
As Introduced
(V) "Gross annual revenues" means the annual gross 3274
receipts derived from the conduct of bingo described in division 3275
(A)(1) of this section plus the annual net profit derived from 3276
the conduct of bingo described in division (A)(2) of this 3277
section. 3278
(W) "Gross profit" means gross receipts minus the amount 3279
actually expended for the payment of prize awards. 3280
(X) "Gross receipts" means all money or assets, including 3281
admission fees, that a person receives from bingo without the 3282
deduction of any amounts for prizes paid out or for the expenses 3283
of conducting bingo. "Gross receipts" does not include any money 3284
directly taken in from the sale of food or beverages by a 3285
charitable organization conducting bingo, or by a bona fide 3286
auxiliary unit or society of a charitable organization 3287
conducting bingo, provided all of the following apply: 3288
(1) The auxiliary unit or society has been in existence as 3289
a bona fide auxiliary unit or society of the charitable 3290
organization for at least two years prior to conducting bingo. 3291
(2) The person who purchases the food or beverage receives 3292
nothing of value except the food or beverage and items 3293
customarily received with the purchase of that food or beverage. 3294
(3) The food and beverages are sold at customary and 3295
reasonable prices. 3296
(Y) "Instant bingo" means a form of bingo that shall use 3297
folded or banded tickets or paper cards with perforated break- 3298
open tabs, a face of which is covered or otherwise hidden from 3299
view to conceal a number, letter, or symbol, or set of numbers, 3300
letters, or symbols, some of which have been designated in 3301
advance as prize winners, and may also include games in which 3302

S. B. No. 197 Page 115
As Introduced
some winners are determined by the random selection of one or 3303
more bingo numbers by the use of a seal card or bingo blower. 3304
"Instant bingo" also includes a punch board game. In all 3305
"instant bingo" the prize amount and structure shall be 3306
predetermined. "Instant bingo" does not include electronic 3307
instant bingo or any device that is activated by the insertion 3308
of a coin, currency, token, or an equivalent, and that contains 3309
as one of its components a video display monitor that is capable 3310
of displaying numbers, letters, symbols, or characters in 3311
winning or losing combinations. 3312
(Z) "Instant bingo ticket dispenser" means a mechanical 3313
device that dispenses an instant bingo ticket or card as the 3314
sole item of value dispensed and that has the following 3315
characteristics: 3316
(1) It is activated upon the insertion of United States 3317
currency. 3318
(2) It performs no gaming functions. 3319
(3) It does not contain a video display monitor or 3320
generate noise. 3321
(4) It is not capable of displaying any numbers, letters, 3322
symbols, or characters in winning or losing combinations. 3323
(5) It does not simulate or display rolling or spinning 3324
reels. 3325
(6) It is incapable of determining whether a dispensed 3326
bingo ticket or card is a winning or nonwinning ticket or card 3327
and requires a winning ticket or card to be paid by a bingo game 3328
operator. 3329
(7) It may provide accounting and security features to aid 3330

S. B. No. 197 Page 116
As Introduced
in accounting for the instant bingo tickets or cards it 3331
dispenses. 3332
(8) It is not part of an electronic network and is not 3333
interactive. 3334
(AA) "Internal Revenue Code" means the "Internal Revenue 3335
Code of 1986," 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended. 3336
(BB) "Manufacturer" means any person who assembles 3337
completed bingo supplies from raw materials, other items, or 3338
subparts or who modifies, converts, adds to, or removes parts 3339
from bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale. 3340
(CC) "Net profit" means gross profit minus expenses. 3341
(DD) "Participant" means any person who plays bingo. 3342
(EE) "Punch board" means a form of instant bingo that uses 3343
a board containing a number of holes or receptacles of uniform 3344
size in which are placed, mechanically and randomly, serially 3345
numbered slips of paper that may be punched or drawn from the 3346
hole or receptacle. A player may punch or draw the numbered 3347
slips of paper from the holes or receptacles and obtain the 3348
prize established for the game if the number drawn corresponds 3349
to a winning number or, if the punch board includes the use of a 3350
seal card, a potential winning number. 3351
(FF) "Raffle" means a form of bingo in which the one or 3352
more prizes are won by one or more persons who have purchased a 3353
raffle ticket. The one or more winners of the raffle are 3354
determined by drawing a ticket stub or other detachable section 3355
from a receptacle containing ticket stubs or detachable sections 3356
corresponding to all tickets sold for the raffle. "Raffle" does 3357
not include the drawing of a ticket stub or other detachable 3358
section of a ticket purchased to attend a professional sporting 3359

S. B. No. 197 Page 117
As Introduced
event if both of the following apply: 3360
(1) The ticket stub or other detachable section is used to 3361
select the winner of a free prize given away at the professional 3362
sporting event; 3363
(2) The cost of the ticket is the same as the cost of a 3364
ticket to the professional sporting event on days when no free 3365
prize is given away. 3366
(GG) "Religious organization" means any church, body of 3367
communicants, or group that is not organized or operated for 3368
profit and that gathers in common membership for regular worship 3369
and religious observances. 3370
(HH) "Revoke" means to void permanently all rights and 3371
privileges of the holder of a license issued under section 3372
3768.04, 3768.16, or 3768.17 of the Revised Code or a charitable 3373
gaming license issued by another jurisdiction. 3374
(II) "Security personnel" includes any person who either 3375
is a sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy marshal, township 3376
constable, or member of an organized police department of a 3377
municipal corporation or has successfully completed a peace 3378
officer's training course pursuant to sections 109.71 to 109.79 3379
of the Revised Code and who is hired to provide security for the 3380
premises on which bingo is conducted. 3381
(JJ) "Seal card" means a form of instant bingo that uses 3382
instant bingo tickets in conjunction with a board or placard 3383
that contains one or more seals that, when removed or opened, 3384
reveal predesignated winning numbers, letters, or symbols. 3385
(KK) "Slot machine" has the same meaning as in section 3386
2915.01 of the Revised Code. 3387

S. B. No. 197 Page 118
As Introduced
(LL) "Sporting organization" means a hunting, fishing, or 3388
trapping organization, other than a college or high school 3389
fraternity or sorority, that is not organized for profit, that 3390
is affiliated with a state or national sporting organization, 3391
including, but not limited to, the league of Ohio sportsmen, and 3392
that has been in continuous existence in this state for a period 3393
of three years. 3394
(MM) "Suspend" means to interrupt temporarily all rights 3395
and privileges of the holder of a license issued under section 3396
3768.04, 3768.16, or 3768.17 of the Revised Code or a charitable 3397
gaming license issued by another jurisdiction. 3398
(NN) "Veteran's organization" means any individual post or 3399
state headquarters of a national veteran's association or an 3400
auxiliary unit of any individual post of a national veteran's 3401
association, which post, state headquarters, or auxiliary unit 3402
is incorporated as a nonprofit corporation and either has 3403
received a letter from the state headquarters of the national 3404
veteran's association indicating that the individual post or 3405
auxiliary unit is in good standing with the national veteran's 3406
association or has received a letter from the national veteran's 3407
association indicating that the state headquarters is in good 3408
standing with the national veteran's association. As used in 3409
this division, "national veteran's association" means any 3410
veteran's association that has been in continuous existence as 3411
such for a period of at least five years and either is 3412
incorporated by an act of the United States congress or has a 3413
national dues-paying membership of at least five thousand 3414
persons. 3415
(OO) "Volunteer firefighter's organization" means any 3416
organization of volunteer firefighters, as defined in section 3417

S. B. No. 197 Page 119
As Introduced
146.01 of the Revised Code, that is organized and operated 3418
exclusively to provide financial support for a volunteer fire 3419
department or a volunteer fire company and that is recognized or 3420
ratified by a county, municipal corporation, or township. 3421
(PP) "Volunteer rescue service organization" means any 3422
organization of volunteers organized to function as an emergency 3423
medical service organization, as defined in section 4765.01 of 3424
the Revised Code. 3425
(QQ) "Youth athletic park organization" means any 3426
organization, not organized for profit, that satisfies both of 3427
the following: 3428
(1) It owns, operates, and maintains playing fields that 3429
satisfy both of the following: 3430
(a) The playing fields are used for athletic activities by 3431
one or more organizations, not organized for profit, each of 3432
which is organized and operated exclusively to provide financial 3433
support to, or to operate, athletic activities for persons who 3434
are eighteen years of age or younger by means of sponsoring, 3435
organizing, operating, or contributing to the support of an 3436
athletic team, club, league, or association. 3437
(b) The playing fields are not used for any profit-making 3438
activity at any time during the year. 3439
(2) It uses the proceeds of bingo it conducts exclusively 3440
for the operation, maintenance, and improvement of its playing 3441
fields of the type described in division (QQ)(1) of this 3442
section. 3443
(RR) "Youth athletic organization" means any organization, 3444
not organized for profit, that is organized and operated 3445
exclusively to provide financial support to, or to operate, 3446

S. B. No. 197 Page 120
As Introduced
athletic activities for persons who are twenty-one years of age 3447
or younger by means of sponsoring, organizing, operating, or 3448
contributing to the support of an athletic team, club, league, 3449
or association. 3450
Sec. 2915.092 3768.02. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) 3451
of this section, a person or entity may conduct a raffle to 3452
raise money for the person or entity and does not need a license 3453
to conduct bingo in order to conduct a raffle drawing that is 3454
not for profit if the person or entity is any of the following: 3455
(a) Exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 3456
501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal 3457
Revenue Code; 3458
(b) A school district, community school established under 3459
Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school established under 3460
Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, college-preparatory boarding 3461
school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, or 3462
chartered nonpublic school; 3463
(c) Exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 3464
501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(4), 501(c)(6), 501(c) 3465
(7), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), or 501(c)(19) of the Internal 3466
Revenue Code. 3467
(2) If a person or entity that is described in division 3468
(A)(1)(c) of this section conducts a raffle, the person or 3469
entity shall distribute at least fifty per cent of the net 3470
profit from the raffle to a charitable purpose described in 3471
division (V) (I) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code 3472
or to a department or agency of the federal government, the 3473
state, or any political subdivision. 3474
(B) Except as provided in division (A) of this section, no 3475

S. B. No. 197 Page 121
As Introduced
person shall conduct a raffle drawing that is for profit or a 3476
raffle drawing that is not for profit. 3477
(C) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is 3478
guilty of illegal conduct of a raffle. Except as otherwise 3479
provided in this division, illegal conduct of a raffle is a 3480
misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has 3481
been convicted of a violation of division (B) of this section, 3482
illegal conduct of a raffle is a felony of the fifth degree. 3483
Sec. 3768.03. (A) Notwithstanding any contrary provision 3484
of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code, a charitable 3485
organization that is, and has received from the internal revenue 3486
service a determination letter that is currently in effect, 3487
stating that the organization is, exempt from federal income 3488
taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 3489
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, may conduct games of 3490
chance, other than craps for money or roulette for money, if all 3491
of the following apply: 3492
(1) The games of chance are conducted at festivals of the 3493
charitable organization that are conducted not more than a total 3494
of five days a calendar year. 3495
(2) The games of chance are conducted at one of the 3496
following locations: 3497
(a) On premises owned by the charitable organization for a 3498
period of not less than one year immediately preceding the 3499
conducting of the games of chance; 3500
(b) On premises leased from a governmental unit; 3501
(c) On premises that are leased from a veteran's or 3502
fraternal organization and that have been owned by the lessor 3503
veteran's or fraternal organization for a period of not less 3504

S. B. No. 197 Page 122
As Introduced
than one year immediately preceding the conducting of the games 3505
of chance. A charitable organization shall not lease premises 3506
from a veteran's or fraternal organization for that purpose if 3507
the veteran's or fraternal organization already has leased the 3508
premises twelve times during the preceding year to charitable 3509
organizations for that purpose. If a charitable organization 3510
leases premises from a veteran's or fraternal organization for 3511
that purpose, the charitable organization shall not pay a rental 3512
rate for the premises per day of the festival that exceeds the 3513
rental rate per bingo session that a charitable organization may 3514
pay under division (B)(1) of section 3768.05 of the Revised Code 3515
when it leases premises from another charitable organization to 3516
conduct bingo games. 3517
(3) All of the money or assets received from the games of 3518
chance after deduction only of prizes paid out during the 3519
conduct of the games of chance are used by, or given, donated, 3520
or otherwise transferred to, any organization that is described 3521
in subsection 509(a)(1), 509(a)(2), or 509(a)(3) of the Internal 3522
Revenue Code and is either a governmental unit or an 3523
organization that is tax exempt under subsection 501(a) and 3524
described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 3525
(4) The games of chance are not conducted during, or 3526
within ten hours of, a bingo game conducted for amusement 3527
purposes only pursuant to section 3768.19 of the Revised Code. 3528
(5) No person receives any commission, wage, salary, 3529
reward, tip, donation, gratuity, or other form of compensation, 3530
directly or indirectly, for operating or assisting in the 3531
operation of any game of chance. 3532
(B) This section shall not be construed to authorize the 3533
sale, lease, or other temporary or permanent transfer of the 3534

S. B. No. 197 Page 123
As Introduced
right to conduct games of chance, as granted by this section, by 3535
any charitable organization that is granted that right. 3536
Sec. 2915.08 3768.04. (A)(1) Except as otherwise permitted 3537
under section 2915.092 3768.02 of the Revised Code, annually 3538
before the first day of January, a charitable organization that 3539
desires to conduct bingo shall apply to the attorney general 3540
commission for one or more of the following types of licenses to 3541
conduct bingo, as appropriate: 3542
(a) A type I license to conduct bingo as described in 3543
division (O)(1) (A)(1) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised 3544
Code; 3545
(b) A type II license to conduct instant bingo, electronic 3546
instant bingo, or both at a bingo session; 3547
(c) A type III license to conduct instant bingo, 3548
electronic instant bingo, or both other than at a bingo session, 3549
in accordance with sections 2915.093 to 2915.095 3768.07 to 3550
3768.09 or sections 2915.13 to 2915.15 3768.10 to 3768.12 of the 3551
Revised Code, as applicable. 3552
(2) A veteran's organization or fraternal organization 3553
that is authorized under section 2915.14 3768.11 of the Revised 3554
Code to conduct electronic instant bingo may be issued only one 3555
license to conduct electronic instant bingo at any one time. The 3556
organization may conduct electronic instant bingo under that 3557
license at only one location specified on the license, which 3558
shall be the organization's principal place of business. 3559
(B) The application shall be accompanied by a license fee 3560
as follows: 3561
(1) If the charitable organization was not licensed to 3562
conduct bingo under this chapter in this state before July 1, 3563

S. B. No. 197 Page 124
As Introduced
2003, a fee established by the attorney general commission by 3564
rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code. 3565
(2) If the charitable organization was licensed to conduct 3566
bingo under this chapter in this state before July 1, 2003, the 3567
following applicable fee: 3568
(a) For a type I license for a charitable organization 3569
that wishes to conduct bingo during twenty-six or more weeks in 3570
any calendar year, a license fee of two hundred dollars; 3571
(b) For a type II or type III license for a charitable 3572
organization that previously has not been licensed under this 3573
chapter to conduct instant bingo or electronic instant bingo and 3574
that wishes to conduct bingo during twenty-six or more weeks in 3575
any calendar year, a license fee of five hundred dollars; 3576
(c) For a type II or type III license for a charitable 3577
organization that previously has been licensed under this 3578
chapter to conduct instant bingo or electronic instant bingo and 3579
that desires to conduct bingo during twenty-six or more weeks in 3580
any calendar year, a license fee that is based upon the gross 3581
profits received by the charitable organization from the 3582
operation of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo during 3583
the one-year period ending on the thirty-first day of October of 3584
the year immediately preceding the year for which the license is 3585
sought, and that is one of the following: 3586
(i) Five hundred dollars, if the total is fifty thousand 3587
dollars or less; 3588
(ii) One thousand two hundred fifty dollars plus one- 3589
fourth per cent of the gross profit, if the total is more than 3590
fifty thousand dollars but less than two hundred fifty thousand 3591
one dollars; 3592

S. B. No. 197 Page 125
As Introduced
(iii) Two thousand two hundred fifty dollars plus one-half 3593
per cent of the gross profit, if the total is more than two 3594
hundred fifty thousand dollars but less than five hundred 3595
thousand one dollars; 3596
(iv) Three thousand five hundred dollars plus one per cent 3597
of the gross profit, if the total is more than five hundred 3598
thousand dollars but less than one million one dollars; 3599
(v) Five thousand dollars plus one per cent of the gross 3600
profit, if the total is one million one dollars or more. 3601
(c)(d) For a type I, type II, or type III license for a 3602
charitable organization that desires to conduct bingo during 3603
fewer than twenty-six weeks in any calendar year, a reduced 3604
license fee established by the attorney general commission by 3605
rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code. 3606
(C) The application shall be in the form prescribed by the 3607
attorney general commission, shall be signed and sworn to by the 3608
applicant, and shall contain all of the following: 3609
(1) The name and post-office address of the applicant; 3610
(2) A statement that the applicant is a charitable 3611
organization and that it has been in continuous existence as a 3612
charitable organization in this state for two years immediately 3613
preceding the making of the application; 3614
(3) The location at which the organization will conduct 3615
bingo, which location shall be within the county in which the 3616
principal place of business of the applicant is located, the 3617
days of the week and the times on each of those days when bingo 3618
will be conducted, whether the organization owns, leases, or 3619
subleases the premises, and a copy of the rental agreement if it 3620
leases or subleases the premises; 3621

S. B. No. 197 Page 126
As Introduced
(4) A statement of the applicant's previous history, 3622
record, and association that is sufficient to establish that the 3623
applicant is a charitable organization, and a copy of a 3624
determination letter that is issued by the Internal Revenue 3625
Service and states that the organization is tax exempt under 3626
subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3), 501(c) 3627
(4), 501(c)(7), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), or 501(c)(19) of the 3628
Internal Revenue Code; 3629
(5) A statement as to whether the applicant has ever had 3630
any previous application refused, whether it previously has had 3631
a license revoked or suspended, and the stated reason stated by 3632
the attorney general for the refusal, revocation, or suspension; 3633
(6) A statement of the charitable purposes for which the 3634
net profit derived from bingo described in division (O)(1) (A) 3635
(1) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code will be used, 3636
or a statement of how the net profit derived from instant bingo 3637
or electronic instant bingo will be distributed in accordance 3638
with section 2915.101 3768.13 of the Revised Code, as 3639
applicable; 3640
(7) Other necessary and reasonable information that the 3641
attorney general commission may require by rule adopted pursuant 3642
to section 111.15 of the Revised Code; 3643
(8) If the applicant is a charitable trust as defined in 3644
section 109.23 of the Revised Code, a statement as to whether it 3645
has registered with the attorney general pursuant to section 3646
109.26 of the Revised Code or filed annual reports pursuant to 3647
section 109.31 of the Revised Code, and, if it is not required 3648
to do either, the exemption in section 109.26 or 109.31 of the 3649
Revised Code that applies to it; 3650

S. B. No. 197 Page 127
As Introduced
(9) If the applicant is a charitable organization as 3651
defined in section 1716.01 of the Revised Code, a statement as 3652
to whether it has filed with the attorney general a registration 3653
statement pursuant to section 1716.02 of the Revised Code and a 3654
financial report pursuant to section 1716.04 of the Revised 3655
Code, and, if it is not required to do both, the exemption in 3656
section 1716.03 of the Revised Code that applies to it; 3657
(10) In the case of an applicant seeking to qualify as a 3658
youth athletic park organization, a statement issued by a board 3659
or body vested with authority under Chapter 755. of the Revised 3660
Code for the supervision and maintenance of recreation 3661
facilities in the territory in which the organization is 3662
located, certifying that the playing fields owned by the 3663
organization were open for use to all residents of that 3664
territory, regardless of race, color, creed, religion, sex, or 3665
national origin, for athletic activities by youth athletic 3666
organizations that do not discriminate on the basis of race, 3667
color, creed, religion, sex, or national origin, and that the 3668
fields were not used for any profit-making activity at any time 3669
during the year. That type of board or body is authorized to 3670
issue the statement upon request and shall issue the statement 3671
if it finds that the applicant's playing fields were so used. 3672
(D) The attorney general commission, within thirty days 3673
after receiving a timely filed application from a charitable 3674
organization that has been issued a license under this section 3675
that has not expired and has not been revoked or suspended, 3676
shall send a temporary permit to the applicant specifying the 3677
date on which the application was filed with the attorney 3678
general commission and stating that, pursuant to section 119.06 3679
of the Revised Code, the applicant may continue to conduct bingo 3680
until a new license is granted or, if the application is 3681

S. B. No. 197 Page 128
As Introduced
rejected, until fifteen days after notice of the rejection is 3682
mailed to the applicant. The temporary permit does not affect 3683
the validity of the applicant's application and does not grant 3684
any rights to the applicant except those rights specifically 3685
granted in section 119.06 of the Revised Code. The issuance of a 3686
temporary permit by the attorney general commission pursuant to 3687
this division does not prohibit the attorney general commission 3688
from rejecting the applicant's application because of acts that 3689
the applicant committed, or actions that the applicant failed to 3690
take, before or after the issuance of the temporary permit. 3691
(E) Within thirty days after receiving an initial license 3692
application from a charitable organization to conduct bingo, the 3693
attorney general commission shall conduct a preliminary review 3694
of the application and notify the applicant regarding any 3695
deficiencies. Once an application is deemed complete, or 3696
beginning on the thirtieth day after the application is filed, 3697
if the attorney general commission failed to notify the 3698
applicant of any deficiencies, the attorney general commission 3699
shall have an additional sixty days to conduct an investigation 3700
and either grant, grant with limits, restrictions, or 3701
probationary conditions, or deny the application based on 3702
findings established and communicated in accordance with 3703
divisions (F) and (I) of this section. As an option to granting, 3704
granting with limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions, 3705
or denying an initial license application, the attorney general 3706
commission may grant a temporary license and request additional 3707
time to conduct the investigation if the attorney general 3708
commission has cause to believe that additional time is 3709
necessary to complete the investigation and has notified the 3710
applicant in writing about the specific concerns raised during 3711
the investigation. 3712

S. B. No. 197 Page 129
As Introduced
(F)(1) The attorney general commission shall adopt rules 3713
to enforce sections 2915.01, 2915.02, and 2915.07 to 2915.15 of 3714
the Revised Code this chapter to ensure that bingo is and games 3715
of chance are conducted in accordance with those sections this 3716
chapter and to maintain proper control over the conduct of bingo 3717
and games of chance by charitable organizations. Except as 3718
otherwise provided in this section, the rules shall be adopted 3719
pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The attorney 3720
general commission shall license charitable organizations to 3721
conduct bingo in conformance with this chapter and with the 3722
licensing provisions of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. 3723
(2) If any of the following applies to an organization, 3724
the attorney general commission may refuse to grant a license to 3725
the organization, may revoke or suspend the organization's 3726
license, or may place limits, restrictions, or probationary 3727
conditions on the organization's license for a limited or 3728
indefinite period, as determined by the attorney general 3729
commission: 3730
(a) The organization fails or has failed at any time to 3731
meet any requirement of this chapter or of section 109.26, 3732
109.31, or 1716.02, or sections 2915.07 to 2915.15 of the 3733
Revised Code, or violates or has violated any provision of 3734
sections 2915.02 or 2915.07 to 2915.13 of the Revised Code this 3735
chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general commission 3736
pursuant to this chapter. 3737
(b) The organization makes or has made an incorrect or 3738
false statement that is material to the granting of the license 3739
in an application filed under this section. 3740
(c) The organization submits or has submitted any 3741
incorrect or false information relating to an application if the 3742

S. B. No. 197 Page 130
As Introduced
information is material to the granting of the license. 3743
(d) The organization maintains or has maintained any 3744
incorrect or false information that is material to the granting 3745
of the license in the records required to be kept pursuant to 3746
section 2915.10 3768.14 of the Revised Code, if applicable. 3747
(e) The attorney general commission has good cause to 3748
believe that the organization will not conduct bingo in 3749
accordance with sections 2915.07 to 2915.15 of the Revised Code 3750
this chapter or with any rule adopted by the attorney general 3751
commission pursuant to this chapter. 3752
(3) If the attorney general commission has good cause to 3753
believe that any director or officer of the organization has 3754
breached the director's or officer's fiduciary duty to, or 3755
committed theft or any other type of misconduct related to, the 3756
organization or any other charitable organization that has been 3757
issued a bingo license under this chapter, the attorney general 3758
commission may refuse to grant a license to the organization, 3759
may impose limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on 3760
the license, or may revoke or suspend the organization's license 3761
for a period not to exceed five years. 3762
(4) The attorney general commission may impose a civil 3763
fine on an organization licensed or permitted under this chapter 3764
for failure to comply with any restrictions, limits, or 3765
probationary conditions on its license, and for failure to 3766
comply with this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, 3767
according to a schedule of fines that the attorney general 3768
commission shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the 3769
Revised Code. 3770
(5) For the purposes of division (F) of this section, any 3771

S. B. No. 197 Page 131
As Introduced
action of an officer, trustee, agent, representative, or bingo 3772
game operator of an organization is an action of the 3773
organization. 3774
(G) The attorney general commission may grant licenses to 3775
charitable organizations that are branches, lodges, or chapters 3776
of national charitable organizations. 3777
(H) The attorney general commission shall send notice of 3778
any of the following actions in writing to the prosecuting 3779
attorney and sheriff of the county in which the charitable 3780
organization is located and to any other law enforcement agency 3781
in that county that so requests, of all of the following: 3782
(1) The issuance of a license under this section; 3783
(2) The issuance of an amended license under this section; 3784
(3) The rejection of an application for and refusal to 3785
grant a license under this section; 3786
(4) The revocation of any license previously issued under 3787
this section; 3788
(5) The suspension of any license previously issued under 3789
this section; 3790
(6) The placing of any limits, restrictions, or 3791
probationary conditions placed on a license issued under this 3792
section. 3793
(I) A license issued by the attorney general commission 3794
under this section shall set forth the information contained on 3795
the application of the charitable organization that the attorney 3796
general commission determines is relevant, including, but not 3797
limited to, the location at which the organization will conduct 3798
bingo, whether the license is a type I, type II, or type III 3799

S. B. No. 197 Page 132
As Introduced
license, and the days of the week and the times on each of those 3800
days when bingo will be conducted. If the attorney general 3801
commission refuses to grant, places limits, restrictions, or 3802
probationary conditions on, or revokes or suspends a license, 3803
the attorney general commission shall notify the applicant in 3804
writing and specifically identify the reason for the refusal, 3805
revocation, limit, restriction, probationary condition, or 3806
suspension in narrative form and, if applicable, by identifying 3807
the section of the Revised Code violated. The failure of the 3808
attorney general commission to give the written notice of the 3809
reasons for the refusal, revocation, limit, restriction, 3810
probationary condition, or suspension or a mistake in the 3811
written notice does not affect the validity of the attorney 3812
general's commission's refusal to grant, or the revocation or 3813
suspension of, or limit, restriction, probationary condition on, 3814
a license. If the attorney general commission fails to give the 3815
written notice or if there is a mistake in the written notice, 3816
the applicant may bring an action to compel the attorney general 3817
commission to comply with this division or to correct the 3818
mistake, but the attorney general's commission's order refusing 3819
to grant, or placing a limit, restriction, or probationary 3820
condition on, or revoking or suspending, a license shall not be 3821
enjoined during the pendency of the action. 3822
(J)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(2) 3823
of this section, a charitable organization that has been issued 3824
a license under this section but that cannot conduct bingo at 3825
the location, or on the day of the week or at the time, 3826
specified on the license due to circumstances that make it 3827
impractical to do so, or that desires to conduct instant bingo 3828
other than at a bingo session at additional locations not 3829
identified on the license, may apply in writing, together with 3830

S. B. No. 197 Page 133
As Introduced
an application fee of two hundred fifty dollars, to the attorney 3831
general commission, at least thirty days prior to a change in or 3832
addition of a location, day of the week, or time, and request an 3833
amended license. 3834
(b) As applicable, the application shall describe the 3835
causes making it impractical for the organization to conduct 3836
bingo in conformity with its license and shall indicate the 3837
location, days of the week, and times on each of those days when 3838
it desires to conduct bingo and, as applicable, shall indicate 3839
the additional locations at which it desires to conduct instant 3840
bingo other than at a bingo session. 3841
(c) Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(3) of 3842
this section, the attorney general commission shall issue the 3843
amended license in accordance with division (I) of this section, 3844
and the organization shall surrender its original license to the 3845
attorney general. 3846
(2)(a) A charitable organization that has been issued a 3847
license under this section to conduct electronic instant bingo 3848
but that cannot conduct electronic instant bingo at the 3849
location, or on the day of the week or at the time, specified on 3850
the license due to circumstances that make it impractical to do 3851
so, may apply in writing, together with an application fee of 3852
two hundred fifty dollars, to the attorney general commission, 3853
at least thirty days prior to a change in a location, day of the 3854
week, or time, and request an amended license. A charitable 3855
organization may not apply for an amended license to conduct 3856
electronic instant bingo at any additional location. 3857
(b) The application shall describe the causes making it 3858
impractical for the organization to conduct electronic instant 3859
bingo in conformity with its license and shall indicate the 3860

S. B. No. 197 Page 134
As Introduced
location, days of the week, and times on each of those days when 3861
it desires to conduct electronic instant bingo. 3862
(c) Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(3) of 3863
this section, the attorney general commission shall issue the 3864
amended license in accordance with division (I) of this section, 3865
and the organization shall surrender its original license to the 3866
attorney general commission. 3867
(3) The attorney general commission may refuse to grant an 3868
amended license under division (J)(1) or (2) of this section 3869
according to the terms of division (F) of this section. 3870
(K) The attorney general may enter into a written contract 3871
with any other state agency to delegate to that state agency the 3872
powers prescribed to the attorney general under Chapter 2915. of 3873
the Revised Code. 3874
(L) The attorney general commission, by rule adopted 3875
pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code, may adopt rules 3876
to determine the requirements for a charitable organization that 3877
is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) 3878
and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 3879
Code to be in good standing in the state for purposes of this 3880
chapter. 3881
Sec. 2915.09 3768.05. (A) No charitable organization that 3882
conducts bingo shall fail to do any of the following: 3883
(1) Own all of the equipment used to conduct bingo or 3884
lease that equipment from a charitable organization that is 3885
licensed to conduct bingo, or from the landlord of a premises 3886
where bingo is conducted, for a rental rate that is not more 3887
than is customary and reasonable for that equipment; 3888
(2) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(3) of 3889

S. B. No. 197 Page 135
As Introduced
this section, use all of the gross receipts from bingo for 3890
paying prizes, for reimbursement of expenses for or for renting 3891
premises in which to conduct a bingo session, for reimbursement 3892
of expenses for or for purchasing or leasing bingo supplies used 3893
in conducting bingo, for reimbursement of expenses for or for 3894
hiring security personnel, for reimbursement of expenses for or 3895
for advertising bingo, or for reimbursement of other expenses or 3896
for other expenses listed in division (GG) (Q) of section 3897
2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code, provided that the amount of 3898
the receipts so spent is not more than is customary and 3899
reasonable for a similar purchase, lease, hiring, advertising, 3900
or expense. If the building in which bingo is conducted is owned 3901
by the charitable organization conducting bingo and the bingo 3902
conducted includes a form of bingo described in division (O)(1) 3903
(A)(1) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code, the 3904
charitable organization may deduct from the total amount of the 3905
gross receipts from each session a sum equal to the lesser of 3906
six hundred dollars or forty-five per cent of the gross receipts 3907
from the bingo described in that division as consideration for 3908
the use of the premises. 3909
(3) Use, or give, donate, or otherwise transfer, all of 3910
the net profit derived from bingo described in division (O)(1) 3911
(A)(1) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code for a 3912
charitable purpose listed in its license application and 3913
described in division (V) (H) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the 3914
Revised Code, or distribute all of the net profit from the 3915
proceeds of the sale of instant bingo or electronic instant 3916
bingo as stated in its license application and in accordance 3917
with section 2915.101 3768.13 of the Revised Code, as 3918
applicable. 3919
(B) No charitable organization that conducts a bingo game 3920

S. B. No. 197 Page 136
As Introduced
described in division (O)(1) (A)(1) of section 2915.01 3768.01 3921
of the Revised Code shall fail to do any of the following: 3922
(1) Conduct the bingo game on premises that are owned by 3923
the charitable organization, on premises that are owned by 3924
another charitable organization and leased from that charitable 3925
organization for a rental rate not in excess of the lesser of 3926
six hundred dollars per bingo session or forty-five per cent of 3927
the gross receipts of the bingo session, on premises that are 3928
leased from a person other than a charitable organization for a 3929
rental rate that is not more than is customary and reasonable 3930
for premises that are similar in location, size, and quality but 3931
not in excess of four hundred fifty dollars per bingo session, 3932
or on premises that are owned by a person other than a 3933
charitable organization, that are leased from that person by 3934
another charitable organization, and that are subleased from 3935
that other charitable organization by the charitable 3936
organization for a rental rate not in excess of four hundred 3937
fifty dollars per bingo session. No charitable organization is 3938
required to pay property taxes or assessments on premises that 3939
the charitable organization leases from another person to 3940
conduct bingo sessions. If the charitable organization leases 3941
from a person other than a charitable organization the premises 3942
on which it conducts bingo sessions, the lessor of the premises 3943
shall provide the premises to the organization and shall not 3944
provide the organization with bingo game operators, security 3945
personnel, concessions or concession operators, bingo supplies, 3946
or any other type of service. A charitable organization shall 3947
not lease or sublease premises that it owns or leases to more 3948
than three other charitable organizations per calendar week for 3949
conducting bingo sessions on the premises. A person that is not 3950
a charitable organization shall not lease premises that it owns, 3951

S. B. No. 197 Page 137
As Introduced
leases, or otherwise is empowered to lease to more than three 3952
charitable organizations per calendar week for conducting bingo 3953
sessions on the premises. In no case shall more than nine bingo 3954
sessions be conducted on any premises in any calendar week. 3955
(2) Display its license conspicuously at the premises 3956
where the bingo session is conducted; 3957
(3) Conduct the bingo session in accordance with the 3958
definition of bingo set forth in division (O)(1) (A)(1) of 3959
section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code. 3960
(C) No charitable organization that conducts a bingo game 3961
described in division (O)(1) (A)(1) of section 2915.01 3768.01 3962
of the Revised Code shall do any of the following: 3963
(1) Pay any compensation to a bingo game operator for 3964
operating a bingo session that is conducted by the charitable 3965
organization or for preparing, selling, or serving food or 3966
beverages at the site of the bingo session, permit any auxiliary 3967
unit or society of the charitable organization to pay 3968
compensation to any bingo game operator who prepares, sells, or 3969
serves food or beverages at a bingo session conducted by the 3970
charitable organization, or permit any auxiliary unit or society 3971
of the charitable organization to prepare, sell, or serve food 3972
or beverages at a bingo session conducted by the charitable 3973
organization, if the auxiliary unit or society pays any 3974
compensation to the bingo game operators who prepare, sell, or 3975
serve the food or beverages; 3976
(2) Pay consulting fees to any person for any services 3977
performed in relation to the bingo session; 3978
(3) Pay concession fees to any person who provides 3979
refreshments to the participants in the bingo session; 3980

S. B. No. 197 Page 138
As Introduced
(4) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(4) of 3981
this section, conduct more than three bingo sessions in any 3982
seven-day period. A volunteer firefighter's organization or a 3983
volunteer rescue service organization that conducts not more 3984
than five bingo sessions in a calendar year may conduct more 3985
than three bingo sessions in a seven-day period after notifying 3986
the attorney general when it will conduct the sessions. 3987
(5) Pay out more than six thousand dollars in prizes for 3988
bingo games described in division (O)(1) (A)(1) of section 3989
2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code during any bingo session 3990
that is conducted by the charitable organization. "Prizes" does 3991
not include awards from the conduct of instant bingo. 3992
(6) Conduct a bingo session at any time during the eight- 3993
hour period between two a.m. and ten a.m., at any time during, 3994
or within ten hours of, a bingo game conducted for amusement 3995
only pursuant to section 2915.12 3768.18 of the Revised Code, at 3996
any premises not specified on its license, or on any day of the 3997
week or during any time period not specified on its license. 3998
Division (A)(6) of this section does not prohibit the sale of 3999
instant bingo tickets beginning at nine a.m. for a bingo session 4000
that begins at ten a.m. If circumstances make it impractical for 4001
the charitable organization to conduct a bingo session at the 4002
premises, or on the day of the week or at the time, specified on 4003
its license, or if a charitable organization wants to conduct 4004
bingo sessions on a day of the week or at a time other than the 4005
day or time specified on its license, the charitable 4006
organization may apply in writing to the attorney general for an 4007
amended license pursuant to division (J) of section 2915.08 4008
3768.04 of the Revised Code. A charitable organization may apply 4009
twice in each calendar year for an amended license to conduct 4010
bingo sessions on a day of the week or at a time other than the 4011

S. B. No. 197 Page 139
As Introduced
day or time specified on its license. If the amended license is 4012
granted, the organization may conduct bingo sessions at the 4013
premises, on the day of the week, and at the time specified on 4014
its amended license. 4015
(7) Permit any person whom the charitable organization 4016
knows, or should have known, is under the age of eighteen to 4017
work as a bingo game operator; 4018
(8) Permit any person whom the charitable organization 4019
knows, or should have known, has been convicted of a felony or 4020
gambling offense in any jurisdiction to be a bingo game 4021
operator; 4022
(9) Permit the lessor of the premises on which the bingo 4023
session is conducted, if the lessor is not a charitable 4024
organization, to provide the charitable organization with bingo 4025
game operators, security personnel, concessions, bingo supplies, 4026
or any other type of service; 4027
(10) Purchase or lease bingo supplies from any person 4028
except a distributor issued a license under section 2915.081 4029
3768.16 of the Revised Code; 4030
(11)(a) Use or permit the use of electronic bingo aids 4031
except under the following circumstances: 4032
(i) For any single participant, not more than ninety bingo 4033
faces can be played using an electronic bingo aid or aids. 4034
(ii) The charitable organization shall provide a 4035
participant using an electronic bingo aid with corresponding 4036
paper bingo cards or sheets. 4037
(iii) The total price of bingo faces played with an 4038
electronic bingo aid shall be equal to the total price of the 4039

S. B. No. 197 Page 140
As Introduced
same number of bingo faces played with a paper bingo card or 4040
sheet sold at the same bingo session but without an electronic 4041
bingo aid. 4042
(iv) An electronic bingo aid cannot be part of an 4043
electronic network other than a network that includes only bingo 4044
aids and devices that are located on the premises at which the 4045
bingo is being conducted or be interactive with any device not 4046
located on the premises at which the bingo is being conducted. 4047
(v) An electronic bingo aid cannot be used to participate 4048
in bingo that is conducted at a location other than the location 4049
at which the bingo session is conducted and at which the 4050
electronic bingo aid is used. 4051
(vi) An electronic bingo aid cannot be used to provide for 4052
the input of numbers and letters announced by a bingo caller 4053
other than the bingo caller who physically calls the numbers and 4054
letters at the location at which the bingo session is conducted 4055
and at which the electronic bingo aid is used. 4056
(b) The attorney general commission may adopt rules in 4057
accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that govern the 4058
use of electronic bingo aids. The rules may include a 4059
requirement that an electronic bingo aid be capable of being 4060
audited by the attorney general commission to verify the number 4061
of bingo cards or sheets played during each bingo session. 4062
(12) Permit any person the charitable organization knows, 4063
or should have known, to be under eighteen years of age to play 4064
bingo described in division (O)(1) (A)(1) of section 2915.01 4065
3768.01 of the Revised Code. 4066
(D)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(3) of 4067
this section, no charitable organization shall provide to a 4068

S. B. No. 197 Page 141
As Introduced
bingo game operator, and no bingo game operator shall receive or 4069
accept, any commission, wage, salary, reward, tip, donation, 4070
gratuity, or other form of compensation, directly or indirectly, 4071
regardless of the source, for conducting bingo or providing 4072
other work or labor at the site of bingo during a bingo session. 4073
(2) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(3) of 4074
this section, no charitable organization shall provide to a 4075
bingo game operator any commission, wage, salary, reward, tip, 4076
donation, gratuity, or other form of compensation, directly or 4077
indirectly, regardless of the source, for conducting instant 4078
bingo, electronic instant bingo, or both other than at a bingo 4079
session at the site of instant bingo, electronic instant bingo, 4080
or both other than at a bingo session. 4081
(3) Nothing in division (D) of this section prohibits an 4082
employee of a fraternal organization, veteran's organization, or 4083
sporting organization from selling instant bingo tickets or 4084
cards to the organization's members or invited guests, as long 4085
as no portion of the employee's compensation is paid from any 4086
receipts of bingo. 4087
(E) Notwithstanding division (B)(1) of this section, a 4088
charitable organization that, prior to December 6, 1977, has 4089
entered into written agreements for the lease of premises it 4090
owns to another charitable organization or other charitable 4091
organizations for the conducting of bingo sessions so that more 4092
than two bingo sessions are conducted per calendar week on the 4093
premises, and a person that is not a charitable organization and 4094
that, prior to December 6, 1977, has entered into written 4095
agreements for the lease of premises it owns to charitable 4096
organizations for the conducting of more than two bingo sessions 4097
per calendar week on the premises, may continue to lease the 4098

S. B. No. 197 Page 142
As Introduced
premises to those charitable organizations, provided that no 4099
more than four sessions are conducted per calendar week, that 4100
the lessor organization or person has notified the attorney 4101
general commission in writing of the organizations that will 4102
conduct the sessions and the days of the week and the times of 4103
the day on which the sessions will be conducted, that the 4104
initial lease entered into with each organization that will 4105
conduct the sessions was filed with the attorney general prior 4106
to December 6, 1977, and that each organization that will 4107
conduct the sessions was issued a license to conduct bingo games 4108
by the attorney general prior to December 6, 1977. 4109
(F) This section does not prohibit a bingo licensed 4110
charitable organization or a game operator from giving any 4111
person an instant bingo ticket as a prize. 4112
(G) Whoever violates division (A)(2) of this section is 4113
guilty of illegally conducting a bingo game, a felony of the 4114
fourth degree. Except as otherwise provided in this division, 4115
whoever violates division (A)(1) or (3), (B)(1), (2), or (3), 4116
(C)(1) to (11), or (D) of this section is guilty of a minor 4117
misdemeanor. If the offender previously has been convicted of a 4118
violation of division (A)(1) or (3), (B)(1), (2), or (3), (C)(1) 4119
to (11), or (D) of this section, a violation of division (A)(1) 4120
or (3), (B)(1), (2), or (3), (C), or (D) of this section is a 4121
misdemeanor of the first degree. Whoever violates division (C) 4122
(12) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first 4123
degree, or if the offender previously has been convicted of a 4124
violation of division (C)(12) of this section, a felony of the 4125
fourth degree. 4126
Sec. 2915.091 3768.06. (A) No charitable organization that 4127
conducts instant bingo shall do any of the following: 4128

S. B. No. 197 Page 143
As Introduced
(1) Fail to comply with the requirements of divisions (A) 4129
(1), (2), and (3) of section 2915.09 3768.05 of the Revised 4130
Code; 4131
(2) Conduct instant bingo unless either of the following 4132
applies: 4133
(a) That organization is, and has received from the 4134
internal revenue service a determination letter that is 4135
currently in effect stating that the organization is, exempt 4136
from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a), is 4137
described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 4138
is a charitable organization as defined in section 2915.01 4139
3768.01 of the Revised Code, is in good standing in the state 4140
pursuant to section 2915.08 3768.04 of the Revised Code, and is 4141
in compliance with Chapter 1716. of the Revised Code; 4142
(b) That organization is, and has received from the 4143
internal revenue service a determination letter that is 4144
currently in effect stating that the organization is, exempt 4145
from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a), is 4146
described in subsection 501(c)(7), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), or 4147
501(c)(19) or is a veteran's organization described in 4148
subsection 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, and conducts 4149
instant bingo under section 2915.13 3768.10 of the Revised Code. 4150
(3) Conduct instant bingo on any day, at any time, or at 4151
any premises not specified on the organization's license issued 4152
pursuant to section 2915.08 3768.04 of the Revised Code; 4153
(4) Permit any person whom the organization knows or 4154
should have known has been convicted of a felony or gambling 4155
offense in any jurisdiction to be a bingo game operator in the 4156
conduct of instant bingo; 4157

S. B. No. 197 Page 144
As Introduced
(5) Purchase or lease supplies used to conduct instant 4158
bingo or punch board games from any person except a distributor 4159
licensed under section 2915.081 3768.16 of the Revised Code; 4160
(6) Sell or provide any instant bingo ticket or card for a 4161
price different from the price printed on it by the manufacturer 4162
on either the instant bingo ticket or card or on the game flare; 4163
(7) Sell an instant bingo ticket or card to a person under 4164
eighteen years of age; 4165
(8) Fail to keep unsold instant bingo tickets or cards for 4166
less than three years; 4167
(9) Pay any compensation to a bingo game operator for 4168
conducting instant bingo that is conducted by the organization 4169
or for preparing, selling, or serving food or beverages at the 4170
site of the instant bingo game, permit any auxiliary unit or 4171
society of the organization to pay compensation to any bingo 4172
game operator who prepares, sells, or serves food or beverages 4173
at an instant bingo game conducted by the organization, or 4174
permit any auxiliary unit or society of the organization to 4175
prepare, sell, or serve food or beverages at an instant bingo 4176
game conducted by the organization, if the auxiliary unit or 4177
society pays any compensation to the bingo game operators who 4178
prepare, sell, or serve the food or beverages; 4179
(10) Pay fees to any person for any services performed in 4180
relation to an instant bingo game, except as provided in 4181
division (D) of section 2915.093 3768.07 of the Revised Code; 4182
(11) Pay fees to any person who provides refreshments to 4183
the participants in an instant bingo game; 4184
(12)(a) Allow instant bingo tickets or cards to be sold to 4185
bingo game operators at a premises at which the organization 4186

S. B. No. 197 Page 145
As Introduced
sells instant bingo tickets or cards or to be sold to employees 4187
of a D permit holder who are working at a premises at which 4188
instant bingo tickets or cards are sold; 4189
(b) Division (A)(12)(a) of this section does not prohibit 4190
a licensed charitable organization or a bingo game operator from 4191
giving any person an instant bingo ticket as a prize in place of 4192
a cash prize won by a participant in an instant bingo game. In 4193
no case shall an instant bingo ticket or card be sold or 4194
provided for a price different from the price printed on it by 4195
the manufacturer on either the instant bingo ticket or card or 4196
on the game flare. 4197
(13) Fail to display its bingo license, and the serial 4198
numbers of the deal of instant bingo tickets or cards to be 4199
sold, conspicuously at each premises at which it sells instant 4200
bingo tickets or cards; 4201
(14) Possess a deal of instant bingo tickets or cards that 4202
was not purchased from a distributor licensed under section 4203
2915.081 3768.16 of the Revised Code as reflected on an invoice 4204
issued by the distributor that contains all of the information 4205
required by division (E) of section 2915.10 3768.14 of the 4206
Revised Code; 4207
(15) Fail, once it opens a deal of instant bingo tickets 4208
or cards, to continue to sell the tickets or cards in that deal 4209
until the tickets or cards with the top two highest tiers of 4210
prizes in that deal are sold; 4211
(16) Possess bingo supplies that were not obtained in 4212
accordance with this chapter. 4213
(B) A charitable organization may purchase, lease, or use 4214
instant bingo ticket dispensers to sell instant bingo tickets or 4215

S. B. No. 197 Page 146
As Introduced
cards. 4216
(C) The attorney general commission may adopt rules in 4217
accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that govern the 4218
conduct of instant bingo by charitable organizations. Before In 4219
adopting those rules are adopted, the attorney general the 4220
commission shall reference the recommended standards for 4221
opacity, randomization, minimum information, winner protection, 4222
color, and cutting for instant bingo tickets or cards, seal 4223
cards, and punch boards established by the North American gaming 4224
regulators association. 4225
(D) Whoever violates division (A) of this section or a 4226
rule adopted under division (C) of this section is guilty of 4227
illegal instant bingo conduct. Except as otherwise provided in 4228
this division, illegal instant bingo conduct is a misdemeanor of 4229
the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted 4230
of a violation of division (A) of this section or of such a 4231
rule, illegal instant bingo conduct is a felony of the fifth 4232
degree. 4233
Sec. 2915.093 3768.07. (A) As used in this section, 4234
"retail income from all commercial activity" means the income 4235
that a person receives from the provision of goods, services, or 4236
activities that are provided at the location where instant bingo 4237
other than at a bingo session is conducted, including the sale 4238
of instant bingo tickets. A religious organization that is 4239
exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and 4240
described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 4241
at not more than one location at which it conducts its 4242
charitable programs, may include donations from its members and 4243
guests as retail income. 4244
(B)(1) If a charitable instant bingo organization conducts 4245

S. B. No. 197 Page 147
As Introduced
instant bingo other than at a bingo session under a type III 4246
license issued under section 2915.08 3768.04 of the Revised 4247
Code, the charitable instant bingo organization shall enter into 4248
a written contract with the owner or lessor of the location at 4249
which the instant bingo is conducted to allow the owner or 4250
lessor to assist in the conduct of instant bingo other than at a 4251
bingo session, identify each location where the instant bingo 4252
other than at a bingo session is being conducted, and identify 4253
the owner or lessor of each location. 4254
(2) A charitable instant bingo organization that conducts 4255
instant bingo other than at a bingo session under a type III 4256
license issued under section 2915.08 3768.04 of the Revised Code 4257
is not required to enter into a written contract with the owner 4258
or lessor of the location at which the instant bingo is 4259
conducted, provided that the owner or lessor is not assisting in 4260
the conduct of the instant bingo other than at a bingo session 4261
and provided that the conduct of the instant bingo other than at 4262
a bingo session at that location is not more than five days per 4263
calendar year and not more than ten hours per day. 4264
(C) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, no 4265
charitable instant bingo organization shall conduct instant 4266
bingo other than at a bingo session at a location where the 4267
primary source of retail income from all commercial activity at 4268
that location is the sale of instant bingo tickets. 4269
(D) The owner or lessor of a location that enters into a 4270
contract pursuant to division (B) of this section shall pay the 4271
full gross profit to the charitable instant bingo organization, 4272
in return for the deal of instant bingo tickets. The owner or 4273
lessor may retain the money that the owner or lessor receives 4274
for selling the instant bingo tickets, provided, however, that 4275

S. B. No. 197 Page 148
As Introduced
after the deal has been sold, the owner or lessor shall pay to 4276
the charitable instant bingo organization the value of any 4277
unredeemed instant bingo prizes remaining in the deal of instant 4278
bingo tickets. 4279
The charitable instant bingo organization shall pay six 4280
per cent of the total gross receipts of any deal of instant 4281
bingo tickets for the purpose of reimbursing the owner or lessor 4282
for expenses described in this division. 4283
As used in this division, "expenses" means those items 4284
provided for in divisions (GG)(4) (R)(4), (5), (6), (7), (8), 4285
(12), and (13) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code 4286
and that percentage of the owner's or lessor's rent for the 4287
location where instant bingo is conducted. "Expenses," in the 4288
aggregate, shall not exceed six per cent of the total gross 4289
receipts of any deal of instant bingo tickets. 4290
As used in this division, "full gross profit" means the 4291
amount by which the total receipts of all instant bingo tickets, 4292
if the deal had been sold in full, exceeds the amount that would 4293
be paid out if all prizes were redeemed. 4294
(E) A charitable instant bingo organization shall provide 4295
the attorney general with all of the following information: 4296
(1) That the charitable instant bingo organization has 4297
terminated a contract entered into pursuant to division (B) of 4298
this section with an owner or lessor of a location; 4299
(2) That the charitable instant bingo organization has 4300
entered into a written contract pursuant to division (B) of this 4301
section with a new owner or lessor of a location; 4302
(3) That the charitable instant bingo organization is 4303
aware of conduct by the owner or lessor of a location at which 4304

S. B. No. 197 Page 149
As Introduced
instant bingo is conducted that is in violation of this chapter. 4305
(F) Division (C) of this section does not apply to a 4306
volunteer firefighter's organization that is exempt from federal 4307
income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in 4308
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, that conducts 4309
instant bingo other than at a bingo session on the premises 4310
where the organization conducts firefighter training, that has 4311
conducted instant bingo continuously for at least five years 4312
prior to July 1, 2003, and that, during each of those five 4313
years, had gross receipts of at least one million five hundred 4314
thousand dollars. 4315
Sec. 2915.094 3768.08. (A) No owner or lessor of a 4316
location shall assist a charitable instant bingo organization in 4317
the conduct of instant bingo other than at a bingo session at 4318
that location unless the owner or lessor has entered into a 4319
written contract, as described in section 2915.093 3768.07 of 4320
the Revised Code, with the charitable instant bingo organization 4321
to assist in the conduct of instant bingo other than at a bingo 4322
session. 4323
(B) The location of the lessor or owner shall be 4324
designated as a location where the charitable instant bingo 4325
organization conducts instant bingo other than at a bingo 4326
session. 4327
(C) No owner or lessor of a location that enters into a 4328
written contract as prescribed in division (A) of this section 4329
shall violate any provision of this chapter or Chapter 2915. of 4330
the Revised Code, or permit, aid, or abet any other person in 4331
violating any provision of this chapter or Chapter 2915. of the 4332
Revised Code. 4333

S. B. No. 197 Page 150
As Introduced
(D) No owner or lessor of a location that enters into a 4334
written contract as prescribed in division (A) of this section 4335
shall violate the terms of the contract. 4336
(E)(1) Whoever violates division (C) or (D) of this 4337
section is guilty of illegal instant bingo conduct. Except as 4338
otherwise provided in this division, illegal instant bingo 4339
conduct is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender 4340
previously has been convicted of a violation of division (C) or 4341
(D) of this section, illegal instant bingo conduct is a felony 4342
of the fifth degree. 4343
(2) If an owner or lessor of a location knowingly, 4344
intentionally, or recklessly violates division (C) or (D) of 4345
this section, any license that the owner or lessor holds for the 4346
retail sale of any goods on the owner's or lessor's premises 4347
that is issued by the state or a political subdivision is 4348
subject to suspension, revocation, or payment of a monetary 4349
penalty at the request of the attorney generalcommission. 4350
Sec. 2915.095 3768.09. The attorney generalcommission, by 4351
rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code, 4352
shall establish a standard contract to be used by a charitable 4353
instant bingo organization, a veteran's organization, a 4354
fraternal organization, or a sporting organization for the 4355
conduct of instant bingo, electronic instant bingo, or both 4356
other than at a bingo session under a type III license issued 4357
under section 2915.08 3768.04 of the Revised Code. The terms of 4358
the contract shall be limited to the provisions in Chapter 2915. 4359
of the Revised Code of this chapter. 4360
Sec. 2915.13 3768.10. (A) Subject to the requirements of 4361
sections 2915.14 3768.11 and 2915.15 3768.12 of the Revised Code 4362
concerning electronic instant bingo, a veteran's organization, a 4363

S. B. No. 197 Page 151
As Introduced
fraternal organization, or a sporting organization authorized to 4364
conduct a bingo session pursuant to this chapter may conduct 4365
instant bingo, electronic instant bingo, or both other than at a 4366
bingo session under a type III license issued under section 4367
2915.08 3768.04 of the Revised Code if all of the following 4368
apply: 4369
(1) The veteran's organization, fraternal organization, or 4370
sporting organization limits the sale of instant bingo or 4371
electronic instant bingo to twelve sixteen hours during any day, 4372
provided that the sale does not begin earlier than ten eight 4373
a.m. and ends not later than two a.m. 4374
(2) The veteran's organization, fraternal organization, or 4375
sporting organization limits the sale of instant bingo or 4376
electronic instant bingo to its own premises and to its own 4377
members and invited guests. 4378
(3) The veteran's organization, fraternal organization, or 4379
sporting organization is raising money for an organization that 4380
is described in subsection 509(a)(1), 509(a)(2), or 509(a)(3) of 4381
the Internal Revenue Code and is either a governmental unit or 4382
an organization that maintains its principal place of business 4383
in this state, that is exempt from federal income taxation under 4384
subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the 4385
Internal Revenue Code, and that is in good standing in this 4386
state and executes a written contract with that organization as 4387
required in division (B) of this section. 4388
(B) If a veteran's organization, fraternal organization, 4389
or sporting organization authorized to conduct instant bingo or 4390
electronic instant bingo pursuant to division (A) of this 4391
section is raising money for another organization that is 4392
described in subsection 509(a)(1), 509(a)(2), or 509(a)(3) of 4393

S. B. No. 197 Page 152
As Introduced
the Internal Revenue Code and is either a governmental unit or 4394
an organization that maintains its principal place of business 4395
in this state, that is exempt from federal income taxation under 4396
subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the 4397
Internal Revenue Code, and that is in good standing in this 4398
state, the veteran's organization, fraternal organization, or 4399
sporting organization shall execute a written contract with the 4400
organization that is described in subsection 509(a)(1), 509(a) 4401
(2), or 509(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is either a 4402
governmental unit or an organization that maintains its 4403
principal place of business in this state, that is exempt from 4404
federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in 4405
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and that is 4406
in good standing in this state in order to conduct instant bingo 4407
or electronic instant bingo. That contract shall include a 4408
statement of the percentage of the net proceeds that the 4409
veteran's, fraternal, or sporting organization will be 4410
distributing to the organization that is described in subsection 4411
509(a)(1), 509(a)(2), or 509(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code 4412
and is either a governmental unit or an organization that 4413
maintains its principal place of business in this state, that is 4414
exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and 4415
described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 4416
and that is in good standing in this state under section 3768.13 4417
of the Revised Code. 4418
(C)(1) If a veteran's organization, fraternal 4419
organization, or sporting organization authorized to conduct 4420
instant bingo or electronic instant bingo pursuant to division 4421
(A) of this section has been issued a liquor permit under 4422
Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code, that permit may be subject to 4423
suspension, revocation, or cancellation if the veteran's 4424

S. B. No. 197 Page 153
As Introduced
organization, fraternal organization, or sporting organization 4425
violates a provision of this chapter. 4426
(2) No veteran's organization, fraternal organization, or 4427
sporting organization that enters into a written contract 4428
pursuant to division (B) of this section shall violate any 4429
provision of this chapter or permit, aid, or abet any other 4430
person in violating any provision of this chapter. 4431
(D) A veteran's organization, fraternal organization, or 4432
sporting organization shall give all required proceeds earned 4433
from the conduct of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo to 4434
the organization with which the veteran's organization, 4435
fraternal organization, or sporting organization has entered 4436
into a written contract. 4437
(E) Whoever violates this section is guilty of illegal 4438
instant bingo or electronic instant bingo conduct. Except as 4439
otherwise provided in this division, illegal instant bingo or 4440
electronic instant bingo conduct is a misdemeanor of the first 4441
degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of a 4442
violation of this section, illegal instant bingo or electronic 4443
instant bingo conduct is a felony of the fifth degree. 4444
Sec. 2915.14 3768.11. (A) No charitable organization shall 4445
conduct electronic instant bingo unless all of the following are 4446
true: 4447
(1) The organization is a veteran's organization described 4448
in division (J) (NN) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised 4449
Code, or is a fraternal organization described in division (L) 4450
(S) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code, and the 4451
organization qualified as a veteran's organization or fraternal 4452
organization, as applicable, on or before June 30, 2021. 4453

S. B. No. 197 Page 154
As Introduced
(2) The organization is a veteran's organization described 4454
in subsection 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code or is, and 4455
has received from the internal revenue service a determination 4456
letter that is currently in effect stating that the organization 4457
is, exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a), 4458
and is described in subsection 501(c)(7), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), 4459
or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code. 4460
(3) The organization has not conducted a raffle in 4461
violation of division (B) of section 2915.092 3768.02 of the 4462
Revised Code using an electronic raffle machine, as described in 4463
Ohio Veterans and Fraternal Charitable Coalition v. DeWine, Case 4464
No. 13-CV-13610 (C.P. Franklin Co. February 23, 2018), at any 4465
time on or after January 1, 2022. 4466
(B) No charitable organization that conducts electronic 4467
instant bingo shall do any of the following: 4468
(1) Possess an electronic instant bingo system that was 4469
not obtained in accordance with this chapter or with any rule 4470
adopted under this chapter; 4471
(2) Conduct electronic instant bingo on any day, at any 4472
time, or on any premises not specified on the organization's 4473
type II or type III license issued under section 2915.08 3768.04 4474
of the Revised Code; 4475
(3) Hold more than one valid license to conduct electronic 4476
instant bingo at any one time; 4477
(4) Conduct electronic instant bingo on more than one 4478
premises or on any premises other than the charitable 4479
organization's principal place of business; 4480
(5) Operate more than ten electronic bingo systems at the 4481
premises on which the charitable organization conducts 4482

S. B. No. 197 Page 155
As Introduced
electronic instant bingo under its license; 4483
(6) Fail to display both of the following conspicuously at 4484
the premises on which the charitable organization conducts 4485
electronic instant bingo: 4486
(a) The charitable organization's bingo license; 4487
(b) The serial number of each deal of electronic instant 4488
bingo tickets being sold. 4489
(7) Permit any person the charitable organization knows, 4490
or should have known, to be under eighteen years of age to play 4491
electronic instant bingo; 4492
(8) Sell or provide to any person an electronic instant 4493
bingo ticket for a price different from the price displayed on 4494
the game flare for that deal, except that the charitable 4495
organization may give a participant who wins an electronic 4496
instant bingo game an electronic instant bingo ticket as a prize 4497
in place of a cash prize; 4498
(9) Fail, once an electronic instant bingo deal is begun, 4499
to continue to sell tickets in that deal until all prizes have 4500
been awarded; 4501
(10) Permit any person whom the organization knows, or 4502
should have known, has been convicted of a felony or gambling 4503
offense in any jurisdiction to be a bingo game operator in the 4504
conduct of electronic instant bingo; 4505
(11) Permit a bingo game operator to play electronic 4506
instant bingo; 4507
(12)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(12) 4508
(b) of this section, pay compensation to a bingo game operator 4509
for conducting electronic instant bingo. 4510

S. B. No. 197 Page 156
As Introduced
(b) Division (B)(12)(a) of this section does not prohibit 4511
an employee of a veteran's organization or fraternal 4512
organization from redeeming electronic instant bingo tickets or 4513
vouchers for the organization's members or invited guests, so 4514
long as no portion of the employee's compensation is paid from 4515
any bingo receipts. 4516
(13) Pay consulting fees to any person in relation to 4517
electronic instant bingo. 4518
(C) No person shall sell, offer to sell, or otherwise 4519
provide or offer to provide an electronic instant bingo system 4520
to any person for use in this state unless the electronic 4521
instant bingo system has been approved under section 2915.15 4522
3768.12 of the Revised Code. 4523
(D) The attorney general commission shall adopt rules 4524
under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to ensure the integrity 4525
of electronic instant bingo, including, but not limited to, 4526
rules governing all of the following: 4527
(1) The requirements to receive a license or endorsement 4528
to conduct electronic instant bingo; 4529
(2) The location and number of electronic instant bingo 4530
systems in use, which shall not exceed ten at the single 4531
licensed location per organization; 4532
(3) The times when electronic instant bingo may be 4533
offered; 4534
(4) Signage requirements in facilities where electronic 4535
instant bingo is offered; 4536
(5) Electronic instant bingo device and system 4537
specifications, including reveal features and game themes; 4538

S. B. No. 197 Page 157
As Introduced
(6) Procedures and standards for the review, approval, 4539
inspection, and monitoring of electronic instant bingo systems, 4540
as described in section 2915.15 3768.12 of the Revised Code; 4541
(7) Procedures and standards for the review and approval 4542
of any changes to technology, systems, or games licensed or 4543
permitted under this chapter; 4544
(8) The fees to be charged under section 2915.15 3768.12 4545
of the Revised Code for review, approval, inspection, and 4546
monitoring of electronic instant bingo systems; 4547
(9) Procedures allowing the attorney general commission to 4548
seek a summary suspension of a license to conduct electronic 4549
instant bingo or a license to manufacture or distribute 4550
electronic instant bingo systems if the attorney general 4551
commission has good cause to believe that the person or 4552
organization licensed to conduct electronic instant bingo, or 4553
the person or organization licensed to manufacture or distribute 4554
electronic instant bingo systems, or any of the organization's 4555
employees, officers, directors, agents, representatives, or 4556
partners, has violated this chapter or a rule adopted under this 4557
chapter. 4558
(E) Whoever knowingly violates division (A), (B), or (C) 4559
of this section or a rule adopted under division (D) of this 4560
section is guilty of illegal electronic instant bingo conduct. 4561
Illegal electronic instant bingo conduct is a misdemeanor of the 4562
first degree, except that if the offender previously has been 4563
convicted of a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section 4564
or of a rule adopted under division (D) of this section, illegal 4565
instant bingo conduct is a felony of the fifth degree. 4566
Sec. 2915.15 3768.12. (A)(1) Before selling, offering to 4567

S. B. No. 197 Page 158
As Introduced
sell, or otherwise providing or offering to provide an 4568
electronic instant bingo system to any person for use in this 4569
state, a manufacturer shall submit the electronic instant bingo 4570
system to an a certified independent testing laboratory that is 4571
licensed by the state lottery commission under section 3770.02 4572
of the Revised Code, or that is certified under section 3772.31 4573
3772.312 of the Revised Code, for testing and evaluation to 4574
determine whether the electronic instant bingo system meets the 4575
requirements of this chapter and of rules adopted under this 4576
chapter. The manufacturer shall pay all costs of that testing 4577
and evaluation. 4578
(2) If the independent testing laboratory certifies that 4579
the electronic instant bingo system meets the requirements of 4580
this chapter and of rules adopted under this chapter, the 4581
manufacturer may submit the electronic instant bingo system, 4582
along with a copy of the laboratory's certification and a fee 4583
established by the attorney general by rule under Chapter 119. 4584
of the Revised Code, to the attorney general for review and 4585
approval. The manufacturer also shall submit a fee established 4586
by the attorney general by rule under Chapter 119. of the 4587
Revised Code, which the attorney general shall use to pay the 4588
cost of reviewing and approving electronic instant bingo systems 4589
under division (A) of this section. 4590
(3) The attorney general shall approve the system for use 4591
in this state if the attorney general determines that the 4592
electronic instant bingo system meets the requirements of this 4593
chapter and of the rules adopted under this chapter. The 4594
attorney general shall consult the Ohio casino control 4595
commission for assistance in determining whether an electronic 4596
instant bingo system is prohibited for use under this chapter on 4597
the ground that it is a slot machine. 4598

S. B. No. 197 Page 159
As Introduced
(4) An electronic instant bingo system shall be verified 4599
approved and sealed by the attorney general commission before 4600
the electronic instant bingo system is placed into service. 4601
(5) (3) Before an electronic instant bingo system is 4602
removed from service, the attorney general's commission's seal 4603
shall be removed by the attorney general's commission's 4604
designee. If the seal is removed after an electronic instant 4605
bingo system is sealed by the attorney general commission but 4606
before the electronic instant bingo system is placed into 4607
service, or if the seal is removed before an electronic instant 4608
bingo system is removed from service, or if the seal is removed 4609
by someone other than the attorney general's commission's 4610
designee, the electronic instant bingo system shall be returned 4611
to an a certified independent testing laboratory described in 4612
division (A)(1) of this section. 4613
(B) Any electronic instant bingo system approved for use 4614
in this state shall have a central server located in Ohio which 4615
is accessible to the attorney general commission and shall 4616
include an internal report management system that records 4617
information concerning the operation of the system and that 4618
meets the requirements adopted by the attorney general 4619
commission by rule under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The 4620
internal report management system shall permit the attorney 4621
general commission or another person designated by the attorney 4622
general commission to access the internal report management 4623
system, monitor the electronic instant bingo system, and 4624
remotely deactivate the electronic instant bingo system or any 4625
aspect of the system. 4626
(C) The attorney general commission may inspect any 4627
electronic instant bingo system in use in this state at any time 4628

S. B. No. 197 Page 160
As Introduced
to ensure that the system is in compliance with this chapter and 4629
with the rules adopted under this chapter. If the attorney 4630
general commission determines that any person or any electronic 4631
instant bingo system is in violation of any provision of this 4632
chapter or of any rule adopted under this chapter, the attorney 4633
general commission may order that the violation immediately 4634
cease and may deactivate the electronic instant bingo system or 4635
any aspect of it. 4636
(D) The attorney general commission may establish by rule 4637
adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code an annual fee to 4638
be paid by distributors licensed under section 2915.081 3768.16 4639
of the Revised Code who have electronic instant bingo 4640
distributor endorsements to their licenses in order to pay the 4641
cost of monitoring the systems under division (B) of this 4642
section and the cost of inspecting systems under division (C) of 4643
this section. 4644
Sec. 2915.101 3768.13. (A) As used in this section: 4645
(1) "Net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant 4646
bingo" means gross profit minus the ordinary, necessary, and 4647
reasonable expense expended for the purchase of bingo supplies 4648
for the purpose of conducting instant bingo or electronic 4649
instant bingo, and, in the case of instant bingo or electronic 4650
instant bingo conducted by a veteran's, fraternal, or sporting 4651
organization, minus the payment by that organization of real 4652
property taxes and assessments levied on a premises on which 4653
instant bingo or electronic instant bingo is conducted. 4654
(2) "Net profit from the proceeds of the sale of 4655
electronic instant bingo" means gross profit minus the ordinary, 4656
necessary, and reasonable expense expended for the purchase of 4657
bingo supplies for the purpose of conducting electronic instant 4658

S. B. No. 197 Page 161
As Introduced
bingo, and minus the payment by the veteran's or fraternal 4659
organization of real property taxes and assessments levied on a 4660
premises on which electronic instant bingo is conducted. 4661
(B) Except as otherwise provided by law, a charitable 4662
organization that conducts instant bingo or electronic instant 4663
bingo shall distribute the net profit from the proceeds of the 4664
sale of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo as follows: in 4665
accordance with this section. 4666
(A)(1) (C)(1) If a veteran's organization, a fraternal 4667
organization, or a sporting organization conducted the conducts 4668
instant bingo or electronic instant bingo, the organization 4669
shall distribute the net profit from the proceeds of the sale of 4670
instant bingo or electronic instant bingo, as follows: 4671
(a) For the first two three hundred fifty thirty thousand 4672
dollars, or a greater amount prescribed by the attorney general 4673
commission to adjust for changes in prices as measured by the 4674
consumer price index as defined in section 325.18 of the Revised 4675
Code and other factors affecting the organization's expenses, as 4676
defined in division (GG) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the 4677
Revised Code, or less of net profit from the proceeds of the 4678
sale of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo generated in a 4679
calendar year: 4680
(i) At least twenty-five per cent shall be distributed to 4681
an organization described in division (V)(1) (H)(1) of section 4682
2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code or to a department or agency 4683
of the federal government, the state, or any political 4684
subdivision. 4685
(ii) Not more than seventy-five per cent may be deducted 4686
and retained by the organization for reimbursement of or for the 4687

S. B. No. 197 Page 162
As Introduced
organization's expenses, as defined in division (GG) of section 4688
2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code, in conducting the instant 4689
bingo or electronic instant bingo game. 4690
(b) For any net profit from the proceeds of the sale of 4691
instant bingo or electronic instant bingo of more than two three 4692
hundred fifty thirty thousand dollars or an adjusted amount 4693
generated in a calendar year: 4694
(i) A minimum of fifty per cent shall be distributed to an 4695
organization described in division (V)(1) (H)(1) of section 4696
2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code or to a department or agency 4697
of the federal government, the state, or any political 4698
subdivision. 4699
(ii) Five per cent may be distributed for the 4700
organization's own charitable purposes or to a community action 4701
agency. 4702
(iii) Forty-five per cent may be deducted and retained by 4703
the organization for reimbursement of or for the organization's 4704
expenses, as defined in division (GG) of section 2915.01 3768.01 4705
of the Revised Code, in conducting the instant bingo or 4706
electronic instant bingo game. 4707
(2) If a veteran's organization, a fraternal organization, 4708
or a sporting organization does not distribute the full 4709
percentages specified in divisions (A)(1)(a) (C)(1)(a) and (b) 4710
of this section for the purposes specified in those divisions, 4711
the organization shall distribute the balance of the net profit 4712
from the proceeds of the sale of instant bingo or electronic 4713
instant bingo not distributed or retained for those purposes to 4714
an organization described in division (V)(1) (H)(1) of section 4715
2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code. 4716

S. B. No. 197 Page 163
As Introduced
(B) (D)(1) If a veteran's or fraternal organization 4717
conducts electronic instant bingo, the organization shall 4718
distribute the net profit from the proceeds of the sale of 4719
electronic instant bingo as follows: 4720
(a) For the first three hundred thirty thousand dollars, 4721
or a greater amount prescribed by the commission to adjust for 4722
changes in prices as measured by the consumer price index as 4723
defined in section 325.18 of the Revised Code and other factors 4724
affecting the organization's expenses, or less of net profit 4725
from the proceeds of the sale of electronic instant bingo 4726
generated in a calendar year: 4727
(i) At least twenty-five per cent shall be distributed to 4728
an organization described in division (H)(1) of section 3768.01 4729
of the Revised Code or to a department or agency of the federal 4730
government, the state, or any political subdivision. 4731
(ii) Not more than seventy-five per cent may be deducted 4732
and retained by the organization for reimbursement of or for the 4733
organization's expenses, as defined in section 3768.01 of the 4734
Revised Code, in conducting the electronic instant bingo game. 4735
(b) For any net profit from the proceeds of the sale of 4736
electronic instant bingo of more than three hundred thirty 4737
thousand dollars or an adjusted amount generated in a calendar 4738
year: 4739
(i) A minimum of fifty per cent shall be distributed to an 4740
organization described in division (H)(1) of section 2915.01 of 4741
the Revised Code or to a department or agency of the federal 4742
government, the state, or any political subdivision. 4743
(ii) Five per cent may be distributed for the 4744
organization's own charitable purposes or to a community action 4745

S. B. No. 197 Page 164
As Introduced
agency. 4746
(iii) Forty-five per cent may be deducted and retained by 4747
the organization for reimbursement of or for the organization's 4748
expenses, as defined in section 3768.01 of the Revised Code, in 4749
conducting the electronic instant bingo game. 4750
(2) If a veteran's or fraternal organization does not 4751
distribute the full percentages specified in divisions (B)(1)(a) 4752
and (b) of this section for the purposes specified in those 4753
divisions, the organization shall distribute the balance of the 4754
net profit from the proceeds of the sale of electronic instant 4755
bingo not distributed or retained for those purposes to an 4756
organization described in division (H)(1) of section 3768.01 of 4757
the Revised Code. 4758
(E) If a charitable organization other than a veteran's 4759
organization, a fraternal organization, or a sporting 4760
organization conducted the conducts instant bingo or electronic 4761
instant bingo, the organization shall distribute one hundred per 4762
cent of the net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant 4763
bingo or electronic instant bingo to an organization described 4764
in division (V)(1) (H)(1) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the 4765
Revised Code or to a department or agency of the federal 4766
government, the state, or any political subdivision. 4767
(C) (F) Nothing in this section prohibits a veteran's 4768
organization, a fraternal organization, or a sporting 4769
organization from distributing any net profit from the proceeds 4770
of the sale of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo to an 4771
organization that is described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the 4772
Internal Revenue Code when the organization that is described in 4773
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code is one that 4774
makes donations to other organizations and permits donors to 4775

S. B. No. 197 Page 165
As Introduced
advise or direct such donations so long as the donations comply 4776
with requirements established in or pursuant to subsection 4777
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 4778
Sec. 2915.10 3768.14. (A) No charitable organization that 4779
conducts bingo, or conducts a game of chance pursuant to 4780
division (D) of section 2915.02 3768.03 of the Revised Code, 4781
shall fail to maintain the following records for at least three 4782
years from the date on which the bingo or game of chance is 4783
conducted: 4784
(1) An itemized list of the gross receipts of each bingo 4785
session, each game of instant bingo by serial number, each 4786
electronic instant bingo game by serial number, each raffle, 4787
each punch board game, and each game of chance, and an itemized 4788
list of the gross profits of each game of instant bingo by 4789
serial number and each electronic instant bingo game by serial 4790
number; 4791
(2) An itemized list of all expenses, other than prizes, 4792
that are incurred in conducting bingo, the name of each person 4793
to whom the expenses are paid, and a receipt for all of the 4794
expenses; 4795
(3) A list of all prizes awarded during each bingo 4796
session, each raffle, each punch board game, and each game of 4797
chance conducted by the charitable organization, the total 4798
prizes awarded from each game of instant bingo by serial number 4799
and each electronic instant bingo game by serial number, and the 4800
name, address, and social security number of all persons who are 4801
winners of prizes of six hundred dollars or more in value; 4802
(4) An itemized list of the recipients of the net profit 4803
of the bingo or game of chance, including the name and address 4804

S. B. No. 197 Page 166
As Introduced
of each recipient to whom the money is distributed, and if the 4805
organization uses the net profit of bingo, or the money or 4806
assets received from a game of chance, for any charitable or 4807
other purpose set forth in division (V) (H) of section 2915.01, 4808
division (D) of 3768.01 or section 2915.02, 3768.03 or section 4809
2915.101 3768.13 of the Revised Code, a list of each purpose and 4810
an itemized list of each expenditure for each purpose; 4811
(5) The number of persons who participate in any bingo 4812
session or game of chance that is conducted by the charitable 4813
organization; 4814
(6) A list of receipts from the sale of food and beverages 4815
by the charitable organization or one of its auxiliary units or 4816
societies, if the receipts were excluded from gross receipts 4817
under division (T) (X) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised 4818
Code; 4819
(7) An itemized list of all expenses incurred at each 4820
bingo session, each raffle, each punch board game, or each game 4821
of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo conducted by the 4822
charitable organization in the sale of food and beverages by the 4823
charitable organization or by an auxiliary unit or society of 4824
the charitable organization, the name of each person to whom the 4825
expenses are paid, and a receipt for all of the expenses. 4826
(B) A charitable organization shall keep the records that 4827
it is required to maintain pursuant to division (A) of this 4828
section at its principal place of business in this state or at 4829
its headquarters in this state and shall notify the attorney 4830
general of the location at which those records are kept. 4831
(C) The gross profit from each bingo session or game 4832
described in division (O)(1) (A)(1) or (2) of section 2915.01 4833

S. B. No. 197 Page 167
As Introduced
3768.01 of the Revised Code shall be deposited into a checking 4834
account devoted exclusively to the bingo session or game. 4835
Payments for allowable expenses incurred in conducting the bingo 4836
session or game and payments to recipients of some or all of the 4837
net profit of the bingo session or game shall be made only by 4838
checks or electronic fund transfers drawn on the bingo session 4839
or game account. 4840
(D) Each charitable organization shall conduct and record 4841
an inventory of all of its bingo supplies as of the first day of 4842
November of each year. 4843
(E) The attorney general commission may adopt rules in 4844
accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish 4845
standards of accounting, record keeping, and reporting to ensure 4846
that gross receipts from bingo or games of chance are properly 4847
accounted for. 4848
(F) A distributor shall maintain, for a period of three 4849
years after the date of its sale or other provision, a record of 4850
each instance of its selling or otherwise providing to another 4851
person bingo supplies for use in this state. The record shall 4852
include all of the following for each instance: 4853
(1) The name of the manufacturer from which the 4854
distributor purchased the bingo supplies and the date of the 4855
purchase; 4856
(2) The name and address of the charitable organization or 4857
other distributor to which the bingo supplies were sold or 4858
otherwise provided; 4859
(3) A description that clearly identifies the bingo 4860
supplies; 4861
(4) Invoices that include the nonrepeating serial numbers 4862

S. B. No. 197 Page 168
As Introduced
of all paper bingo cards and sheets and all instant bingo deals 4863
sold or otherwise provided to each charitable organization. 4864
(G) A manufacturer shall maintain, for a period of three 4865
years after the date of its sale or other provision, a record of 4866
each instance of its selling or otherwise providing bingo 4867
supplies for use in this state. The record shall include all of 4868
the following for each instance: 4869
(1) The name and address of the distributor to whom the 4870
bingo supplies were sold or otherwise provided; 4871
(2) A description that clearly identifies the bingo 4872
supplies, including serial numbers; 4873
(3) Invoices that include the nonrepeating serial numbers 4874
of all paper bingo cards and sheets and all instant bingo deals 4875
sold or otherwise provided to each distributor. 4876
(H) The attorney general commission or any law enforcement 4877
agency may do all of the following: 4878
(1) Investigate any charitable organization, distributor, 4879
or manufacturer or any officer, agent, trustee, member, or 4880
employee of the organization, distributor, or manufacturer; 4881
(2) Examine the accounts and records of the charitable 4882
organization, distributor, or manufacturer or of any officer, 4883
agent, trustee, member, or employee of the organization, 4884
distributor, or manufacturer; 4885
(3) Conduct inspections, audits, and observations of bingo 4886
or games of chance; 4887
(4) Conduct inspections of the premises where bingo or 4888
games of chance are conducted or where bingo supplies are 4889
manufactured or distributed; 4890

S. B. No. 197 Page 169
As Introduced
(5) Take any other necessary and reasonable action to 4891
determine if a violation of any provision of this chapter has 4892
occurred and to determine whether section 2915.11 3768.15 of the 4893
Revised Code has been complied with. 4894
If any law enforcement agency has reasonable grounds to 4895
believe that a charitable organization, distributor, or 4896
manufacturer or an officer, agent, trustee, member, or employee 4897
of the organization, distributor, or manufacturer has violated 4898
any provision of this chapter, the law enforcement agency may 4899
proceed by action in the proper court to enforce this chapter, 4900
provided that the law enforcement agency shall give written 4901
notice to the attorney general commission when commencing an 4902
action as described in this division. 4903
(I) No person shall destroy, alter, conceal, withhold, or 4904
deny access to any accounts or records of a charitable 4905
organization, distributor, or manufacturer that have been 4906
requested for examination, or obstruct, impede, or interfere 4907
with any inspection, audit, or observation of bingo or a game of 4908
chance, of premises where bingo or a game of chance is 4909
conducted, or of premises where bingo supplies are manufactured 4910
or distributed, or refuse to comply with any reasonable request 4911
of, or obstruct, impede, or interfere with any other reasonable 4912
action undertaken by, the attorney general commission or a law 4913
enforcement agency pursuant to division (H) of this section. 4914
(J) Whoever violates division (A) or (I) of this section 4915
is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. 4916
Sec. 2915.11 3768.15. (A) No person shall be a bingo game 4917
operator unless he the person is eighteen years of age or older. 4918
(B) No person who has been convicted of a felony or a 4919

S. B. No. 197 Page 170
As Introduced
gambling offense in any jurisdiction shall be a bingo game 4920
operator. 4921
(C) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is 4922
guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. 4923
(D) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is 4924
guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. 4925
Sec. 2915.081 3768.16. (A) No distributor shall sell, 4926
offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo 4927
supplies to another person, or modify, convert, add to, or 4928
remove parts from bingo supplies to further their promotion or 4929
sale, for use in this state without having obtained a license 4930
from the attorney general commission under this section. 4931
(B)(1) The attorney general commission may issue a 4932
distributor license to any person that meets the requirements of 4933
this section. The application for the license shall be on a form 4934
prescribed by the attorney general commission and be accompanied 4935
by the annual fee prescribed by this section. The license is 4936
valid for a period of one year, and the annual fee for the 4937
license is five thousand dollars. 4938
(2) Upon applying for or renewing a license under this 4939
section, an applicant shall file with and have approved by the 4940
attorney general commission a bond in which the applicant shall 4941
be the principal obligor, in the sum of fifty thousand dollars, 4942
with one or more sureties authorized to do business in this 4943
state. The applicant shall maintain the bond in effect as long 4944
as the license is valid; however, the liability of the surety 4945
under the bond shall not exceed an all-time aggregate liability 4946
of fifty thousand dollars. The bond, which may be in the form of 4947
a rider to a larger blanket liability bond, shall run to the 4948

S. B. No. 197 Page 171
As Introduced
state and to any person who may have a cause of action against 4949
the principal obligor of the bond for any liability arising out 4950
of a violation by the obligor of any provision of this chapter 4951
or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter. 4952
(C) The attorney general commission may refuse to issue a 4953
distributor license to any person to which any of the following 4954
applies, or to any person that has an officer, partner, or other 4955
person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more and 4956
to whom any of the following applies: 4957
(1) The person, officer, or partner has been convicted of 4958
a disqualifying offense as determined in accordance with section 4959
9.79 of the Revised Code. 4960
(2) The person, officer, or partner has made an incorrect 4961
or false statement that is material to the granting of a license 4962
in an application submitted to the attorney general commission 4963
under this section or in a similar application submitted to a 4964
gambling licensing authority in another jurisdiction if the 4965
statement resulted in license revocation through administrative 4966
action in the other jurisdiction. 4967
(3) The person, officer, or partner has submitted any 4968
incorrect or false information relating to the application to 4969
the attorney general commission under this section, if the 4970
information is material to the granting of the license. 4971
(4) The person, officer, or partner has failed to correct 4972
any incorrect or false information that is material to the 4973
granting of the license in the records required to be maintained 4974
under division (F) of section 2915.10 3768.14 of the Revised 4975
Code. 4976
(5) The person, officer, or partner has had a license 4977

S. B. No. 197 Page 172
As Introduced
related to gambling revoked or suspended under the laws of this 4978
state, another state, or the United States. 4979
(6) The attorney general commission has good cause to 4980
believe that a person, officer, or partner has committed a 4981
breach of fiduciary duty, theft, or other type of misconduct 4982
related to a charitable organization that has obtained a bingo 4983
license issued under this chapter. 4984
(D) The attorney general commission shall not issue a 4985
distributor license to any person that is involved in the 4986
conduct of bingo on behalf of a charitable organization or that 4987
is a lessor of premises used for the conduct of bingo. This 4988
division does not prohibit a distributor from advising 4989
charitable organizations on the use and benefit of specific 4990
bingo supplies or prohibit a distributor from advising a 4991
customer on operational methods to improve bingo profitability. 4992
(E)(1) No distributor shall sell, offer to sell, or 4993
otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies to any 4994
person, or modify, convert, add to, or remove parts from bingo 4995
supplies to further their promotion or sale, for use in this 4996
state except to or for the use of a charitable organization that 4997
has been issued a license under section 2915.08 3768.04 of the 4998
Revised Code or to another distributor that has been issued a 4999
license under this section. No distributor shall accept payment 5000
for the sale or other provision of bingo supplies other than by 5001
check or electronic fund transfer. 5002
(2) No distributor may donate, give, loan, lease, or 5003
otherwise provide any bingo supplies or equipment, or modify, 5004
convert, add to, or remove parts from bingo supplies to further 5005
their promotion or sale, to or for the use of a charitable 5006
organization for use in a bingo session conditioned on or in 5007

S. B. No. 197 Page 173
As Introduced
consideration for an exclusive right to provide bingo supplies 5008
to the charitable organization. A distributor may provide a 5009
licensed charitable organization with free samples of the 5010
distributor's products to be used as prizes or to be used for 5011
the purpose of sampling. 5012
(3) No distributor shall purchase bingo supplies for use 5013
in this state from any person except from a manufacturer issued 5014
a license under section 2915.082 3768.17 of the Revised Code or 5015
from another distributor issued a license under this section. 5016
Subject to division (D) of section 2915.082 3768.17 of the 5017
Revised Code, no distributor shall pay for purchased bingo 5018
supplies other than by check or electronic fund transfer. 5019
(4) No distributor shall participate in the conduct of 5020
bingo on behalf of a charitable organization or have any direct 5021
or indirect ownership interest in a premises used for the 5022
conduct of bingo. 5023
(5) No distributor shall knowingly solicit, offer, pay, or 5024
receive any kickback, bribe, or undocumented rebate, directly or 5025
indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind, in return 5026
for providing bingo supplies to any person in this state. 5027
(F)(1) No distributor shall knowingly sell, offer to sell, 5028
or otherwise provide or offer to provide an electronic instant 5029
bingo system to any person for use in this state, or install, 5030
maintain, update, or repair an electronic instant bingo system, 5031
without first obtaining an electronic instant bingo distributor 5032
endorsement to the person's distributor license issued under 5033
this section. An applicant for a distributor license under this 5034
section may apply simultaneously for an electronic instant bingo 5035
distributor endorsement to that license. 5036

S. B. No. 197 Page 174
As Introduced
(2) An applicant for an electronic instant bingo 5037
distributor endorsement shall submit the application on a form 5038
prescribed by the attorney general commission and shall submit 5039
one complete set of fingerprints directly to the superintendent 5040
of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for 5041
the purpose of conducting a criminal records check. The 5042
applicant shall provide the fingerprints using a method the 5043
superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 5044
109.572 of the Revised Code and shall fill out the form the 5045
superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(1) of that 5046
section. Upon receiving an application for an electronic instant 5047
bingo distributor endorsement, the attorney general commission 5048
shall request the superintendent, or a vendor approved by the 5049
bureau, to conduct a criminal records check based on the 5050
applicant's fingerprint impressions in accordance with division 5051
(A)(18) of that section. The applicant shall pay any fee 5052
required under division (C)(3) of that section. 5053
(3) The attorney general commission shall not issue an 5054
electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement to an applicant 5055
unless the attorney general commission has received the results 5056
of the criminal records check described in division (F)(2) of 5057
this section. The attorney general shall not issue an electronic 5058
instant bingo distributor endorsement to an applicant if the 5059
applicant, any officer or partner of the applicant, or any 5060
person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more in 5061
the applicant has violated any provision of this chapter or any 5062
rule adopted by the attorney general commission under this 5063
chapter or has violated any existing or former law or rule of 5064
this state, any other state, or the United States that is 5065
substantially equivalent to any provision of this chapter or any 5066
rule adopted by the attorney general commission under this 5067

S. B. No. 197 Page 175
As Introduced
chapter. 5068
(4) An electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement 5069
issued under this section shall be valid for the period of the 5070
underlying distributor license. 5071
(G) The attorney general commission may suspend, place 5072
limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on, or revoke a 5073
distributor license or an electronic instant bingo distributor 5074
endorsement, for a limited or indefinite period of time at the 5075
attorney general's commission's discretion, for any of the 5076
following reasons: 5077
(1) Any reason for which the attorney general commission 5078
may refuse to issue the license or endorsement; 5079
(2) The distributor holding the license or endorsement 5080
violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by 5081
the attorney general commission under this chapter; 5082
(3) The distributor or any officer, partner, or other 5083
person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more in 5084
the distributor is convicted of either of the following: 5085
(a) A felony under the laws of this state, another state, 5086
or the United States; 5087
(b) Any gambling offense. 5088
(H) The attorney general commission may adopt rules for 5089
the application, acceptance, denial, suspension, revocation, 5090
limitation, restriction, or condition of a distributor license 5091
or endorsement, and to enforce any other provisions of this 5092
section, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. 5093
(I) The attorney general commission may impose a civil 5094
fine on a distributor licensed or permitted under this chapter 5095

S. B. No. 197 Page 176
As Introduced
for failure to comply with any restrictions, limits, or 5096
probationary conditions on its license, or for failure to comply 5097
with this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, 5098
according to a schedule of fines that the attorney general 5099
commission shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the 5100
Revised Code. 5101
(J) Whoever violates division (A), (E), or (F) of this 5102
section is guilty of illegally operating as a distributor. 5103
Except as otherwise provided in this division, illegally 5104
operating as a distributor is a misdemeanor of the first degree. 5105
If the offender previously has been convicted of a violation of 5106
division (A), (E), or (F) of this section, illegally operating 5107
as a distributor is a felony of the fifth degree. 5108
Sec. 2915.082 3768.17. (A) No manufacturer shall sell, 5109
offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo 5110
supplies for use in this state without having obtained a license 5111
from the attorney general commission under this section. 5112
(B)(1) The attorney general commission may issue a 5113
manufacturer license to any person that meets the requirements 5114
of this section. The application for the license shall be on a 5115
form prescribed by the attorney general commission and be 5116
accompanied by the annual fee prescribed by this section. The 5117
license is valid for a period of one year, and the annual fee 5118
for the license is five thousand dollars. 5119
(2) Upon applying for or renewing a license under this 5120
section, an applicant shall file with and have approved by the 5121
attorney general commission a bond in which the applicant shall 5122
be the principal obligor, in the sum of fifty thousand dollars, 5123
with one or more sureties authorized to do business in this 5124
state. The applicant shall maintain the bond in effect as long 5125

S. B. No. 197 Page 177
As Introduced
as the license is valid; however, the liability of the surety 5126
under the bond shall not exceed an all-time aggregate liability 5127
of fifty thousand dollars. The bond, which may be in the form of 5128
a rider to a larger blanket liability bond, shall run to the 5129
state and to any person who may have a cause of action against 5130
the principal obligor of the bond for any liability arising out 5131
of a violation by the obligor of any provision of this chapter 5132
or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter. 5133
(C) The attorney general commission may refuse to issue a 5134
manufacturer license to any person to which any of the following 5135
applies, or to any person that has an officer, partner, or other 5136
person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more and 5137
to whom any of the following applies: 5138
(1) The person, officer, or partner has been convicted of 5139
a disqualifying offense as determined in accordance with section 5140
9.79 of the Revised Code. 5141
(2) The person, officer, or partner has made an incorrect 5142
or false statement that is material to the granting of a license 5143
in an application submitted to the attorney general commission 5144
under this section or in a similar application submitted to a 5145
gambling licensing authority in another jurisdiction if the 5146
statement resulted in license revocation through administrative 5147
action in the other jurisdiction. 5148
(3) The person, officer, or partner has submitted any 5149
incorrect or false information relating to the application to 5150
the attorney general commission under this section, if the 5151
information is material to the granting of the license. 5152
(4) The person, officer, or partner has failed to correct 5153
any incorrect or false information that is material to the 5154

S. B. No. 197 Page 178
As Introduced
granting of the license in the records required to be maintained 5155
under division (G) of section 2915.10 3768.14 of the Revised 5156
Code. 5157
(5) The person, officer, or partner has had a license 5158
related to gambling revoked or suspended under the laws of this 5159
state, another state, or the United States. 5160
(6) The attorney general commission has good cause to 5161
believe that the person, officer, or partner has committed a 5162
breach of fiduciary duty, theft, or other type of misconduct, 5163
related to a charitable organization that has obtained a bingo 5164
license under this chapter. 5165
(D)(1) No manufacturer shall sell, offer to sell, or 5166
otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies to any 5167
person for use in this state except to a distributor that has 5168
been issued a license under section 2915.081 3768.16 of the 5169
Revised Code. No manufacturer shall accept payment for the sale 5170
of bingo supplies other than by check or electronic fund 5171
transfer. 5172
(2) No manufacturer shall knowingly solicit, offer, pay, 5173
or receive any kickback, bribe, or undocumented rebate, directly 5174
or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind, in 5175
return for providing bingo supplies to any person in this state. 5176
(E)(1) No manufacturer shall knowingly sell, offer to 5177
sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide an electronic 5178
instant bingo system to any person for use in this state, or 5179
submit an electronic instant bingo system for testing and 5180
approval under section 2915.15 3768.12 of the Revised Code, 5181
without first obtaining an electronic instant bingo manufacturer 5182
endorsement to the person's manufacturer license issued under 5183

S. B. No. 197 Page 179
As Introduced
this section. An applicant for a manufacturer license under this 5184
section may apply simultaneously for an electronic instant bingo 5185
manufacturer endorsement to that license. 5186
(2) A manufacturer licensed under this section may only 5187
sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide 5188
electronic instant bingo systems that contain proprietary 5189
software owned by or licensed to the manufacturer. If the 5190
proprietary software is licensed to the manufacturer, the 5191
manufacturer shall provide a copy of the license along with the 5192
application for an endorsement under this section. 5193
(3) An applicant for an electronic instant bingo 5194
manufacturer endorsement shall submit the application on a form 5195
prescribed by the attorney general commission and shall submit 5196
one complete set of fingerprints directly to the superintendent 5197
of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for 5198
the purpose of conducting a criminal records check. The 5199
applicant shall provide the fingerprints using a method the 5200
superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 5201
109.572 of the Revised Code and shall fill out the form the 5202
superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(1) of that 5203
section. Upon receiving an application for an electronic instant 5204
bingo manufacturer endorsement, the attorney general commission 5205
shall request the superintendent, or a vendor approved by the 5206
bureau, to conduct a criminal records check based on the 5207
applicant's fingerprint impressions in accordance with division 5208
(A)(18) of that section. The applicant shall pay any fee 5209
required under division (C)(3) of that section. 5210
(4) The attorney general commission shall not issue an 5211
electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement to an 5212
applicant unless the attorney general commission has received 5213

S. B. No. 197 Page 180
As Introduced
the results of the criminal records check described in division 5214
(E)(3) of this section. The attorney general commission shall 5215
not issue an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement 5216
to an applicant if the applicant, any officer or partner of the 5217
applicant, or any person who has an ownership interest of ten 5218
per cent or more in the applicant has violated any existing or 5219
former law or rule of this state, any other state, or the United 5220
States that is substantially equivalent to any provision of this 5221
chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general commission 5222
under this chapter. 5223
(F)(1) The attorney general commission may suspend, place 5224
limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on, or revoke a 5225
manufacturer license or an electronic instant bingo manufacturer 5226
endorsement for a limited or indefinite period of time for any 5227
of the following reasons: 5228
(a) Any reason for which the attorney general commission 5229
may refuse to issue the license or endorsement; 5230
(b) The manufacturer holding the license or endorsement 5231
violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by 5232
the attorney general commission under this chapter; 5233
(c) The manufacturer or any officer, partner, or other 5234
person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more in 5235
the manufacturer is convicted of either of the following: 5236
(i) A felony under the laws of this state, another state, 5237
or the United States; 5238
(ii) Any gambling offense. 5239
(2) The attorney general commission may perform an onsite 5240
inspection of a manufacturer of bingo supplies that is selling, 5241
offering to sell, or otherwise providing or offering to provide 5242

S. B. No. 197 Page 181
As Introduced
bingo supplies or that is applying for a license to sell, offer 5243
to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies 5244
in this state. 5245
(3)(a) The attorney general commission shall establish by 5246
rule an application and renewal fee for an electronic instant 5247
bingo manufacturer endorsement in an amount sufficient to cover 5248
the costs the attorney general commission incurs in processing 5249
applications for electronic instant bingo manufacturer 5250
endorsements and investigating an applicant's suitability. 5251
(b) If the cost of processing a particular application and 5252
investigating the applicant's suitability exceeds the amount of 5253
the application and renewal fee, the attorney general commission 5254
may charge the applicant an additional fee as necessary to cover 5255
that cost. 5256
(c) The attorney general commission shall not issue an 5257
electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement unless the 5258
attorney general commission has received payment in full from 5259
the applicant for all fees to be charged under this section. 5260
(G) The attorney general commission may adopt rules for 5261
the application, acceptance, denial, suspension, revocation, 5262
limitation, restriction, or condition of a manufacturer license 5263
or endorsement described in this section, and to enforce any 5264
other provisions of this section, in accordance with Chapter 5265
119. of the Revised Code. 5266
(H) The attorney general commission may impose a civil 5267
fine on a manufacturer licensed or permitted under this chapter 5268
for failure to comply with any restrictions, limits, or 5269
probationary conditions on its license, and for failure to 5270
comply with this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, 5271

S. B. No. 197 Page 182
As Introduced
according to a schedule of fines that the attorney general 5272
commission shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the 5273
Revised Code. 5274
(I) Whoever violates division (A), (D), or (E) of this 5275
section is guilty of illegally operating as a manufacturer. 5276
Except as otherwise provided in this division, illegally 5277
operating as a manufacturer is a misdemeanor of the first 5278
degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of a 5279
violation of division (A), (D), or (E) of this section, 5280
illegally operating as a manufacturer is a felony of the fifth 5281
degree. 5282
Sec. 2915.07 3768.18. (A) No person, except a charitable 5283
organization that has obtained a license pursuant to section 5284
2915.08 3768.04 of the Revised Code, shall conduct or advertise 5285
bingo. This division does not apply to a raffle that a 5286
charitable organization conducts or advertises. 5287
(B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of conducting 5288
illegal bingo, a felony of the fourth degree. 5289
Sec. 2915.12 3768.19. (A) Sections 2915.07 3768.02 to 5290
2915.15 3768.18 of the Revised Code do not apply to bingo games 5291
that are conducted for the purpose of amusement only. A bingo 5292
game is conducted for the purpose of amusement only if it 5293
complies with all of the requirements specified in either 5294
division (A)(1) or (2) of this section: 5295
(1)(a) The participants do not pay any money or any other 5296
thing of value including an admission fee, or any fee for bingo 5297
cards or sheets, objects to cover the spaces, or other devices 5298
used in playing bingo, for the privilege of participating in the 5299
bingo game, or to defray any costs of the game, or pay tips or 5300

S. B. No. 197 Page 183
As Introduced
make donations during or immediately before or after the bingo 5301
game. 5302
(b) All prizes awarded during the course of the game are 5303
nonmonetary, and in the form of merchandise, goods, or 5304
entitlements to goods or services only, and the total value of 5305
all prizes awarded during the game is less than one hundred 5306
dollars. 5307
(c) No commission, wages, salary, reward, tip, donation, 5308
gratuity, or other form of compensation, either directly or 5309
indirectly, and regardless of the source, is paid to any bingo 5310
game operator for work or labor performed at the site of the 5311
bingo game. 5312
(d) The bingo game is not conducted either during or 5313
within ten hours of any of the following: 5314
(i) A bingo session during which a charitable bingo game 5315
is conducted pursuant to sections 2915.07 to 2915.11 of the 5316
Revised Code this chapter; 5317
(ii) A scheme or game of chance, or bingo described in 5318
division (O)(2) (A)(2) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised 5319
Code. 5320
(e) The number of players participating in the bingo game 5321
does not exceed fifty. 5322
(2)(a) The participants do not pay money or any other 5323
thing of value as an admission fee, and no participant is 5324
charged more than twenty-five cents to purchase a bingo card or 5325
sheet, objects to cover the spaces, or other devices used in 5326
playing bingo. 5327
(b) The total amount of money paid by all of the 5328

S. B. No. 197 Page 184
As Introduced
participants for bingo cards or sheets, objects to cover the 5329
spaces, or other devices used in playing bingo does not exceed 5330
one hundred dollars. 5331
(c) All of the money paid for bingo cards or sheets, 5332
objects to cover spaces, or other devices used in playing bingo 5333
is used only to pay winners monetary and nonmonetary prizes and 5334
to provide refreshments. 5335
(d) The total value of all prizes awarded during the game 5336
does not exceed one hundred dollars. 5337
(e) No commission, wages, salary, reward, tip, donation, 5338
gratuity, or other form of compensation, either directly or 5339
indirectly, and regardless of the source, is paid to any bingo 5340
game operator for work or labor performed at the site of the 5341
bingo game. 5342
(f) The bingo game is not conducted during or within ten 5343
hours of either of the following: 5344
(i) A bingo session during which a charitable bingo game 5345
is conducted pursuant to sections 2915.07 to 2915.15 of the 5346
Revised Code this chapter; 5347
(ii) A scheme of chance or game of chance, or bingo 5348
described in division (O)(2) (A)(2) of section 2915.01 3768.01 5349
of the Revised Code. 5350
(g) All of the participants reside at the premises where 5351
the bingo game is conducted. 5352
(h) The bingo games are conducted on different days of the 5353
week and not more than twice in a calendar week. 5354
(B) The attorney general commission or any local law 5355
enforcement agency may investigate the conduct of a bingo game 5356

S. B. No. 197 Page 185
As Introduced
that purportedly is conducted for purposes of amusement only if 5357
there is reason to believe that the purported amusement bingo 5358
game does not comply with the requirements of either division 5359
(A)(1) or (2) of this section. A local law enforcement agency 5360
may proceed by action in the proper court to enforce this 5361
section if the local law enforcement agency gives written notice 5362
to the attorney general commission when commencing the action. 5363
Sec. 173.121 3768.20. (A) As used in this section, 5364
"bingo," "bingo game operator," and "participant" have the same 5365
meanings as in section 2915.01 of the Revised Code. 5366
(B) Notwithstanding sections 2915.07 3768.02 to 2915.13 5367
3768.18 of the Revised Code, a multipurpose senior center 5368
described in section 173.11 of the Revised Code may conduct 5369
bingo games described in division (O)(1) (A)(1) of section 5370
2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code, but only if it complies 5371
with all of the following requirements: 5372
(1) (A) All bingo games are conducted only on the premises 5373
of the facility. 5374
(2) (B) All participants are twenty-one years of age or 5375
older. 5376
(3) (C) All bingo game operators are sixty years of age or 5377
older and receive no compensation for serving as operators. 5378
(4) (D) No participant is charged an admission fee, and no 5379
participant is charged more than twenty-five cents to purchase a 5380
bingo card or sheet. 5381
(5) (E) All proceeds from games are used only for any of 5382
the following: 5383
(a) (1) To pay winners monetary or nonmonetary prizes; 5384

S. B. No. 197 Page 186
As Introduced
(b) (2) To provide refreshments; 5385
(c) (3) To defray any costs directly related to conducting 5386
the games; 5387
(d) (4) To defray costs of services the facility provides 5388
in accordance with section 173.12 of the Revised Code. 5389
Sec. 5907.18 3768.21. (A) As used in this section, 5390
"bingo," "bingo game operator," and "participant" have the same 5391
meanings as in section 2915.01 of the Revised Code. 5392
(B) Notwithstanding sections 2915.07 to 2915.13 3768.02 to 5393
3768.18 of the Revised Code, an Ohio veterans' home described in 5394
Chapter 5907. of the Revised Code may conduct bingo games as 5395
described in division (O)(1) (A)(1) of section 2915.01 3768.01 5396
of the Revised Code, but only if the Ohio veterans' home 5397
complies with all of the following requirements: 5398
(1) (A) All bingo games are conducted only on the premises 5399
of the Ohio veterans' home. 5400
(2) (B) All participants are residents of the Ohio 5401
veterans' home and are eighteen years of age or older. 5402
(3) (C) All bingo game operators receive no compensation 5403
for serving as an operator. 5404
(4) (D) Participants do not pay any money or any other 5405
thing of value, including an admission fee, or any fee for bingo 5406
cards or sheets, objects to cover the spaces, or other devices 5407
used in playing bingo, for the privilege of participating in the 5408
bingo game, or to defray any costs of the game, or pay tips or 5409
make donations during or immediately before or after the bingo 5410
game. 5411
(5) (E) Prizes awarded during a game may be monetary or 5412

S. B. No. 197 Page 187
As Introduced
nonmonetary prizes in the form of merchandise, goods, or 5413
entitlements to goods or services, provided that individual 5414
prizes do not exceed one hundred dollars in value, and the total 5415
value of all prizes awarded during a game do not exceed five 5416
hundred dollars. 5417
(6) (F) The bingo game is not conducted during or within 5418
ten hours of any of the following activities conducted at the 5419
Ohio veterans' home: 5420
(a) (1) A bingo session during which a charitable bingo 5421
game is conducted pursuant to sections 2915.07 to 2915.11 of the 5422
Revised Code this chapter; 5423
(b) (2) A scheme of chance or game of chance; or 5424
(c) (3) Bingo as described in division (O)(2) (A)(2) of 5425
section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code. 5426
(7) (G) The bingo games are conducted on different days of 5427
the week and not more than twice in a calendar week. 5428
Sec. 3768.22. The commission may take any necessary and 5429
reasonable action to determine a violation of this chapter, 5430
including requesting documents and information, performing 5431
inspections of premises, or requiring the attendance of any 5432
person at an examination under oath. 5433
Sec. 3768.23. The charitable gaming fund is created in th e 5434
state treasury. All fees received by the commission under this 5435
chapter shall be deposited in the fund. Money in the fund shall 5436
be used for the following purposes: 5437
(A) Upon any authorized transfer to the charitable law 5438
fund established under section 109.32 of the Revised Code, for 5439
the purpose of paying the expenses of the charitable law section 5440

S. B. No. 197 Page 188
As Introduced
of the office of the attorney general; 5441
(B) Upon any authorized transfer to the casino control 5442
commission fund, as defined in section 3772.01 of the Revised 5443
Code, for the purpose of paying the expenses of the commission 5444
in fulfilling its duties. 5445
Sec. 3769.01. As used in this chapter, except where the 5446
context requires otherwise: 5447
(A) "Collection and settlement agent" means the permit 5448
holder designated by the commission under division (B) of 5449
section 3769.0810 of the Revised Code. 5450
(B) "Commission" means the Ohio casino control commission 5451
established under section 3772.02 of the Revised Code. For 5452
purposes of division (C)(3)(e) of Section 6 of Article XV, Ohio 5453
Constitution, the Ohio casino control commission is an Ohio 5454
state racing commission. 5455
(C) "Live racing day" means a racing day on which a live 5456
racing program is conducted by the permit holder along with 5457
simulcasts of all other available racing programs from within 5458
this state and simulcast racing programs from outside this state 5459
as authorized under section 3769.089 of the Revised Code. 5460
(D) "Live racing program" means a racing program 5461
consisting of no fewer than seven live horse races at 5462
thoroughbred tracks and nine live races at standardbred tracks 5463
and additional horse races simulcast from other facilities 5464
located either inside or outside this state, in which not more 5465
than two horse races on which pari-mutuel wagering is conducted 5466
are simulcast from facilities located outside this state. If 5467
only one racing meeting of a particular breed of horse is being 5468
held, no fewer than nine live horse races shall be held on a 5469

S. B. No. 197 Page 189
As Introduced
live racing day. If, during the course of a racing meeting at a 5470
standardbred track, the racing secretary of the permit holder 5471
determines that there is an insufficient number of entries to 5472
have a full field of eight horses for each of nine races on a 5473
live racing program, then the racing secretary of the permit 5474
holder, after consultation with the Ohio harness horsemens 5475
association, may reduce the number of live races on that live 5476
racing program, as the racing secretary may determine. The 5477
racing secretary shall not reduce the live racing program to 5478
less than seven live races. If during the course of a meeting at 5479
a thoroughbred track, the racing secretary of a permit holder 5480
determines that there is an insufficient number of entries to 5481
have a full field of eight horses for each of nine races on a 5482
live racing program, then the racing secretary of the permit 5483
holder, with the consent of the thoroughbred horsemens 5484
association, may reduce the number of live races on that live 5485
racing program, as the racing secretary may determine. The 5486
racing secretary shall not reduce the live racing program to 5487
less than seven live races. No more than seventeen races on 5488
which pari-mutuel wagering is conducted, including both live 5489
races and races simulcast from other facilities located either 5490
inside or outside this state, shall be part of a live racing 5491
program. 5492
(E) "Ohio voluntary exclusion program" has the same 5493
meaning as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. 5494
(F) "Permit" means a document issued by the commission 5495
that allows a person to conduct horse racing at which pari- 5496
mutuel wagering is conducted, in accordance with this chapter. 5497
(G) "Permit holder" means a person who has been issued a 5498
valid permit under this chapter. 5499

S. B. No. 197 Page 190
As Introduced
(H) "Racing day" means any day authorized under a permit 5500
holder's permit on which, at a simulcast host, either a live 5501
racing program is conducted as authorized under section 3769.07 5502
of the Revised Code or a simulcast racing program is conducted 5503
as authorized under section 3769.089 of the Revised Code. 5504
(I) "Satellite facility" means any facility that is 5505
approved by the commission and at which pari-mutuel wagering is 5506
conducted under section 3769.26 of the Revised Code. "Satellite 5507
facility" does not include a track. 5508
(J) "Simulcast" means the telecast, for wagering purposes, 5509
of audio and visual signals of live horse races conducted at 5510
facilities either inside or outside this state. 5511
(K) "Simulcast guest" means any track or enclosure that is 5512
receiving from a simulcast host, on a day other than a racing 5513
day, a live racing program or a simulcast racing program. 5514
(L) "Simulcast host" means a race track in this state 5515
where, on a racing day, a permit holder is doing one or both of 5516
the following: 5517
(1) Conducting a live racing program and offering this 5518
program for simulcasting to one or more simulcast guests and 5519
satellite facilities in this state; 5520
(2) Receiving a simulcast racing program for simulcasting 5521
to one or more simulcast guests and satellite facilities in this 5522
state. 5523
(M) "Simulcast racing program" means all simulcasts of 5524
horse races to a simulcast host or simulcast guest on a racing 5525
day or on any other day on which pari-mutuel wagering is 5526
conducted, but does not include any simulcast horse races from 5527
inside or outside this state that are included in a simulcast 5528

S. B. No. 197 Page 191
As Introduced
host's live racing program. 5529
(N) "Special racing event" means individual races in live 5530
racing programs or simulcast racing programs, and simulcast 5531
racing programs on special event days under division (C) of 5532
section 3769.089 of the Revised Code, conducted at facilities 5533
located outside this state for which the track, racing 5534
association, or state regulatory agency conducting such races 5535
charges a simulcast host a fee for the privilege of receiving a 5536
simulcast of such races into this state that is higher than the 5537
customary and regular fee charged for simulcast races because of 5538
the status or popularity of such races. 5539
(O) "Track" means any place, track, or enclosure where a 5540
permit holder conducts live horse racing for profit at a race 5541
meeting. 5542
(P) "Video lottery sales agent," "video lottery terminal," 5543
"video lottery terminal income," and "video lottery terminal 5544
promotional gaming credit" have the same meanings as in section 5545
3770.01 of the Revised Code. 5546
Sec. 3769.01 3769.02. No person, association, corporation, 5547
or trust shall hold, conduct, assist, or aid and abet in holding 5548
or conducting any meetings, at which horse racing is permitted 5549
for any stake, purse, or award unless such person, association, 5550
corporation, or trust secures a permit to conduct a horse-racing 5551
meeting and complies with sections 3769.01 to 3769.14 of the 5552
Revised Code this chapter. 5553
Such sections shall apply This chapter applies only to the 5554
racing of horses and do does not prevent the use of any grounds, 5555
enclosure, or race track, whether or not owned or controlled by 5556
a permit holder, for any county or state fair, agricultural or 5557

S. B. No. 197 Page 192
As Introduced
livestock exhibition, horse show, or any horse racing where the 5558
pari-mutuel system of wagering upon the result of such horse 5559
racing is not permitted or allowed. This section does not permit 5560
the pari-mutuel method of wagering upon any race track unless a 5561
permit is secured as provided in sections 3769.04 to 3769.06 of 5562
the Revised Code this chapter. 5563
Sec. 3769.03. The state racing commission shall prescribe 5564
the rules and conditions under which horse racing may be 5565
conducted and may issue, deny, suspend, diminish, or revoke 5566
permits to conduct horse racing as authorized by sections 5567
3769.01 to 3769.14 of the Revised Code this chapter. The 5568
commission may impose, in addition to any other penalty imposed 5569
by the commission, fines in an amount not to exceed ten thousand 5570
dollars on any permit holder or any other person who violates 5571
the rules or orders of the commission. The commission may 5572
prescribe the forms of wagering that are permissible, the number 5573
of races, the procedures on wagering, and the wagering 5574
information to be provided to the public. 5575
The commission may require totalizator equipment to 5576
display the amount of wagering in each wagering pool. The 5577
commission shall initiate safeguards as necessary to account for 5578
the amount of money wagered at each track in each wagering pool. 5579
It may require permit holders to install equipment that will 5580
provide a complete check and analysis of the functioning of any 5581
computers and require safeguards on their performance. The 5582
commission shall require all permit holders, except those 5583
holding state fair, county fair, or other fair permits, to 5584
provide a photographic recording, approved by the commission, of 5585
the entire running of all races conducted by the permit holder. 5586
The state racing commission may issue, deny, suspend, or 5587

S. B. No. 197 Page 193
As Introduced
revoke licenses to those persons engaged in racing and to those 5588
employees of permit holders, as described in section 3769.031 of 5589
the Revised Code. The commission, as is in the public interest 5590
for the purpose of maintaining proper control over horse-racing 5591
meetings, also may rule any person off a permit holder's 5592
premises. 5593
There is hereby created in the state treasury the state 5594
racing commission operating fund. All license fees established 5595
and collected by the commission pursuant to this section or 5596
section 3769.031 of the Revised Code, and the amounts specified 5597
in divisions (B) and (C) of section 3769.08 and division (A)(5) 5598
of section 3769.087 of the Revised Code, shall be paid into the 5599
state treasury to the credit of the casino control commission 5600
fund described in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. Moneys in 5601
the fund shall be expended by the commission to defray its 5602
operating costs, salaries and expenses, and the cost of 5603
administering and enforcing this chapter. 5604
The commission may deny a permit to any permit holder that 5605
has defaulted in payments to the public, employees, or the 5606
horsemen and may deny a permit to any successor purchaser of a 5607
track for as long as any of those defaults have not been 5608
satisfied by either the seller or purchaser. 5609
The commission shall deny a permit to any permit holder 5610
that has defaulted in payments to the state or has defaulted in 5611
payments required under section 3769.089 or 3769.0810 of the 5612
Revised Code and shall deny a permit to any successor purchaser 5613
of a track for as long as those defaults have not been satisfied 5614
by either the seller or purchaser. 5615
The commission may sue and be sued in its own name. Any 5616
action against the commission shall be brought in the court of 5617

S. B. No. 197 Page 194
As Introduced
common pleas of Franklin county. Any appeal from a determination 5618
or decision of the commission rendered in the exercise of its 5619
powers and duties under this chapter shall be brought in the 5620
court of common pleas of Franklin county. 5621
The commission, biennially, shall make a full report to 5622
the governor of its proceedings under this chapter for the two- 5623
year period ending with the thirty-first day of December 5624
preceding the convening of the general assembly and shall 5625
include its recommendations in the report. The commission, 5626
semiannually, on the thirtieth day of June and on the thirty- 5627
first day of December of each year, shall make a report and 5628
accounting to the governor regarding its activities under this 5629
chapter. 5630
Sec. 3769.031. (A) The state racing commission may issue, 5631
deny, suspend, or revoke licenses to those persons engaged in 5632
racing and to those employees of permit holders as is in the 5633
public interest for the purpose of maintaining a proper control 5634
over horse-racing meetings, subject to the requirements of this 5635
section. 5636
(B)(1) The commission shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. 5637
of the Revised Code prescribing the following licenses to be 5638
issued, including the activities regulated under each license, 5639
the qualifications and other requirements to receive and 5640
maintain each license, and the fees that apply to the license: 5641
(a) The following racing official licenses: state steward, 5642
steward, program director, director of racing, general manager, 5643
racing secretary, assistant racing secretary, horsemen's 5644
bookkeeper, identifier, presiding judge, paddock judge, placing 5645
judge, judge, clerk of course, clerk of scales, jockey room 5646
custodian, announcer, starter, timer, photographer, and 5647

S. B. No. 197 Page 195
As Introduced
videographer, provided that the license fee for a general 5648
manager shall not exceed seventy-five dollars; 5649
(b) The following participant licenses: primary and 5650
secondary stable name, owner, partnership, person eligible to 5651
claim, authorized agent, thoroughbred breeder, trainer, 5652
assistant trainer, driver-trainer, driver, jockey, apprentice 5653
jockey, jockey agent, outrider, pony person, exercise rider, 5654
valet, and supply salesperson; 5655
(c) The following equine care licenses: veterinarian, 5656
veterinarian's assistant, dentist, horseshoer, and groom; 5657
(d) The following wagering licenses: management services 5658
company and totalizator company, totalizator company management 5659
supervisory employee, totalizator company employee, and mutuel 5660
employee; 5661
(e) A fair license, which shall not require the payment of 5662
any fee, to be issued for the following positions: racing 5663
official, owner, quarter horse participant, driver-trainer, and 5664
groom, totalizator, and mutuel employee; 5665
(f) The following race track facility licenses: security, 5666
medical and first aid, concession employee, and maintenance, 5667
provided that the license fee for a medical and first aid worker 5668
shall not exceed ten dollars. 5669
(2) The commission shall issue only the licenses listed in 5670
division (B)(1) of this section with respect to horse racing. No 5671
license issued by the commission is required to hold any 5672
position that is not listed in that division. 5673
(C)(1) Applicants for licenses issued by the commission 5674
shall submit their fingerprints to the commission, and the 5675
commission may forward the fingerprints to the federal bureau of 5676

S. B. No. 197 Page 196
As Introduced
investigation or to any other agency, or to both, for 5677
examination. 5678
(2) Each license issued by the commission, unless revoked 5679
for cause, shall be for the period of one year from the first 5680
day of January of the year in which it is issued, except as 5681
otherwise provided in section 3769.07 of the Revised Code. 5682
(3) The commission shall issue a license to a person 5683
engaged in racing or an employee of a permit holder in 5684
accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code if that person 5685
or employee holds a license in another state, or that person or 5686
employee has satisfactory work experience, a government 5687
certification, or a private certification as described in that 5688
chapter in horse racing in a state that does not issue that 5689
license. 5690
(4) Any violation of this chapter, of any rule of racing 5691
adopted by the commission, or of any law or rule with respect to 5692
racing in any jurisdiction shall be sufficient reason for a 5693
refusal to issue a license, or a suspension or revocation of any 5694
license issued, pursuant to this section. With respect to the 5695
issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation of a license to a 5696
participant in horse racing, the action of the commission is 5697
subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. 5698
(D)(1) An individual described in division (A) of section 5699
3772.13 of the Revised Code shall hold a valid key gaming 5700
employee license issued by the commission under that section at 5701
all times. 5702
(2) An individual whose duties with respect to pari-mutuel 5703
wagering on horse racing are as described in division (A) of 5704
section 3772.131 of the Revised Code shall hold a valid gaming 5705

S. B. No. 197 Page 197
As Introduced
employee license issued by the commission under that section at 5706
all times, provided that an individual who is licensed under 5707
division (B) of this section is not required to hold a gaming 5708
employee license in addition to that license. 5709
Sec. 3769.04. Any person, association, corporation, or 5710
trust desiring to hold or conduct a horse-racing meeting, 5711
wherein the pari-mutuel system of wagering is allowed, shall 5712
make application to the state racing commission for a permit to 5713
do so. Each application, accompanied by a permit fee of ten 5714
dollars and a cash bond, certified check, or bank draft, shall 5715
be filed with the commission at least five days prior to the 5716
first day of each horse-racing meeting that the person, 5717
association, corporation, or trust proposes to hold or conduct. 5718
The application, if made by an individual, shall be signed and 5719
verified under oath by the individual and, if made by 5720
individuals or a partnership, shall be signed and verified under 5721
oath by one of the individuals or a member of the partnership. 5722
If made by an association, trust, or corporation, the 5723
application shall be signed by its president or vice-president 5724
and attested by the secretary or assistant secretary under the 5725
seal of the association, trust, or corporation, if it has a 5726
seal, and shall also be verified under oath by one of the 5727
officers signing the application. The commission shall prescribe 5728
forms to be used in making the application. The application 5729
shall specify the name of the person, association, trust, or 5730
corporation making such application, the post-office address of 5731
the applicant (if a corporation, the name of the state of its 5732
incorporation), the dates on which the applicant intends to 5733
conduct or hold such horse-racing meeting, which dates shall be 5734
successive days, including Sundays unless otherwise requested by 5735
the applicant and authorized by the commission, the hours of 5736

S. B. No. 197 Page 198
As Introduced
each racing day during which the applicant intends to hold or 5737
conduct horse racing at such meeting, which shall be during the 5738
hours specified pursuant to section 3769.07 of the Revised Code, 5739
the location of the place, track, or enclosure where it is 5740
proposed to hold or conduct such horse-racing meeting, and such 5741
further information as the commission prescribes. 5742
If the application requests a permit for a horse-racing 5743
meet at a location at which such a meet has not previously been 5744
conducted by permission of the commission, then, in addition to 5745
the other requirements for the application, there shall 5746
accompany the application a petition signed by at least fifty- 5747
one per cent of the qualified electors voting for governor at 5748
the most recent general election in the townships in which the 5749
racing meet is proposed to be conducted, together with a 5750
certificate of the board of elections of the counties in which 5751
such townships are situated that the signatures on the petition 5752
are valid and comply with this section. No petition or 5753
certificate shall be required for a transfer made under section 5754
3769.13 of the Revised Code if the transfer is to a county in 5755
which racing has previously been conducted pursuant to a permit 5756
issued under section 3769.06 of the Revised Code. 5757
Such petition shall be in the following form: 5758
"We, the undersigned, electors of ____________ township, 5759
____________ county, Ohio request the granting of the 5760
application of ____________ for a horse-racing meet to be 5761
conducted in whole or in part in ____________ township, 5762
____________ Ohio in the year ______ 5763
Name Address Voting Precinct Township 5764
______________________________________________________________" 5765

S. B. No. 197 Page 199
As Introduced
Such petition shall be sworn to in the manner provided in 5766
section 3513.27 of the Revised Code. This section does not apply 5767
to small horse-racing meets or horse shows which are not 5768
required to secure permits under section 3769.01 3769.02 of the 5769
Revised Code, nor shall this section, other than the first 5770
paragraph, apply to county fair horse-racing meets. 5771
Sec. 3769.041. (A) Any information concerning the 5772
following that is submitted, collected, or gathered as part of 5773
an application to the state racing commission for a license or 5774
permit under this chapter is confidential and not subject to 5775
disclosure by a state agency or political subdivision as a 5776
public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code: 5777
(1) A minor child of an applicant; 5778
(2) The social security number, passport number, or 5779
federal tax identification number of an applicant or of the 5780
spouse of an applicant; 5781
(3) The home address and telephone number of an applicant 5782
or of the spouse or dependent of an applicant; 5783
(4) An applicant's birth certificate; 5784
(5) The driver's license number of an applicant or of the 5785
applicant's spouse; 5786
(6) The name or address of a previous spouse of the 5787
applicant; 5788
(7) The date of birth of the applicant and of the spouse 5789
of an applicant; 5790
(8) The place of birth of the applicant and of the spouse 5791
of an applicant; 5792

S. B. No. 197 Page 200
As Introduced
(9) The personal financial information and records of an 5793
applicant or of an employee or the spouse or dependent of an 5794
applicant, including tax returns and information, and records of 5795
criminal proceedings; 5796
(10) Any information concerning a victim of domestic 5797
violence, sexual assault, or stalking; 5798
(11) The electronic mail address of the spouse or family 5799
member of the applicant; 5800
(12) Any trade secret, medical records, and patents or 5801
exclusive licenses; 5802
(13) Security information, including risk prevention 5803
plans, detection and countermeasures, location of count rooms or 5804
other money storage areas, emergency management plans, security 5805
and surveillance plans, equipment and usage protocols, and theft 5806
and fraud prevention plans and countermeasures; 5807
(14) Information provided in a multijurisdictional 5808
personal history disclosure form, including the Ohio supplement, 5809
exhibits, attachments, and updates. 5810
(B) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, upon 5811
written request from a person, the commission shall provide the 5812
following information to the person, except as provided in this 5813
chapter: 5814
(1) The information provided under this chapter concerning 5815
a licensee, permit holder, or an applicant; 5816
(2) A copy of a letter providing the reasons for the 5817
denial of an applicant's license or permit and a copy of a 5818
letter providing the reasons for the commission's refusal to 5819
allow an applicant to withdraw the applicant's application, but 5820

S. B. No. 197 Page 201
As Introduced
with confidential information redacted if that information is 5821
the reason for the denial or refusal to withdraw. 5822
(C) The individual's name, the individual's place of 5823
employment, the individual's job title, and the individual's 5824
gaming experience that is provided for an individual who holds, 5825
held, or has applied for a license or permit under this chapter 5826
is not confidential. The reason for denial or revocation of a 5827
license or permit or for disciplinary action against the 5828
individual is not confidential. The cover sheet completed by an 5829
applicant for a key employee license is not confidential. 5830
(D) A person who holds, held, or has applied for a license 5831
or permit under this chapter may waive the confidentiality 5832
requirements of division (A) of this section. 5833
(E) Confidential information received by the commission 5834
from another jurisdiction relating to a person who holds, held, 5835
or has applied for a license or permit under this chapter is 5836
confidential and not subject to disclosure as a public record 5837
under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. The commission may 5838
share the information referenced in this division with, or 5839
disclose the information to, the inspector general, any 5840
appropriate prosecuting authority, any law enforcement agency, 5841
or any other appropriate governmental or licensing agency, if 5842
the agency that receives the information complies with the same 5843
requirements regarding confidentiality as those with which the 5844
commission must comply. 5845
Sec. 3769.05. At the time of making application for a 5846
permit to conduct a horse-racing meeting, the applicant shall 5847
deposit with the state racing commission a cash bond, certified 5848
check, or bank draft, payable to the order of the commission, in 5849
an amount equal to one hundred dollars for each day petitioned 5850

S. B. No. 197 Page 202
As Introduced
for in said application. At the close of the last day of the 5851
horse-racing meeting, for which a permit is issued, as provided 5852
for in section 3769.06 of the Revised Code, the commission shall 5853
refund to such permit holder the sum of one hundred dollars for 5854
each racing day the permit holder paid to the state tax 5855
commissioner the tax due for said day, as provided for and at 5856
the rate stipulated in section 3769.08 of the Revised Code. In 5857
harness horse-racing meetings, if any full day's racing is 5858
declared off by the judges because of inclement weather or a 5859
muddy track, the commission shall refund to the permit holders 5860
the sum of one hundred dollars of their deposit for each such 5861
day. 5862
Sec. 3769.06. Upon the proper filing of an application to 5863
conduct a horse-racing meeting accompanied by a permit fee and a 5864
cash bond, certified check, or bank draft by any person, 5865
association, trust, or corporation, not in default of payment of 5866
any obligation or debt due to the state under sections 3769.01 5867
to 3769.14 of the Revised Code, the state racing commission may 5868
issue a permit to such applicant to hold or conduct a horse- 5869
racing meeting. Such permit shall specify: 5870
(A) The person, association, trust, or corporation to whom 5871
the same is issued; 5872
(B) The days upon which such horse-racing meeting is to be 5873
held or conducted; 5874
(C) The hours of such days between which live racing 5875
programs will be permitted; 5876
(D) The location of the place, track, or enclosure where 5877
such horse-racing meeting is to be held or conducted. Such 5878
permit shall receipt the payment of the permit fee and deposit 5879

S. B. No. 197 Page 203
As Introduced
of the cash bond, certified check, or bank draft, by the 5880
applicant. Every permit shall contain a condition that all horse 5881
races or racing meetings, conducted thereunder, shall be subject 5882
to the rules and conditions prescribed and promulgated by the 5883
commission. The commission may refuse to award days or to issue 5884
a permit to any applicant if a permit previously issued to said 5885
applicant has been revoked under the authority of such sections. 5886
Such permit may be suspended, diminished, or revoked by the 5887
commission for any violation of such sections or of any rule of 5888
the commission. The commission shall immediately enter upon its 5889
record of proceedings a memorandum of its action in such 5890
suspension, diminution, or revocation and its reasons therefor. 5891
Such permit shall be nontransferable and shall apply only to the 5892
place, track, or enclosure specified in the permit, except as 5893
provided in section 3769.13 of the Revised Code. 5894
Each permit issued under this section to hold or conduct a 5895
horse-racing meeting shall be issued for one year from the first 5896
day of January of the year for which it is issued. The holder of 5897
such permit shall be entitled to renewal of the permit upon 5898
application to the commission for a renewal, and the commission 5899
shall renew the permit unless the commission rejects the 5900
application for good cause, according to the procedures of 5901
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. 5902
Sec. 3769.07. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this 5903
section, no permit shall be issued under sections 3769.01 to 5904
3769.14 of the Revised Code this chapter, authorizing the 5905
conduct of a live racing program for thoroughbred horses and 5906
quarter horses at any place, track, or enclosure except between 5907
the hours of twelve noon and seven p.m., for running horse- 5908
racing meetings, except that on special events days running 5909
horse-racing meetings may begin at nine a.m. by application to 5910

S. B. No. 197 Page 204
As Introduced
the state racing commission and except that the seven p.m. time 5911
may be extended to eight p.m. on a Sunday or holiday by 5912
application to the commission, and no permit shall be issued 5913
under those sections authorizing the conduct of a live racing 5914
program for harness horses at any place, track, or enclosure 5915
except between the hours of twelve noon and twelve midnight for 5916
light harness horse-racing meetings. The seven p.m. and eight 5917
p.m. closing times described in this section shall upon 5918
application to the commission be extended to nine p.m. for any 5919
running horse-racing meeting conducted between the fifteenth day 5920
of May and the fifteenth day of September at a track that is 5921
located more than twenty-five miles from a track located in this 5922
state where a light harness horse-racing meeting, other than a 5923
light harness horse-racing meeting at a county fair or 5924
independent fair, is being conducted and that is located less 5925
than twenty-five miles from a track located outside this state. 5926
A permit issued for horse racing at a county fair shall 5927
authorize live horse racing to begin at nine a.m. 5928
(B) No permit shall be granted for the holding or 5929
conducting of a horse-racing meeting after the tenth day of 5930
December in any calendar year, except for racing at winterized 5931
tracks. "Winterized track" means a track with enclosed club 5932
house or grandstand, all-weather racing track, heated facilities 5933
for jockeys or drivers, backstretch facilities that are properly 5934
prepared for winter racing, and adequate snow removal equipment 5935
available. 5936
(C) No permit shall be issued for more than an aggregate 5937
of fifty-six racing days in any one calendar year, except that 5938
an additional five days of racing may be approved by the 5939
commission upon application by a permit holder and except that 5940
an additional thirty days of racing may be granted for racing at 5941

S. B. No. 197 Page 205
As Introduced
any time after the fifteenth day of October and prior to the 5942
fifteenth day of March to a permit holder who has a winterized 5943
facility, but no more than thirty such additional days may be 5944
issued at any one track or enclosure. No more than an aggregate 5945
of fifty-six racing days shall be issued in any one calendar 5946
year for any one race track, place, or enclosure, except for the 5947
additional five days of racing for each permit holder which may 5948
be approved by the commission pursuant to this section, except 5949
as provided in sections 3769.071 and 3769.13 of the Revised 5950
Code, except for racing days granted as a result of a winterized 5951
facility, and except that the commission may issue a second 5952
permit for a maximum of fifty-six racing days for any one track, 5953
place, or enclosure, if the commission determines that the 5954
issuance of such second permit is not against the public 5955
interest. No such second permit shall be issued: 5956
(1) For the operation of racing in any county with a 5957
population of less than seven hundred thousand or for the 5958
operation of racing in any county which has more than one race 5959
track at which a racing meet has been authorized, except as 5960
provided in this division and in sections 3769.071 and 3769.13 5961
of the Revised Code, in the same year by the commission. A 5962
second permit issued pursuant to this division may be issued at 5963
either or both race tracks in a county that has only two race 5964
tracks if a racing meet has been authorized at both race tracks 5965
in the same year by the commission and one race track has been 5966
authorized to conduct thoroughbred racing meets and the other 5967
race track has been authorized to conduct harness racing meets. 5968
When such second permit is issued pursuant to this division for 5969
racing at the one race track, racing shall not be conducted at 5970
that race track on the same day that racing is conducted at the 5971
other race track in the county except by mutual agreement of the 5972

S. B. No. 197 Page 206
As Introduced
two race tracks. 5973
(2) To any corporation having one or more shareholders 5974
owning an interest in any other permit issued by the commission 5975
for the operation of racing, in the same year, at any other race 5976
track, place, or enclosure in this state; 5977
(3) To any person, association, or trust which owns, or 5978
which has any members owning, an interest in any other permit 5979
issued by the commission for the operation of racing, in the 5980
same year, at any other race track, place, or enclosure in this 5981
state. 5982
(D) No permit shall be issued so as to permit live racing 5983
programs on the same hour at more than one track in one county 5984
or on tracks in operation in 1975 within fifty miles of each 5985
other, nor shall any other form of pari-mutuel wagering other 5986
than horse racing be permitted within seventy-five miles of a 5987
track where horse racing is being conducted, except that this 5988
provision shall not apply to a horse-racing meeting held at the 5989
state fair or at a fair conducted by a county agricultural 5990
society or at a fair conducted by an independent agricultural 5991
society. Distribution of days shall not apply to fairs or horse 5992
shows not required to secure a permit under such section. 5993
(E) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of The the 5994
Revised Code: 5995
(1) No person or entity shall be issued permits to conduct 5996
horse-racing meetings at more than two facilities in this state 5997
at any one time. 5998
(2) No person or entity shall be issued permits to conduct 5999
thoroughbred horse-racing meetings at more than one facility in 6000
this state at any one time. 6001

S. B. No. 197 Page 207
As Introduced
(3) No person or entity shall be a management company for 6002
persons or entities that have been issued permits to conduct 6003
horse-racing meetings at more than two facilities in this state 6004
at any one time. 6005
(4) A person or entity is not prohibited from owning more 6006
than two facilities in this state at which horse-racing meetings 6007
are conducted, so long as the person or entity is not in 6008
violation of division (E)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. 6009
(F) A permit, granted under sections 3769.01 to 3769.14 of 6010
the Revised Code, this chapter shall be conspicuously displayed 6011
during the horse-racing meeting in the principal office at such 6012
race track and at all reasonable times shall be exhibited to any 6013
authorized person requesting to see the same. 6014
Sec. 3769.071. In addition to any permit authorized to be 6015
issued by this chapter, the state racing commission may issue 6016
not more than three permits for not more than fourteen 6017
consecutive racing days each at any race track, place, or 6018
enclosure. Not more than two permits shall be issued for quarter 6019
horse racing in one county. All racing under any permit issued 6020
pursuant to this section shall be limited to quarter horse 6021
racing only. This chapter applies to quarter horse racing, which 6022
shall be classified for this purpose the same as running horse 6023
racing. The minimum purse shall be five hundred dollars. 6024
Sec. 3769.072. The commission shall grant to any track or 6025
enclosure that has fewer permits or total racing days available 6026
to it than another track or enclosure located within twenty 6027
miles a number of permits so that the total number of racing 6028
days available to both tracks or enclosures is equal. The state 6029
racing commission shall issue one additional permit for not more 6030
than sixty-one days to a permit holder issued a racing permit 6031

S. B. No. 197 Page 208
As Introduced
under section 3769.07 of the Revised Code, if, on the effective 6032
date of this section September 19, 1996, such permit holder 6033
conducts racing at a track that is located within the same 6034
county as, or is located within twenty miles of, another track 6035
for which three or more permits have previously been issued by 6036
the commission under section 3769.07 of the Revised Code. If one 6037
of the three permits is for racing at a winterized facility, the 6038
new permit issued under this section shall be for thirty days. 6039
Further, in addition to any permit authorized to be issued by 6040
this chapter, the commission shall issue not more than two 6041
additional permits for not more than fourteen days each to a 6042
permit holder issued a racing permit under section 3769.07 of 6043
the Revised Code, if, on the effective date of this section 6044
September 19, 1996, such permit holder conducts racing at a 6045
track that is located within the same county as another track 6046
for which permits have previously been issued by the commission 6047
under section 3769.071 of the Revised Code. Permit holders 6048
receiving permits issued by the commission under this section 6049
may, but need not, conduct live racing programs under such a 6050
permit, subject to commission approval, but the number of racing 6051
days authorized by the permit shall be considered to be permit 6052
days for the purpose of section 3769.0810 of the Revised Code, 6053
whether or not live racing programs are conducted under that 6054
permit. 6055
Sec. 3769.08. (A) Any (A)(1) The pari-mutuel method of 6056
wagering on live horse racing programs, and on simulcast horse 6057
racing programs as permitted under sections 3769.089 and 3769.26 6058
of the Revised Code, is not unlawful. No person other than a 6059
permit holder or a management services company designated by a 6060
permit holder under section 3769.081 of the Revised Code shall 6061
conduct pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing. No person shall 6062

S. B. No. 197 Page 209
As Introduced
conduct any other form of wagering on horse racing. 6063
(2) A person holding a permit to conduct a horse-racing 6064
meeting may provide a place in the race meeting grounds or 6065
enclosure at which the permit holder may conduct and supervise 6066
the accept pari-mutuel system of wagering by patrons of legal 6067
age wagers only on the live racing programs and simulcast racing 6068
programs conducted by the permit holder, only from individuals 6069
who are eighteen years of age or older, and only using equipment 6070
and systems approved by the commission and, if applicable, 6071
provided by a licensed totalizator company. 6072
The pari-mutuel method of wagering upon the live racing 6073
programs and simulcast racing programs held at or conducted 6074
within such race track, and at the time of such horse-racing 6075
meeting, or at other times authorized by the state racing 6076
commission, shall not be unlawful. No other place, except that 6077
provided and designated by the permit holder and except as 6078
provided in section 3769.26 of the Revised Code, nor any other 6079
method or system of betting or wagering on live racing programs 6080
and simulcast racing programs, except the pari-mutuel system, 6081
shall be used or permitted by the permit holder; nor, except as 6082
provided in section 3769.089 or 3769.26 of the Revised Code, 6083
shall the pari-mutuel system of wagering be conducted by the 6084
permit holder on any races except the races at the race track, 6085
grounds, or enclosure for which the person holds a permit. (3) A 6086
permit holder may accept such a wager in person at the permit 6087
holder's track or satellite facility. A permit holder, other 6088
than a person who holds only a permit issued for a racing 6089
meeting at a fair, also may accept such a wager over the 6090
internet. 6091
(4) Each permit holder may retain as a commission an 6092

S. B. No. 197 Page 210
As Introduced
amount not to exceed eighteen per cent of the total of all 6093
moneys wagered on live racing programs and simulcast racing 6094
programs. 6095
(5) The pari-mutuel wagering authorized by this section is 6096
subject to sections 3769.25 to 3769.28 of the Revised Code. 6097
(6) A permit holder shall comply with all applicable 6098
requirements of Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code and the rules 6099
of the commission. 6100
(B) At the close of each racing day, each permit holder 6101
authorized to conduct thoroughbred racing, out of the amount 6102
retained on that day by the permit holder, shall pay in the 6103
manner prescribed under section 3769.103 of the Revised Code, as 6104
a tax, a sum equal to the following percentages of the total of 6105
all moneys wagered on live racing programs on that day and shall 6106
separately compute and pay in the manner prescribed under 6107
section 3769.103 of the Revised Code, as a tax, a sum equal to 6108
the following percentages of the total of all money wagered on 6109
simulcast racing programs on that day: 6110
(1) One per cent of the first two hundred thousand dollars 6111
wagered, or any part of that amount; 6112
(2) Two per cent of the next one hundred thousand dollars 6113
wagered, or any part of that amount; 6114
(3) Three per cent of the next one hundred thousand 6115
dollars wagered, or any part of that amount; 6116
(4) Four per cent of all sums over four hundred thousand 6117
dollars wagered. 6118
Except as otherwise provided in section 3769.089 of the 6119
Revised Code, each permit holder authorized to conduct 6120

S. B. No. 197 Page 211
As Introduced
thoroughbred racing shall use for purse money a sum equal to 6121
fifty per cent of the pari-mutuel revenues retained by the 6122
permit holder as a commission after payment of the state tax. 6123
This fifty per cent payment shall be in addition to the purse 6124
distribution from breakage specified in this section. 6125
Subject to division (M) of this section, from the moneys 6126
paid to the tax commissioner by thoroughbred racing permit 6127
holders, one-half of one per cent of the total of all moneys so 6128
wagered on a racing day shall be paid into the Ohio fairs fund 6129
created by section 3769.082 of the Revised Code, one and one- 6130
eighth per cent of the total of all moneys so wagered on a 6131
racing day shall be paid into the Ohio thoroughbred race fund 6132
created by section 3769.083 of the Revised Code, and one-quarter 6133
of one per cent of the total of all moneys wagered on a racing 6134
day by each permit holder shall be paid into the state racing 6135
casino control commission operating fund created by described in 6136
section 3769.03 3772.01 of the Revised Code. The required 6137
payment to the state racing casino control commission operating 6138
fund does not apply to county and independent fairs and 6139
agricultural societies. The remaining moneys may be retained by 6140
the permit holder, except as provided in this section with 6141
respect to the odd cents redistribution. Amounts paid into the 6142
nursing home franchise permit fee fund pursuant to this section 6143
and section 3769.26 of the Revised Code shall be used solely for 6144
the support of the PASSPORT program as determined in 6145
appropriations made by the general assembly. If the PASSPORT 6146
program is abolished, the amount that would have been paid to 6147
the nursing home franchise permit fee fund under this chapter 6148
shall be paid to the general revenue fund of the state. As used 6149
in this chapter, "PASSPORT program" has the same meaning as in 6150
section 173.51 of the Revised Code. 6151

S. B. No. 197 Page 212
As Introduced
The total amount paid to the Ohio thoroughbred race fund 6152
under this section and division (A) of section 3769.087 of the 6153
Revised Code shall not exceed by more than six per cent the 6154
total amount paid to this fund under this section and division 6155
(A) of that section during the immediately preceding calendar 6156
year. 6157
Each year, the total amount calculated for payment into 6158
the Ohio fairs fund under this division, division (C) of this 6159
section, and division (A) of section 3769.087 of the Revised 6160
Code shall be an amount calculated using the percentages 6161
specified in this division, division (C) of this section, and 6162
division (A) of section 3769.087 of the Revised Code. 6163
A permit holder may contract with a thoroughbred 6164
horsemen's organization for the organization to act as a 6165
representative of all thoroughbred owners and trainers 6166
participating in a horse-racing meeting conducted by the permit 6167
holder. A "thoroughbred horsemen's organization" is any 6168
corporation or association that represents, through membership 6169
or otherwise, more than one-half of the aggregate of all 6170
thoroughbred owners and trainers who were licensed and actively 6171
participated in racing within this state during the preceding 6172
calendar year. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, 6173
any moneys received by a thoroughbred horsemen's organization 6174
shall be used exclusively for the benefit of thoroughbred owners 6175
and trainers racing in this state through the administrative 6176
purposes of the organization, benevolent activities on behalf of 6177
the horsemen, promotion of the horsemen's rights and interests, 6178
and promotion of equine research. A thoroughbred horsemen's 6179
organization may expend not more than an aggregate of five per 6180
cent of its annual gross receipts, or a larger amount as 6181
approved by the organization, for dues, assessments, and other 6182

S. B. No. 197 Page 213
As Introduced
payments to all other local, national, or international 6183
organizations having as their primary purposes the promotion of 6184
thoroughbred horse racing, thoroughbred horsemen's rights, and 6185
equine research. 6186
(C) Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this 6187
section, at the close of each racing day, each permit holder 6188
authorized to conduct harness or quarter horse racing, out of 6189
the amount retained that day by the permit holder, shall pay in 6190
the manner prescribed under section 3769.103 of the Revised 6191
Code, as a tax, a sum equal to the following percentages of the 6192
total of all moneys wagered on live racing programs and shall 6193
separately compute and pay in the manner prescribed under 6194
section 3769.103 of the Revised Code, as a tax, a sum equal to 6195
the following percentages of the total of all money wagered on 6196
simulcast racing programs on that day: 6197
(1) One per cent of the first two hundred thousand dollars 6198
wagered, or any part of that amount; 6199
(2) Two per cent of the next one hundred thousand dollars 6200
wagered, or any part of that amount; 6201
(3) Three per cent of the next one hundred thousand 6202
dollars wagered, or any part of that amount; 6203
(4) Four per cent of all sums over four hundred thousand 6204
dollars wagered. 6205
Except as otherwise provided in division (B) and subject 6206
to division (M) of this section, from the moneys paid to the tax 6207
commissioner by permit holders authorized to conduct harness or 6208
quarter horse racing, one-half of one per cent of all moneys 6209
wagered on that racing day shall be paid into the Ohio fairs 6210
fund; from the moneys paid to the tax commissioner by permit 6211

S. B. No. 197 Page 214
As Introduced
holders authorized to conduct harness racing, five-eighths of 6212
one per cent of all moneys wagered on that racing day shall be 6213
paid into the Ohio standardbred development fund; and from the 6214
moneys paid to the tax commissioner by permit holders authorized 6215
to conduct quarter horse racing, five-eighths of one per cent of 6216
all moneys wagered on that racing day shall be paid into the 6217
Ohio thoroughbred race fund to support quarter horse development 6218
and purses. 6219
(D) In addition, subject to division (M) of this section, 6220
beginning on January 1, 1996, from the money paid to the tax 6221
commissioner as a tax under this section and division (A) of 6222
section 3769.087 of the Revised Code by harness horse permit 6223
holders, one-half of one per cent of the amount wagered on a 6224
racing day shall be paid into the Ohio standardbred development 6225
fund. Beginning January 1, 1998, the payment to the Ohio 6226
standardbred development fund required under this division does 6227
not apply to county agricultural societies or independent 6228
agricultural societies. 6229
The total amount paid to the Ohio standardbred development 6230
fund under this division, division (C) of this section, and 6231
division (A) of section 3769.087 of the Revised Code and the 6232
total amount paid to the Ohio thoroughbred race fund to support 6233
quarter horse development and purses under this division and 6234
division (A) of that section shall not exceed by more than six 6235
per cent the total amount paid into the fund under this 6236
division, division (C) of this section, and division (A) of 6237
section 3769.087 of the Revised Code in the immediately 6238
preceding calendar year. 6239
(E) Subject to division (M) of this section, from the 6240
money paid as a tax under this chapter by harness and quarter 6241

S. B. No. 197 Page 215
As Introduced
horse permit holders, one-quarter of one per cent of the total 6242
of all moneys wagered on a racing day by each permit holder 6243
shall be paid into the state racing casino control commission 6244
operating fund created by described in section 3769.03 3772.01 6245
of the Revised Code. This division does not apply to county and 6246
independent fairs and agricultural societies. 6247
(F) Except as otherwise provided in section 3769.089 of 6248
the Revised Code, each permit holder authorized to conduct 6249
harness racing shall pay to the harness horsemen's purse pool a 6250
sum equal to fifty per cent of the pari-mutuel revenues retained 6251
by the permit holder as a commission after payment of the state 6252
tax. This fifty per cent payment is to be in addition to the 6253
purse distribution from breakage specified in this section. 6254
(G) In addition, each permit holder authorized to conduct 6255
harness racing shall be allowed to retain the odd cents of all 6256
redistribution to be made on all mutual contributions exceeding 6257
a sum equal to the next lowest multiple of ten. 6258
Forty per cent of that portion of that total sum of such 6259
odd cents shall be used by the permit holder for purse money for 6260
Ohio sired, bred, and owned colts, for purse money for Ohio bred 6261
horses, and for increased purse money for horse races. Upon the 6262
formation of the corporation described in section 3769.21 of the 6263
Revised Code to establish a harness horsemen's health and 6264
retirement fund, twenty-five per cent of that portion of that 6265
total sum of odd cents shall be paid at the close of each racing 6266
day by the permit holder to that corporation to establish and 6267
fund the health and retirement fund. Until that corporation is 6268
formed, that twenty-five per cent shall be paid at the close of 6269
each racing day by the permit holder to the tax commissioner or 6270
the tax commissioner's agent in the county seat of the county in 6271

S. B. No. 197 Page 216
As Introduced
which the permit holder operates race meetings. The remaining 6272
thirty-five per cent of that portion of that total sum of odd 6273
cents shall be retained by the permit holder. 6274
(H) In addition, each permit holder authorized to conduct 6275
thoroughbred racing shall be allowed to retain the odd cents of 6276
all redistribution to be made on all mutuel contributions 6277
exceeding a sum equal to the next lowest multiple of ten. Twenty 6278
per cent of that portion of that total sum of such odd cents 6279
shall be used by the permit holder for increased purse money for 6280
horse races. Upon the formation of the corporation described in 6281
section 3769.21 of the Revised Code to establish a thoroughbred 6282
horsemen's health and retirement fund, forty-five per cent of 6283
that portion of that total sum of odd cents shall be paid at the 6284
close of each racing day by the permit holder to that 6285
corporation to establish and fund the health and retirement 6286
fund. Until that corporation is formed, that forty-five per cent 6287
shall be paid by the permit holder to the tax commissioner or 6288
the tax commissioner's agent in the county seat of the county in 6289
which the permit holder operates race meetings, at the close of 6290
each racing day. The remaining thirty-five per cent of that 6291
portion of that total sum of odd cents shall be retained by the 6292
permit holder. 6293
(I) In addition, each permit holder authorized to conduct 6294
quarter horse racing shall be allowed to retain the odd cents of 6295
all redistribution to be made on all mutuel contributions 6296
exceeding a sum equal to the next lowest multiple of ten, 6297
subject to a tax of twenty-five per cent on that portion of the 6298
total sum of such odd cents that is in excess of two thousand 6299
dollars during a calendar year, which tax shall be paid at the 6300
close of each racing day by the permit holder to the tax 6301
commissioner or the tax commissioner's agent in the county seat 6302

S. B. No. 197 Page 217
As Introduced
of the county within which the permit holder operates race 6303
meetings. Forty per cent of that portion of that total sum of 6304
such odd cents shall be used by the permit holder for increased 6305
purse money for horse races. The remaining thirty-five per cent 6306
of that portion of that total sum of odd cents shall be retained 6307
by the permit holder. 6308
(J)(1) To encourage the improvement of racing facilities 6309
for the benefit of the public, breeders, and horse owners, and 6310
to increase the revenue to the state from the increase in pari- 6311
mutuel wagering resulting from those improvements, the taxes 6312
paid by a permit holder to the state as provided for in this 6313
chapter shall be reduced by three-fourths of one per cent of the 6314
total amount wagered for those permit holders who make capital 6315
improvements to existing race tracks or construct new race 6316
tracks. The percentage of the reduction that may be taken each 6317
racing day shall equal seventy-five per cent of the taxes levied 6318
under divisions (B) and (C) of this section and section 3769.087 6319
of the Revised Code, and division (F)(2) of section 3769.26 of 6320
the Revised Code, as applicable, divided by the calculated 6321
amount each fund should receive under divisions (B) and (C) of 6322
this section and section 3769.087 of the Revised Code, and 6323
division (F)(2) of section 3769.26 of the Revised Code and the 6324
reduction provided for in this division. If the resulting 6325
percentage is less than one, that percentage shall be multiplied 6326
by the amount of the reduction provided for in this division. 6327
Otherwise, the permit holder shall receive the full reduction 6328
provided for in this division. The amount of the allowable 6329
reduction not received shall be carried forward and applied 6330
against future tax liability. After any reductions expire, any 6331
reduction carried forward shall be treated as a reduction as 6332
provided for in this division. 6333

S. B. No. 197 Page 218
As Introduced
If more than one permit holder is authorized to conduct 6334
racing at the facility that is being built or improved, the cost 6335
of the new race track or capital improvement shall be allocated 6336
between or among all the permit holders in the ratio that the 6337
permit holders' number of racing days bears to the total number 6338
of racing days conducted at the facility. 6339
A reduction for a new race track or a capital improvement 6340
shall start from the day racing is first conducted following the 6341
date actual construction of the new race track or each capital 6342
improvement is completed and the construction cost has been 6343
approved by the racing commission, unless otherwise provided in 6344
this section. A reduction for a new race track or a capital 6345
improvement shall continue for a period of twenty-five years for 6346
new race tracks and for fifteen years for capital improvements 6347
if the construction of the capital improvement or new race track 6348
commenced prior to March 29, 1988, and for a period of ten years 6349
for new race tracks or capital improvements if the construction 6350
of the capital improvement or new race track commenced on or 6351
after March 29, 1988, but before June 6, 2001, or until the 6352
total tax reduction reaches seventy per cent of the approved 6353
cost of the new race track or capital improvement, as allocated 6354
to each permit holder, whichever occurs first. A reduction for a 6355
new race track or a capital improvement approved after June 6, 6356
2001, shall continue until the total tax reduction reaches one 6357
hundred per cent of the approved cost of the new race track or 6358
capital improvement, as allocated to each permit holder. 6359
A reduction granted for a new race track or a capital 6360
improvement, the application for which was approved by the 6361
racing commission after March 29, 1988, but before June 6, 2001, 6362
shall not commence nor shall the ten-year period begin to run 6363
until all prior tax reductions with respect to the same race 6364

S. B. No. 197 Page 219
As Introduced
track have ended. The total tax reduction because of capital 6365
improvements shall not during any one year exceed for all permit 6366
holders using any one track three-fourths of one per cent of the 6367
total amount wagered, regardless of the number of capital 6368
improvements made. Several capital improvements to a race track 6369
may be consolidated in an application if the racing commission 6370
approved the application prior to March 29, 1988. No permit 6371
holder may receive a tax reduction for a capital improvement 6372
approved by the racing commission on or after March 29, 1988, at 6373
a race track until all tax reductions have ended for all prior 6374
capital improvements approved by the racing commission under 6375
this section or section 3769.20 of the Revised Code at that race 6376
track. If there are two or more permit holders operating 6377
meetings at the same track, they may consolidate their 6378
applications. The racing commission shall notify the tax 6379
commissioner when the reduction of tax begins and when it ends. 6380
Each fiscal year the racing commission shall submit a 6381
report to the tax commissioner, the office of budget and 6382
management, and the legislative service commission. The report 6383
shall identify each capital improvement project undertaken under 6384
this division and in progress at each race track, indicate the 6385
total cost of each project, state the tax reduction that 6386
resulted from each project during the immediately preceding 6387
fiscal year, estimate the tax reduction that will result from 6388
each project during the current fiscal year, state the total tax 6389
reduction that resulted from all such projects at all race 6390
tracks during the immediately preceding fiscal year, and 6391
estimate the total tax reduction that will result from all such 6392
projects at all race tracks during the current fiscal year. 6393
(2) In order to qualify for the reduction in tax, a permit 6394
holder shall apply to the racing commission in such form as the 6395

S. B. No. 197 Page 220
As Introduced
commission may require and shall provide full details of the new 6396
race track or capital improvement, including a schedule for its 6397
construction and completion, and set forth the costs and 6398
expenses incurred in connection with it. The racing commission 6399
shall not approve an application unless the permit holder shows 6400
that a contract for the new race track or capital improvement 6401
has been let under an unrestricted competitive bidding 6402
procedure, unless the contract is exempted by the controlling 6403
board because of its unusual nature. In determining whether to 6404
approve an application, the racing commission shall consider 6405
whether the new race track or capital improvement will promote 6406
the safety, convenience, and comfort of the racing public and 6407
horse owners and generally tend towards the improvement of 6408
racing in this state. 6409
(3) If a new race track or capital improvement is approved 6410
by the racing commission and construction has started, the tax 6411
reduction may be authorized by the commission upon presentation 6412
of copies of paid bills in excess of one hundred thousand 6413
dollars or ten per cent of the approved cost, whichever is 6414
greater. After the initial authorization, the permit holder 6415
shall present copies of paid bills. If the permit holder is in 6416
substantial compliance with the schedule for construction and 6417
completion of the new race track or capital improvement, the 6418
racing commission may authorize the continuation of the tax 6419
reduction upon the presentation of the additional paid bills. 6420
The total amount of the tax reduction authorized shall not 6421
exceed the percentage of the approved cost of the new race track 6422
or capital improvement specified in division (J)(1) of this 6423
section. The racing commission may terminate any tax reduction 6424
immediately if a permit holder fails to complete the new race 6425
track or capital improvement, or to substantially comply with 6426

S. B. No. 197 Page 221
As Introduced
the schedule for construction and completion of the new race 6427
track or capital improvement. If a permit holder fails to 6428
complete a new race track or capital improvement, the racing 6429
commission shall order the permit holder to repay to the state 6430
the total amount of tax reduced. The normal tax paid by the 6431
permit holder shall be increased by three-fourths of one per 6432
cent of the total amount wagered until the total amount of the 6433
additional tax collected equals the total amount of tax reduced. 6434
(4) As used in this section: 6435
(a) "Capital improvement" means an addition, replacement, 6436
or remodeling of a structural unit of a race track facility 6437
costing at least one hundred thousand dollars, including, but 6438
not limited to, the construction of barns used exclusively for 6439
the race track facility, backstretch facilities for horsemen, 6440
paddock facilities, new pari-mutuel and totalizator equipment 6441
and appurtenances to that equipment purchased by the track, new 6442
access roads, new parking areas, the complete reconstruction, 6443
reshaping, and leveling of the racing surface and appurtenances, 6444
the installation of permanent new heating or air conditioning, 6445
roof replacement or restoration, installations of a permanent 6446
nature forming a part of the track structure, and construction 6447
of buildings that are located on a permit holder's premises. 6448
"Capital improvement" does not include the cost of replacement 6449
of equipment that is not permanently installed, ordinary 6450
repairs, painting, and maintenance required to keep a race track 6451
facility in ordinary operating condition. 6452
(b) "New race track" includes the reconstruction of a race 6453
track damaged by fire or other cause that has been declared by 6454
the racing commission, as a result of the damage, to be an 6455
inadequate facility for the safe operation of horse racing. 6456

S. B. No. 197 Page 222
As Introduced
(c) "Approved cost" includes all debt service and interest 6457
costs that are associated with a capital improvement or new race 6458
track and that the racing commission approves for a tax 6459
reduction under division (J) of this section. 6460
(5) The racing commission shall not approve an application 6461
for a tax reduction under this section if it has reasonable 6462
cause to believe that the actions or negligence of the permit 6463
holder substantially contributed to the damage suffered by the 6464
track due to fire or other cause. The racing commission shall 6465
obtain any data or information available from a fire marshal, 6466
law enforcement official, or insurance company concerning any 6467
fire or other damage suffered by a track, prior to approving an 6468
application for a tax reduction. 6469
(6) The approved cost to which a tax reduction applies 6470
shall be determined by generally accepted accounting principles 6471
and verified by an audit of the permit holder's records upon 6472
completion of the project by the racing commission, or by an 6473
independent certified public accountant selected by the permit 6474
holder and approved by the commission. 6475
(K) No other license or excise tax or fee, except as 6476
provided in sections 3769.01 to 3769.14 of the Revised Code, 6477
shall be assessed or collected from such licensee by any county, 6478
township, district, municipal corporation, or other body having 6479
power to assess or collect a tax or fee. That portion of the tax 6480
paid under this section by permit holders for racing conducted 6481
at and during the course of an agricultural exposition or fair, 6482
and that portion of the tax that would have been paid by 6483
eligible permit holders into the nursing home franchise permit 6484
fee fund as a result of racing conducted at and during the 6485
course of an agricultural exposition or fair, shall be deposited 6486

S. B. No. 197 Page 223
As Introduced
into the state treasury to the credit of the horse racing tax 6487
fund, which is hereby created for the use of the agricultural 6488
societies of the several counties in which the taxes originate. 6489
The state racing commission shall determine eligible permit 6490
holders for purposes of the preceding sentence, taking into 6491
account the breed of horse, the racing dates, the geographic 6492
proximity to the fair, and the best interests of Ohio racing. On 6493
the first day of any month on which there is money in the fund, 6494
the tax commissioner shall provide for payment to the treasurer 6495
of each agricultural society the amount of the taxes collected 6496
under this section upon racing conducted at and during the 6497
course of any exposition or fair conducted by the society. 6498
(L) From the tax paid under this section by harness track 6499
permit holders, the tax commissioner shall pay into the Ohio 6500
thoroughbred race fund a sum equal to a percentage of the amount 6501
wagered upon which the tax is paid. The percentage shall be 6502
determined by the tax commissioner and shall be rounded to the 6503
nearest one-hundredth. The percentage shall be such that, when 6504
multiplied by the amount wagered upon which tax was paid by the 6505
harness track permit holders in the most recent year for which 6506
final figures are available, it results in a sum that 6507
substantially equals the same amount of tax paid by the tax 6508
commissioner during that year into the Ohio fairs fund from 6509
taxes paid by thoroughbred permit holders. This division does 6510
not apply to county and independent fairs and agricultural 6511
societies. 6512
(M) Twenty-five per cent of the taxes levied on 6513
thoroughbred racing permit holders, harness racing permit 6514
holders, and quarter horse racing permit holders under this 6515
section, division (A) of section 3769.087 of the Revised Code, 6516
and division (F)(2) of section 3769.26 of the Revised Code shall 6517

S. B. No. 197 Page 224
As Introduced
be paid into the nursing home franchise permit fee fund. The tax 6518
commissioner shall pay any money remaining, after the payment 6519
into the nursing home franchise permit fee fund and the 6520
reductions provided for in division (J) of this section and in 6521
section 3769.20 of the Revised Code, into the Ohio fairs fund, 6522
Ohio thoroughbred race fund, Ohio standardbred development fund, 6523
and state racing casino control commission operating fund as 6524
prescribed in this section and division (A) of section 3769.087 6525
of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner shall thereafter use 6526
and apply the balance of the money paid as a tax by any permit 6527
holder to cover any shortage in the accounts of such funds 6528
resulting from an insufficient payment as a tax by any other 6529
permit holder. Subject to section 3769.101 of the Revised Code, 6530
the moneys received by the tax commissioner shall be deposited 6531
monthly and paid by the tax commissioner into the funds to cover 6532
the total aggregate amount due from all permit holders to the 6533
funds, as calculated under this section and division (A) of 6534
section 3769.087 of the Revised Code, as applicable. If, after 6535
the payment into the nursing home franchise permit fee fund, 6536
sufficient funds are not available from the tax deposited by the 6537
tax commissioner to pay the required amounts into the Ohio fairs 6538
fund, Ohio standardbred development fund, Ohio thoroughbred race 6539
fund, and the state racing casino control commission operating 6540
fund, the tax commissioner shall prorate on a proportional basis 6541
the amount paid to each of the funds. Any shortage to the funds 6542
as a result of a proration shall be applied against future 6543
deposits for the same calendar year when funds are available. 6544
After this application, the tax commissioner shall pay any 6545
remaining money paid as a tax by all permit holders into the 6546
nursing home franchise permit fee fund. This division does not 6547
apply to permit holders conducting racing at the course of an 6548
agricultural exposition or fair as described in division (K) of 6549

S. B. No. 197 Page 225
As Introduced
this section. 6550
Sec. 3769.081. (A)(1) A permit holder may contract with 6551
one management services company to offer pari-mutuel wagering on 6552
horse racing under section 3769.08 of the Revised Code on the 6553
permit holder's behalf, in a manner authorized under the 6554
contract. If the permit holder contracts with a management 6555
services company, the permit holder shall not offer pari-mutuel 6556
wagering on horse racing under that section in any other manner. 6557
(2) A management services company may offer pari-mutuel 6558
wagering on horse racing only in accordance with this chapter, 6559
with the rules adopted by the commission under this chapter, and 6560
with the nature of the permit holder's permit. 6561
(B)(1) A management services company shall be licensed 6562
under this section before entering into a contract with a permit 6563
holder as described in division (A) of this section. A 6564
management services company license entitles the holder to 6565
contract with one permit holder. An applicant for an initial or 6566
renewed management services company license shall meet all 6567
requirements for licensure established by the commission by rule 6568
and shall pay the fee required under division (C)(3) of section 6569
109.572 of the Revised Code, along with a nonrefundable 6570
application fee in an amount determined by the commission by 6571
rule. 6572
(2) The commission may accept another jurisdiction's 6573
license, if the commission determines it has similar licensing 6574
requirements, as evidence that the applicant meets the 6575
requirements for a license issued under this section. 6576
(3) After receiving an initial or renewed management 6577
services company license, the applicant shall pay a 6578

S. B. No. 197 Page 226
As Introduced
nonrefundable license fee in an amount determined by the 6579
commission by rule. 6580
(C) A management services company license shall be valid 6581
for a term of five years. In order to renew a management 6582
services company license, the licensee shall apply to the 6583
commission for a renewed license in the same manner as for an 6584
initial license. 6585
(D) In order to permit a management services company to 6586
offer pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing on behalf of a permit 6587
holder, the permit holder and the management services company 6588
shall enter into a written contract that has been approved by 6589
the commission. If the permit holder and the management services 6590
company wish to make a material change to the contract, the 6591
permit holder first shall submit the change to the commission 6592
for its approval or rejection. The permit holder or the 6593
management services company shall not assign, delegate, 6594
subcontract, or transfer the management services company's 6595
duties and responsibilities under the contract to a third party. 6596
(E)(1) Subject to division (E)(2) of this section, the 6597
provisions of this chapter and Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code 6598
concerning a permit holder apply to a management services 6599
company that contracts with the permit holder with respect to 6600
all rights, duties, and liabilities of the permit holder 6601
assigned, delegated, subcontracted, or transferred to the 6602
management services company as though the management services 6603
company were a permit holder. Unless the context requires 6604
otherwise, references in the Revised Code to a permit holder 6605
apply to a management services company to the extent that the 6606
management services company is acting on behalf of a permit 6607
holder pursuant to the contract. 6608

S. B. No. 197 Page 227
As Introduced
(2) Division (E)(1) of this section does not permit a 6609
management services company to operate pari-mutuel wagering on 6610
horse racing other than pursuant to a contract with a permit 6611
holder to operate pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing on behalf 6612
of the permit holder. Division (E)(1) of this section does not 6613
permit a management services company to operate video lottery 6614
terminals on behalf of a permit holder. 6615
(F) The commission shall adopt a rule setting a maximum 6616
number of management services company licenses a person may hold 6617
at any one time. 6618
Sec. 3769.082. (A) There is hereby created in the state 6619
treasury the Ohio fairs fund. The director of agriculture shall 6620
distribute money in the fund annually, on or before the first 6621
day of March, as follows: 6622
(1) To each county agricultural society and to each 6623
independent agricultural society conducting an annual fair, 6624
twelve per cent of the total money in the Ohio fairs fund, to be 6625
allocated for general operations; 6626
(2) To the Ohio expositions commission, the sum of one 6627
hundred twenty thousand dollars annually, to be divided equally 6628
as purse money among four stake races for two-year-old and 6629
three-year-old colts and for four stake races for two-year-old 6630
and three-year-old fillies at each gait of trotting and pacing; 6631
provided, that five thousand dollars and all entry fees shall be 6632
added to each race by the Ohio expositions commission. 6633
(3) To each county agricultural society and each 6634
independent agricultural society conducting horse races during 6635
its annual fair, the sum of four thousand dollars, to be used as 6636
purse money for horse races in accordance with this section, and 6637

S. B. No. 197 Page 228
As Introduced
the additional sum of one thousand dollars to each such county 6638
agricultural society and independent agricultural society to be 6639
used for race track maintenance and other expenses necessary for 6640
the conduct of such horse races or colt stakes. 6641
A grant of four thousand dollars shall be available to 6642
each county or independent agricultural society for the conduct 6643
of four stake races for two-year-old and three-year-old colts 6644
and for four stake races for two-year-old and three-year-old 6645
fillies at each gait of trotting and pacing; provided, that at 6646
least five hundred dollars shall be added to each race. 6647
Exclusive of entrance fees and the excess money provided in 6648
division (A)(4) of this section from the grant of four thousand 6649
dollars for purse money provided in this division, a sum not to 6650
exceed three thousand dollars may be used by a society to reach 6651
the required purse for each of the eight stake races. Such stake 6652
races shall be distributed as evenly as possible throughout the 6653
racing season. 6654
(4) In the event that the money available on the first day 6655
of March of any year are is less than that required to carry out 6656
divisions (A)(1), (2), and (3) of this section, the money so 6657
available in the Ohio fairs fund shall be prorated equally to 6658
the items set forth in such divisions. In the event that the 6659
money available on the first day of March of any year are is in 6660
excess of that required to carry out divisions (A)(1), (2), and 6661
(3) of this section, such excess shall be distributed equally to 6662
those county agricultural societies and independent agricultural 6663
societies conducting stake races, such excess to be added to the 6664
stake races conducted under division (A)(3) of this section. The 6665
balance of such excess shall be distributed to provide four per 6666
cent of such excess to the Ohio expositions commission to be 6667
added to the purses pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section, 6668

S. B. No. 197 Page 229
As Introduced
and the balance shall be distributed to the county and 6669
independent agricultural societies conducting stake races, such 6670
excess to be added to and divided equally among the stake races 6671
conducted under division (A)(3) of this section. 6672
(B) County agricultural societies and independent 6673
agricultural societies participating under division (A)(3) of 6674
this section shall, on or before the first day of November in 6675
the year immediately preceding the year in which the money are 6676
is to be distributed, make application for participation in such 6677
distribution to the director of agriculture on forms provided by 6678
the director. 6679
(C) Distribution of money pursuant to division (A)(3) of 6680
this section shall not be paid to county agricultural societies 6681
and independent agricultural societies that conduct on their 6682
race courses automobile or motorcycle races during any year for 6683
which such distribution is requested, unless such automobile or 6684
motorcycle races are not conducted during the days and nights 6685
that horse racing is being conducted at such fair. 6686
(D) All the foals in stake races conducted for two-year- 6687
old and three-year-old colts and fillies under this section 6688
shall have been sired by a stallion registered with the state 6689
racing commission. To be eligible for registration, a stallion 6690
shall be one of the following: 6691
(1) Owned by a resident of Ohio and regularly standing the 6692
entire stud season in Ohio; 6693
(2) Owned by a resident of a state other than Ohio but 6694
regularly standing the entire stud season in Ohio and leased by 6695
a resident of Ohio for a term of not less than ten years; 6696
(3) Owned jointly by a resident of a state other than Ohio 6697

S. B. No. 197 Page 230
As Introduced
and a resident of Ohio, regularly standing the entire stud 6698
season in Ohio, and leased by a resident of Ohio for a term of 6699
not less than ten years. 6700
Each race shall be conditioned to admit only registered 6701
two-year-old and three-year-old colts and fillies sired by a 6702
registered stallion owned or leased and permanently standing for 6703
service at and within this state at the time of the foal's 6704
conception. All other conditions for the scheduling and conduct 6705
of these races shall be approved by the state racing commission. 6706
The races shall be scheduled subject to the right of the 6707
commission to prevent conflicts in the event of contemporaneous 6708
meetings. 6709
Such stake races shall be open for nomination not earlier 6710
than the fifteenth day of February in the year the race is to be 6711
held. All entrance fees in such events shall be added to the 6712
money distributed under this section as purse money. 6713
(E) The state racing commission shall make unannounced 6714
periodic urine, saliva, or blood tests of horses competing in 6715
the events raced under this section. 6716
(F) The director of agriculture shall provide forms for 6717
application for distribution under division (A)(3) of this 6718
section, shall adopt such rules as are necessary for carrying 6719
out this section, and may make such investigations as are 6720
necessary to determine the validity of any claims and 6721
applications for distribution of money under this section. 6722
(G) Any county agricultural society or independent 6723
agricultural society which uses the money distributed under this 6724
section for any purpose other than that provided in this section 6725
is not eligible to receive distribution from the Ohio fairs fund 6726

S. B. No. 197 Page 231
As Introduced
for a period of two years after such misuse of such money 6727
occurs. 6728
(H) As used in this section, "horse races" and "stake 6729
races" include either harness races or running races. 6730
Sec. 3769.083. (A) As used in this section: 6731
(1) An "accredited Ohio thoroughbred horse" means a horse 6732
conceived in this state and born in this state which is both of 6733
the following: 6734
(a) Born of a mare that is domiciled in this state at the 6735
time of the horse's conception, that remains continuously in the 6736
state through the date on which the horse is born, and that is 6737
registered as required by the rules of the state racing 6738
commission; 6739
(b) By a stallion that stands for breeding purposes only 6740
in this state in the year in which the horse is conceived, and 6741
that is registered as required by the rules of the commission. 6742
(2) An "Ohio foaled horse" means a horse registered as 6743
required by the rules of the state racing commission which is 6744
either of the following: 6745
(a) A horse born of a mare that enters this state before 6746
foaling and remains continuously in this state until the horse 6747
is born; 6748
(b) A thoroughbred foal produced within the state by any 6749
broodmare shipped into the state to foal and be bred to a 6750
registered Ohio stallion. To qualify this foal as an Ohio foaled 6751
horse, the broodmare shall remain in this state one year 6752
continuously after foaling or continuously through foaling to 6753
the cover of the Ohio stallion, whichever is sooner. All horses 6754

S. B. No. 197 Page 232
As Introduced
previously registered as Ohio conceived and foaled shall be 6755
considered as Ohio foaled horses effective January 1, 1976. 6756
Any thoroughbred mare may leave this state for periods of 6757
time for purposes of activities such as veterinary treatment or 6758
surgery, sales purposes, breeding purposes, racing purposes, and 6759
similar activities if permission is granted by the state racing 6760
commission and the mare is returned to this state immediately 6761
upon the conclusion of the requested activity. 6762
(3) "Horse," "stallion," "mare," or "foal" means a horse 6763
of the thoroughbred breed as distinguished from a horse of the 6764
standard breed or any other breed, and "race" means a race for 6765
thoroughbred horses conducted by a permit holder of the state 6766
racing commission. 6767
(4) "Horse" includes animals of all ages and of both 6768
sexes. 6769
(B) There is hereby created in the state treasury the Ohio 6770
thoroughbred race fund, to consist of moneys paid into it 6771
pursuant to sections 3769.08 and 3769.087 of the Revised Code. 6772
All investment earnings on the cash balances in the fund shall 6773
be credited to it. Moneys to the credit of the fund shall be 6774
distributed on order of the state racing commission. The 6775
commission, with the advice and assistance of the Ohio 6776
thoroughbred racing advisory committee, shall use the fund, 6777
except as provided in divisions (C)(2) and (3) and (D) of this 6778
section, to promote races and provide purses for races for 6779
horses in the following classes: 6780
(1) Accredited Ohio thoroughbred horses; 6781
(2) Ohio foaled horses. 6782
Not less than ten nor more than twenty-five per cent of 6783

S. B. No. 197 Page 233
As Introduced
the total money to be paid from the fund for all types of races 6784
shall be allocated to races restricted to accredited Ohio 6785
thoroughbred horses. The commission may combine the classes of 6786
horses described in divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section in 6787
one race, except in stakes races. 6788
(C)(1) Each permit holder conducting thoroughbred races 6789
shall schedule races each week for horses in the classes named 6790
in division (B) of this section; the number of the races shall 6791
be prescribed by the state racing commission. The commission, 6792
pursuant to division (B) of this section, shall prescribe the 6793
class or classes of the races to be held by each permit holder 6794
and, with the advice of the Ohio thoroughbred racing advisory 6795
committee, shall fix the dates and conditions of the races and 6796
the amount of moneys to be paid from the Ohio thoroughbred race 6797
fund to be added in each race to the minimum purse established 6798
by the permit holder for the class of race held. 6799
(2) The commission, with the advice of the Ohio 6800
thoroughbred racing advisory committee, may provide for stakes 6801
races to be run each year, and fix the number of stakes races 6802
and the time, place, and conditions under which each shall be 6803
run. The commission shall fix the amount of moneys to be paid 6804
from the Ohio thoroughbred race fund to be added to the purse 6805
provided for each stakes race by the permit holder, except that, 6806
in at least four stakes races each year, the commission shall 6807
require, if four stakes races can be arranged, that the permit 6808
holder conducting the stakes race provide no less than fifteen 6809
thousand dollars for the purse for the stakes race, and the 6810
commission shall provide moneys from the fund to be added to the 6811
purse in an amount equal to or greater than the amount provided 6812
by the permit holder. The commission may require a nominating, 6813
sustaining, and entry fee not to exceed one per cent of the 6814

S. B. No. 197 Page 234
As Introduced
money added from the fund for each horse in any stakes race, 6815
which fee shall be added to the purse for the race. 6816
Stakes races where money is added from the Ohio 6817
thoroughbred race fund shall be open only to accredited Ohio 6818
thoroughbred horses and Ohio foaled horses. Twenty-five per cent 6819
of the total moneys to be paid from the fund for stakes races 6820
shall be allocated to races for only accredited Ohio 6821
thoroughbred horses. The commission may require a nominating, 6822
sustaining, and entry fee, not to exceed one per cent of the 6823
money added from the fund, for each horse in any of these stakes 6824
races. These fees shall be accumulated by the commission and 6825
shall be paid out by the commission at its discretion as part of 6826
the purse money for additional races. 6827
(3) The commission may pay from the Ohio thoroughbred race 6828
fund to the breeder of a horse of class (1) or (2) of division 6829
(B) of this section winning first, second, or third prize money 6830
of a purse for a thoroughbred race an amount not to exceed 6831
fifteen per cent of the first, second, or third prize money of 6832
the purse. For the purposes of this division, the term "breeder" 6833
shall be defined by rule of the commission. 6834
The commission also may provide for stallion owners' 6835
awards in an amount equal to not less than three nor more than 6836
ten per cent of the first, second, or third place share of the 6837
purse. The award shall be paid to the owner of the stallion, 6838
provided that the stallion was standing in this state as 6839
provided in division (A)(1)(b) of this section at the time the 6840
horse placing first, second, or third was conceived. 6841
(D) The state racing commission may provide for the 6842
expenditure of moneys from the Ohio thoroughbred race fund in an 6843
amount not to exceed in any one calendar year ten per cent of 6844

S. B. No. 197 Page 235
As Introduced
the total amount received in the account that year to provide 6845
for research projects directed toward improving the breeding, 6846
raising, racing, and health and soundness of thoroughbred horses 6847
in the state and toward education or promotion of the industry. 6848
Research for which the moneys from the fund may be used may 6849
include, but shall not be limited to, studies of pre-race blood 6850
testing, post-race testing, improvement of the breed, and 6851
nutrition. 6852
(E) The state racing commission shall appoint qualified 6853
personnel as may be required to supervise registration of horses 6854
under the terms of this section, to determine the eligibility of 6855
horses for accredited Ohio thoroughbred races, Ohio foaled 6856
races, and the stakes races authorized by division (C)(2) of 6857
this section, and to assist the Ohio thoroughbred racing 6858
advisory committee and the commission in determining the 6859
conditions, class, and quality of the race program to be 6860
established under this section so as to carry out the purposes 6861
of this section. The personnel shall serve at the pleasure of 6862
the commission, and compensation shall be fixed by the 6863
commission. The compensation of the personnel and necessary 6864
expenses shall be paid out of the Ohio thoroughbred race fund. 6865
The commission shall adopt rules as are necessary to carry 6866
out this section and shall administer the stakes race program 6867
and other races supported by the Ohio thoroughbred race fund in 6868
a manner best designed to aid in the development of the 6869
thoroughbred horse industry in the state, to upgrade the quality 6870
of horse racing in the state, and to improve the quality of 6871
horses conceived and foaled in the state. 6872
(F) The state racing commission shall adopt rules 6873
regarding the maintenance and use of money collected for quarter 6874

S. B. No. 197 Page 236
As Introduced
horse development and purses under division (C) of section 6875
3769.08 and division (A) of section 3769.087 of the Revised 6876
Code. 6877
Sec. 3769.084. (A) The Ohio thoroughbred racing advisory 6878
committee is hereby created to consist of three members 6879
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the 6880
senate. The members of the committee shall be residents of the 6881
state knowledgeable in the breeding and racing of thoroughbred 6882
horses. The Ohio thoroughbred horsemen's association and 6883
representatives of Ohio thoroughbred race tracks may submit to 6884
the governor the names of persons whom they recommend for 6885
appointment as members of the committee. Terms of office shall 6886
be for three years, commencing on the first day of February and 6887
ending on the thirty-first day of January. Each member shall 6888
hold office from the date of his appointment until the end of 6889
the term for which he was appointed. Any member appointed to 6890
fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for 6891
which his the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold 6892
office for the remainder of such term. Any member shall continue 6893
in office subsequent to the expiration date of his the member's 6894
term until his the member's successor takes office, or until a 6895
period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. 6896
(B) The Ohio thoroughbred racing advisory committee shall 6897
advise and assist the state racing commission regarding the 6898
administration of the Ohio thoroughbred race fund created by 6899
section 3769.083 of the Revised Code. 6900
(C) Members of the committee shall receive no compensation 6901
except that they shall be paid from the fund for the actual and 6902
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. 6903
Sec. 3769.085. (A) There is hereby created in the state 6904

S. B. No. 197 Page 237
As Introduced
treasury the Ohio standardbred development fund, to consist of 6905
moneys paid into it pursuant to section 3769.08 of the Revised 6906
Code and any fees assessed for or on behalf of the Ohio sires 6907
stakes races. All fees so assessed shall be exempt from the 6908
requirements of divisions (D) and (M) of that section. All 6909
investment earnings on the cash balance in the fund shall be 6910
credited to the fund. Moneys to the credit of the fund shall be 6911
distributed on order of the state racing Ohio casino control 6912
commission with the approval of the Ohio standardbred 6913
development commission. 6914
(B) The Ohio standardbred development commission shall 6915
consist of three members, all to be residents of this state 6916
knowledgeable in breeding and racing, to be appointed by the 6917
governor with the advice and consent of the senate. One member 6918
shall be a standardbred breeder, and one member shall be a 6919
standardbred owner. Of the initial appointments, one member 6920
shall be appointed for a term ending June 30, 1977, and two 6921
members shall be appointed for terms ending June 30, 1979. 6922
Thereafter, appointments for other than unexpired terms shall be 6923
for four years. Terms shall begin the first day of July and end 6924
the thirtieth day of June. Any member appointed to fill a 6925
vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which 6926
the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the 6927
remainder of that term. Any member shall continue in office 6928
subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until a 6929
successor takes office. Members shall receive no compensation, 6930
except that they shall be paid actual and necessary expenses 6931
from the Ohio standardbred development fund. The state racing 6932
Ohio casino control commission also shall be reimbursed from the 6933
fund for actual expenses approved by the development commission. 6934
The development commission may elect one member to serve as 6935

S. B. No. 197 Page 238
As Introduced
secretary. 6936
(C) Upon application not later than the first day of 6937
December from the harness tracks conducting races with pari- 6938
mutuel wagering, other than agricultural expositions and fairs, 6939
the Ohio standardbred development commission, after a hearing 6940
and not later than the twentieth day of January, shall allocate 6941
and approve all available moneys for colt races for two-year-old 6942
and three-year-old colts and fillies, both trotting and pacing. 6943
Separate races for fillies shall be provided at each age and 6944
gait. Up to five races and a championship race shall be 6945
scheduled for each of the eight categories of age, sex, and 6946
gait. The allocations shall take into account the time of year 6947
that racing colts is feasible, the equity and continuity of the 6948
proposed dates for racing events, and the amounts to be added by 6949
the tracks, looking to the maximum benefit for those 6950
participating in the races. Representatives of the tracks and 6951
the Ohio harness horsemen's association shall be given an 6952
opportunity to be heard before the allocations are made. No 6953
races shall be contested earlier than the first day of May or 6954
later than the first day of November; all permit holders 6955
operating extended pari-mutuel meetings between those dates 6956
shall be entitled to at least three races. No funds for a race 6957
shall be allocated to and paid to a permit holder by the 6958
development commission unless the permit holder adds at least 6959
twenty-five per cent to the amount allocated by the development 6960
commission, and not less than five thousand dollars to each 6961
race. 6962
Colts and fillies eligible to the races shall be only 6963
those sired by a standardbred stallion that was registered with 6964
the state racing commission and stood in the state the entire 6965
breeding season of the year the colt or filly was conceived. 6966

S. B. No. 197 Page 239
As Introduced
If the development commission concludes that sufficient 6967
funds are available to add aged races without reducing purse 6968
levels of the colt and filly races, the development commission 6969
may allocate funds to four-year-old and up races of each sex and 6970
gait with Ohio eligibility required as set forth in this 6971
section. 6972
(D) The state racing Ohio casino control commission may 6973
allocate an amount not to exceed five per cent of the total Ohio 6974
standardbred development fund available in any one calendar year 6975
to research projects directed toward improving the breeding, 6976
raising, racing, and health and soundness of horses in the state 6977
and toward education or promotion of the industry. 6978
Sec. 3769.087. (A) In addition to the commission of 6979
eighteen per cent retained by each permit holder as provided in 6980
section 3769.08 of the Revised Code, each permit holder shall 6981
retain an additional amount equal to four per cent of the total 6982
of all moneys wagered on each racing day on all wagering pools 6983
other than win, place, and show, of which amount retained an 6984
amount equal to three per cent of the total of all moneys 6985
wagered on each racing day on those pools shall be paid in the 6986
manner prescribed under section 3769.103 of the Revised Code, as 6987
a tax. Subject to the restrictions contained in divisions (B), 6988
(C), and (M) of section 3769.08 of the Revised Code, from such 6989
additional moneys paid to the tax commissioner: 6990
(1) Four-sixths shall be allocated to fund distribution as 6991
provided in division (M) of section 3769.08 of the Revised Code. 6992
(2) One-twelfth shall be paid into the Ohio fairs fund 6993
created by section 3769.082 of the Revised Code. 6994
(3) One-twelfth of the additional moneys paid to the tax 6995

S. B. No. 197 Page 240
As Introduced
commissioner by thoroughbred racing permit holders shall be paid 6996
into the Ohio thoroughbred race fund created by section 3769.083 6997
of the Revised Code. 6998
(4) One-twelfth of the additional moneys paid to the tax 6999
commissioner by harness horse racing permit holders shall be 7000
paid to the Ohio standardbred development fund created by 7001
section 3769.085 of the Revised Code. 7002
(5) One-sixth shall be paid into the state racing casino 7003
control commission operating fund created by described in 7004
section 3769.03 3772.01 of the Revised Code. 7005
(6) One-twelfth of the additional moneys paid to the tax 7006
commissioner by quarterhorse racing permit holders shall be paid 7007
into the Ohio thoroughbred race fund created by section 3769.083 7008
of the Revised Code to support quarterhorse development and 7009
purses. 7010
The remaining one per cent that is retained of the total 7011
of all moneys wagered on each racing day on all pools other than 7012
win, place, and show, shall be retained by racing permit 7013
holders, and, except as otherwise provided in section 3769.089 7014
of the Revised Code, racing permit holders shall use one-half 7015
for purse money and retain one-half. 7016
(B) In addition to the commission of eighteen per cent 7017
retained by each permit holder as provided in section 3769.08 of 7018
the Revised Code and the additional amount retained by each 7019
permit holder as provided in division (A) of this section, each 7020
permit holder shall retain an additional amount equal to one- 7021
half of one per cent of the total of all moneys wagered on each 7022
racing day on all wagering pools other than win, place, and 7023
show. The additional amount retained under this division shall 7024

S. B. No. 197 Page 241
As Introduced
be paid in the manner prescribed under section 3769.103 of the 7025
Revised Code, as a tax. The tax commissioner shall pay the 7026
amount of the tax received under this division to the state 7027
racing casino control commission operating fund created by 7028
described in section 3769.03 3772.01 of the Revised Code. 7029
(C) Unless otherwise agreed to by the video lottery sales 7030
agent and the applicable horsemen's association recognized by 7031
the state racing commission to represent such persons, within 7032
ninety days after September 29, 2013, for video lottery sales 7033
agents operating as such on September 29, 2013, or within six 7034
months after the date a video lottery sales agent begins 7035
operating as such for video lottery sales agents not operating 7036
as such on September 29, 2013, the state racing commission shall 7037
direct through rule that a percentage of the lottery sales 7038
agent's commission as determined by the state lottery commission 7039
for conducting video lottery terminal gaming on behalf of the 7040
state be paid to the state racing commission for the benefit of 7041
breeding and racing in this state. The percentage so determined 7042
shall not be less than nine per cent or more than eleven per 7043
cent of the video lottery terminal income, and shall be a 7044
sliding scale based upon capital expenditures necessary to build 7045
the video lottery sales agent's facility. The aggregate of one 7046
hundred per cent of video lottery terminal income minus the 7047
lottery sales agent's commission percentage as determined by the 7048
state lottery commission plus the percentage of the lottery sale 7049
agent's commission, as determined by the state racing commission 7050
or otherwise agreed to by the video lottery sales agent and the 7051
applicable horsemen's association recognized by the state racing 7052
commission to represent such persons, for the benefit of 7053
breeding and racing in this state shall not exceed forty-five 7054
per cent of the video lottery terminal income. In addition, 7055

S. B. No. 197 Page 242
As Introduced
beginning July 1, 2013, the state lottery commission shall adopt 7056
a rule to require the lottery sales agent conducting video 7057
lottery terminal gaming on behalf of the state to disperse 7058
disburse to the state lottery commission one-half of one per 7059
cent of such a lottery sales agent's commission for the purpose 7060
of providing funding support to appropriate state agencies for 7061
programs that provide for gambling addiction and other related 7062
addiction services, to be deposited in the state treasury to the 7063
credit of the problem gambling fund established under section 7064
5753.031 of the Revised Code. The state lottery commission's 7065
rule also may require the lottery sales agent conducting video 7066
lottery terminal gaming on behalf of the state to disperse 7067
disburse to the state lottery commission an additional amount up 7068
to one-half of one per cent of such a lottery sales agent's 7069
commission for that purpose to be deposited in the state 7070
treasury to the credit of that fund. 7071
Sec. 3769.089. (A) As used in this chapter: 7072
(1) "Racing day" means any day authorized under a permit 7073
holder's permit on which, at a simulcast host, either a live 7074
racing program is conducted as authorized under section 3769.07 7075
of the Revised Code or a simulcast racing program is conducted 7076
as authorized under this section. 7077
(2) "Live racing day" means a racing day on which a live 7078
racing program is conducted by the permit holder along with 7079
simulcasts of all other available racing programs from within 7080
this state and simulcast racing programs from outside this state 7081
as authorized under this section. 7082
(3) "Live racing program" means a racing program 7083
consisting of no fewer than seven live horse races at 7084
thoroughbred tracks and nine live races at standardbred tracks 7085

S. B. No. 197 Page 243
As Introduced
and additional horse races simulcast from other facilities 7086
located either inside or outside this state, in which not more 7087
than two horse races on which pari-mutuel wagering is conducted 7088
are simulcast from facilities located outside this state. If 7089
only one racing meeting of a particular breed of horse is being 7090
held, no fewer than nine live horse races shall be held on a 7091
live racing day. If, during the course of a racing meeting at a 7092
standardbred track, the racing secretary of the permit holder 7093
determines that there is an insufficient number of entries to 7094
have a full field of eight horses for each of nine races on a 7095
live racing program, then the racing secretary of the permit 7096
holder, after consultation with the Ohio harness horsemens 7097
association, may reduce the number of live races on that live 7098
racing program, as the racing secretary may determine. The 7099
racing secretary shall not reduce the live racing program to 7100
less than seven live races. If during the course of a meeting at 7101
a thoroughbred track, the racing secretary of a permit holder 7102
determines that there is an insufficient number of entries to 7103
have a full field of eight horses for each of nine races on a 7104
live racing program, then the racing secretary of the permit 7105
holder, with the consent of the thoroughbred horsemens 7106
association, may reduce the number of live races on that live 7107
racing program, as the racing secretary may determine. The 7108
racing secretary shall not reduce the live racing program to 7109
less than seven live races. No more than seventeen races on 7110
which pari-mutuel wagering is conducted, including both live 7111
races and races simulcast from other facilities located either 7112
inside or outside this state, shall be part of a live racing 7113
program. 7114
(4) "Simulcast host" means a track or enclosure in this 7115
state where, on a racing day, a permit holder is doing one or 7116

S. B. No. 197 Page 244
As Introduced
both of the following: 7117
(a) Conducting a live racing program and offering this 7118
program for simulcasting to one or more simulcast guests and 7119
satellite facilities in this state; 7120
(b) Receiving a simulcast racing program for simulcasting 7121
to one or more simulcast guests and satellite facilities in this 7122
state. 7123
(5) "Simulcast guest" means any track or enclosure that is 7124
receiving from a simulcast host, on a day other than a racing 7125
day, a live racing program or a simulcast racing program. 7126
(6) "Simulcast racing program" means all simulcasts of 7127
horse races to a simulcast host or simulcast guest on a racing 7128
day or on any other day on which pari-mutuel wagering is 7129
conducted, but does not include any simulcast horse races from 7130
inside or outside this state that are included in a simulcast 7131
host's live racing program. 7132
(7) "Satellite facility" has the same meaning as in 7133
section 3769.25 of the Revised Code. 7134
(8) "Collection and settlement agent" has the same meaning 7135
as in section 3769.0810 of the Revised Code. 7136
(9) "Special racing event" means individual races in live 7137
racing programs or simulcast racing programs, and simulcast 7138
racing programs on special event days under division (C) of this 7139
section, conducted at facilities located outside this state for 7140
which the track, racing association, or state regulatory agency 7141
conducting such races charges a simulcast host a fee for the 7142
privilege of receiving a simulcast of such races into this state 7143
that is higher than the customary and regular fee charged for 7144
simulcast races because of the status or popularity of such 7145

S. B. No. 197 Page 245
As Introduced
races. 7146
(B)(1)(a) (A)(1)(a) The state racing commission shall, 7147
upon request by any permit holder, permit electronically 7148
televised simulcasts of horse races at the permit holder's track 7149
or enclosure on racing days authorized by the permit holder's 7150
permit. Except as provided in division (B)(A) of this section, 7151
the commission shall not permit the simulcast of any simulcast 7152
racing program conducted at tracks or facilities located outside 7153
this state unless the out-of-state simulcast racing program is 7154
available at the same signal rate to all permit holders, whether 7155
serving as simulcast hosts or simulcast guests, and all 7156
satellite facilities, in this state open and operating on that 7157
day. A permit holder or satellite facility may inform the 7158
commission that it waives the right to receive the simulcast of 7159
a simulcast racing program or a race in a simulcast racing 7160
program on that day and in this event the simulcast racing 7161
program or simulcast race shall be available to all other 7162
simulcast hosts, simulcast guests, and satellite facilities open 7163
and operating in this state on that day. 7164
(b) In order for a permit holder to offer simulcasts of 7165
horse races conducted at facilities located outside this state, 7166
the permit holder shall have conducted live racing programs 7167
during the immediately preceding calendar year on a number of 7168
days that is not less than the number of regular live racing 7169
days it conducted in calendar year 1991, not including 7170
additional racing days conducted in calendar year 1991 by the 7171
permit holder at a winterized facility under a permit issued 7172
under section 3769.07 of the Revised Code, as certified by the 7173
commission. In satisfying the foregoing requirement for live 7174
racing days during the immediately preceding calendar year, a 7175
permit holder may include the number of days on which live 7176

S. B. No. 197 Page 246
As Introduced
racing programs were conducted under a permit issued under 7177
section 3769.07 of the Revised Code for additional racing days 7178
at a winterized facility. In addition, in order for a permit 7179
holder to offer simulcasts of horse races conducted at 7180
facilities located outside this state, the permit holder shall 7181
offer all simulcasts of horse races conducted in this state made 7182
available to it. 7183
In order for a permit holder to offer simulcasts of races 7184
conducted at race tracks located outside this state at the same 7185
time and during the hours in which the live races of a live 7186
racing program are being conducted at its track, a permit holder 7187
conducting a thoroughbred live racing program shall obtain the 7188
consent of the thoroughbred horsemens association and a permit 7189
holder conducting a harness live racing program shall obtain the 7190
consent of the Ohio harness horsemens association. The consent 7191
of the horsemen's organization shall not be unreasonably 7192
withheld, and shall be consistent with the interest of 7193
preserving live racing in this state. If a horsemen's 7194
organization withholds its consent, the permit holder may file 7195
an objection with the commission, which shall promptly consider 7196
the objection and determine whether the horsemen's 7197
organization's action in withholding consent is without 7198
substantial merit and, if the commission so determines, shall 7199
authorize the permit holder to simulcast the simulcast racing 7200
programs. The determination of the commission is final. A permit 7201
holder, as a simulcast host, may offer simulcast racing programs 7202
at its track or enclosure of races conducted at tracks and 7203
facilities located outside this state prior to the commencement 7204
of, and following the conclusion of, its live races without 7205
obtaining the consent of a horsemen's organization under this 7206
division. 7207

S. B. No. 197 Page 247
As Introduced
(c) Division (B)(1)(b) (A)(1)(b) of this section remains 7208
in effect for each permit holder until the calendar year after 7209
that permit holder first receives a commission as a lottery 7210
sales agent for conducting video lottery terminal gaming on 7211
behalf of the state. 7212
(2) Notwithstanding section 3769.07 of the Revised Code 7213
and unless otherwise agreed to by the applicable horsemen's 7214
association and the permit holder, beginning in the calendar 7215
year after the permit holder first receives video lottery 7216
terminal income, one of the following applies as determined on a 7217
yearly basis: 7218
(a) If eleven per cent of the gross gaming revenue from 7219
video lottery terminals at the permit holder's facilities 7220
(either existing or relocated) in the previous calendar year 7221
exceeds fifteen million dollars, a permit holder shall conduct a 7222
minimum of one hundred twenty-five live racing days. 7223
(b) If eleven per cent of the gross gaming revenue from 7224
video lottery terminals at the permit holder's facilities 7225
(either existing or relocated) in the previous calendar year 7226
exceeds eleven million dollars, but is less than or equal to 7227
fifteen million dollars, a permit holder shall conduct a minimum 7228
of one hundred live racing days or the number of racing days 7229
applied for by the permit holder in calendar year 2012, 7230
whichever is greater. 7231
(c) If eleven per cent of the gross gaming revenue from 7232
video lottery terminals at the permit holder's facilities 7233
(either existing or relocated) in the previous calendar year is 7234
less than or equal to eleven million dollars, a permit holder 7235
shall conduct a minimum of seventy-five racing days or the 7236
number of racing days applied for by the permit holder for 7237

S. B. No. 197 Page 248
As Introduced
calendar year 2012, whichever is greater. 7238
In no case shall the minimum number of racing days for any 7239
permit holder exceed one hundred twenty-five racing days. 7240
(3) For the purposes of division (B)(2)(A)(2) of this 7241
section, for live racing conducted at a track with more than one 7242
permit, the minimum live racing days shall apply to those 7243
permits collectively and not as a single permit. 7244
(4) In addition to the required live racing days, a permit 7245
holder shall simulcast a simulcast racing program on a minimum 7246
of three hundred sixty days each calendar year. The permit 7247
holder shall simulcast all simulcast racing programs conducted 7248
in this state and made available to the permit holder and 7249
simulcast racing programs conducted outside this state. 7250
(5) The commission may make exception to the required 7251
minimum number of live racing days or simulcast racing program 7252
days in instances of natural disaster or other unexpected 7253
circumstances as defined by the commission, in its sole 7254
discretion. For any calendar year, the horsemen's association at 7255
each track may negotiate an agreement with the permit holder for 7256
that track to reduce the number of live racing days at that 7257
track to less than the minimum live racing days required by 7258
division (B)(2)(a)(A)(2)(a), (b), or (c) of this section, as 7259
applicable, subject to the approval of the commission. These 7260
negotiations shall not reduce the number of live racing days to 7261
less than fifty days per calendar year. 7262
(6) To satisfy the requirement of live racing days, a 7263
permit holder may include the number of days on which live 7264
racing programs were conducted under a permit issued under 7265
section 3769.07 of the Revised Code for racing days authorized 7266

S. B. No. 197 Page 249
As Introduced
at a winterized facility. 7267
(C)(B) The commission shall allocate to each track one 7268
racing day for each permit holder during each calendar year for 7269
the conduct of a live racing program on which a permit holder 7270
may conduct as few as one live horse race, with the remainder of 7271
the horse races on that racing day on which pari-mutuel wagering 7272
is conducted as part of the live racing program being simulcast 7273
from other tracks and facilities located either inside or 7274
outside this state. In addition, the commission may allocate to 7275
each permit holder racing days on which it may as part of a live 7276
racing program simulcast more than two horse races from 7277
facilities located outside this state if the horse races involve 7278
a national wagering pool and pari-mutuel wagering is conducted 7279
on the national wagering pool, but on such a racing day there 7280
shall in no event be more than two horse races simulcast from 7281
facilities located outside this state included in a live racing 7282
program on which separate pari-mutuel wagering is conducted. As 7283
used in this division, "national wagering pool" means an 7284
interstate or intrastate common pari-mutuel wagering pool 7285
involving two or more selections covering two or more horse 7286
races conducted at tracks located inside or outside this state. 7287
In emergency situations, the commission may authorize a 7288
live racing day at a track in which all horse races on that 7289
racing day on which pari-mutuel wagering is conducted are 7290
simulcast from tracks and facilities located either inside or 7291
outside this state with the consent of the thoroughbred 7292
horsemens association for a track conducting a thoroughbred live 7293
racing program and with the consent of the Ohio harness 7294
horsemens association for a track conducting a harness live 7295
racing program. If a horsemen's organization withholds its 7296
consent, the permit holder may file an objection with the 7297

S. B. No. 197 Page 250
As Introduced
commission, which shall promptly consider the objection and 7298
determine whether the horsemen's organization's action in 7299
withholding consent is without substantial merit and, if the 7300
commission so determines, shall authorize the permit holder to 7301
simulcast the simulcast racing programs. The determination of 7302
the commission is final. 7303
(D)(C) On any day that a racing day has been applied for 7304
at any track in this state, each track in this state may operate 7305
as either a simulcast host or a simulcast guest and may conduct, 7306
with the approval of the state racing commission, pari-mutuel 7307
wagering on all simulcasts of races conducted inside this state 7308
made available to it plus all simulcasts of races conducted at 7309
facilities located outside this state as determined by the 7310
simulcast hosts. Except as otherwise provided in this section, 7311
any simulcast host or simulcast guest may receive and conduct 7312
simulcast racing programs that feature any breed of horse at any 7313
time of day, as authorized by the commission. Those persons 7314
holding state fair, county fair, or other fair permits shall not 7315
receive a simulcast racing program on which pari-mutuel wagering 7316
is conducted, except that a holder of a permit issued under 7317
section 3769.07 of the Revised Code that has been authorized by 7318
the commission to conduct races of the state fair, a county 7319
fair, or other fair at a commercial track may receive and 7320
conduct simulcast racing programs as a simulcast host or 7321
simulcast guest at the same time in conjunction with the live 7322
racing program of the state fair, county fair, or other fair 7323
permit holder conducted at its track. 7324
The simulcast hosts, with the approval of the state racing 7325
commission, shall determine which simulcast racing programs 7326
offered by race tracks located outside this state will be 7327
simulcast at their tracks and at all simulcast hosts, simulcast 7328

S. B. No. 197 Page 251
As Introduced
guests, and satellite facilities in this state that are open and 7329
operating during the hours that the simulcast hosts are 7330
operating. Simulcast guests and satellite facilities shall 7331
receive all approved simulcast racing programs offered by 7332
simulcast hosts. In addition, a simulcast host and simulcast 7333
guest, with the approval of the commission, may also receive 7334
simulcast horse races and simulcast racing programs not agreed 7335
to by simulcast hosts. 7336
A simulcast host that normally operates during the day 7337
only may serve as a simulcast host for only day-simulcast racing 7338
programs, which include all simulcast racing programs that 7339
commence at a track located outside this state on or before four 7340
p.m. A simulcast host that normally operates during the evening 7341
only may serve as a simulcast host for only evening-simulcast 7342
racing programs, which include all simulcast racing programs 7343
that commence at a track located outside this state on or after 7344
three p.m. A simulcast host that normally operates during the 7345
evening, but that under its permit conducts live racing programs 7346
during the day, may serve as a simulcast host for day-simulcast 7347
racing programs. A permit holder that is offering at its track 7348
simulcast racing programs that commence at a track located 7349
outside this state on or before four p.m. and simulcast racing 7350
programs that commence at a track located outside this state on 7351
or after three p.m. may serve as a simulcast host for both the 7352
day-simulcast racing program and the evening-simulcast racing 7353
program only if no other permit holder is serving as a simulcast 7354
host for the other simulcast racing programs. The times listed 7355
in this and the immediately following paragraphs are standard 7356
time as described in section 1.04 of the Revised Code and in the 7357
"Uniform Time Act of 1966," 80 Stat. 107, 15 U.S.C. 260 to 265. 7358
A simulcast host that is conducting a live racing program 7359

S. B. No. 197 Page 252
As Introduced
and is simulcasting that program to other simulcast hosts and 7360
simulcast guests in this state shall receive from each simulcast 7361
host and each simulcast guest receiving the simulcast an 7362
intrastate simulcast fee of one and three-eighths per cent of 7363
the amounts wagered on such simulcast racing program at its 7364
facilities. The simulcast hosts and simulcast guests receiving 7365
such simulcast racing program shall pay the intrastate simulcast 7366
fee to the collection and settlement agent, and the fee shall be 7367
disbursed by the agent, at the time and in the manner provided 7368
in section 3769.0810 of the Revised Code. 7369
(E)(1)(D)(1) The moneys wagered on simulcast racing 7370
programs on a racing day shall be separated from the moneys 7371
wagered on the live racing program on that racing day. From the 7372
moneys wagered on the simulcast races, each permit holder may 7373
retain as a commission the percentage of the amount wagered as 7374
specified in sections 3769.08 and 3769.087 of the Revised Code, 7375
as applicable, and shall pay, in the manner prescribed under 7376
section 3769.103 of the Revised Code, as a tax, the tax 7377
specified in sections 3769.08 and 3769.087 of the Revised Code, 7378
as applicable. From the tax collected, the tax commissioner 7379
shall make the distributions to the respective funds, and in the 7380
proper amounts, as required by sections 3769.08 and 3769.087 of 7381
the Revised Code, as applicable. Except as provided in division 7382
(E)(2)(D)(2) of this section, from the amount remaining after 7383
the payment of state taxes on the moneys wagered on live racing 7384
programs and on the moneys wagered on simulcast racing programs, 7385
a permit holder shall retain an amount equal to two and three- 7386
eighths per cent of the amount wagered on live racing programs 7387
and on intrastate and interstate simulcast racing programs 7388
simulcast at its track and on the amount wagered on the live 7389
racing programs and simulcast racing programs at a satellite 7390

S. B. No. 197 Page 253
As Introduced
facility allocated to it under section 3769.26 of the Revised 7391
Code, as a fee to pay for those costs associated with the 7392
reception and transmission of simulcasts and the administrative 7393
cost of the conduct of live racing programs and simulcast racing 7394
programs. From the remaining balance, one-half shall be retained 7395
by the permit holder for purses. On a day when a permit holder 7396
conducts a live racing program, all purse money generated from 7397
wagering on live racing programs and on simulcast racing 7398
programs at its track shall be used for that permit holder's 7399
purse account. On a day when a permit holder operates as a 7400
simulcast host with no live racing program, or operates as a 7401
simulcast guest, all purse money generated from wagering on 7402
intrastate and interstate simulcast racing programs shall be 7403
paid to the state racing commission for deposit into the Ohio 7404
combined simulcast horse racing purse fund created under this 7405
section. In addition, on a day when a permit holder serves as a 7406
simulcast host for a satellite facility, all purse money 7407
generated from amounts wagered at the satellite facility 7408
allocated to the permit holder under section 3769.26 of the 7409
Revised Code shall be paid to the commission for deposit into 7410
the Ohio simulcast horse racing purse fund. 7411
(2) If there are not four satellite facilities in 7412
operation in this state within one year after September 19, 7413
1996, or if there are not seven satellite facilities in 7414
operation in this state within two years after September 19, 7415
1996, or if there are not ten satellite facilities in operation 7416
in this state within three years after September 19, 1996, then 7417
in any such event the amount to be retained as a fee by the 7418
permit holder under division (E)(1)(D)(1) of this section shall 7419
be one and seven-eighths per cent until such time as the number 7420
of satellite facilities specified in division (E)(2)(D)(2) of 7421

S. B. No. 197 Page 254
As Introduced
this section are in operation. For good cause shown, the 7422
thoroughbred horsemens association and Ohio harness horsemens 7423
association may waive the requirements of division (E)(2)(D)(2) 7424
of this section or extend the date for compliance as to any year 7425
by filing a written notification with the state racing 7426
commission. 7427
(3) If a simulcast racing program simulcast by a simulcast 7428
host at its track or enclosure and to other simulcast hosts, 7429
simulcast guests, and satellite facilities in this state is a 7430
special racing event, the permit holder offering the special 7431
racing event and other simulcast hosts, simulcast guests, and 7432
satellite facilities receiving the special racing event shall 7433
not retain the fee provided under division (E)(1)(D)(1) or (2) 7434
of this section but shall retain from the moneys wagered on the 7435
special racing event an amount equal to the fee charged by the 7436
track, racing association, or state regulatory agency 7437
simulcasting the special racing event to the simulcast host. 7438
From the remaining balance, one-half shall be retained by the 7439
permit holder for purses in the manner provided in division (E) 7440
(1)(D)(1) of this section. 7441
A permit holder proposing to simulcast a special racing 7442
event as a simulcast host shall advise its horsemen's 7443
organization of the proposed schedule of the special racing 7444
event and obtain its consent to this schedule. The consent of 7445
the horsemen's organization shall not be unreasonably withheld 7446
and shall be consistent with the interest of preserving live 7447
racing in this state. If the horsemen's organization withholds 7448
its consent, the permit holder may file an objection with the 7449
state racing commission, which shall promptly consider the 7450
objection and determine whether the organization's action in 7451
withholding consent is without substantial merit and, if the 7452

S. B. No. 197 Page 255
As Introduced
commission so determines, shall authorize the permit holder to 7453
simulcast the special racing event. The determination of the 7454
commission is final. 7455
(F)(E) There is hereby created in the state treasury the 7456
Ohio combined simulcast horse racing purse fund, to consist of 7457
moneys paid into it by permit holders pursuant to division (E) 7458
(D) of this section and by satellite facilities pursuant to 7459
division (F) of section 3769.26 of the Revised Code. Moneys to 7460
the credit of the fund, including interest earned thereon, may 7461
be used by the commission for the costs of administering this 7462
division and the balance shall be distributed among permit 7463
holders no less frequently than monthly to each permit holder's 7464
purse account on order of the commission. 7465
For each calendar year, permit holders at each track shall 7466
receive a share of each distribution of the Ohio combined 7467
simulcast horse racing purse fund in the same percentage, 7468
rounded to the nearest one-hundredth of the amount of each 7469
distribution, as the average total amount wagered at the track 7470
on racing days at which live racing programs were conducted, 7471
including the amount allocated to the track under section 7472
3769.26 of the Revised Code for live races, during the five 7473
calendar years immediately preceding the year for which the 7474
distribution is made bears to the average annual total amount 7475
wagered at all tracks in the state operating under permits 7476
issued by the state racing commission under section 3769.07, 7477
3769.071, or 3769.072 of the Revised Code on all racing days at 7478
which live racing programs were conducted, including the amount 7479
allocated to the tracks under section 3769.26 of the Revised 7480
Code for live races, during the five calendar years immediately 7481
preceding the year for which the distribution is made. By the 7482
thirty-first day of January of each year the commission shall 7483

S. B. No. 197 Page 256
As Introduced
calculate the share of the permit holders at each track for that 7484
year, shall enter the share percentages in its official records, 7485
and shall notify all permit holders of the share percentages of 7486
all tracks for that calendar year. 7487
The permit holders at each track, with the approval of the 7488
commission, shall allocate their share of the fund as 7489
distributed to the purse account of each permit holder for each 7490
race meeting. 7491
The commission shall cause to be kept accurate records of 7492
its administration of the fund, including all administrative 7493
expenses incurred by it and charged to the fund, and of 7494
distributions to permit holders. These records are public 7495
records available for inspection at any time during the regular 7496
business hours of the commission by any permit holder or 7497
horsemen's organization, by an authorized agent of the permit 7498
holder or horsemen's organization, or by any other person. 7499
(G)(F) Upon the approval of the commission, a permit 7500
holder conducting live racing programs may transmit 7501
electronically televised simulcasts of horse races conducted at 7502
the permit holder's track to racing associations, tracks, and 7503
facilities located outside this state for the conduct of pari- 7504
mutuel wagering thereon, at the times, on the terms, and for the 7505
fee agreed upon by the permit holder and the receiving racing 7506
association, track, or facility. From the fees paid to the 7507
permit holder for such simulcasts, a permit holder shall retain 7508
for the costs of administration a fee in an amount equal to one 7509
per cent of the amount wagered on the races simulcast by the 7510
permit holder. From the remaining balance of the fee, one-half 7511
shall be retained by the permit holder for purses, except that 7512
notwithstanding the fee arrangement between the permit holder 7513

S. B. No. 197 Page 257
As Introduced
and the receiving racing association, track, or facility, the 7514
permit holder shall deposit into its purse account not less than 7515
an amount equal to three-fourths of one per cent of the amount 7516
wagered at racing associations, tracks, and facilities located 7517
outside the state on the races simulcast by the permit holder. 7518
All televised simulcasts of horse races conducted in this 7519
state to racing associations, tracks, and facilities located 7520
outside this state shall comply with the "Interstate Horse 7521
Racing Act of 1978," 92 Stat. 1811, 15 U.S.C.A. 3001 to 3007. 7522
The consent of the horsemen's organization at the track of the 7523
permit holder applying to the commission to simulcast horse 7524
races conducted at the permit holder's track to racing 7525
associations, tracks, and facilities located outside this state 7526
shall be consistent with the interest of preserving live racing. 7527
(H)(1)(G)(1) The state racing commission may authorize any 7528
permit holder that is authorized to conduct live horse racing on 7529
racing days and that conducts pari-mutuel wagering on simulcasts 7530
of horse races under this section that are conducted at race 7531
tracks either inside or outside this state to conduct, 7532
supervise, and participate in interstate and intrastate common 7533
pari-mutuel wagering pools on those races in the manner provided 7534
in division (H)(G) of this section. Except as otherwise 7535
expressly provided in division (H)(G) of this section or in the 7536
rules of the state racing commission, the provisions of this 7537
chapter that govern pari-mutuel wagering apply to interstate or 7538
intrastate common pari-mutuel wagering pools. 7539
(2) Subject to the approval of the state racing 7540
commission, the types of wagering, calculation of the commission 7541
retained by the permit holder, tax rates, distribution of 7542
winnings, and rules of racing in effect for pari-mutuel wagering 7543

S. B. No. 197 Page 258
As Introduced
pools at the host track may govern wagers placed at a receiving 7544
track in this state and merged into an interstate or intrastate 7545
common pari-mutuel wagering pool. Breakage from interstate or 7546
intrastate common pari-mutuel wagering pools shall be calculated 7547
in accordance with the rules that govern the host track and 7548
shall be distributed among the tracks participating in the 7549
interstate or intrastate common wagering pool in a manner agreed 7550
to by the participating tracks and the host track. An interstate 7551
common pari-mutuel wagering pool formed under division (H)(3)(G) 7552
(3) of this section is subject to that division rather than to 7553
division (H)(2)(G)(2) of this section. 7554
(3) Subject to the approval of the state racing 7555
commission, an interstate common pari-mutuel wagering pool may 7556
be formed between a permit holder and one or more receiving 7557
tracks located in states other than the state in which the host 7558
track is located. The commission may approve types of wagering, 7559
calculation of the commission retained by the permit holder, tax 7560
rates, distribution of winnings, rules of racing, and 7561
calculation of breakage for such an interstate common pari- 7562
mutuel wagering pool that differ from those that would otherwise 7563
be applied in this state under this chapter but that are 7564
consistent for all tracks participating in the interstate common 7565
pari-mutuel wagering pool formed under division (H)(3)(G)(3) of 7566
this section. 7567
(4) As used in division (H)(G) of this section: 7568
(a) "Host track" means a track where live horse races are 7569
conducted and offered for simulcasting to receiving tracks. 7570
(b) "Receiving track" means a track where simulcasts of 7571
races from a host track are displayed and wagered on. 7572

S. B. No. 197 Page 259
As Introduced
(I)(H) Each permit holder is responsible for paying all 7573
costs associated with the up-link for, and reception of, 7574
simulcasts, and the conduct and operation of simulcast racing 7575
programs, for all fees and costs associated with serving as a 7576
simulcast host or simulcast guest, and for any required fees 7577
payable to the tracks, racing associations, or state regulatory 7578
agencies where simulcast racing is conducted at tracks located 7579
outside this state. 7580
(J)(I) No license, fee, or excise tax, other than as 7581
specified in division (E)(D) of this section, shall be assessed 7582
upon or collected from a permit holder or the owners of a permit 7583
holder in connection with, or pertaining to, the operation and 7584
conduct of simulcast racing programs in this state, by any 7585
county, township, municipal corporation, district, or other body 7586
having the authority to assess or collect a tax or fee. 7587
(K)(1)(J)(1) Permit holders operating tracks within the 7588
same county or adjacent counties that are conducting simulcast 7589
racing programs under this section may enter into agreements 7590
regarding the conduct of simulcast racing programs at their 7591
respective tracks and the sharing of the retained commissions 7592
therefrom, for such periods of time, upon such terms and 7593
conditions, and subject to such rights and obligations, as the 7594
contracting permit holders consider appropriate under the 7595
circumstances. Permit holders shall notify the state racing 7596
commission of their entry into an agreement pursuant to this 7597
division, the names of the permit holders that are parties to 7598
the agreement, and the length of time the agreement shall be in 7599
effect. 7600
(2) Permit holders and the thoroughbred horsemens 7601
association and Ohio harness horsemens association may agree to 7602

S. B. No. 197 Page 260
As Introduced
do any of the following: 7603
(a) Increase or reduce the fees and amounts to be retained 7604
by the permit holders under this section; 7605
(b) Increase or reduce the fees and amounts to be 7606
allocated to the purse accounts of permit holders under this 7607
section; 7608
(c) Increase or reduce the fees to be paid between and 7609
among simulcast hosts and simulcast guests under this section 7610
and under division (C) of section 3769.0810 of the Revised Code; 7611
(d) Modify, suspend, or waive the requirements set forth 7612
in division (B)(A) of this section as to any permit holder or as 7613
to all permit holders. 7614
All permit holders and both horsemen's organizations shall 7615
approve such agreement. Any agreement entered into under 7616
division (K)(2)(J)(2) of this section shall set forth the 7617
effective date of any such increase or reduction, and the terms 7618
and provisions of the agreement, and a copy of the agreement 7619
shall be filed with the state racing commission. 7620
Sec. 3769.0810. (A) As used in this section: 7621
(1) "Collection and settlement agent" means the permit 7622
holder designated by the state racing commission under division 7623
(B) of this section. 7624
(2) "Racing week" means a seven-day period commencing on a 7625
Monday and ending on a Sunday. 7626
(3) "Simulcast guest" and "simulcast host" have the same 7627
meanings as in section 3769.089 of the Revised Code. 7628
(4) "Satellite facility" has the same meaning as in 7629

S. B. No. 197 Page 261
As Introduced
section 3769.25 of the Revised Code. 7630
(5) (2) "Settlement of wagering accounts" means the 7631
exchange of funds in order to equalize payments of winning 7632
wagers at all tracks and facilities participating in a common 7633
pari-mutuel pool. 7634
(B) Except as provided in division (K) of this section, 7635
the state racing commission shall annually appoint as the 7636
collection and settlement agent one or more permit holders of 7637
tracks that hold no fewer than three fifty-six-day permits 7638
issued under section 3769.07 of the Revised Code. The collection 7639
and settlement agent shall give a cash or surety bond payable to 7640
the treasurer of state in an amount set by the commission for 7641
the performance of its duties under this section, and the bond 7642
shall be filed with the commission. 7643
(C)(1) At the close of each day, each permit holder acting 7644
as a simulcast guest shall pay, by check, draft, or money order, 7645
or by wire transfer of funds, out of the money retained on that 7646
day to the collection and settlement agent an amount equal to 7647
one-half of one per cent of the total of all moneys wagered on 7648
that day on out-of-state simulcast racing programs simulcast to 7649
the simulcast guest from a simulcast host, to reimburse the 7650
simulcast host for administrative and simulcast costs. 7651
(2) Within five business days after the close of each 7652
racing week, the collection and settlement agent shall pay and 7653
distribute to each simulcast host operating during that racing 7654
week its pro rata share of the fees collected from simulcast 7655
guests during that racing week. If a simulcast host acted as a 7656
host for day-simulcast racing programs only, then its share of 7657
the fees collected by the collection and settlement agent shall 7658
be computed and based on fees paid by simulcast guests offering 7659

S. B. No. 197 Page 262
As Introduced
such day-simulcast racing programs at their tracks. If a 7660
simulcast host acted as a simulcast host for evening-simulcast 7661
racing programs only, then its share of the fees shall be 7662
computed and based on fees paid by simulcast guests offering 7663
such evening-simulcast racing programs at their tracks. In 7664
making a calculation of the amount of fees to be distributed to 7665
simulcast hosts, the collection and settlement agent shall 7666
allocate equally between the accounts of simulcast hosts 7667
conducting only day-simulcast racing programs and only evening- 7668
simulcast racing programs those fees received by the agent from 7669
simulcast guests for simulcast racing programs that commenced on 7670
or after three p.m. and on or before four p.m. The times listed 7671
in division (C)(2) of this section are standard time as 7672
described in section 1.04 of the Revised Code and in the 7673
"Uniform Time Act of 1966," 80 Stat. 107, 15 U.S.C. 260 to 265. 7674
(D)(1) At the close of each day, each permit holder shall 7675
pay, by check, draft, or money order, or by wire transfer of 7676
funds, out of the money retained on that day to the collection 7677
and settlement agent the intrastate simulcast fee provided in 7678
division (D)(C) of section 3769.089 of the Revised Code in the 7679
amount equal to one and three-eighths per cent of the total of 7680
all moneys wagered on that day at its track or enclosure on live 7681
races conducted in this state and simulcast to its facility. 7682
(2) Within five business days after the close of each 7683
racing week, the collection and settlement agent shall pay and 7684
distribute to permit holders that conducted live racing programs 7685
in this state during that racing week their share of the fees 7686
collected from other permit holders for that racing week. 7687
(E) At the close of each day, each permit holder and 7688
satellite facility shall pay, by check, draft, or money order, 7689

S. B. No. 197 Page 263
As Introduced
or by wire transfer of funds, out of the money retained on that 7690
day to the collection and settlement agent a sum equal to 7691
required fees due to tracks, racing associations, or state 7692
regulatory agencies located outside this state for races 7693
simulcast into this state based on the totals of all money 7694
wagered that day at its track or enclosure or satellite facility 7695
on simulcast racing programs of races conducted outside this 7696
state. The collection and settlement agent shall inform the 7697
permit holders and the satellite facilities each day of the fee 7698
charged by each track, racing association, or state regulatory 7699
agency located outside this state for the simulcast of simulcast 7700
racing programs on races conducted outside this state and 7701
simulcast into this state. The collection and settlement agent 7702
shall be responsible for paying and disbursing to these tracks, 7703
racing associations, and state regulatory agencies on a timely 7704
basis the fees collected by it from permit holders and satellite 7705
facilities under this division. 7706
(F) On or before the tenth day of each month, the 7707
collection and settlement agent shall file a report with the 7708
state racing commission showing all of the following: 7709
(1) All collections of moneys and fees from permit holders 7710
and satellite facilities during the preceding calendar month; 7711
(2) All payments and disbursements made by the agent to 7712
permit holders operating as simulcast hosts and the method of 7713
calculation of the share of each simulcast host; 7714
(3) All payments and disbursements of required fees to 7715
tracks, racing associations, and state regulatory agencies 7716
located outside this state from which there were simulcasts of 7717
simulcast racing programs into this state; 7718

S. B. No. 197 Page 264
As Introduced
(4) Such other information regarding the performance of 7719
its duties under this section as the commission may request. 7720
(G) All moneys and fees received and collected by the 7721
collection and settlement agent shall be deposited into, and 7722
disbursed from, separate bank accounts maintained with banks 7723
domiciled in this state established by the agent for this 7724
purpose, and no other funds or money of the agent or any other 7725
person shall be commingled with, deposited into, or withdrawn 7726
from the accounts. The collection and settlement agent may 7727
retain as its fee for services it provides and expenses it 7728
incurs in the performance of its duties under this section any 7729
interest earned on the bank accounts maintained by the agent 7730
under this division. The commission shall annually audit the 7731
bank account records, and the books and records, of the 7732
collection and settlement agent. 7733
(H)(1) The collection and settlement agent shall assist 7734
permit holders and satellite facilities in the settlement of 7735
wagering accounts between and among simulcast hosts, simulcast 7736
guests, and satellite facilities for intrastate simulcast racing 7737
programs. 7738
(2) The collection and settlement agent on behalf of all 7739
permit holders and satellite facilities operating in this state 7740
shall be responsible for the settlement of wagering accounts for 7741
interstate simulcast racing programs with all tracks, racing 7742
associations, and state regulatory agencies located outside this 7743
state. The agent shall notify each permit holder and satellite 7744
facility not less frequently than weekly of the amounts that may 7745
be due from it, or the amounts that may be due to it, for the 7746
settlement of wagering accounts on interstate simulcast racing 7747
programs simulcast into this state during the preceding race 7748

S. B. No. 197 Page 265
As Introduced
week. If a permit holder or satellite facility owes money for 7749
the settlement of wagering accounts for that racing week, it 7750
shall promptly pay, by check, draft, or money order, or by wire 7751
transfer of funds, to the agent the amount due. From the amounts 7752
it collects, the agent shall pay and disburse to permit holders 7753
and satellite facilities and to tracks, racing associations, and 7754
state regulatory agencies located outside this state, the 7755
amounts necessary to provide for the settlement of wagering 7756
accounts for that racing week. 7757
(I) If a permit holder or satellite facility fails to 7758
timely pay and remit to the collection and settlement agent the 7759
money and fees provided for in this section and in sections 7760
3769.089 and 3769.26 of the Revised Code, the agent shall 7761
promptly notify the commission, or if the collection and 7762
settlement agent fails to collect, pay, disburse, and account 7763
for, the moneys and fees in the manner provided for in this 7764
section, then in any such event or occurrence, based on the 7765
information in the commission's possession, the commission may 7766
issue an emergency order prohibiting the permit holder, 7767
satellite facility, or agent, as the case may be, from serving 7768
as a simulcast host or simulcast guest or from receiving any 7769
simulcast racing program, and conducting wagering thereon, at 7770
its track or satellite facility, until such time as the permit 7771
holder, satellite facility, or agent complies with the 7772
requirements of this section and sections 3769.089 and 3769.26 7773
of the Revised Code in the manner and to the extent set forth in 7774
the commission's order. In addition, the commission may make an 7775
assessment against the permit holder, satellite facility, or 7776
agent, as the case may be, based on information in the 7777
commission's possession. The commission shall give the party 7778
assessed written notice of the assessment by personal service or 7779

S. B. No. 197 Page 266
As Introduced
certified mail. All assessments not paid within thirty days 7780
after service of the notice of assessment, shall bear interest 7781
at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the 7782
Revised Code computed from and after the date the assessment is 7783
made by the commission and entered in its official records until 7784
paid. 7785
Unless the party to whom the notice of assessment is 7786
directed files with the commission, within thirty days after 7787
service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by 7788
certified mail, a petition for reassessment in writing, signed 7789
by the party assessed, or by the party's authorized agent having 7790
knowledge of the facts, the assessment shall become conclusive 7791
and the amount of the assessment, together with interest on it, 7792
shall be due and payable from the party assessed to the 7793
commission. The petition shall indicate the objections of the 7794
party assessed, but additional objections may be raised in 7795
writing if received prior to the date shown on the final 7796
determination by the commission. 7797
Unless the petitioner waives a hearing, the commission 7798
shall assign a time and place for the hearing on the petition 7799
and notify the petitioner of the time and place of the hearing 7800
by personal service or certified mail, but the commission may 7801
continue the hearing from time to time if necessary. 7802
The commission may make such correction to its assessment 7803
as it finds proper. The commission shall serve a copy of its 7804
final determination on the petitioner by personal service or 7805
certified mail, and its decision in the matter is final, subject 7806
to appeal under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. 7807
After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the 7808
assessment, or interest due on it, remains unpaid, a certified 7809

S. B. No. 197 Page 267
As Introduced
copy of the commission's entry making the assessment final may 7810
be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas 7811
in the county in which the track for which the permit was issued 7812
is located or the county in which the party assessed resides or 7813
has its principal place of business. If the party assessed 7814
maintains no place of business in this state and is not a 7815
resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be 7816
filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of 7817
Franklin county. The clerk, immediately upon the filing of such 7818
entry, shall enter a judgment for the state against the party 7819
assessed in the amount shown on the entry. 7820
From the date of the filing of the entry in the clerk's 7821
office, any unpaid portion of the assessment, including the 7822
interest, shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed 7823
in section 5703.47 of the Revised Code and shall have the same 7824
effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the 7825
judgment upon request of the commission, and all laws applicable 7826
to sales on execution apply to sales made under the judgment. 7827
If the judgment is entered against the collection and 7828
settlement agent, the commission may immediately proceed against 7829
the agent's bond and surety for the full amount of the judgment 7830
and interest on it. 7831
Any assessment, including interest on it, paid to or 7832
collected by the commission shall be deposited with the 7833
treasurer of state to the account of the commission, and the fee 7834
portion of such amount shall be distributed by the treasurer of 7835
state on order of the commission to the collection and 7836
settlement agent or to the permit holders and satellite 7837
facilities entitled to receive such fees, as the case may be 7838
under the circumstances. 7839

S. B. No. 197 Page 268
As Introduced
(J) The commission may adopt rules for the implementation 7840
and administration of this section. 7841
(K)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 7842
section, after sixty days notification to the commission, a 7843
permit holder may take responsibility for handling any payments 7844
and distributions required of a collection and settlement agent 7845
under this section for any or all related permits under common 7846
ownership in lieu of making the required payments and 7847
distributions through the collection and settlement agent 7848
designated by the state racing commission under division (B) of 7849
this section. 7850
(2) Any permit holder having responsibility for payments 7851
and distributions required under division (K)(1) of this section 7852
shall, on or before the tenth day of each month, file a report 7853
with the state racing commission showing the following: 7854
(a) All payments and disbursements made by the permit 7855
holder to permit holders operating as simulcast hosts and the 7856
method of calculation of the share of each simulcast host; 7857
(b) All payments and disbursements of required fees to 7858
tracks, racing associations, and state regulatory agencies 7859
located outside this state from which there were simulcasts of 7860
simulcast racing programs into the permit holder facilities; 7861
(c) Such other information regarding the performance of 7862
the permit holder's duties under this section as the commission 7863
may request. 7864
(3) A permit holder having responsibility for payments and 7865
distributions required under division (K)(1) of this section may 7866
utilize an authorized agent to make the required payments and 7867
distributions. 7868

S. B. No. 197 Page 269
As Introduced
Sec. 3769.09. The state racing commission shall employ a 7869
racing inspector to attend each horse-racing meeting, held under 7870
a permit issued under sections 3769.01 to 3769.14 of the Revised 7871
Code this chapter. Such racing inspector shall give bond in the 7872
sum of five thousand dollars with sufficient sureties to be 7873
approved by and made payable to the treasurer of state, which 7874
bond shall be filed with the secretary of state. Such racing 7875
inspectors shall be paid a salary fixed pursuant to Chapter 124. 7876
of the Revised Code. Such racing inspector shall have full and 7877
free access to the books, records, and papers pertaining to the 7878
pari-mutuel system of wagering and to the enclosure or space 7879
where the pari-mutuel system is conducted at any horse-racing 7880
meeting to which he the racing inspector shall be assigned, for 7881
the purpose of ascertaining whether the holder of such permit is 7882
retaining the proper amount of commission. Such racing inspector 7883
shall investigate and ascertain whether such sections or rules 7884
promulgated by the commission are being violated at such race 7885
track or enclosure. Upon discovering any such violation, such 7886
racing inspector shall immediately report his such findings in 7887
writing and under oath to the commission for such action as it 7888
may deem fitting and proper. 7889
Sec. 3769.091. The state racing commission may delegate to 7890
the stewards and judges of racing meetings under the 7891
jurisdiction of the commission the power to suspend licenses for 7892
not to exceed one year and to impose fines not to exceed one 7893
thousand dollars for any violation of the rules or orders of the 7894
commission, provided that two of such officials shall concur in 7895
such suspension. Any suspension of a license by such officials 7896
is valid even though the suspension extends beyond the period of 7897
the racing meeting for which such officials have been appointed. 7898
The suspension shall be effective at all other race meetings 7899

S. B. No. 197 Page 270
As Introduced
under the jurisdiction of the commission. Any fine or suspension 7900
may be appealed to the commission. Such appeal shall stay the 7901
fine or suspension until further action by the commission. 7902
Sec. 3769.10. The state racing commission and the tax 7903
commissioner shall enforce this chapter and may incur such 7904
expenses as are necessary; provided, that the power of the tax 7905
commissioner shall extend only to enforcement and administration 7906
of the taxes levied by sections 3769.08, 3769.087, 3769.26, and 7907
3769.28 of the Revised Code as provided in those sections and in 7908
sections 3769.088, 3769.101, 3769.102, 3769.103, 5703.05, 7909
5703.17 to 5703.37, 5703.39, 5703.41, and 5703.45 of the Revised 7910
Code. The commissioner may adopt, in accordance with section 7911
5703.14 of the Revised Code, such rules as the commissioner 7912
considers necessary to administer sections 3769.08, 3769.087, 7913
3769.088, 3769.101, 3769.102, 3769.103, 3769.26, and 3769.28 of 7914
the Revised Code. 7915
Except as otherwise provided in section 3769.03 of the 7916
Revised Code, all taxes, fees, and moneys due the state under 7917
sections 3769.01 to 3769.071 and 3769.09 to 3769.14 of the 7918
Revised Code shall be paid to, and receipted for by, the 7919
secretary of the state racing commission, and shall be paid by 7920
the secretary commission weekly into the state treasury to the 7921
credit of the general revenue fund. All taxes due the state 7922
under sections 3769.08, 3769.087, and 3769.26 of the Revised 7923
Code shall be paid to, and receipted for by, the tax 7924
commissioner, and shall be paid by the commissioner monthly into 7925
the proper funds. 7926
All vouchers of the commission issued under this chapter 7927
shall be approved by the commission chairperson or secretary 7928
executive director, or both, as authorized by the commission. 7929

S. B. No. 197 Page 271
As Introduced
Sec. 3769.101. (A) For the purposes of receiving, 7930
distributing, and accounting for revenue received from the taxes 7931
levied by sections 3769.08, 3769.087, and 3769.26 of the Revised 7932
Code, there is hereby created in the state treasury the horse- 7933
racing tax revenue fund. 7934
(B) All moneys collected from the taxes imposed by 7935
sections 3769.08, 3769.087, and 3769.26 of the Revised Code 7936
shall be deposited into the horse-racing tax revenue fund. 7937
(C) On or before the fifteenth day of each month, the tax 7938
commissioner shall pay into the nursing home franchise permit 7939
fee fund, Ohio fairs fund, Ohio thoroughbred race fund, Ohio 7940
standardbred development fund, and state racing casino control 7941
commission operating fund created under this chapter the amounts 7942
required by sections 3769.08, 3769.087, and 3769.26 of the 7943
Revised Code based on amounts received in the preceding month. 7944
Sec. 3769.11. (A) No individual who is on the commission' s 7945
track exclusion list created under section 3772.031 of the 7946
Revised Code shall enter a track or satellite facility operated 7947
by a permit holder or the grounds of such a track or participate 7948
in the play or operation of pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing 7949
in this state. A permit holder shall employ commercially 7950
reasonable methods to prevent an individual who is on the 7951
commission's track exclusion list from engaging in pari-mutuel 7952
wagering on horse racing conducted by the permit holder. 7953
(B)(1) A permit holder may exclude any individual from 7954
entering a track or satellite facility, or the grounds of a 7955
track or satellite facility, that is under the control of the 7956
permit holder and may exclude any individual from participating 7957
in the play or operation of pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing 7958
conducted by the permit holder. The permit holder shall keep a 7959

S. B. No. 197 Page 272
As Introduced
list of all excluded individuals. No individual who is on a 7960
permit holder's exclusion list shall enter a track or satellite 7961
facility, or the grounds of a track or satellite facility, that 7962
is under the control of the permit holder or participate in the 7963
play or operation of pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing 7964
conducted by the permit holder under this chapter. 7965
(2) If a permit holder excludes an individual because the 7966
permit holder determines that the individual engaged or 7967
attempted to engage in any gaming related activity that is 7968
prohibited under the laws of this state or rules of the 7969
commission, the permit holder shall report that fact to the 7970
commission. 7971
(C)(1) The commission shall require by rule adopted under 7972
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that each permit holder comply 7973
with the requirements of the Ohio voluntary exclusion program 7974
described in section 3772.39 of the Revised Code. 7975
(2) Absent gross negligence, all of the following persons 7976
are immune from any type of civil liability on the basis that a 7977
person who is participating in the Ohio voluntary exclusion 7978
program enters or accesses a track or satellite facility or 7979
participates in pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing conducted 7980
under this chapter: 7981
(a) The commission or any other agency of this state and 7982
its agents or employees; 7983
(b) A permit holder and its agents or employees. 7984
(D) No permit holder, no director, officer, agent, or 7985
employee of a permit holder, no other person who has a financial 7986
interest in a permit holder, and no person living in the same 7987
household as any of those persons, shall engage in any pari- 7988

S. B. No. 197 Page 273
As Introduced
mutuel wagering on horse racing conducted by the permit holder, 7989
other than as part of operating pari-mutuel wagering on horse 7990
racing or as part of the employee's employment. A permit holder 7991
shall employ commercially reasonable methods to prevent those 7992
persons, and any other person who has access to confidential 7993
information held by the permit holder, from engaging in pari- 7994
mutuel wagering on horse racing conducted by the permit holder. 7995
(E) No member or employee of the commission shall 7996
knowingly participate in pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing in 7997
this state. A permit holder shall employ commercially reasonable 7998
methods to prevent such a person from engaging in video lottery 7999
terminal gaming conducted by the permit holder. 8000
(F) This section does not apply to a permit holder who 8001
holds only a permit issued for a racing meeting at a fair. 8002
Sec. 3769.12. The county sheriff shall enforce sections 8003
3769.01 to 3769.14, inclusive, of the Revised Code this chapter 8004
in cooperation with the commission. 8005
Sec. 3769.13. (A) Any person, association, trust, or 8006
corporation owning, leasing, or operating a race track, place, 8007
or enclosure which has been damaged by fire or other cause and 8008
at which in any year such a person, association, trust, or 8009
corporation has held or conducted a horse-racing meeting under a 8010
permit issued by the state racing commission, may be issued a 8011
permit by said commission to hold or conduct a horse-racing 8012
meeting at any one other track, place, or enclosure for not more 8013
than an aggregate of fifty-six racing days in the calendar year 8014
for which such permit is issued, provided: 8015
(1) The damaged race track, place, or enclosure has not 8016
been repaired or restored to its previous condition at the time 8017

S. B. No. 197 Page 274
As Introduced
the permit is issued;. 8018
(2) The permit is issued within two years after the damage 8019
was incurred. 8020
(B) The permits provided for in divisions (A), (C), and 8021
(D) of this section shall be issued in conformity with and 8022
subject to sections 3769.01 to 3769.14 of the Revised Code this 8023
chapter, except that the restriction contained in section 8024
3769.07 of the Revised Code against the issuing of a permit for 8025
the holding or conducting of a horse-racing meeting for more 8026
than an aggregate of fifty-six racing days in any one calendar 8027
year for any one race track, place, or enclosure shall not be 8028
applicable to a race track, place, or enclosure at which a 8029
horse-racing meeting is held under a permit issued pursuant to 8030
this section, and except that if more than one permit holder has 8031
conducted horse-racing meetings at the same race track pursuant 8032
to divisions (A), (C), and (D) of this section, the permits may 8033
be consolidated or held under one permit holder with the consent 8034
of all current permit holders and the approval of the racing 8035
commission. 8036
(C) Any person, association, trust, or corporation 8037
operating or conducting a horse-racing meeting at a race track 8038
in 1974 under license from the commission, or successor in 8039
interest to such person, association, trust, or corporation, 8040
shall be issued a permit by the commission to conduct a horse- 8041
racing meeting at any other race track, if the race track is 8042
within fifty miles of the race track at which racing was 8043
conducted in 1974, and the facilities of the race track to which 8044
it is sought to remove are substantially better than the 8045
facilities of the race track from which it is sought to remove. 8046
In the event of the removal, no other person, association, 8047

S. B. No. 197 Page 275
As Introduced
trust, or corporation, or successor in interest to the person, 8048
association, trust, or corporation, excepting however, a fair or 8049
agricultural society, may conduct racing under license from the 8050
commission at the race track from which said permit was removed. 8051
(D) Any person, association, trust, or corporation to whom 8052
a permit has been issued under section 3769.06 of the Revised 8053
Code but who is unable to conduct a horse-racing meeting on any 8054
of the days authorized by the permit because of damage by fire 8055
or other cause to the race track, place, or enclosure where the 8056
horse-racing meeting was to occur shall be issued a permit by 8057
the commission authorizing the unused racing days to be used 8058
during the next three successive years for which a permit is 8059
issued under section 3769.06 of the Revised Code, except that 8060
the commission shall not issue a permit authorizing the future 8061
use of the unused days if it has reasonable cause to believe 8062
that the actions or negligence of the permit holder 8063
substantially contributed to the damage suffered by the track. 8064
Sec. 3769.131. Notwithstanding sections 3769.07 and 8065
3769.13 of the Revised Code, any person operating or conducting 8066
a horse-racing meeting at any race track, place, or enclosure in 8067
1990 under a permit issued by the state racing commission under 8068
this chapter, or the successor in interest to such person, may, 8069
with the approval of the commission, consolidate and hold in one 8070
entity all permits issued by the commission under this chapter 8071
for horse racing at the same race track, place, or enclosure, as 8072
were held in 1990. Any such consolidation of permits shall have 8073
no effect on the number of racing days authorized to the holder 8074
of the permits by this chapter. 8075
Sec. 3769.14. If there is presented to the board of 8076
elections of any county a petition, sworn to in the manner 8077

S. B. No. 197 Page 276
As Introduced
provided by section 3513.27 of the Revised Code and signed by 8078
thirty-five per cent of the qualified and registered electors, 8079
where such qualified electors are required to be registered to 8080
enjoy the privilege of suffrage, as shown by the most recent 8081
general election, but in no event shall such petition contain 8082
less than thirty-five hundred signatures of qualified electors, 8083
requesting that there be submitted at a general election or at a 8084
special election, at the discretion of the board, the issue, 8085
"Shall licensed horse racing be prohibited throughout this 8086
county for a period of __________ (not to exceed five) years?", 8087
the board shall submit such issue to the electors of said county 8088
in the manner provided by section 3505.06 of the Revised Code. 8089
If a majority of the electors voting on said issue vote "yes" 8090
thereon, the state racing commission shall have no jurisdiction 8091
thereafter to license meetings in said county for the number of 8092
years, not exceeding five, specified in said petition. If a 8093
majority of the electors voting on said issue or question vote 8094
"no" thereon, such issue or question shall not again be 8095
submitted to a vote until the expiration of the time set forth 8096
in the petition on which the question or issue was submitted. 8097
When the board of any county has received such petition 8098
and accepted it as valid, it shall notify the commission of said 8099
petition, and the commission shall not issue a permit for racing 8100
in said county between the time of filing said petition and the 8101
general or special election. 8102
Sec. 3769.20. (A) To encourage the renovation of existing 8103
racing facilities for the benefit of the public, breeders, and 8104
horse owners and to increase the revenue to the state from the 8105
increase in pari-mutuel wagering resulting from such 8106
improvement, the taxes paid by a permit holder to the state, in 8107
excess of the amount paid into the nursing home franchise permit 8108

S. B. No. 197 Page 277
As Introduced
fee fund, shall be reduced by one per cent of the total amount 8109
wagered for those permit holders who carry out a major capital 8110
improvement project. The percentage of the reduction that may be 8111
taken each racing day shall equal seventy-five per cent of the 8112
amount of the taxes levied under divisions (B) and (C) of 8113
section 3769.08, section 3769.087, and division (F)(2) of 8114
section 3769.26 of the Revised Code, as applicable, divided by 8115
the calculated amount each fund should receive under divisions 8116
(B) and (C) of section 3769.08, section 3769.087, and division 8117
(F)(2) of section 3769.26 of the Revised Code and the reduction 8118
provided for in this section. If the resulting percentage is 8119
less than one, that percentage shall be multiplied by the amount 8120
of the reduction provided for in this section. Otherwise, the 8121
permit holder shall receive the full reduction provided for in 8122
this section. The amount of the allowable reduction not received 8123
shall be carried forward and added to any other reduction 8124
balance and applied against future tax liability. After any 8125
reductions expire, any reduction carried forward shall be 8126
treated as a reduction as provided for in this section. If the 8127
amount of allowable reduction exceeds the amount of taxes 8128
derived from a permit holder, the amount of the allowable 8129
reduction not used may be carried forward and applied against 8130
future tax liability. 8131
If more than one permit holder is authorized to conduct 8132
racing at the facility that is being improved, the cost of the 8133
major capital improvement project shall be allocated between or 8134
among all the permit holders in the ratio that each permit 8135
holder's number of racing days bears to the total number of 8136
racing days conducted at the facility. 8137
A reduction for a major capital improvement project shall 8138
start from the day racing is first conducted following the date 8139

S. B. No. 197 Page 278
As Introduced
on which the major capital improvement project is completed and 8140
the construction cost has been approved by the state racing 8141
commission, except as otherwise provided in division (E) of this 8142
section, and shall continue until the total tax reduction equals 8143
the cost of the major capital improvement project plus debt 8144
service applicable to the project. In no event, however, shall 8145
any tax reduction, excluding any reduction balances, be 8146
permitted under this section after December 31, 2017. The total 8147
tax reduction because of the major capital improvement project 8148
shall not during any one year exceed for all permit holders 8149
using any one track one per cent of the total amount wagered. 8150
The racing commission shall notify the tax commissioner when the 8151
reduction of tax begins and when it ends. 8152
(B) Each fiscal year, the racing commission shall submit a 8153
report to the tax commissioner, the office of budget and 8154
management, and the legislative service commission. The report 8155
shall identify each capital improvement project undertaken under 8156
this section and in progress at each race track, indicate the 8157
total cost of each project, state the tax reduction that 8158
resulted from each project during the immediately preceding 8159
fiscal year, estimate the tax reduction that will result from 8160
each project during the current fiscal year, state the total tax 8161
reduction that resulted from all such projects at all race 8162
tracks during the immediately preceding fiscal year, and 8163
estimate the total tax reduction that will result from all such 8164
projects at all race tracks during the current fiscal year. 8165
(C) The tax reduction granted pursuant to this section 8166
shall be in addition to any tax reductions for capital 8167
improvements and new race tracks provided for in section 3769.08 8168
of the Revised Code and approved by the racing commission. 8169

S. B. No. 197 Page 279
As Introduced
(D) In order to qualify for the reduction in tax, a permit 8170
holder shall apply to the racing commission in such form as the 8171
commission may require and shall provide full details of the 8172
major capital improvement project, including plans and 8173
specifications, a schedule for the project's construction and 8174
completion, and a breakdown of proposed costs. In addition, the 8175
permit holder shall have commenced construction of the major 8176
capital improvement project or shall have had the application 8177
for the project approved by the racing commission prior to March 8178
29, 1988. The racing commission shall not approve an application 8179
unless the permit holder shows that a contract for the major 8180
capital improvement project has been let under an unrestricted 8181
competitive bidding procedure, unless the contract is exempted 8182
by the controlling board because of its unusual nature. In 8183
determining whether to approve an application, the racing 8184
commission shall consider whether the major capital improvement 8185
project will promote the safety, convenience, and comfort of the 8186
racing public and horse owners and generally tend toward the 8187
improvement of racing in this state. 8188
(E) If the major capital improvement project is approved 8189
by the racing commission and construction has started, the tax 8190
reduction may be authorized by the commission upon presentation 8191
of copies of paid bills in excess of five hundred thousand 8192
dollars. After the initial authorization, the permit holder 8193
shall present copies of paid bills in the amount of not less 8194
than five hundred thousand dollars. If the permit holder is in 8195
substantial compliance with the schedule for construction and 8196
completion of the major capital improvement project, the racing 8197
commission may authorize the continuance of the tax reduction 8198
upon the presentation of the additional paid bills in increments 8199
of five hundred thousand dollars. The racing commission may 8200

S. B. No. 197 Page 280
As Introduced
terminate the tax reduction if a permit holder fails to complete 8201
the major capital improvement project or fails to comply 8202
substantially with the schedule for construction and completion 8203
of the major capital improvement project. If the time for 8204
completion of the major capital improvement project is delayed 8205
by acts of God, strikes, or the unavailability of labor or 8206
materials, the time for completion as set forth in the schedule 8207
shall be extended by the period of the delay. If a permit holder 8208
fails to complete the major capital improvement project, the 8209
racing commission shall order the permit holder to repay to the 8210
state the total amount of tax reduced, unless the permit holder 8211
has spent at least six million dollars on the project. The 8212
normal tax paid by the permit holder under section 3769.08 of 8213
the Revised Code shall be increased by one per cent of the total 8214
amount wagered until the total amount of the additional tax 8215
collected equals the total amount of tax reduced. Any action 8216
taken by the racing commission pursuant to this section in 8217
terminating the tax adjustment or requiring repayment of the 8218
amount of tax reduced shall be subject to Chapter 119. of the 8219
Revised Code. 8220
(F) As used in this section, "major capital improvement 8221
project" means the renovation, reconstruction, or remodeling, 8222
costing at least six million dollars, of a race track facility, 8223
including, but not limited to, the construction of barns used 8224
exclusively for that race track facility, backstretch facilities 8225
for horsemen, paddock facilities, pari-mutuel and totalizator 8226
equipment and appurtenances to that equipment purchased by the 8227
track, new access roads, new parking areas, the complete 8228
reconstruction, reshaping, and leveling of the racing surface 8229
and appurtenances, grandstand enclosure, installation of 8230
permanent new heating or air conditioning, roof replacement, and 8231

S. B. No. 197 Page 281
As Introduced
installations of a permanent nature forming a part of the track 8232
structure. 8233
(G) The cost and expenses to which the tax reduction 8234
granted under this section applies shall be determined by 8235
generally accepted accounting principles and be verified by an 8236
audit of the permit holder's records, upon completion of the 8237
major capital improvement project, either by the racing 8238
commission or by an independent certified public accountant 8239
selected by the permit holder and approved by the commission. 8240
(H) This section and section 3769.201 of the Revised Code 8241
govern any tax reduction granted to a permit holder for the cost 8242
to the permit holder of any cleanup, repair, or improvement 8243
required as a result of damage caused by the 1997 Ohio river 8244
flood to the place, track, or enclosure for which the permit is 8245
issued. 8246
Sec. 3769.201. The holder of a permit issued under section 8247
3769.06 of the Revised Code may apply to the state racing 8248
commission for the tax reduction available under section 3769.20 8249
of the Revised Code for the cost to the permit holder of any 8250
cleanup, repair, or improvement required as a result of damage 8251
caused by the 1997 Ohio river flood to the place, track, or 8252
enclosure for which the permit is issued. As part of the 8253
application, the permit holder shall submit evidence of payment 8254
of the cost of the cleanup, repair, or improvement. The 8255
commission shall approve the tax reduction in the amount of the 8256
cost to the permit holder, net of any insurance proceeds, of any 8257
cleanup, repair, or improvement the commission determines was 8258
required as a result of damage caused by the flood. The permit 8259
holder need not have followed unrestricted competitive bidding 8260
procedures as required under section 3769.20 of the Revised Code 8261

S. B. No. 197 Page 282
As Introduced
to qualify for the reduction under this section. 8262
The permit holder shall claim the tax reduction under this 8263
section in the same manner as if it were a tax reduction for a 8264
major capital improvement project under section 3769.20 of the 8265
Revised Code. The percentage of the reduction that may be taken 8266
each racing day shall equal the percentage allowed for a 8267
reduction under section 3769.20 of the Revised Code. A reduction 8268
under this section shall be in addition to, and shall be taken 8269
after completion of, a reduction approved under section 3769.20 8270
or division (J) of section 3769.08 of the Revised Code. A permit 8271
holder shall not take a reduction under this section for a 8272
repair or improvement for which a reduction is taken under 8273
section 3769.20 or division (J) of section 3769.08 of the 8274
Revised Code. 8275
Sec. 3769.21. (A) A corporation may be formed pursuant to 8276
Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code to establish a thoroughbred 8277
horsemen's health and retirement fund and a corporation may be 8278
formed pursuant to Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code to 8279
establish a harness horsemen's health and retirement fund to be 8280
administered for the benefit of horsemen. As used in this 8281
section, "horsemen" includes any person involved in the owning, 8282
breeding, training, grooming, or racing of horses which race in 8283
Ohio, except for the owners or managers of race tracks. For 8284
purposes of the thoroughbred horsemen's health and retirement 8285
fund, "horsemen" also does not include trainers and grooms who 8286
are not members of the thoroughbred horsemen's organization in 8287
this state. No more than one corporation to establish a 8288
thoroughbred horsemen's health and retirement fund and no more 8289
than one corporation to establish a harness horsemen's health 8290
and retirement fund may be established in Ohio pursuant to this 8291
section. The trustees of the corporation formed to establish a 8292

S. B. No. 197 Page 283
As Introduced
thoroughbred horsemen's health and retirement fund shall have 8293
the discretion to determine which horsemen shall benefit from 8294
such fund. 8295
(B) The articles of incorporation of both of the 8296
corporations described in division (A) of this section shall 8297
provide for at least the following: 8298
(1) The corporation shall be governed by, and the health 8299
and retirement fund shall be administered by, a board of three 8300
trustees appointed pursuant to division (C) of this section for 8301
staggered three-year terms. 8302
(2) The board of trustees shall adopt and administer a 8303
plan to provide health benefits, retirement benefits, or both to 8304
either thoroughbred or harness horsemen. 8305
(3) The sum paid to the corporation pursuant to division 8306
(G) or (H) of section 3769.08 of the Revised Code shall be used 8307
exclusively to establish and administer the health and 8308
retirement fund, and to finance benefits paid to horsemen 8309
pursuant to the plan adopted under division (B)(2) of this 8310
section. 8311
(4) The articles of incorporation and code of regulations 8312
of the corporation may be amended at any time by the board of 8313
trustees pursuant to the method set forth in the articles of 8314
incorporation and code of regulations, except that no amendment 8315
shall be adopted which is inconsistent with this section. 8316
(C) Within sixty days after the formation of each of the 8317
corporations described in division (A) of this section, the 8318
state racing The commission shall appoint the members of the 8319
board boards of trustees of that corporation the corporations 8320
described in division (A) of this section. Vacancies shall be 8321

S. B. No. 197 Page 284
As Introduced
filled by the state racing commission in the same manner as 8322
initial appointments. Each trustee of the thoroughbred 8323
horsemen's health and retirement fund appointed by the 8324
commission shall be active as a thoroughbred horseman while 8325
serving a term as a trustee and shall have been active as a 8326
thoroughbred horseman for at least five years immediately prior 8327
to the commencement of any such term. Each trustee of the 8328
harness horsemen's health and retirement fund appointed by the 8329
commission shall be active as a harness horseman while serving a 8330
term as a trustee and shall have been active as a harness 8331
horseman for at least five years immediately prior to the 8332
commencement of any such term. The incorporators of either such 8333
corporation may serve as initial trustees until the state racing 8334
commission acts pursuant to this section to make these 8335
appointments. 8336
(D) The intent of the general assembly in enacting this 8337
section pursuant to Amended House Bill No. 639 of the 115th 8338
general assembly was to fulfill a legitimate government 8339
responsibility in a manner that would be more cost efficient and 8340
effective than direct state agency administration by permitting 8341
nonprofit corporations to be formed to establish health and 8342
retirement funds for the benefit of harness and thoroughbred 8343
horsemen, as it was determined that such persons were in need of 8344
such benefits. 8345
Sec. 3769.22. (A) The general assembly finds and declares 8346
all of the following: 8347
(1) A national racing compact, comprised of states that 8348
are party to the compact, exists to provide for the licensure 8349
and regulation of individuals involved in the horse racing 8350
industry. 8351

S. B. No. 197 Page 285
As Introduced
(2) The intent of the compact is to prevent individual 8352
owners, trainers, jockeys, drivers, backstretch employees, 8353
totalizator employees, farriers, concessionaires, veterinarians, 8354
and other persons involved in live horse racing upon which pari- 8355
mutuel wagering is conducted from having to be licensed in each 8356
state in which they may conduct business. 8357
(3) The compact authorizes the individuals described in 8358
division (A)(2) of this section to be licensed in occupational 8359
categories established by the compact committee that oversees 8360
the compact and, thus, to be able to practice their occupation 8361
in all states that are parties to the compact. 8362
(4) The purposes of the compact are to do all of the 8363
following: 8364
(a) Establish uniform requirements among the states that 8365
are parties to the compact for the licensure of the individuals 8366
described in division (A)(2) of this section and to ensure that 8367
all of those individuals licensed pursuant to the compact meet a 8368
uniform minimum standard of honesty and integrity; 8369
(b) Facilitate the growth of the horse racing industry in 8370
each state that is a party to the compact and throughout the 8371
country by simplifying the licensing process for the individuals 8372
described in division (A)(4)(a) of this section and by reducing 8373
the duplicative and costly process of separate licensing by the 8374
applicable agency in each state that is a party to the compact; 8375
(c) Provide for participation in the compact by officials 8376
of the states that are parties to the compact, and permit those 8377
officials, through the compact committee established by the 8378
compact, to enter into contracts with governmental agencies and 8379
nongovernmental persons and entities to carry out the purposes 8380

S. B. No. 197 Page 286
As Introduced
of the compact; 8381
(d) Establish the compact committee as an interstate 8382
governmental entity authorized to request and receive criminal 8383
record history information from the federal bureau of 8384
investigation, other federal law enforcement agencies, the royal 8385
Canadian mounted police, law enforcement agencies of other 8386
nations, and state and local law enforcement agencies. 8387
(5) Both of the following apply under the compact: 8388
(a) No state that is party to the compact, including that 8389
state's racing commission or equivalent agency, is liable for 8390
the debts or other financial obligations incurred by the compact 8391
committee. 8392
(b) No official of a state that is a party to the compact 8393
or employee of the compact committee is personally liable for 8394
any act the official or employee performs or omits to perform in 8395
good faith while carrying out the official's or employee's 8396
responsibilities and duties under the compact. 8397
(B)(1) The state racing commission is hereby authorized to 8398
enter into and participate in the compact described in division 8399
(A) of this section for the purposes described in that division. 8400
(2) The participation of this state and the commission in 8401
the compact shall not have any of the following consequences: 8402
(a) Result in the diminution of any applicable existing 8403
standards governing the issuance, denial, suspension, or 8404
revocation of a license issued under section 3769.03 of the 8405
Revised Code; 8406
(b) Prevent the enforcement of any statute or rule 8407
affecting the holder of any such license; 8408

S. B. No. 197 Page 287
As Introduced
(c) Relieve any individual or entity of its duty to obtain 8409
any such license or pay any license fee; 8410
(d) Make the state or the commission liable for the debts 8411
or other financial obligations incurred by the compact 8412
committee; 8413
(e) Make any officer or employee of this state personally 8414
liable for any act the official or employee performs or omits to 8415
perform in good faith while carrying out the official's or 8416
employee's responsibilities and duties under the compact. 8417
(3) The commission shall designate an individual to 8418
represent this state and the commission on the compact committee 8419
in the administration of the compact. 8420
Sec. 3769.25. As used in sections 3769.25 to 3769.27 of 8421
the Revised Code, unless the context requires otherwise: 8422
(A) "Simulcast" means the telecast, for wagering purposes, 8423
of audio and visual signals of live horse races conducted at 8424
facilities either inside or outside this state. 8425
(B) "Track" means any place, track, or enclosure where a 8426
permit holder conducts live horse racing for profit at a race 8427
meeting. 8428
(C) "Permit holder" means a corporation, trust, 8429
partnership, limited partnership, association, person, or group 8430
of persons issued a permit under this chapter to conduct a 8431
racing meeting, other than does not include the holder of a 8432
permit issued for a racing meeting at a county fair or an 8433
independent fair. 8434
(D) "Simulcast host" has the same meaning as in section 8435
3769.089 of the Revised Code. 8436

S. B. No. 197 Page 288
As Introduced
(E) "Satellite facility" means any facility that is 8437
approved by the state racing commission and at which pari-mutuel 8438
wagering is conducted under section 3769.26 of the Revised Code. 8439
"Satellite facility" does not include a track. 8440
(F) "Collection and settlement agent" has the same meaning 8441
as in section 3769.0810 of the Revised Code. 8442
(G) (B) "Approval of the appropriate local legislative 8443
authority" means the enactment of an ordinance or resolution by 8444
the legislative authority of the municipal corporation where a 8445
satellite facility is proposed to be located or, if a satellite 8446
facility is proposed to be located in an unincorporated area, by 8447
the board of township trustees of the township where the 8448
satellite facility is proposed to be located, that approves the 8449
location of the satellite facility in the municipal corporation 8450
or the unincorporated area. "Approval of the appropriate local 8451
legislative authority" also means the failure of the legislative 8452
authority of a municipal corporation or the board of township 8453
trustees of a township to take a vote to enact an ordinance or 8454
resolution described in this division within sixty days after 8455
the ordinance or resolution is first introduced before the 8456
legislative authority or board. 8457
Sec. 3769.26. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in 8458
division (B) of this section, each track in existence on 8459
September 27, 1994, regardless of the number of permit holders 8460
authorized to conduct race meetings at the track, may establish, 8461
with the approval of the state racing commission and the 8462
appropriate local legislative authority, not more than two 8463
satellite facilities at which it may conduct pari-mutuel 8464
wagering on horse races conducted either inside or outside this 8465
state and simulcast by a simulcast host to the satellite 8466

S. B. No. 197 Page 289
As Introduced
facilities. 8467
(2) Prior to a track's establishing satellite facilities 8468
under this section, the permit holders at that track shall agree 8469
among themselves regarding their respective rights and 8470
obligations with respect to those satellite facilities. 8471
(3)(a) Any track that desires to establish a satellite 8472
facility shall provide written notification of its intent to the 8473
state racing commission and to the appropriate local legislative 8474
authority that is required to approve the satellite facility, 8475
together with detailed plans and specifications for the 8476
satellite facility. The commission shall deliver copies of this 8477
notification to all other tracks in this state, and the 8478
commission shall, within forty-five days after receiving the 8479
notification, hold a hearing on the track's intent to establish 8480
a satellite facility. At this hearing the commission shall 8481
consider the evidence presented and determine whether the 8482
request for establishment of a satellite facility shall be 8483
approved. 8484
The commission shall not approve a track's request to 8485
establish a satellite facility if the owner of the premises 8486
where the satellite facility is proposed to be located or if the 8487
proposed operator of the satellite facility has been convicted 8488
of or has pleaded guilty to a gambling offense that is a felony 8489
or any other felony under the laws of this state, any other 8490
state, or the United States that the commission determines to be 8491
related to fitness to be the owner of such a premises or to be 8492
the operator of a satellite facility. As used in division (A)(3) 8493
(a) of this section, "gambling offense" has the same meaning as 8494
in section 2915.01 of the Revised Code and "operator" means the 8495
individual who is responsible for the day-to-day operations of a 8496

S. B. No. 197 Page 290
As Introduced
satellite facility. The commission shall conduct a background 8497
investigation on each person who is the owner of a premises 8498
where a satellite facility is proposed to be located or who is 8499
proposed to be the operator or an employee of a satellite 8500
facility. The commission shall adopt rules in accordance with 8501
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that specify the specific 8502
information the commission shall collect in conducting such a 8503
background investigation. 8504
No track shall knowingly contract with a person as the 8505
owner of the premises where a satellite facility is located, or 8506
knowingly employ a person as the operator or an employee of a 8507
satellite facility, who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty 8508
to a gambling offense that is a felony or any other felony under 8509
the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States 8510
that the commission determines to be related to fitness to be 8511
the owner of such a premises or to be the operator or an 8512
employee of a satellite facility. The commission may impose a 8513
fine in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars on any 8514
track that violates any of these prohibitions. 8515
(b) Each track that receives the notification described in 8516
division (A)(3)(a) of this section shall notify the commission 8517
and the track that desires to establish the satellite facility, 8518
within thirty days after receiving the notification from the 8519
commission, indicating whether or not it desires to participate 8520
in the joint ownership of the facility. Ownership shall be 8521
distributed equally among the tracks that choose to participate 8522
in the joint ownership of the facility unless the participating 8523
tracks agree to and contract otherwise. Tracks that fail to 8524
respond to the commission and the track that desires to 8525
establish the satellite facility within this thirty-day period 8526
regarding the ownership of the particular satellite facility are 8527

S. B. No. 197 Page 291
As Introduced
not eligible to participate in its ownership. 8528
(B) If, within three years after September 27, 1994, a 8529
track in existence on September 27, 1994, does not establish 8530
both of the satellite facilities it is authorized to establish 8531
under division (A) of this section, another track, with the 8532
approval of the racing commission, may establish in accordance 8533
with this section a number of additional satellite facilities 8534
that does not exceed the number of satellite facilities that the 8535
first track did not establish. However, no more than fourteen 8536
satellite facilities may be established in this state. 8537
(C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, each 8538
permit holder in this state shall allow the races that it 8539
conducts, and the races conducted outside this state that it 8540
receives as a simulcast host, to be simulcast to all satellite 8541
facilities operating in this state and shall take all action 8542
necessary to supply its simulcast and wagering information to 8543
these satellite facilities. A permit holder at a track where the 8544
average daily amount wagered for all race meetings during 8545
calendar year 1990 did not exceed two hundred fifty thousand 8546
dollars may elect not to simulcast its races to the satellite 8547
facilities. If a permit holder at such a track chooses to 8548
simulcast its races to satellite facilities, it shall allow its 8549
races to be simulcast to all satellite facilities operating in 8550
this state. Except as otherwise provided in this division, each 8551
satellite facility shall receive simulcasts of and conduct pari- 8552
mutuel wagering on all live racing programs being conducted at 8553
any track in this state and on all agreed simulcast racing 8554
programs, as provided in division (D)(C) of section 3769.089 of 8555
the Revised Code, conducted in other states that are received by 8556
simulcast in this state, without regard to the breed of horse 8557
competing in the race or the time of day of the race. 8558

S. B. No. 197 Page 292
As Introduced
No satellite facility may receive simulcasts of horse 8559
races during the same hours that a county fair or independent 8560
fair located within the same county as the satellite facility is 8561
conducting pari-mutuel wagering on horse races at that county or 8562
independent fair. 8563
Except as otherwise provided in this division, the 8564
commission shall not approve the establishment of a satellite 8565
facility within a radius of fifty miles of any track. The 8566
commission may approve the establishment of a satellite facility 8567
at a location within a radius of at least thirty-five but not 8568
more than fifty miles from one or more tracks if all of the 8569
holders of permits issued for those tracks consent in writing to 8570
the establishment of the satellite facility. The commission may 8571
approve the establishment of a satellite facility at a location 8572
within a radius of thirty-five miles of more than one race track 8573
if all holders of permits issued for those tracks consent in 8574
writing to the establishment of the satellite facility and, if 8575
the tracks are located completely within one county and the 8576
proposed satellite facility will be located within that county, 8577
if both the legislative authority of the municipal corporation 8578
in that county with the largest population, and the appropriate 8579
legislative authority that is required to approve the satellite 8580
facility under division (A)(1) of this section, approve the 8581
establishment of the new satellite facility. The commission may 8582
approve the establishment of a satellite facility at a location 8583
within a radius of less than twenty miles from an existing 8584
satellite facility if the owner of the existing satellite 8585
facility consents in writing to the establishment of the new 8586
satellite facility. 8587
A satellite facility shall not receive simulcasts of horse 8588
races conducted outside this state on any day when no simulcast 8589

S. B. No. 197 Page 293
As Introduced
host is operating. 8590
(D) Each simulcast host is responsible for paying all 8591
costs associated with the up-link for simulcasts. Each satellite 8592
facility is responsible for paying all costs associated with the 8593
reception of simulcasts and the operation of the satellite 8594
facility. 8595
(E) All money wagered at the simulcast host, and all money 8596
wagered at all satellite facilities on races simulcast from the 8597
simulcast host, shall be included in a common pari-mutuel pool 8598
at the simulcast host. Except as otherwise provided in division 8599
(F)(6) of this section, the payment shall be the same for all 8600
winning tickets whether a wager is placed at a simulcast host or 8601
a satellite facility. Wagers placed at a satellite facility 8602
shall conform in denomination, character, terms, conditions, and 8603
in all other respects to wagers placed at the simulcast host for 8604
the same race. 8605
(F)(1) As used in division (F) of this section, "effective 8606
rate" means the effective gross tax percentage applicable at the 8607
simulcast host, determined in accordance with sections 3769.08 8608
and 3769.087 of the Revised Code, after combining the money 8609
wagered at the simulcast host with the money wagered at 8610
satellite facilities on races simulcast from the host track. 8611
(2) For the purposes of calculating the amount of taxes to 8612
be paid and the amount of commissions to be retained by permit 8613
holders, fifty per cent of the amount wagered at satellite 8614
facilities on a live racing program simulcast from a simulcast 8615
host shall be allocated to the permit holder's live race 8616
wagering at that simulcast host that conducts the live racing 8617
program, and fifty per cent of the amount wagered at satellite 8618
facilities on simulcast racing programs conducted outside this 8619

S. B. No. 197 Page 294
As Introduced
state shall be allocated to, and apportioned equally among, the 8620
permit holders acting as simulcast hosts for the out-of-state 8621
simulcast racing programs. The remainder of the amount wagered 8622
at a satellite facility on races simulcast from a simulcast host 8623
shall be allocated to the satellite facility. In computing the 8624
tax due on the amount allocated to the satellite facility, if 8625
there is more than one simulcast host for out-of-state simulcast 8626
racing programs, the effective rate applied by the satellite 8627
facility shall be the tax rate applicable to the simulcast host 8628
that pays the highest effective rate under section 3769.08 of 8629
the Revised Code on such simulcast racing programs. 8630
(3) The portion of the amount wagered that is allocated to 8631
a simulcast host under division (F)(2) of this section shall be 8632
treated, for the purposes of calculating the amount of taxes to 8633
be paid and commissions to be retained, as having been wagered 8634
at the simulcast host on a live racing program or on a simulcast 8635
racing program. The permit holder at the simulcast host shall 8636
pay, in the manner prescribed under section 3769.103 of the 8637
Revised Code, as a tax, the tax specified in sections 3769.08 8638
and 3769.087 of the Revised Code, as applicable, except that the 8639
tax shall be calculated using the effective rate, and the permit 8640
holder may retain as a commission the percentage of the amount 8641
wagered as specified in those sections. From the tax collected, 8642
the tax commissioner shall make distributions to the respective 8643
funds, and in the proper amounts, as required by sections 8644
3769.08 and 3769.087 of the Revised Code, as applicable. 8645
(4) From the portion of the amount wagered that is 8646
allocated to a satellite facility under division (F)(2) of this 8647
section, the satellite facility may retain as a commission the 8648
amount specified in section 3769.08 or 3769.087 of the Revised 8649
Code, as applicable. The portion of the amount wagered that is 8650

S. B. No. 197 Page 295
As Introduced
allocated to a satellite facility shall be subject to tax at the 8651
effective rate as follows: 8652
(a) One per cent of such amount allocated to the satellite 8653
facility shall be paid as a tax each racing day to the tax 8654
commissioner for deposit into the nursing home franchise permit 8655
fee fund. 8656
(b) The remaining balance of the taxes calculated at the 8657
effective rate, after payment of the tax specified in division 8658
(F)(4)(a) of this section, shall be retained by the satellite 8659
facility to pay for those costs associated with the reception of 8660
the simulcasts. 8661
(5) From the commission retained by a satellite facility 8662
after the deduction of the tax paid at the effective rate under 8663
division (F)(4) of this section, the satellite facility shall 8664
retain an amount equal to two and three-eighths per cent of the 8665
amount wagered that day on simulcast racing programs and the 8666
balance shall be divided as follows: 8667
(a) One-half shall be paid to the owner of the satellite 8668
facility; 8669
(b) One-half shall be paid to the state racing commission 8670
for deposit into the Ohio combined simulcast horse racing purse 8671
fund. 8672
(6) In addition to the commission retained under this 8673
section, a satellite facility shall retain two and one-half per 8674
cent of the amount that would otherwise be paid on each winning 8675
wager unless the retention of this amount would either cause or 8676
add to a minus pool. As used in division (F)(6) of this section, 8677
"minus pool" means a wagering pool in which a winning wager is 8678
paid off at less than one hundred ten per cent of the amount of 8679

S. B. No. 197 Page 296
As Introduced
the wager. The amount retained shall be paid each racing day to 8680
the tax commissioner for deposit into the nursing home franchise 8681
permit fee fund. 8682
(7) At the close of each day, each satellite facility 8683
shall pay, by check, draft, or money order, or by wire transfer 8684
of funds, out of the money retained on that day to the 8685
collection and settlement agent the required fee to be paid by 8686
the simulcast host to the tracks, racing associations, or state 8687
regulatory agencies located outside this state for simulcasts 8688
into this state computed and based on one-half of the amount 8689
wagered at the satellite facility that day on interstate 8690
simulcast racing programs. 8691
(G) No license, fee, or excise tax, other than as 8692
specified in division (F)(6) of this section, shall be assessed 8693
upon or collected from a satellite facility, the owners of a 8694
satellite facility, or the holders of permits issued for a track 8695
that has established a satellite facility by any county, 8696
township, municipal corporation, district, or other body having 8697
the authority to assess or collect a tax or fee. 8698
(H) In no case shall that portion of the commissions 8699
designated for purses from satellite facilities be less than 8700
that portion of those commissions designated for purses at the 8701
simulcast host. 8702
(I) It is the intention of the general assembly in 8703
enacting this section not to adversely affect the amounts paid 8704
into the Ohio thoroughbred race fund created under section 8705
3769.083 of the Revised Code. Therefore, each track that acts as 8706
a simulcast host under this section shall calculate, on a semi- 8707
annual basis during calendar years 1994, 1995, and 1996, its 8708
average daily contribution to the Ohio thoroughbred race fund 8709

S. B. No. 197 Page 297
As Introduced
created under section 3769.083 of the Revised Code on those days 8710
on which the track conducted live horse racing. If this average 8711
daily contribution to the fund is less than the average daily 8712
contribution from the same track to the fund during the same 8713
six-month period of calendar year 1992, there shall be 8714
contributed to the fund an amount equal to the average daily 8715
shortfall multiplied by the number of days of live racing 8716
conducted during the six-month period in calendar year 1994, 8717
1995, or 1996, as applicable. The amount of such contribution 8718
shall be allocated among the simulcast host, the purse program 8719
at the simulcast host, and the satellite facilities for which 8720
the track served as the simulcast host, on a pro rata basis in 8721
proportion to the amounts contributed by them to the fund during 8722
such six-month period in calendar year 1994, 1995, or 1996, as 8723
applicable. 8724
Sec. 3769.27. (A) If a petition is presented, not later 8725
than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of a general 8726
or primary election, to the board of elections of any county, 8727
signed by qualified electors of the county equal in number to at 8728
least ten per cent of the total number of votes cast in the 8729
county for the office of governor at the preceding general 8730
election for that office, but signed by at least five hundred 8731
electors, requesting that there be submitted the question "shall 8732
satellite facilities that receive simulcasts of live horse races 8733
and that conduct wagering on those simulcasts be prohibited 8734
throughout this county for a period of _______ (not to exceed 8735
five) years?", the board of elections shall submit this question 8736
to the electors of the county on the day of the next general or 8737
primary election, whichever occurs first, in the manner provided 8738
by law for the submission of questions and issues. The board of 8739
elections shall notify the state racing commission of the 8740

S. B. No. 197 Page 298
As Introduced
results of the election on the question. 8741
(B) If a majority of the electors voting on the question 8742
set forth in division (A) of this section vote "yes," the state 8743
racing commission shall have no jurisdiction thereafter to 8744
approve satellite facilities in that county for the number of 8745
years, not exceeding five, specified in the petition. If a 8746
majority of the electors voting on the question set forth in 8747
division (A) of this section vote "no," this question shall not 8748
again be submitted to a vote in the county until the expiration 8749
of the time set forth in the petition. When the board of 8750
elections of any county has received a petition and accepted it 8751
as valid, it shall so notify the commission and the commission 8752
shall not approve a satellite facility in that county between 8753
this notification and the day of the general or primary 8754
election. 8755
(C) Once a proposed satellite facility receives the 8756
approval of the appropriate local legislative authority, a 8757
petition seeking an election under this section in the county 8758
where the proposed satellite facility will be located is invalid 8759
unless the date of signing of each signature on the petition 8760
that is counted by the board of elections to meet the number of 8761
signatures required by division (A) of this section is a date 8762
within ninety days after the date of the approval of the 8763
appropriate local legislative authority for the proposed 8764
satellite facility. 8765
Sec. 3769.99. (A) Whoever knowingly does any of the 8766
following commits a misdemeanor of the first degree on the first 8767
offense and a felony of the fifth degree on a subsequent 8768
offense: 8769
(1) Makes a false statement on an application submitted 8770

S. B. No. 197 Page 299
As Introduced
under this chapter; 8771
(2) Permits an individual under eighteen years of age to 8772
engage in pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing; 8773
(3) Participates in pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing 8774
in violation of division (D) of section 3769.11 of the Revised 8775
Code, other than as part of operating pari-mutuel wagering on 8776
horse racing or as part of the employee's employment. 8777
(B) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a 8778
felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of 8779
the fourth degree on a subsequent offense. If the person is a 8780
permit holder or licensee under this chapter, the commission 8781
shall revoke the person's permit or license issued under this 8782
chapter after the first offense. 8783
(1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value to anyone 8784
for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a horse race on 8785
which pari-mutuel wagering is conducted or attempts to do so; 8786
(2) Places, increases, or decreases a wager after 8787
acquiring knowledge not available to the general public that 8788
anyone has been offered, promised, or given anything of value 8789
for the purpose of influencing the outcome of the horse race 8790
upon which the wager is placed, increased, or decreased, or 8791
attempts to do so; 8792
(3) Manufactures, sells, or distributes any device that is 8793
intended by that person to be used to violate any provision of 8794
this chapter or Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code or the horse 8795
racing laws of any other state; 8796
(4) Places a bet or aids any other person in placing a bet 8797
on a horse race after unlawfully acquiring knowledge of the 8798
outcome on which winnings from that bet are contingent; 8799

S. B. No. 197 Page 300
As Introduced
(5) Claims, collects, or takes anything of value from a 8800
permit holder with intent to defraud or attempts to do so 8801
without having made a wager in which the amount or value is 8802
legitimately won or owed; 8803
(6) Places a wager using counterfeit currency or other 8804
counterfeit form of credit approved for wagering; 8805
(7) Possesses any device intended to be used to violate 8806
this chapter, Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code, or any rule 8807
adopted thereunder with respect to pari-mutuel wagering on horse 8808
racing, or any materials used to manufacture such a device. This 8809
division does not apply to a permit holder or to an agent or 8810
employee of a permit holder who is acting in furtherance of the 8811
permit holder's interest. 8812
(8) Changes or alters the normal outcome of any pari- 8813
mutuel wagering on horse racing, including any system used to 8814
monitor the wagering, or the way in which the outcome is 8815
reported to any patron; 8816
(9) Operates pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing in a 8817
manner other than the manner required under this chapter and 8818
Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code. Premises or any internet web 8819
site used or occupied in violation of this division constitute a 8820
nuisance subject to abatement under Chapter 3767. of the Revised 8821
Code. 8822
(C) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a 8823
felony of the third degree. If the person is a permit holder or 8824
licensee under this chapter, the commission shall revoke the 8825
person's permit or license issued under this chapter after the 8826
first offense. If the person is a public servant or political 8827
party official, the person is forever disqualified from holding 8828

S. B. No. 197 Page 301
As Introduced
any public office, employment, or position of trust in this 8829
state. 8830
(1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value or 8831
benefit to a person who is connected with a permit holder, an 8832
agent or employee of a permit holder, or a member, agent, or 8833
employee of the commission, under an agreement to influence, or 8834
with the intent to influence, the actions of the person to whom 8835
the offer, promise, or gift is made in order to affect or 8836
attempt to affect the outcome of pari-mutuel wagering on horse 8837
racing or an official action of a member, agent, or employee of 8838
the commission; 8839
(2) Solicits, accepts, or receives a promise of anything 8840
of value or benefit while the person is connected with a permit 8841
holder, an agent or employee of a permit holder, or a member, 8842
agent, or employee of the commission, under an agreement to 8843
influence, or with the intent to influence, the actions of the 8844
person to affect or attempt to affect the outcome of pari-mutuel 8845
wagering on horse racing or an official action of a member, 8846
agent, or employee of the commission. 8847
(D) Whoever knowingly does any of the following while 8848
participating in pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing or 8849
otherwise transacting with a permit holder as permitted under 8850
this chapter commits a felony of the fifth degree on a first 8851
offense and a felony of the fourth degree on a subsequent 8852
offense: 8853
(1) Causes or attempts to cause the person to fail to file 8854
a report required under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any 8855
regulation prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the 8856
Revised Code, or to fail to file a report or maintain a record 8857
required by an order issued under section 21 of the "Federal 8858

S. B. No. 197 Page 302
As Introduced
Deposit Insurance Act," 12 U.S.C. 1829b or section 123 of Pub. 8859
L. No. 91-508; 8860
(2) Causes or attempts to cause the person to file a 8861
report under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any regulation 8862
prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the Revised Code, to 8863
file a report or to maintain a record required by any order 8864
issued under 31 U.S.C. 3126, or to maintain a record required 8865
under any regulation prescribed under section 21 of the "Federal 8866
Deposit Insurance Act," 12 U.S.C. 1829b or section 123 of Pub. 8867
L. No. 91-508 that contains a material omission or misstatement 8868
of fact; 8869
(3) With one or more permit holders, structures a 8870
transaction, is complicit in structuring a transaction, attempts 8871
to structure a transaction, or is complicit in an attempt to 8872
structure a transaction. As used in this division: 8873
(a) To be "complicit" means to engage in any conduct of a 8874
type described in divisions (A)(1) to (4) of section 2923.03 of 8875
the Revised Code. 8876
(b) "Structure a transaction" has the same meaning as in 8877
section 1315.51 of the Revised Code. 8878
Sec. 3770.10 3770.01. As used in sections 3770.07 to 8879
3770.073 and 3770.10 to 3770.14 of the Revised Code this 8880
chapter, except where the context requires otherwise: 8881
(A) "Commission" means the state lottery commission 8882
established under section 3770.011 of the Revised Code. 8883
(B) "Court of competent jurisdiction" means either the 8884
general division or the probate division of the court of common 8885
pleas of the county in which the prize winner or transferor 8886
resides, or, if the prize winner or transferor is not a resident 8887

S. B. No. 197 Page 303
As Introduced
of this state, either the general division or the probate 8888
division of the court of common pleas of Franklin county or a 8889
federal court having jurisdiction over the lottery prize award. 8890
(B) (C) "Discounted present value" means the present value 8891
of the future payments of a lottery prize award that is 8892
determined by discounting those payments to the present, using 8893
the most recently published applicable federal rate for 8894
determining the present value of an annuity as issued by the 8895
United States internal revenue service and assuming daily 8896
compounding. 8897
(C) (D) "Independent professional advice" means the advice 8898
of an attorney, a certified public accountant, an actuary, or 8899
any other licensed professional adviser if all of the following 8900
apply: 8901
(1) The prize winner has engaged the services of the 8902
licensed professional adviser to render advice concerning the 8903
legal and other implications of a transfer of the lottery prize 8904
award. 8905
(2) The licensed professional adviser is not affiliated in 8906
any manner with or compensated in any manner by the transferee 8907
of the lottery prize award. 8908
(3) The compensation of the licensed professional adviser 8909
is not affected by whether or not a transfer of a lottery prize 8910
award occurs. 8911
(D) (E) "Internet lottery gaming" means an internet-based 8912
version of lottery gaming in which lots are drawn to determine a 8913
winner by chance among those who have purchased a lottery 8914
ticket. "Internet lottery gaming" does not include video lottery 8915
terminal gaming. 8916

S. B. No. 197 Page 304
As Introduced
(F) "Lottery prize award" means winnings from any form of 8917
lottery gaming, including lottery sports gaming or a video 8918
lottery terminal. 8919
(G) "Lottery sales agent" means both of the following: 8920
(1) A person licensed by the commission under section 8921
3770.05 of the Revised Code to sell lottery tickets or otherwise 8922
offer lottery gaming on behalf of the commission, including a 8923
type C sports gaming host; 8924
(2) A video lottery sales agent. 8925
(H) "Lottery sports gaming" means sports gaming conducted 8926
by a type C sports gaming proprietor on behalf of the commission 8927
and offered through lottery sales agents that are licensed as 8928
type C sports gaming hosts. 8929
(I) "Ohio voluntary exclusion program" has the same 8930
meaning as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. 8931
(J) "Permit holder" and "track" have the same meanings as 8932
in section 3769.01 of the Revised Code. 8933
(K) "Prize winner" means any person that holds the right 8934
to receive all or any part of a lottery prize award as a result 8935
of being any of the following: 8936
(1) A person who is a claimant under division (A) of 8937
section 3770.07 of the Revised Code; 8938
(2) A person who is entitled to a prize award and who is 8939
under a legal disability as described in division (B) of section 8940
3770.07 of the Revised Code; 8941
(3) A person who was awarded a prize award to which 8942
another has claimed title by a federal bankruptcy court order or 8943

S. B. No. 197 Page 305
As Introduced
other court order referred to in division (D) of section 3770.07 8944
of the Revised Code; 8945
(4) A person who is receiving payments upon the death of a 8946
prize winner as provided in division (D) of section 3770.07 of 8947
the Revised Code. 8948
(E) (L) "Sports gaming," "type C sports gaming 8949
proprietor," and "type C sports gaming host" have the same 8950
meanings as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. 8951
(M) "Statewide joint lottery game" means a lottery game 8952
that the commission sells solely within this state under an 8953
agreement with other lottery jurisdictions to sell the same 8954
lottery game solely within their statewide or other 8955
jurisdictional boundaries. 8956
(N) "Transfer" means any form of sale, assignment, or 8957
redirection of payment of all or any part of a lottery prize 8958
award for consideration. 8959
(F) (O) "Transfer agreement" means an agreement that is 8960
complete and valid, and that provides for the transfer of all or 8961
any part of a lottery prize award from a transferor to a 8962
transferee. A transfer agreement is incomplete and invalid 8963
unless the agreement contains both of the following: 8964
(1) A statement, signed by the transferor under penalties 8965
of perjury, that the transferor irrevocably agrees that the 8966
transferor is subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 5733. or 8967
5747. of the Revised Code with respect to gain or income which 8968
the transferor will recognize in connection with the transfer. 8969
If the transferor is a pass-through entity, as defined in 8970
section 5733.04 of the Revised Code, each investor in the pass- 8971
through entity shall also sign under penalties of perjury a 8972

S. B. No. 197 Page 306
As Introduced
statement that the investor irrevocably agrees that the investor 8973
is subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 5733. or 5747. of the 8974
Revised Code with respect to gain or income which the transferor 8975
and the investor will recognize in connection with the transfer. 8976
(2) A statement, signed by the transferee, that the 8977
transferee irrevocably agrees that the transferee is subject to 8978
the withholding requirements imposed by division (C) of section 8979
3770.072 of the Revised Code and that the transferee is subject 8980
to the tax imposed by Chapter 5733. or 5747. of the Revised Code 8981
with respect to gain or income which the transferee will 8982
recognize in connection with lottery prize awards to be received 8983
as a result of the transfer. If the transferee is a pass-through 8984
entity, as defined in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code, each 8985
investor in the pass-through entity shall also sign under 8986
penalties of perjury a statement setting forth that the investor 8987
irrevocably agrees that the investor is subject to the 8988
withholding requirements imposed by division (C) of section 8989
3770.072 of the Revised Code and is subject to the tax imposed 8990
by Chapter 5733. or 5747. of the Revised Code with respect to 8991
gain or income which the transferee and the investor will 8992
recognize in connection with lottery prize awards to be received 8993
as a result of the transfer. 8994
(G) (P) "Transferee" means a party acquiring or proposing 8995
to acquire all or any part of a lottery prize award through a 8996
transfer. 8997
(H) (Q) "Transferor" means either a prize winner or a 8998
transferee in an earlier transfer whose interest is acquired by 8999
or is sought to be acquired by a transferee or a new transferee 9000
through a transfer. 9001
(I) "Lottery prize award" includes winnings from lottery 9002

S. B. No. 197 Page 307
As Introduced
sports gaming.(R) "Video lottery sales agent" means a permit 9003
holder who is licensed by the Ohio casino control commission to 9004
operate video lottery terminals at a track operated by the 9005
permit holder. 9006
(S) "Video lottery technology provider" means a video 9007
lottery terminal manufacturer, distributor, or provider that 9008
contracts with video lottery sales agents. 9009
(T) "Video lottery terminal" means an electronic device 9010
approved by the Ohio casino control commission that provides 9011
immediate lottery prize determinations for participants on an 9012
electronic display that is located at a track operated by a 9013
video lottery sales agent. 9014
(U) "Video lottery terminal income" means credits played, 9015
minus approved video lottery terminal promotional gaming 9016
credits, minus video lottery prize awards. 9017
(V) "Video lottery terminal promotional gaming credit" 9018
means a video lottery terminal game credit, discount, or other 9019
similar item issued to a patron to enable the placement of, or 9020
increase in, a wager at a video lottery terminal. 9021
Sec. 3770.01 3770.011. (A) There is hereby created the 9022
state lottery commission consisting of nine members appointed by 9023
the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. No more 9024
than five members of the commission shall be members of the same 9025
political party. Of the additional and new appointments made to 9026
the commission pursuant to the amendment of August 1, 1980, 9027
three shall be for terms ending August 1, 1981, three shall be 9028
for terms ending August 1, 1982, and three shall be for terms 9029
ending August 1, 1983. Thereafter, terms of office shall be for 9030
three years, each term ending on the same day of the same month 9031

S. B. No. 197 Page 308
As Introduced
of the year as did the term which it succeeds. 9032
(B) Each member shall hold office from the date of 9033
appointment until the end of the term for which the member was 9034
appointed. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring 9035
prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's 9036
predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of 9037
that term. Any member shall continue in office subsequent to the 9038
expiration date of the member's term until the member's 9039
successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has 9040
elapsed, whichever occurs first. 9041
(C) All members of the commission shall be citizens of the 9042
United States and residents of this state. The members of the 9043
commission shall represent the various geographic regions of the 9044
state. No member of the commission shall have any pecuniary 9045
interest in any contract or license awarded by the commission. 9046
One person appointed as a member of the commission shall have 9047
experience or training in the area of problem gambling or other 9048
addictions and in assistance to recovering gambling or other 9049
addicts. Each person appointed as a member of the commission, 9050
except the member appointed as having experience or training in 9051
the area of problem gambling or other addictions and in 9052
assistance to recovering gambling or other addicts, shall have 9053
prior experience or education in business administration, 9054
management, sales, marketing, or advertising. 9055
(D) The commission shall elect annually one of its members 9056
to serve as chairperson for a term of one year. Election as 9057
chairperson shall not extend a member's appointive term. Each 9058
member of the commission shall receive an annual salary of five 9059
thousand dollars, payable in monthly installments. Each member 9060
of the commission also shall receive the member's actual and 9061

S. B. No. 197 Page 309
As Introduced
necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of the member's 9062
official duties. 9063
(E) Each member of the commission, before entering upon 9064
the discharge of the member's official duties, shall give a 9065
bond, payable to the treasurer of state, in the sum of ten 9066
thousand dollars with sufficient sureties to be approved by the 9067
treasurer of state, which bond shall be filed with the secretary 9068
of state. 9069
(F) The governor may remove any member of the commission 9070
for malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, giving 9071
the member a copy of the charges against the member and 9072
affording the member an opportunity to be publicly heard in 9073
person or by counsel in the member's own defense upon not less 9074
than ten days' notice. If the member is removed, the governor 9075
shall file in the office of the secretary of state a complete 9076
statement of all charges made against the member and the 9077
governor's finding on the charges, together with a complete 9078
report of the proceedings, and the governor's decision on the 9079
charges is final. 9080
(G) The commission shall maintain offices at locations in 9081
the state as it may consider necessary for the efficient 9082
performance of its functions. The director shall maintain an 9083
office in Columbus to coordinate the activities of the state 9084
lottery commission with other state departments. 9085
Sec. 3770.02. (A) Subject to the advice and consent of the 9086
senate, the governor shall appoint a director of the state 9087
lottery commission who shall serve at the pleasure of the 9088
governor. The director shall devote full time to the duties of 9089
the office and shall hold no other office or employment. The 9090
director shall meet all requirements for appointment as a member 9091

S. B. No. 197 Page 310
As Introduced
of the commission and shall, by experience and training, possess 9092
management skills that equip the director to administer an 9093
enterprise of the nature of a state lottery. The director shall 9094
receive an annual salary in accordance with pay range 48 of 9095
section 124.152 of the Revised Code. 9096
(B)(1) The director shall attend all meetings of the 9097
commission and shall act as its secretary. The director shall 9098
keep a record of all commission proceedings and shall keep the 9099
commission's records, files, and documents at the commission's 9100
principal office. All records of the commission's meetings shall 9101
be available for inspection by any member of the public, upon a 9102
showing of good cause and prior notification to the director. 9103
(2) The director shall be the commission's executive 9104
officer and shall be responsible for keeping all commission 9105
records and supervising and administering the state lottery in 9106
accordance with this chapter, and carrying out all commission 9107
rules adopted under section 3770.03 of the Revised Code. 9108
(C)(1) The director shall appoint deputy directors as 9109
necessary and as many regional managers as are required. The 9110
director may also appoint necessary professional, technical, and 9111
clerical assistants. All such officers and employees shall be 9112
appointed and compensated pursuant to Chapter 124. of the 9113
Revised Code. Regional and assistant regional managers, sales 9114
representatives, and any lottery executive account 9115
representatives shall remain in the unclassified service. The 9116
assistant director shall act as director in the absence or 9117
disability of the director. If the director does not appoint an 9118
assistant director, the director shall designate a deputy 9119
director to act as director in the absence or disability of the 9120
director. 9121

S. B. No. 197 Page 311
As Introduced
(2) The director, in consultation with the director of 9122
administrative services, may establish standards of proficiency 9123
and productivity for commission field representatives. 9124
(D) The director shall request the bureau of criminal 9125
identification and investigation, the department of public 9126
safety, or any other state, local, or federal agency to supply 9127
the director with the criminal records of any job applicant and 9128
may periodically request the criminal records of commission 9129
employees. At or prior to the time of making such a request, the 9130
director shall require a job applicant or commission employee to 9131
obtain fingerprint cards prescribed by the superintendent of the 9132
bureau of criminal identification and investigation at a 9133
qualified law enforcement agency, and the director shall cause 9134
these fingerprint cards to be forwarded to the bureau of 9135
criminal identification and investigation and the federal bureau 9136
of investigation. The commission shall assume the cost of 9137
obtaining the fingerprint cards and shall pay to each agency 9138
supplying criminal records for each investigation under this 9139
division a reasonable fee, as determined by the agency. 9140
(E) The (E)(1) Except as otherwise provided in sections 9141
3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code, the director shall 9142
license lottery sales agents pursuant to section 3770.05 of the 9143
Revised Code and, when it is considered necessary, may revoke or 9144
suspend the license of any lottery sales agent. The 9145
(2) Except as otherwise provided in sections 3770.21 to 9146
3770.22 of the Revised Code, the director may license video 9147
lottery technology providers, independent testing laboratories, 9148
and gaming employees, and promulgate rules relating thereto. 9149
When the director considers it necessary, the director may 9150
suspend or revoke the license of a video lottery technology 9151

S. B. No. 197 Page 312
As Introduced
provider, independent testing laboratory, or gaming employee, 9152
including suspension or revocation without affording an 9153
opportunity for a prior hearing under section 119.07 of the 9154
Revised Code when the public safety, convenience, or trust 9155
requires immediate action. 9156
(F) The director shall confer at least once each month 9157
with the commission, at which time the director shall advise it 9158
regarding the operation and administration of the lottery. The 9159
director shall make available at the request of the commission 9160
all documents, files, and other records pertaining to the 9161
operation and administration of the lottery. The director shall 9162
prepare and make available to the commission each month a 9163
complete and accurate accounting of lottery revenues, prize 9164
money disbursements and the cost of goods and services awarded 9165
as prizes, operating expenses, and all other relevant financial 9166
information, including an accounting of all transfers made from 9167
any lottery funds in the custody of the treasurer of state to 9168
benefit education. 9169
(G) The director may enter into contracts for the 9170
operation or promotion of the lottery pursuant to Chapter 125. 9171
of the Revised Code. 9172
(H)(1) Pursuant to rules adopted by the commission under 9173
section 3770.03 of the Revised Code, the director shall require 9174
any lottery sales agents to deposit to the credit of the state 9175
lottery fund, in banking institutions designated by the 9176
treasurer of state, net proceeds due the commission as 9177
determined by the director. 9178
(2) Pursuant to rules adopted by the commission under 9179
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director may impose 9180
penalties for the failure of a sales agent to transfer funds to 9181

S. B. No. 197 Page 313
As Introduced
the commission in a timely manner. Penalties may include 9182
monetary penalties, immediate suspension or revocation of a 9183
license, or any other penalty the commission adopts by rule. 9184
(I) The director may arrange for any person, or any 9185
banking institution, to perform functions and services in 9186
connection with the operation of the lottery as the director may 9187
consider necessary to carry out this chapter. 9188
(J)(1) As used in this chapter, "statewide joint lottery 9189
game" means a lottery game that the commission sells solely 9190
within this state under an agreement with other lottery 9191
jurisdictions to sell the same lottery game solely within their 9192
statewide or other jurisdictional boundaries. 9193
(2) If the governor directs the director to do so, the 9194
director shall enter into an agreement with other lottery 9195
jurisdictions to conduct statewide joint lottery games. If the 9196
governor signs the agreement personally or by means of an 9197
authenticating officer pursuant to section 107.15 of the Revised 9198
Code, the director then may conduct statewide joint lottery 9199
games under the agreement. 9200
(3) (2) The entire net proceeds from any statewide joint 9201
lottery games shall be used to fund elementary, secondary, 9202
vocational, and special education programs in this state. 9203
(4) (3) The commission shall conduct any statewide joint 9204
lottery games in accordance with rules it adopts under division 9205
(B)(5) of section 3770.03 of the Revised Code. 9206
(K)(1) The director shall enter into an agreement with the 9207
department of mental health and addiction services under which 9208
the department shall provide a program of gambling addiction 9209
services on behalf of the commission. The commission shall pay 9210

S. B. No. 197 Page 314
As Introduced
the costs of the program provided pursuant to the agreement. 9211
(2) As used in this section, "gambling addiction services" 9212
has the same meaning as in section 5119.01 of the Revised Code. 9213
Sec. 3770.03. (A)(1) The state lottery commission shall 9214
promulgate rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, 9215
and shall adopt operating procedures, under which a statewide 9216
lottery and statewide joint lottery may be conducted, which 9217
includes, and since the original enactment of this section has 9218
included, the authority for the commission to operate video 9219
lottery terminal games, internet lottery gaming, and all other 9220
lottery games. Any reference in this chapter to tickets shall 9221
not be construed to in any way limit the authority of the 9222
commission to operate video lottery terminal games or , lottery 9223
sports gaming, or internet lottery gaming. 9224
(2) Except regarding matters about which this chapter 9225
explicitly requires the commission to promulgate rules under 9226
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the commission instead may 9227
adopt operating procedures for the conduct of lottery games. 9228
Those operating procedures shall include, but need not be 9229
limited to, the following: 9230
(a) The type of lottery to be conducted; 9231
(b) The prices of tickets in the lottery; 9232
(c) The number, nature, and value of prize awards, the 9233
manner and frequency of prize drawings, and the manner in which 9234
prizes shall be awarded to holders of winning tickets. 9235
(3) The commission shall publish all of its operating 9236
procedures on its official web site and shall make copies of its 9237
operating procedures available to the public upon request. 9238

S. B. No. 197 Page 315
As Introduced
(4) An operating procedure adopted under this section is 9239
not considered a rule under section 111.15 of the Revised Code. 9240
(5) All rules of the commission that are in effect on the 9241
effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, remain 9242
effective unless the commission rescinds them. 9243
(B) The commission shall promulgate rules pursuant to 9244
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code concerning all of the 9245
following: 9246
(1) The locations at which lottery tickets may be sold and 9247
the manner in which they are to be sold. These rules may 9248
authorize the sale of lottery tickets by commission personnel or 9249
other licensed individuals from traveling show wagons at the 9250
state fair, and at any other expositions the director of the 9251
commission considers acceptable. These rules shall prohibit 9252
commission personnel or other licensed individuals from 9253
soliciting from an exposition the right to sell lottery tickets 9254
at that exposition, but shall allow commission personnel or 9255
other licensed individuals to sell lottery tickets at an 9256
exposition if the exposition requests commission personnel or 9257
licensed individuals to do so. These rules may also address the 9258
accessibility of sales agent locations to commission products in 9259
accordance with the "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990," 9260
104 Stat. 327, 42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq. 9261
(2) The manner in which lottery sales revenues are to be 9262
collected, including authorization for the director to impose 9263
penalties for failure by lottery sales agents to transfer 9264
revenues to the commission in a timely manner; 9265
(3) The amount of compensation to be paid to licensed 9266
lottery sales agents; , provided that for lottery gaming other 9267

S. B. No. 197 Page 316
As Introduced
than video lottery terminal gaming, lottery sports gaming, and 9268
internet lottery gaming, a lottery sales agent shall receive a 9269
base commission rate of not less than the following amount: 9270
(a) During the first year in which the commission conducts 9271
internet lottery gaming, one-quarter per cent more than the base 9272
commission rate that applies on the effective date of this 9273
amendment; 9274
(b) Thereafter, one-half per cent more than the base 9275
commission rate that applies on the effective date of this 9276
amendment. 9277
(4) The Except as otherwise provided in sections 3770.21 9278
to 3770.22 of the Revised Code, the substantive criteria for the 9279
licensing of lottery sales agents consistent with section 9280
3770.05 of the Revised Code, and procedures for revoking or 9281
suspending their licenses consistent with Chapter 119. of the 9282
Revised Code. If circumstances, such as the nonpayment of funds 9283
owed by a lottery sales agent, or other circumstances related to 9284
the public safety, convenience, or trust, require immediate 9285
action, the director may suspend a license without affording an 9286
opportunity for a prior hearing under section 119.07 of the 9287
Revised Code. 9288
(5) Special game rules to implement any agreements signed 9289
by the governor that the director enters into with other lottery 9290
jurisdictions under division (J) of section 3770.02 of the 9291
Revised Code to conduct statewide joint lottery games. The rules 9292
shall require that the entire net proceeds of those games that 9293
remain, after associated operating expenses, prize 9294
disbursements, lottery sales agent bonuses, commissions, and 9295
reimbursements, and any other expenses necessary to comply with 9296
the agreements or the rules are deducted from the gross proceeds 9297

S. B. No. 197 Page 317
As Introduced
of those games, be transferred to the lottery profits education 9298
fund under division (B) of section 3770.06 of the Revised Code. 9299
(6) Rules establishing any of the following with respect 9300
to the operation of video implementing internet lottery terminal 9301
games: 9302
(a) Any fees, fines, or payment schedules; 9303
(b) Any voluntary exclusion program gaming; 9304
(7) Rules specifying the circumstances under which the 9305
commission, instead of a type C sports gaming proprietor, is 9306
responsible for withholding amounts from lottery sports gaming 9307
winnings under sections 3770.071, 3770.072, and 3770.073 of the 9308
Revised Code. 9309
(C) Chapter Chapters 2915., 3768., and 3771. of the 9310
Revised Code does do not apply to, affect, or prohibit lotteries 9311
conducted pursuant to this chapter. 9312
(D) The commission may promulgate rules pursuant to 9313
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish any standards 9314
governing the display of advertising and celebrity images on 9315
lottery tickets and on other items that are used in the conduct 9316
of, or to promote, the statewide lottery and statewide joint 9317
lottery games. Any revenue derived from the sale of advertising 9318
displayed on lottery tickets and on those other items shall be 9319
considered, for purposes of section 3770.06 of the Revised Code, 9320
to be related proceeds in connection with the statewide lottery 9321
or gross proceeds from statewide joint lottery games, as 9322
applicable. 9323
(E)(1) The commission shall meet with the director at 9324
least once each month and shall convene other meetings at the 9325
request of the chairperson or any five of the members. No action 9326

S. B. No. 197 Page 318
As Introduced
taken by the commission shall be binding unless at least five of 9327
the members present vote in favor of the action. A written 9328
record shall be made of the proceedings of each meeting and 9329
shall be transmitted forthwith to the governor, the president of 9330
the senate, the senate minority leader, the speaker of the house 9331
of representatives, and the house minority leader. 9332
(2) The director shall present to the commission a report 9333
each month, showing the total revenues, prize disbursements, and 9334
operating expenses of the state lottery for the preceding month. 9335
As soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year, the 9336
commission shall prepare and transmit to the governor and the 9337
general assembly a report of lottery revenues, prize 9338
disbursements, and operating expenses for the preceding fiscal 9339
year and any recommendations for legislation considered 9340
necessary by the commission. 9341
Sec. 3770.05. (A) As used in this section, "person" means 9342
any individual, association, corporation, limited liability 9343
company, partnership, club, trust, estate, society, receiver, 9344
trustee, person acting in a fiduciary or representative 9345
capacity, instrumentality of the state or any of its political 9346
subdivisions, or any other business entity or combination of 9347
individuals meeting the requirements set forth in this section 9348
or established by rule or order of the state lottery commission. 9349
(B) The Except as otherwise provided in sections 3770.21 9350
to 3770.22 of the Revised Code, the director of the state 9351
lottery commission may license any person as a lottery sales 9352
agent. 9353
Before issuing any license to a lottery sales agent, the 9354
director shall consider all of the following: 9355

S. B. No. 197 Page 319
As Introduced
(1) The financial responsibility and security of the 9356
applicant and the applicant's business or activity; 9357
(2) The accessibility of the applicant's place of business 9358
or activity to the public; 9359
(3) The sufficiency of existing licensed agents to serve 9360
the public interest; 9361
(4) The volume of expected sales by the applicant; 9362
(5) Any other factors pertaining to the public interest, 9363
convenience, or trust. 9364
(C) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (F) and (G) 9365
of this section, the director of the state lottery commission 9366
may refuse to grant, or may suspend or revoke, a license if the 9367
applicant or licensee: 9368
(1) Has been convicted of a felony or has been convicted 9369
of a crime involving moral turpitude; 9370
(2) Has been convicted of an offense that involves illegal 9371
gambling; 9372
(3) Has been found guilty of fraud or misrepresentation in 9373
any connection; 9374
(4) Has been found to have violated any rule or order of 9375
the commission; or 9376
(5) Has been convicted of illegal trafficking in 9377
supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits. 9378
(D) Except as otherwise provided in division (G) of this 9379
section, the director of the state lottery commission may refuse 9380
to grant, or may suspend or revoke, a license if the applicant 9381
or licensee is a corporation or other business entity, and any 9382

S. B. No. 197 Page 320
As Introduced
of the following applies: 9383
(1) Any of the directors, officers, managers, or 9384
controlling shareholders has been found guilty of any of the 9385
activities specified in divisions (C)(1) to (5) of this section; 9386
(2) It appears to the director of the state lottery 9387
commission that, due to the experience or general fitness of any 9388
director, officer, manager, or controlling shareholder, the 9389
granting of a license as a lottery sales agent would be 9390
inconsistent with the public interest, convenience, or trust; 9391
(3) The corporation or other business entity is not the 9392
owner or lessee of the business at which it would conduct a 9393
lottery sales agency pursuant to the license applied for; 9394
(4) Any person, firm, association, or corporation other 9395
than the applicant or licensee shares or will share in the 9396
profits of the applicant or licensee, other than receiving 9397
dividends or distributions as a shareholder, or participates or 9398
will participate in the management of the affairs of the 9399
applicant or licensee. 9400
(E)(1) The director of the state lottery commission shall 9401
revoke a lottery sales agent license if the applicant or 9402
licensee is or has been convicted of a violation of division (A) 9403
or (C)(1) of section 2913.46 of the Revised Code. 9404
(2) The director shall revoke the lottery sales agent 9405
license of a corporation if the corporation is or has been 9406
convicted of a violation of division (A) or (C)(1) of section 9407
2913.46 of the Revised Code. 9408
(F) The director of the state lottery commission shall not 9409
refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a 9410
conviction of an offense unless the refusal is in accordance 9411

S. B. No. 197 Page 321
As Introduced
with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. 9412
(G) The director of the state lottery commission shall 9413
request the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, 9414
the department of public safety, or any other state, local, or 9415
federal agency to supply the director with the criminal records 9416
of any applicant for a lottery sales agent license, and may 9417
periodically request the criminal records of any person to whom 9418
a lottery sales agent license has been issued. At or prior to 9419
the time of making such a request, the director shall require an 9420
applicant or licensee to obtain fingerprint impressions on 9421
fingerprint cards prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau 9422
of criminal identification and investigation at a qualified law 9423
enforcement agency, and the director shall cause those 9424
fingerprint cards to be forwarded to the bureau of criminal 9425
identification and investigation, to the federal bureau of 9426
investigation, or to both bureaus. The commission shall assume 9427
the cost of obtaining the fingerprint cards. 9428
The director shall pay to each agency supplying criminal 9429
records for each investigation a reasonable fee, as determined 9430
by the agency. 9431
The commission may adopt uniform rules specifying time 9432
periods after which the persons described in divisions (C)(1) to 9433
(5) and (D)(1) to (4) of this section may be issued a license 9434
and establishing requirements for those persons to seek a court 9435
order to have records sealed in accordance with law. 9436
(H)(1) Each applicant for a lottery sales agent license 9437
shall do both of the following: 9438
(a) Pay fees to the state lottery commission, if required 9439
by rule adopted by the director under Chapter 119. of the 9440

S. B. No. 197 Page 322
As Introduced
Revised Code and the controlling board approves the fees; 9441
(b) Prior to approval of the application, obtain a surety 9442
bond in an amount the director determines by rule adopted under 9443
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code or, alternatively, with the 9444
director's approval, deposit the same amount into a dedicated 9445
account for the benefit of the state lottery. The director also 9446
may approve the obtaining of a surety bond to cover part of the 9447
amount required, together with a dedicated account deposit to 9448
cover the remainder of the amount required. The director also 9449
may establish an alternative program or policy, with the 9450
approval of the commission by rule adopted under Chapter 119. of 9451
the Revised Code, that otherwise ensures the lottery's financial 9452
interests are adequately protected. If such an alternative 9453
program or policy is established, an applicant or lottery sales 9454
agent, subject to the director's approval, may be permitted to 9455
participate in the program or proceed under that policy in lieu 9456
of providing a surety bond or dedicated amount. 9457
A surety bond may be with any company that complies with 9458
the bonding and surety laws of this state and the requirements 9459
established by rules of the commission pursuant to this chapter. 9460
A dedicated account deposit shall be conducted in accordance 9461
with policies and procedures the director establishes. 9462
A surety bond, dedicated account, other established 9463
program or policy, or any combination of these resources, as 9464
applicable, may be used to pay for the lottery sales agent's 9465
failure to make prompt and accurate payments for lottery ticket 9466
sales, for missing or stolen lottery tickets, for damage to 9467
equipment or materials issued to the lottery sales agent, or to 9468
pay for expenses the commission incurs in connection with the 9469
lottery sales agent's license. 9470

S. B. No. 197 Page 323
As Introduced
(2) A lottery sales agent license is effective for at 9471
least one year, but not more than three years. 9472
A licensed lottery sales agent, on or before the date 9473
established by the director, shall renew the agent's license and 9474
provide at that time evidence to the director that the surety 9475
bond, dedicated account deposit, or both, required under 9476
division (H)(1)(b) of this section has been renewed or is 9477
active, whichever applies. 9478
Before the commission renews a lottery sales agent 9479
license, the lottery sales agent shall submit a renewal fee to 9480
the commission, if one is required by rule adopted by the 9481
director under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and the 9482
controlling board approves the renewal fee. The renewal fee 9483
shall not exceed the actual cost of administering the license 9484
renewal and processing changes reflected in the renewal 9485
application. The renewal of the license is effective for at 9486
least one year, but not more than three years. 9487
(3) A lottery sales agent license shall be complete, 9488
accurate, and current at all times during the term of the 9489
license. Any changes to an original license application or a 9490
renewal application may subject the applicant or lottery sales 9491
agent, as applicable, to paying an administrative fee that shall 9492
be in an amount that the director determines by rule adopted 9493
under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, and that the controlling 9494
board approves, and that shall not exceed the actual cost of 9495
administering and processing the changes to an application. 9496
(4) The relationship between the commission and a lottery 9497
sales agent is one of trust. A lottery sales agent collects 9498
funds on behalf of the commission through the sale of lottery 9499
tickets for which the agent receives a compensation. 9500

S. B. No. 197 Page 324
As Introduced
(I) Pending a final resolution of any question arising 9501
under this section, the director of the state lottery commission 9502
may issue a temporary lottery sales agent license, subject to 9503
the terms and conditions the director considers appropriate. 9504
(J) If a lottery sales agent's rental payments for the 9505
lottery sales agent's premises are determined, in whole or in 9506
part, by the amount of retail sales the lottery sales agent 9507
makes, and if the rental agreement does not expressly provide 9508
that the amount of those retail sales includes the amounts the 9509
lottery sales agent receives from lottery ticket sales, only the 9510
amounts the lottery sales agent receives as compensation from 9511
the state lottery commission for selling lottery tickets shall 9512
be considered to be amounts the lottery sales agent receives 9513
from the retail sales the lottery sales agent makes, for the 9514
purpose of computing the lottery sales agent's rental payments. 9515
Sec. 3770.06. (A) There is hereby created the state 9516
lottery gross revenue fund, which shall be in the custody of the 9517
treasurer of state but shall not be part of the state treasury. 9518
All gross revenues received from sales of lottery tickets, 9519
fines, fees, and related proceeds in connection with the 9520
statewide lottery, all gross proceeds of lottery sports gaming 9521
described in sections 3770.23 to 3770.24 and 3770.25 of the 9522
Revised Code, and all gross proceeds from statewide joint 9523
lottery games shall be deposited into the fund. The treasurer of 9524
state shall invest any portion of the fund not needed for 9525
immediate use in the same manner as, and subject to all 9526
provisions of law with respect to the investment of, state 9527
funds. The treasurer of state shall disburse money from the fund 9528
on order of the director of the state lottery commission or the 9529
director's designee. 9530

S. B. No. 197 Page 325
As Introduced
Except for gross proceeds from statewide joint lottery 9531
games, all revenues of the state lottery gross revenue fund that 9532
are not paid to holders of winning lottery tickets, that are not 9533
required to meet short-term prize liabilities, that are not 9534
credited to lottery sales agents in the form of bonuses, 9535
commissions, or reimbursements, that are not paid to financial 9536
institutions to reimburse those institutions for sales agent 9537
nonsufficient funds, and that are collected from sales agents 9538
for remittance to insurers under contract to provide sales agent 9539
bonding services shall be transferred to the state lottery fund, 9540
which is hereby created in the state treasury. In addition, all 9541
revenues of the state lottery gross revenue fund that represent 9542
the gross proceeds from the statewide joint lottery games and 9543
that are not paid to holders of winning lottery tickets, that 9544
are not required to meet short-term prize liabilities, that are 9545
not credited to lottery sales agents in the form of bonuses, 9546
commissions, or reimbursements, and that are not necessary to 9547
cover operating expenses associated with those games or to 9548
otherwise comply with the agreements signed by the governor that 9549
the director enters into under division (J) of section 3770.02 9550
of the Revised Code or the rules the commission adopts under 9551
division (B)(5) of section 3770.03 of the Revised Code shall be 9552
transferred to the state lottery fund. All investment earnings 9553
of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys shall be 9554
disbursed from the fund pursuant to vouchers approved by the 9555
director. Total disbursements for monetary prize awards to 9556
holders of winning lottery tickets in connection with the 9557
statewide lottery, other than lottery sports gaming, and 9558
purchases of goods and services awarded as prizes to holders of 9559
winning lottery tickets shall be of an amount equal to at least 9560
fifty per cent of the total revenue accruing from the sale of 9561
lottery tickets. 9562

S. B. No. 197 Page 326
As Introduced
(B) Pursuant to Section 6 of Article XV, Ohio 9563
Constitution, there is hereby established in the state treasury 9564
the lottery profits education fund. Whenever, in the judgment of 9565
the director of the state lottery commission, the amount to the 9566
credit of the state lottery fund that does not represent 9567
proceeds from statewide joint lottery games is in excess of that 9568
needed to meet the maturing obligations of the commission and as 9569
working capital for its further operations, the director of the 9570
state lottery commission shall recommend the amount of the 9571
excess to be transferred to the lottery profits education fund, 9572
and the director of budget and management may transfer the 9573
excess to the lottery profits education fund in connection with 9574
the statewide lottery. In addition, whenever, in the judgment of 9575
the director of the state lottery commission, the amount to the 9576
credit of the state lottery fund that represents proceeds from 9577
statewide joint lottery games equals the entire net proceeds of 9578
those games as described in division (B)(5) of section 3770.03 9579
of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under that division, 9580
the director of the state lottery commission shall recommend the 9581
amount of the proceeds to be transferred to the lottery profits 9582
education fund, and the director of budget and management may 9583
transfer those proceeds to the lottery profits education fund. 9584
Investment earnings of the lottery profits education fund shall 9585
be credited to the fund. 9586
The lottery profits education fund shall be used solely 9587
for the support of elementary, secondary, vocational, and 9588
special education programs as determined in appropriations made 9589
by the general assembly, or as provided in applicable bond 9590
proceedings for the payment of debt service on obligations 9591
issued to pay costs of capital facilities, including those for a 9592
system of common schools throughout the state pursuant to 9593

S. B. No. 197 Page 327
As Introduced
section 2n of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution. When determining 9594
the availability of money in the lottery profits education fund, 9595
the director of budget and management may consider all balances 9596
and estimated revenues of the fund. 9597
(C) There is hereby established in the state treasury the 9598
deferred prizes trust fund. With the approval of the director of 9599
budget and management, an amount sufficient to fund annuity 9600
prizes shall be transferred from the state lottery fund and 9601
credited to the trust fund. The treasurer of state shall credit 9602
all earnings arising from investments purchased under this 9603
division to the trust fund. Within sixty days after the end of 9604
each fiscal year, the treasurer of state shall certify to the 9605
director of budget and management whether the actuarial amount 9606
of the trust fund is sufficient over the fund's life for 9607
continued funding of all remaining deferred prize liabilities as 9608
of the last day of the fiscal year just ended. Also, within that 9609
sixty days, the director of budget and management shall certify 9610
the amount of investment earnings necessary to have been 9611
credited to the trust fund during the fiscal year just ending to 9612
provide for such continued funding of deferred prizes. Any 9613
earnings credited in excess of the latter certified amount shall 9614
be transferred to the lottery profits education fund. 9615
To provide all or a part of the amounts necessary to fund 9616
deferred prizes awarded by the commission in connection with the 9617
statewide lottery, the treasurer of state, in consultation with 9618
the commission, may invest moneys contained in the deferred 9619
prizes trust fund which represents proceeds from the statewide 9620
lottery in obligations of the type permitted for the investment 9621
of state funds but whose maturities are thirty years or less. 9622
Notwithstanding the requirements of any other section of the 9623
Revised Code, to provide all or part of the amounts necessary to 9624

S. B. No. 197 Page 328
As Introduced
fund deferred prizes awarded by the commission in connection 9625
with statewide joint lottery games, the treasurer of state, in 9626
consultation with the commission, may invest moneys in the trust 9627
fund which represent proceeds derived from the statewide joint 9628
lottery games in accordance with the rules the commission adopts 9629
under division (B)(5) of section 3770.03 of the Revised Code. 9630
Investments of the trust fund are not subject to the provisions 9631
of division (A)(11) of section 135.143 of the Revised Code 9632
limiting to twenty-five per cent the amount of the state's total 9633
average portfolio that may be invested in debt interests other 9634
than commercial paper and limiting to five per cent the amount 9635
that may be invested in debt interests, including commercial 9636
paper, of a single issuer. 9637
All purchases made under this division shall be effected 9638
on a delivery versus payment method and shall be in the custody 9639
of the treasurer of state. 9640
The treasurer of state may retain an investment advisor, 9641
if necessary. The commission shall pay any costs incurred by the 9642
treasurer of state in retaining an investment advisor. 9643
(D) The auditor of state shall conduct annual audits of 9644
all funds and any other audits as the auditor of state or the 9645
general assembly considers necessary. The auditor of state may 9646
examine all records, files, and other documents of the 9647
commission, and records of lottery sales agents that pertain to 9648
their activities as agents, for purposes of conducting 9649
authorized audits. 9650
(E) The state lottery commission shall establish an 9651
internal audit plan before the beginning of each fiscal year, 9652
subject to the approval of the office of internal audit in the 9653
office of budget and management. At the end of each fiscal year, 9654

S. B. No. 197 Page 329
As Introduced
the commission shall prepare and submit an annual report to the 9655
office of internal audit for the office's review and approval, 9656
specifying the internal audit work completed by the end of that 9657
fiscal year and reporting on compliance with the annual internal 9658
audit plan. 9659
(F) Whenever, in the judgment of the director of budget 9660
and management, an amount of net state lottery proceeds is 9661
necessary to be applied to the payment of debt service on 9662
obligations, all as defined in sections 151.01 and 151.03 of the 9663
Revised Code, the director shall transfer that amount directly 9664
from the state lottery fund or from the lottery profits 9665
education fund to the bond service fund defined in those 9666
sections. The provisions of this division are subject to any 9667
prior pledges or obligation of those amounts to the payment of 9668
bond service charges as defined in division (C) of section 9669
3318.21 of the Revised Code, as referred to in division (B) of 9670
this section. 9671
Sec. 3770.07. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (A)(2) 9672
of this section, lottery prize awards shall be claimed by the 9673
holder of the winning lottery product, or by the executor or 9674
administrator, or the trustee of a trust, of the estate of a 9675
deceased holder of a winning lottery product, in a manner to be 9676
determined by the state lottery commission, within one hundred 9677
eighty days after the date on which the prize award was 9678
announced if the lottery game is an online game, within one 9679
hundred eighty days after the close of the game if the lottery 9680
game is an instant game, and within one hundred eighty days 9681
after the end of the sporting event or series of sporting events 9682
on which the wager was placed if the lottery game is lottery 9683
sports gaming. 9684

S. B. No. 197 Page 330
As Introduced
Any lottery prize award with a value that meets or exceeds 9685
the reportable winnings amounts set by 26 U.S.C. 6041, or a 9686
subsequent analogous section of the Internal Revenue Code, shall 9687
not be claimed by or paid to any person, as defined in section 9688
1.59 of the Revised Code or as defined by rule or order of the 9689
state lottery commission, until the name, address, and social 9690
security number of each beneficial owner of the prize award are 9691
documented for the commission. Except when a beneficial owner 9692
otherwise consents in writing, in the case of a claim for a 9693
lottery prize award made by one or more beneficial owners using 9694
a trust, the name, address, and social security number of each 9695
such beneficial owner in the commission's records as a result of 9696
such a disclosure are confidential and shall not be subject to 9697
inspection or copying under section 149.43 of the Revised Code 9698
as a public record. 9699
Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(1) of this 9700
section or as otherwise provided by law, the name and address of 9701
any individual claiming a lottery prize award are subject to 9702
inspection or copying under section 149.43 of the Revised Code 9703
as a public record. 9704
(2) An eligible person serving on active military duty in 9705
any branch of the United States armed forces during a war or 9706
national emergency declared in accordance with federal law may 9707
submit a delayed claim for a lottery prize award. The eligible 9708
person shall do so by notifying the state lottery commission 9709
about the claim not later than the three hundred sixtieth day 9710
after the applicable deadline specified under division (A)(1) of 9711
this section. 9712
(3) If no valid claim to a lottery prize award is made 9713
within the prescribed period, the prize money, the cost of goods 9714

S. B. No. 197 Page 331
As Introduced
and services awarded as prizes, or, if goods or services awarded 9715
as prizes are resold by the state lottery commission, the 9716
proceeds from their sale shall be returned to the state lottery 9717
fund and distributed in accordance with section 3770.06 of the 9718
Revised Code. 9719
(4) The state lottery commission may share with other 9720
governmental agencies the name, address, and social security 9721
number of a beneficial owner disclosed to the commission under 9722
division (A)(1) of this section, as authorized under sections 9723
3770.071 and 3770.073 of the Revised Code. Any shared 9724
information as disclosed pursuant to those sections that is made 9725
confidential by division (A)(1) of this section remains 9726
confidential and shall not be subject to inspection or copying 9727
under section 149.43 of the Revised Code as a public record 9728
unless the applicable beneficial owner otherwise provides 9729
written consent. 9730
(5) As used in this division: 9731
(a) "Eligible person" means a person who is entitled to a 9732
lottery prize award and who falls into either of the following 9733
categories: 9734
(i) While on active military duty in this state, the 9735
person, as the result of a war or national emergency declared in 9736
accordance with federal law, is transferred out of this state 9737
before the applicable deadline specified under division (A)(1) 9738
of this section. 9739
(ii) While serving in the reserve forces in this state, 9740
the person, as the result of a war or national emergency 9741
declared in accordance with federal law, is placed on active 9742
military duty and is transferred out of this state before the 9743

S. B. No. 197 Page 332
As Introduced
applicable deadline specified under division (A)(1) of this 9744
section. 9745
(b) "Active military duty" means that a person is covered 9746
by the "Servicemembers Civil Relief Act," 117 Stat. 2835 (2003), 9747
50 U.S.C. 501 et seq., as amended, or the "Uniformed Services 9748
Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994," 108 Stat. 3149, 9749
38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq., as amended. 9750
(c) "Each beneficial owner" means the ultimate recipient 9751
or, if there is more than one, each ultimate recipient of a 9752
lottery prize award. 9753
(B) If (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B) 9754
(2) of this section, if a prize winner, as defined in section 9755
3770.10 of the Revised Code, is under eighteen years of age or, 9756
in the case of lottery sports gaming, under twenty-one years of 9757
age, or is under some other legal disability, and the prize 9758
money or the cost of goods or services awarded as a prize 9759
exceeds one thousand dollars, the director of the state lottery 9760
commission shall order that payment be made to the order of the 9761
legal guardian of that prize winner. If the amount of the prize 9762
money or the cost of goods or services awarded as a prize is one 9763
thousand dollars or less, the director may order that payment be 9764
made to the order of the adult member, if any, of that prize 9765
winner's family legally responsible for the care of that prize 9766
winner. 9767
(2) If an individual under twenty-one years of age 9768
participates in video lottery terminal gaming or lottery sports 9769
gaming, the play or wager is void and the individual forfeits 9770
all credits or amounts wagered. 9771
(C) No right of any prize winner, as defined in section 9772

S. B. No. 197 Page 333
As Introduced
3770.10 of the Revised Code, to a prize award shall be the 9773
subject of a security interest or used as collateral. 9774
(D)(1) No right of any prize winner, as defined in section 9775
3770.10 of the Revised Code, to a prize award shall be 9776
assignable except as follows: when the payment is to be made to 9777
the executor or administrator, or the trustee of a trust, of the 9778
estate of a prize winner; when the award of a prize is disputed, 9779
any person may be awarded a prize award to which another has 9780
claimed title, pursuant to the order of a court of competent 9781
jurisdiction; when a person is awarded a prize award to which 9782
another has claimed title, pursuant to the order of a federal 9783
bankruptcy court under Title 11 of the United States Code; or as 9784
provided in sections 3770.10 3770.11 to 3770.14 of the Revised 9785
Code. 9786
(2)(a) No right of any prize winner, as defined in section 9787
3770.10 of the Revised Code, to a prize award with a remaining 9788
unpaid balance of less than one hundred thousand dollars shall 9789
be subject to garnishment, attachment, execution, withholding, 9790
or deduction except as provided in sections 3119.80, 3119.81, 9791
3121.02, 3121.03, and 3123.06 of the Revised Code or when the 9792
director is to make a payment pursuant to section 3770.071 or 9793
3770.073 of the Revised Code. 9794
(b) No right of any prize winner, as defined in section 9795
3770.10 of the Revised Code, to a prize award with an unpaid 9796
balance of one hundred thousand dollars or more shall be subject 9797
to garnishment, attachment, execution, withholding, or deduction 9798
except as follows: as provided in sections 3119.80, 3119.81, 9799
3121.02, 3121.03, and 3123.06 of the Revised Code; when the 9800
director is to make a payment pursuant to section 3770.071 or 9801
3770.073 of the Revised Code; or pursuant to the order of a 9802

S. B. No. 197 Page 334
As Introduced
court of competent jurisdiction located in this state in a 9803
proceeding in which the state lottery commission is a named 9804
party, in which case the garnishment, attachment, execution, 9805
withholding, or deduction pursuant to the order shall be 9806
subordinate to any payments to be made pursuant to section 9807
3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, 3123.06, 3770.071, or 9808
3770.073 of the Revised Code. 9809
(3) The state lottery commission may adopt and amend rules 9810
pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to 9811
implement division (D) of this section, to provide for payments 9812
from prize awards subject to garnishment, attachment, execution, 9813
withholding, or deduction, and to comply with any applicable 9814
requirements of federal law. 9815
(4) Upon making payments from a prize award as required by 9816
division (D) of this section, the director and the state lottery 9817
commission are discharged from all further liability for those 9818
payments, whether they are made to an executor, administrator, 9819
trustee, judgment creditor, or another person, or to the prize 9820
winner, as defined in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code. 9821
(5) The state lottery commission shall adopt rules 9822
pursuant to section 3770.03 of the Revised Code concerning the 9823
payment of prize awards upon the death of a prize winner, as 9824
defined in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code. Upon the death 9825
of a prize winner, the remainder of the prize winner's prize 9826
award, to the extent it is not subject to a transfer agreement 9827
under sections 3770.10 3770.11 to 3770.14 of the Revised Code, 9828
may be paid to the executor, administrator, or trustee in the 9829
form of a discounted lump sum cash settlement. 9830
(E) No lottery prize award shall be awarded to or for any 9831
officer or employee of the state lottery commission, any officer 9832

S. B. No. 197 Page 335
As Introduced
or employee of the auditor of state actively auditing, 9833
coordinating, or observing commission drawings, or any blood 9834
relative or spouse of such an officer or employee of the 9835
commission or auditor of state living as a member of the 9836
officer's or employee's household, nor shall any such officer, 9837
employee, blood relative, or spouse attempt to claim a lottery 9838
prize award. 9839
(F) The director may prohibit vendors to the state lottery 9840
commission and their employees from being awarded a lottery 9841
prize award. 9842
(G) Upon the payment of prize awards pursuant to a 9843
provision of this section, other than a provision of division 9844
(D) of this section, the director and the state lottery 9845
commission are discharged from all further liability for their 9846
payment. Installment payments of lottery prize awards shall be 9847
paid by official check or warrant, and they shall be sent by 9848
mail delivery to the prize winner's address within the United 9849
States or by electronic funds transfer to an established bank 9850
account located within the United States, or the prize winner 9851
may pick them up at an office of the commission. 9852
Sec. 3770.071. (A) As used in this section, "lottery prize 9853
award" does not include a prize award from a video lottery 9854
terminal and does not include winnings from lottery sports 9855
gaming from which, under the rules of the commission, the type C 9856
sports gaming proprietor is responsible for withholding amounts. 9857
(B) If the amount of the prize money or the cost of goods 9858
or services awarded as a lottery prize award meets or exceeds 9859
the reportable winnings amounts set by 26 U.S.C. 6041, or a 9860
subsequent analogous section of the Internal Revenue Code, the 9861
director of the state lottery commission or the director's 9862

S. B. No. 197 Page 336
As Introduced
designee shall consult the data match program established under 9863
section 3123.89 of the Revised Code to determine whether the 9864
person is subject to a final and enforceable determination of 9865
default made under sections 3123.01 to 3123.07 of the Revised 9866
Code. If so, the director or the director's designee shall 9867
withhold an amount from the prize award in accordance with 9868
section 3123.89 of the Revised Code. 9869
Sec. 3770.072. (A) As used in division (B) of this 9870
section, "prize winner," "transferee," and "transferor" have the 9871
same meanings as in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code "lottery 9872
prize award" does not include a prize award from a video lottery 9873
terminal and does not include winnings from lottery sports 9874
gaming from which, under the rules of the commission, the type C 9875
sports gaming proprietor is responsible for withholding amounts. 9876
(B) The state lottery commission shall deduct amounts from 9877
lottery prize awards and file returns in accordance with 9878
sections section 5747.062 and 5747.064 of the Revised Code and 9879
any rules adopted by the tax commissioner pursuant to those 9880
sections that section. This division also applies to lottery 9881
prize award payments the commission remits to transferees. 9882
(C)(1)(a) Each transferee shall deduct and withhold from 9883
each gross amount payable to each prize winner four per cent of 9884
the gross amount payable prior to making any other reduction 9885
required by this chapter. 9886
(b) Subject to division (C)(1)(c) of this section, each 9887
transferee, including any transferee that is a related member, 9888
as defined in section 5733.042 of the Revised Code, to the 9889
transferor, shall deduct and withhold from each amount payable 9890
to a transferor that is not a prize winner four per cent of the 9891
portion of the payment representing gain or income the 9892

S. B. No. 197 Page 337
As Introduced
transferor will recognize in connection with the payment. 9893
(c) For purposes of division (C)(1)(b) of this section, 9894
the portion of any payment representing gain or income 9895
recognized by the transferor shall be computed in accordance 9896
with the Internal Revenue Code. The transferor shall prepare a 9897
written statement setting forth that amount and sign the 9898
statement under penalty of perjury. Within five days before the 9899
date on which the payment is to be made, the transferor shall 9900
deliver the written statement to the transferee and deliver a 9901
copy of the written statement to the tax commissioner. If the 9902
transferee does not receive the written statement by the time 9903
the payment is made, the transferee shall withhold four per cent 9904
of the entire amount of the payment. If the tax commissioner 9905
notifies the transferee that the transferor has erroneously 9906
computed the amount of gain or income recognized, the transferee 9907
shall withhold four per cent of the entire amount of each 9908
payment to be made after the transferee receives the notice. 9909
(d) The tax commissioner may impose a penalty of up to one 9910
thousand dollars for any person failing to timely deliver to the 9911
tax commissioner the copy of the written statement as required 9912
by division (C)(1)(c) of this section. Proceeds from the 9913
imposition of the penalty shall be considered as revenue arising 9914
from the tax imposed under section 5733.06 or 5747.02 of the 9915
Revised Code, as applicable. 9916
(2) With respect to amounts deducted and withheld pursuant 9917
to division (C)(1) of this section, each transferee shall comply 9918
with divisions (A)(2) to (4) of section 5747.062 of the Revised 9919
Code. 9920
(3) An employee of a corporation, limited liability 9921
company, or business trust having control or supervision of or 9922

S. B. No. 197 Page 338
As Introduced
charged with the responsibility of filing the report and making 9923
the payment required by division (C) of this section and section 9924
5747.062 of the Revised Code, or an officer, member, manager, or 9925
trustee of a corporation, limited liability company, or business 9926
trust who is responsible for the execution of the corporation's, 9927
limited liability company's, or business trust's fiscal 9928
responsibilities, shall be personally liable for failure to file 9929
the report or pay the amount due as required by division (C) of 9930
this section and section 5747.062 of the Revised Code. The 9931
dissolution, termination, or bankruptcy of a corporation, 9932
limited liability company, or business trust does not discharge 9933
a responsible officer's, member's, manager's, employee's, or 9934
trustee's liability for a failure of the corporation, limited 9935
liability company, or business trust to file returns or pay the 9936
amount due. 9937
(4)(a) The tax commissioner may make an assessment against 9938
any person listed in division (C)(1) or (3) of this section for 9939
any deficiency for any period. Section 5747.13 of the Revised 9940
Code shall apply with respect to issuing assessments, filing 9941
petitions for reassessments, conducting hearings, issuing final 9942
determinations, making the assessment final, and filing the 9943
entry that makes the assessment final. Section 5717.02 of the 9944
Revised Code shall apply to appeals of the commissioner's final 9945
decision in connection with assessments issued pursuant to 9946
division (C)(4) of this section. 9947
(b) An assessment issued against any person listed in 9948
division (C)(1) or (3) of this section shall not be considered 9949
an election of remedies or a bar to an assessment against any 9950
other person for the failure to comply with division (C)(1) of 9951
this section. No assessment shall be issued against any person 9952
who is so listed if the amount required to be withheld has been 9953

S. B. No. 197 Page 339
As Introduced
paid by another. 9954
(c) The assessment shall include interest at the rate per 9955
annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code on 9956
liability from the time the payment is due until the date of 9957
assessment. Interest shall continue to accrue from the date of 9958
assessment until the date the assessment is paid in full. Any 9959
interest accruing subsequent to the date of the issuance of the 9960
assessment shall be considered to be an additional deficiency 9961
for which the tax commissioner may issue subsequent assessments. 9962
The initial assessment and any subsequent assessments may 9963
include a penalty in an amount not to exceed twice the 9964
applicable interest charged under this division. 9965
Sec. 3770.073. (A) As used in this section, "lottery prize 9966
award" does not include a prize award from a video lottery 9967
terminal and does not include winnings from lottery sports 9968
gaming from which, under the rules of the commission, the type C 9969
sports gaming proprietor is responsible for withholding amounts. 9970
(B) The attorney general shall provide the state lottery 9971
commission or its designee with access to the real time data 9972
match program described in section 131.02 of the Revised Code 9973
for the purpose of identifying prize winners who owe amounts to 9974
the state or a political subdivision. 9975
(C) If a person is entitled to a lottery prize award and 9976
is indebted to the state for the payment of any tax, workers' 9977
compensation premium, unemployment contribution, payment in lieu 9978
of unemployment contribution, or certified claim under section 9979
131.02 or 131.021 of the Revised Code, or is indebted to a 9980
political subdivision that has a certified claim under section 9981
131.02 of the Revised Code, owes lottery sales receipts held in 9982
trust on behalf of the state lottery commission as described in 9983

S. B. No. 197 Page 340
As Introduced
division (H)(4) of section 3770.05 of the Revised Code, or owes 9984
any charge, penalty, or interest arising from these any of those 9985
debts and if the amount of the prize money or the cost of goods 9986
or services awarded as a lottery prize award meets or exceeds 9987
the reportable winnings amount set by 26 U.S.C. 6041, the 9988
director of the state lottery commission, or the director's 9989
designee, shall do either of the following: 9990
(1) If the prize award will be paid in a lump sum, deduct 9991
from the prize award and pay to the attorney general an amount 9992
in satisfaction of the debt and pay any remainder to that 9993
person. If the amount of the prize award is less than the amount 9994
of the debt, the entire amount of the prize award shall be 9995
deducted and paid in partial satisfaction of the debt. 9996
(2) If the prize award will be paid in annual 9997
installments, on the date the initial installment payment is 9998
due, deduct from that installment and pay to the attorney 9999
general an amount in satisfaction of the debt and, if necessary 10000
to collect the full amount of the debt, do the same for any 10001
subsequent annual installments, at the time the installments 10002
become due and owing to the person, until the debt is fully 10003
satisfied. 10004
(B) (D) If a person entitled to a lottery prize award owes 10005
more than one debt, any debt owed to the state shall be 10006
satisfied first, subject to both section 5739.33 and division 10007
(G) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code having first 10008
priority, and subject to division (C)(E) of this section. 10009
(C) (E) Any debt owed under section 3770.071 of the 10010
Revised Code shall be satisfied with first priority over debts 10011
owed under this section. 10012

S. B. No. 197 Page 341
As Introduced
(D) (F) Except as provided in section 131.021 of the 10013
Revised Code, this section applies only to debts that have 10014
become final. 10015
Sec. 3770.08. (A) No person shall sell a lottery ticket at 10016
a price greater than that fixed by rule of the state lottery 10017
commission. 10018
(B) No person other than a licensed lottery sales agent 10019
shall sell lottery tickets, but nothing in this section shall be 10020
construed to prevent any person from giving lottery tickets to 10021
another as a gift. A transfer of lottery tickets by any person 10022
which is made in connection with a marketing, promotional, or 10023
advertising program shall be deemed to be a gift for the 10024
purposes of this chapter. 10025
(C) No (C)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions 10026
(C)(2) and (3) of this section, no person shall sell a lottery 10027
ticket to any person under eighteen years of age, and no person 10028
under eighteen years of age shall attempt to purchase a lottery 10029
ticket. 10030
(2) No person shall allow an individual under twenty-one 10031
years of age to participate in video lottery terminal gaming. 10032
(3) No person shall allow an individual under twenty-one 10033
years of age to participate in lottery sports gaming, as 10034
prohibited under section 3775.99 of the Revised Code. 10035
(D) No person, directly or indirectly, on behalf of self, 10036
or another, nor any organization, shall invite, solicit, demand, 10037
offer, or accept any payment, contribution, favor, or other 10038
consideration to influence the award, renewal, or retention of a 10039
lottery sales agent license. 10040
(E) Except as otherwise provided in this division, no 10041

S. B. No. 197 Page 342
As Introduced
person shall sell lottery tickets on any fairgrounds during any 10042
annual exhibition conducted in accordance with Chapter 991. or 10043
1711. of the Revised Code. "Fairgrounds" includes any land or 10044
property under the control or management of any agricultural 10045
society or of the Ohio expositions commission. This division 10046
does not apply to the sale of lottery tickets by the commission 10047
at the state fairground during the state fair. 10048
Sec. 3770.13. (A) A transferee shall file an application 10049
under sections 3770.10 3770.11 to 3770.14 of the Revised Code 10050
for the approval in advance of a transfer of a lottery prize 10051
award in a court of competent jurisdiction. 10052
(B) The following procedures shall apply to an application 10053
for the approval in advance by a court of a transfer of a 10054
lottery prize award under division (A) of this section: 10055
(1) Upon the filing of the application, the court shall 10056
set a date, time, and place for a hearing on the application and 10057
shall notify the transferee and transferor of the date, time, 10058
and place of the hearing. 10059
(2) Not less than thirty days prior to the date set by the 10060
court for the hearing on an application filed pursuant to this 10061
section, the transferee shall file with the court and shall 10062
serve on the state lottery commission, in the manner prescribed 10063
in the Rules of Civil Procedure for the service of process, a 10064
notice of the proposed transfer and the application for its 10065
approval in advance. The notice shall include all of the 10066
following: 10067
(a) A copy of the application; 10068
(b) A copy of the transfer agreement or, if the transferor 10069
is not a prize winner, a redacted copy of the transfer agreement 10070

S. B. No. 197 Page 343
As Introduced
that discloses sufficient information to allow the commission 10071
and the court to determine the validity of the transfer 10072
agreement; 10073
(c) If the transferor is a prize winner, a copy of the 10074
disclosure statement provided by the transferee pursuant to 10075
section 3770.11 of the Revised Code and signed by the prize 10076
winner pursuant to division (A) of section 3770.12 of the 10077
Revised Code; 10078
(d) The amounts and due dates of the lottery prize award 10079
payments that will be transferred under the transfer agreement; 10080
(e) Notification of the date, time, and place of the 10081
hearing on the application; 10082
(f) The complete name, address, and taxpayer 10083
identification number of the transferee. 10084
(3) The commission shall not be required to appear in or 10085
be named as a party to a hearing on the application, but may 10086
intervene as of right in the proceeding. 10087
(4) At the conclusion of the hearing on an application 10088
under this section, the court may grant or deny the approval of 10089
the transfer. The court shall enter its order accordingly. If 10090
the court grants the approval of the transfer, it shall include 10091
in its order all of the express findings specified in section 10092
3770.12 of the Revised Code. If the court denies the approval of 10093
the transfer, it shall include in its order the reasons for the 10094
denial. 10095
(5) An order of the court made under division (B)(4) of 10096
this section is a final and appealable order. 10097
Sec. 3770.21. (A) As used in this section: 10098

S. B. No. 197 Page 344
As Introduced
(1) "Video lottery terminal" means any electronic device 10099
approved by the state lottery commission that provides immediate 10100
prize determinations for participants on an electronic display 10101
that is located at a facility owned by a holder of a permit as 10102
defined in rule 3769-1-05 of the Administrative Code. 10103
(2) "Video lottery terminal promotional gaming credit" 10104
means a video lottery terminal game credit, discount, or other 10105
similar item issued to a patron to enable the placement of, or 10106
increase in, a wager at a video lottery terminal. 10107
(3) "Video lottery terminal income" means credits played, 10108
minus approved video lottery terminal promotional gaming 10109
credits, minus video lottery prize awards. 10110
(B) The state lottery commission shall include, in 10111
conjunction with the state racing commission, in any rules 10112
adopted concerning video lottery terminals, the level of minimum 10113
investments that must be made by video lottery terminal sales 10114
agents in the buildings, fixtures, equipment, facilities-related 10115
preparation, and grounds at the facilities, including temporary 10116
facilities, in which the terminals will be located, along with 10117
any standards and timetables for such investments. 10118
(C) The state lottery commission shall offer lottery 10119
gaming on video lottery terminals at tracks as part of the 10120
statewide lottery, in accordance with this chapter. The state 10121
lottery commission may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the 10122
Revised Code, in consultation with the Ohio casino control 10123
commission, to implement this section, so long as those rules 10124
are not in conflict with the rules of the Ohio casino control 10125
commission. 10126
(B) The Ohio casino control commission shall license each 10127

S. B. No. 197 Page 345
As Introduced
permit holder who meets the eligibility and suitability 10128
requirements of this chapter, Chapters 3769. and 3772. of the 10129
Revised Code, and the rules of the Ohio casino control 10130
commission as a video lottery sales agent to operate video 10131
lottery terminals at the permit holder's track on behalf of the 10132
state lottery commission under the terms of a contract between 10133
the video lottery sales agent and the state lottery commission. 10134
(C)(1) The Ohio casino control commission has jurisdiction 10135
over all persons operating, or participating in the operation 10136
of, video lottery terminals, including the authority to license, 10137
regulate, investigate, and penalize those persons in a manner 10138
that is consistent with the commission's authority with respect 10139
to casino gaming, provided that the state lottery commission is 10140
not required to be licensed by the Ohio casino control 10141
commission to operate video lottery terminals. 10142
(2) An individual described in division (A) of section 10143
3772.13 of the Revised Code shall hold a valid key gaming 10144
employee license issued by the commission under that section at 10145
all times. An individual whose duties with respect to video 10146
lottery terminal gaming are as described in division (A) of 10147
section 3772.131 of the Revised Code shall hold a valid gaming 10148
employee license issued by the commission under that section at 10149
all times. However, a member or employee of the state lottery 10150
commission is not required to have a key gaming employee or 10151
gaming employee license. 10152
(3) In all cases in which this chapter requires or allows 10153
the Ohio casino control commission to adopt rules concerning 10154
video lottery terminals, the commission shall adopt those rules 10155
under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. 10156
(D) A licensed video lottery sales agent may provide video 10157

S. B. No. 197 Page 346
As Introduced
lottery terminal promotional gaming credits or bonuses to 10158
patrons for video lottery terminal gaming, subject to the 10159
requirements of section 3772.231 of the Revised Code and the 10160
rules of the Ohio casino control commission. Video lottery 10161
terminal promotional gaming credits shall be subject to approval 10162
by the director of the state lottery commission. 10163
(D) (E) Video lottery terminal sales agents shall develop 10164
internal guidelines and controls for the purpose of giving 10165
minority business enterprises the ability to compete for the 10166
awarding of contracts to provide goods and services to those 10167
sales agents. As used in this division, "minority business 10168
enterprise" has the meaning defined in section 122.71 of the 10169
Revised Code. 10170
(E) (F) No license or excise tax or fee not in effect on 10171
the effective date of this section shall be assessed upon or 10172
collected from a video lottery terminal sales agent by any 10173
county, township, municipal corporation, school district, or 10174
other political subdivision of the state that has authority to 10175
assess or collect a tax or fee by reason of the video lottery 10176
terminal related conduct authorized by section 3770.03 of the 10177
Revised Code. This division does not prohibit the imposition of 10178
taxes under Chapter 718. or 3769. of the Revised Code. 10179
(F)(1) (G)(1) Any action asserting that this section or 10180
section 3770.03 of the Revised Code or any portion provision of 10181
those sections or any rule adopted under those sections violates 10182
any provision of the Ohio Constitution shall be brought in the 10183
court of common pleas of Franklin county within ninety days 10184
after the effective date of the amendment of this section by Am. 10185
Sub. H.B. 386 of the 129th general assembly or within ninety 10186
days after the effective day of any rule, as applicable 10187

S. B. No. 197 Page 347
As Introduced
applicable provision or rule. 10188
(2) Any claim asserting that any action taken by the 10189
governor or , the state lottery commission, or the Ohio casino 10190
control commission pursuant to those sections violates any 10191
provision of the Ohio Constitution or any provision of the 10192
Revised Code shall be brought in the court of common pleas of 10193
Franklin county within sixty days after the action is taken. 10194
(3) Divisions (F)(1) (G)(1) and (2) of this section do not 10195
apply to any claim within the original jurisdiction of the 10196
supreme court or a court of appeals under Article IV of the Ohio 10197
Constitution. 10198
(G) (H) The court of common pleas of Franklin county shall 10199
give any claim filed under division (F)(1) (G)(1) or (2) of this 10200
section priority over all other civil cases before the court, 10201
irrespective of position on the court's calendar, and shall make 10202
a determination on the claim expeditiously. A court of appeals 10203
shall give any appeal from a final order issued in a case 10204
brought pursuant to division (F) (G) of this section priority 10205
over all other civil cases before the court, irrespective of 10206
position on the court's calendar, and shall make a determination 10207
on the appeal expeditiously. 10208
Sec. 3770.211. (A) The Ohio casino control commission 10209
shall adopt rules that include all of the following: 10210
(1) The form and manner of applying for or renewing a 10211
video lottery sales agent license, which shall require all of 10212
the following: 10213
(a) That the applicant submit a nonrefundable application 10214
fee in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of processing the 10215
application; 10216

S. B. No. 197 Page 348
As Introduced
(b) That an applicant not be required to take action to 10217
satisfy any requirement for a video lottery sales agent license 10218
that is substantially similar to any requirement the applicant 10219
previously has satisfied in order to obtain or renew any other 10220
license issued by the Ohio casino control commission; 10221
(c) That upon being granted a video lottery sales agent 10222
license, the applicant give the state lottery commission a 10223
surety bond or dedicated account deposit as described in 10224
division (H) of section 3770.05 of the Revised Code; 10225
(d) That a video lottery sales agent license issued on or 10226
after the effective date of this section be valid for a term of 10227
five years. 10228
(2) Procedures for a video lottery sales agent to operate 10229
video lottery terminals; 10230
(3) The types of records video lottery sales agents are to 10231
keep; 10232
(4) The manner in which video lottery sales agents must 10233
verify that their patrons are at least twenty-one years of age; 10234
(5) Protections for a person participating in video 10235
lottery terminal gaming; 10236
(6) Measures to promote responsible video lottery terminal 10237
gaming; 10238
(7) Penalties and fines for violating this section or 10239
rules adopted under this section; 10240
(8) Restrictions to ensure that video lottery sales 10241
agents' advertisements for video lottery terminals meet the 10242
requirements of section 3772.41 of the Revised Code; 10243

S. B. No. 197 Page 349
As Introduced
(9) A requirement that each video lottery sales agent 10244
comply with the requirements of the Ohio voluntary exclusion 10245
program; 10246
(10) Any other procedure or thing the Ohio casino control 10247
commission determines necessary to implement the requirements of 10248
sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 or Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code 10249
or to ensure the integrity of video lottery terminal gaming. 10250
(C) The Ohio casino control commission shall adopt rules 10251
establishing minimum internal control standards for the 10252
administration of video lottery sales agents' operations, video 10253
lottery terminals, systems, or other items used by video lottery 10254
sales agents, and the maintenance of video lottery sales agents' 10255
financial records and other required records. The commission may 10256
approve minimum internal control standards proposed by video 10257
lottery sales agents. 10258
(D) The commission shall approve all video lottery 10259
terminals in accordance with section 3772.312 of the Revised 10260
Code and shall license all video lottery technology providers. 10261
(E)(1) The commission shall determine a permit holder's 10262
eligibility to hold or renew a video lottery sales agent license 10263
under this chapter, shall issue all video lottery sales agent 10264
licenses, and shall maintain a record of all video lottery sales 10265
agent licenses issued under this chapter. 10266
(2) The commission shall conduct a complete investigation 10267
of each applicant for a video lottery sales agent license to 10268
determine whether the applicant meets the requirements of this 10269
chapter and of the commission's rules each time the applicant 10270
applies for an initial or renewed video lottery sales agent 10271
license. The commission may initiate an additional licensing 10272

S. B. No. 197 Page 350
As Introduced
investigation or adjudication or reopen an existing licensing 10273
investigation or adjudication at any time. 10274
(F) The Ohio casino control commission shall levy and 10275
collect all fees, fines, and surcharges the Ohio casino control 10276
commission imposes under sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 and Chapter 10277
3772. of the Revised Code and rules adopted under those sections 10278
and that chapter and shall deposit all money collected in the 10279
casino control commission fund created under section 5753.03 of 10280
the Revised Code. 10281
(G)(1) The Ohio casino control commission, in an 10282
adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code 10283
and in accordance with section 3772.04 of the Revised Code, may 10284
do any of the following: 10285
(a) Penalize or fine any video lottery sales agent, 10286
applicant for a video lottery sales agent license, or other 10287
person who is subject to the commission's jurisdiction under 10288
sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code; 10289
(b) Limit, condition, restrict, suspend, revoke, deny, or 10290
refuse to renew any video lottery sales agent license. 10291
(2) The executive director of the Ohio casino control 10292
commission may issue an emergency order with respect to video 10293
lottery terminal gaming under division (G) of section 3772.04 of 10294
the Revised Code. 10295
(H)(1) The Ohio casino control commission shall monitor 10296
all video lottery terminal gaming conducted in this state, or 10297
shall contract with an independent integrity monitoring provider 10298
for that purpose, in order to identify any unusual activities or 10299
patterns that may indicate a need for further investigation. The 10300
Ohio casino control commission shall require each video lottery 10301

S. B. No. 197 Page 351
As Introduced
sales agent to participate in the monitoring system as part of 10302
the minimum internal control standards described in division (C) 10303
of this section. 10304
(2) The information in the monitoring system described in 10305
division (H)(1) of this section is not a public record. The 10306
commission may disclose the information in the monitoring system 10307
only as necessary for investigative or law enforcement purposes 10308
or pursuant to a court order. 10309
(I)(1) The executive director of the Ohio casino control 10310
commission and the director of the state lottery commission 10311
promptly shall report to the Ohio casino control commission any 10312
facts or circumstances related to the operation of video lottery 10313
terminals that constitute a violation of state or federal law. 10314
(2) The Ohio casino control commission and the state 10315
lottery commission shall cooperate with any investigation 10316
conducted by a law enforcement agency, including by providing, 10317
or facilitating the provision of, video lottery terminal gaming 10318
information and audio or video files related to video lottery 10319
terminal gaming. 10320
(3) A sheriff, chief of police, or prosecuting attorney 10321
shall furnish to the Ohio casino control commission, on forms 10322
prescribed by the commission, any information obtained 10323
concerning any apparent violation of this chapter or rules 10324
adopted under this chapter. If the information is considered a 10325
confidential law enforcement investigatory record under section 10326
149.43 of the Revised Code, the Ohio casino control commission 10327
shall not disclose the information to the public. 10328
(J)(1) The attorney general has a civil cause of action to 10329
restrain any violation of sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 or of 10330

S. B. No. 197 Page 352
As Introduced
rules adopted under those sections. Upon the request of the Ohio 10331
casino control commission or its executive director, the 10332
attorney general shall commence and prosecute such an action to 10333
completion. The court shall give priority to such an action over 10334
all other civil actions. 10335
(2) An action brought under division (J)(1) of this 10336
section does not preclude an administrative or criminal 10337
proceeding on the same facts. 10338
(3) The attorney general may enter into an agreement with 10339
a state or local law enforcement agency to carry out the duties 10340
described in division (J)(1) of this section. 10341
Sec. 3770.212. (A) The Ohio casino control commission 10342
shall not grant a video lottery sales agent license until it has 10343
determined that each person who has control of the applicant has 10344
met the qualifications for the license. All of the following 10345
persons are considered to have control of an applicant: 10346
(1) Each person associated with a corporate applicant, 10347
including any corporate holding company, parent company, or 10348
subsidiary company of the applicant, that has the ability to 10349
control the activities of the corporate applicant or elect a 10350
majority of the board of directors of that corporation, other 10351
than any bank or other licensed lending institution that holds a 10352
mortgage or other lien acquired in the ordinary course of 10353
business; 10354
(2) Each person associated with a noncorporate applicant 10355
that directly or indirectly holds a beneficial or proprietary 10356
interest in the applicant's business operation or that the 10357
commission otherwise determines has the ability to control the 10358
applicant; 10359

S. B. No. 197 Page 353
As Introduced
(3) Key personnel of an applicant, including any 10360
executive, employee, or agency, having the power to exercise 10361
significant influence over decisions concerning any part of the 10362
applicant's business operation. 10363
(B) A video lottery sales agent shall display its license 10364
conspicuously in its place of business or have the license 10365
available for inspection by any agent of the Ohio casino control 10366
commission, the state lottery commission, or any law enforcement 10367
agency. 10368
(C) A video lottery sales agent shall give the Ohio casino 10369
control commission written notice within ten days of any 10370
material change to any information provided in the video lottery 10371
sales agent's application for a license or renewal, as required 10372
under section 3772.113 of the Revised Code. 10373
(D) An applicant for a video lottery sales agent license 10374
shall establish the applicant's suitability for the license by 10375
clear and convincing evidence. 10376
(E) The Ohio casino control commission shall not grant a 10377
video lottery sales agent license to an applicant if evidence 10378
satisfactory to the commission exists that the applicant has 10379
done any of the following: 10380
(1) Knowingly made a false statement to the Ohio casino 10381
control commission or the state lottery commission; 10382
(2) Been suspended from operating a gambling game, gaming 10383
device, or gaming operation, or had a license revoked by any 10384
governmental unit of a national, state, or local body exercising 10385
governmental functions; 10386
(3) Been convicted of a disqualifying offense, as defined 10387
in section 3772.07 of the Revised Code; 10388

S. B. No. 197 Page 354
As Introduced
(4) Been directly involved in or employed by any offshore 10389
wagering market that illegally serviced the United States or 10390
otherwise accepted illegal wagers from individuals located in 10391
the United States on or after April 16, 2015. 10392
(F) The Ohio casino control commission may deny a video 10393
lottery sales agent license to any applicant, reprimand any 10394
video lottery sales agent, or suspend or revoke a video lottery 10395
sales agent license if any of the following are true: 10396
(1) The applicant or licensee has not demonstrated to the 10397
commission's satisfaction financial responsibility sufficient to 10398
adequately meet the requirements of the enterprise. 10399
(2) The applicant or licensee is not the true owner of the 10400
business or is not the sole owner and has not disclosed the 10401
existence or identity of other persons who have an ownership 10402
interest in the business. 10403
(3) The applicant or licensee is a corporation that sells 10404
more than five per cent of the corporation's voting stock, or 10405
more than five per cent of the voting stock of a corporation 10406
that controls the corporation, or sells the corporation's 10407
assets, other than those bought and sold in the ordinary course 10408
of business, or any interest in the assets, to any person who, 10409
under division (A) of this section, must meet the qualifications 10410
of a video lottery sales agent, and who has not already been 10411
determined by the commission to have met the applicable 10412
qualifications. 10413
(G) The Ohio casino control commission shall revoke a 10414
video lottery sales agent license if the video lottery sales 10415
agent ceases to be a permit holder. 10416
Sec. 3770.213. (A) A video lottery sales agent shall do 10417

S. B. No. 197 Page 355
As Introduced
all of the following: 10418
(1) Operate video lottery terminals in a manner that does 10419
not pose a threat to the public health, safety, or welfare of 10420
the citizens of this state; 10421
(2) Keep current in all payments and obligations to the 10422
Ohio casino control commission and the state lottery commission; 10423
(3) Provide a secure location for the placement, 10424
operation, and use of video lottery terminals; 10425
(4) Prevent any person from tampering with or interfering 10426
with the operation of video lottery terminals; 10427
(5) Ensure that video lottery terminal gaming is conducted 10428
within the sight and control of designated employees of the 10429
video lottery sales agent and that video lottery terminal gaming 10430
is conducted under continuous observation by security equipment 10431
in conformity with the specifications and requirements of the 10432
Ohio casino control commission; 10433
(6) Ensure that video lottery terminal gaming occurs only 10434
in the locations and manner approved by the Ohio casino control 10435
commission and the state lottery commission; 10436
(7) Maintain sufficient funds and other supplies to 10437
conduct video lottery terminal gaming at all times; 10438
(8) Maintain daily records showing the video lottery sales 10439
agent's video lottery terminal receipts and timely file with the 10440
Ohio casino control commission and the state lottery commission 10441
any additional reports required by rule or by other provisions 10442
of the Revised Code; 10443
(9) Comply with all applicable requirements of Chapter 10444
3772. of the Revised Code. 10445

S. B. No. 197 Page 356
As Introduced
(B) A video lottery sales agent is not liable under the 10446
laws of this state to any party, including a patron, for 10447
disclosing information as required under this chapter or for 10448
refusing to disclose information that is not required by law to 10449
be disclosed. 10450
Sec. 3770.214. (A) No individual who is on the Ohio casin o 10451
control commission's track exclusion list created under section 10452
3772.031 of the Revised Code shall enter a track operated by a 10453
video lottery sales agent or the grounds of such a track or 10454
participate in the play or operation of video lottery terminal 10455
gaming in this state. A video lottery sales agent shall employ 10456
commercially reasonable methods to prevent an individual who is 10457
on the commission's track exclusion list from engaging in video 10458
lottery terminal gaming conducted by the video lottery sales 10459
agent. 10460
(B)(1) A video lottery sales agent may exclude any 10461
individual from entering a track, or the grounds of a track, 10462
that is under the control of the video lottery sales agent and 10463
may exclude any individual from participating in the play or 10464
operation of video lottery terminal gaming conducted by the 10465
video lottery sales agent. The video lottery sales agent shall 10466
keep a list of all excluded individuals. No individual who is on 10467
a video lottery sales agent's exclusion list shall enter a 10468
track, or the grounds of a track, that is under the control of 10469
the video lottery sales agent or participate in the play or 10470
operation of video lottery terminal gaming conducted by the 10471
video lottery sales agent under this chapter. 10472
(2) If a video lottery sales agent excludes an individual 10473
because the video lottery sales agent determines that the 10474
individual engaged or attempted to engage in any gaming related 10475

S. B. No. 197 Page 357
As Introduced
activity that is prohibited under the laws of this state or 10476
rules of the Ohio casino control commission or the state lottery 10477
commission, the video lottery sales agent shall report that fact 10478
to the Ohio casino control commission and the state lottery 10479
commission. 10480
(C)(1) A video lottery sales agent shall employ 10481
commercially reasonable methods to prevent any person who is 10482
participating in the Ohio voluntary exclusion program from 10483
engaging in video lottery terminal gaming conducted by the video 10484
lottery sales agent. 10485
(2) Absent gross negligence, all of the following persons 10486
are immune from any type of civil liability on the basis that a 10487
person who is participating in the Ohio voluntary exclusion 10488
program enters or accesses a track or participates in video 10489
lottery terminal gaming conducted under this chapter: 10490
(a) The Ohio casino control commission, the state lottery 10491
commission, or any other agency of this state and its agents or 10492
employees; 10493
(b) A video lottery sales agent and its agents or 10494
employees. 10495
(D) No video lottery sales agent, no director, officer, 10496
agent, or employee of a video lottery sales agent, no other 10497
person who has a financial interest in a video lottery sales 10498
agent, and no person living in the same household as any of 10499
those persons, shall engage in any video lottery terminal gaming 10500
conducted by the video lottery sales agent, other than as part 10501
of operating video lottery terminals or as part of the 10502
employee's employment. A video lottery sales agent shall employ 10503
commercially reasonable methods to prevent those persons, and 10504

S. B. No. 197 Page 358
As Introduced
any other person who has access to confidential information held 10505
by the video lottery sales agent, from engaging in video lottery 10506
terminal gaming conducted by the video lottery sales agent. 10507
(E) No member or employee of the Ohio casino control 10508
commission or the state lottery commission shall knowingly 10509
participate in video lottery terminal gaming in this state. A 10510
video lottery sales agent shall employ commercially reasonable 10511
methods to prevent such a person from engaging in video lottery 10512
terminal gaming conducted by the video lottery sales agent. 10513
Sec. 3770.24. (A) The state lottery commission shall 10514
operate lottery sports gaming as part of the statewide lottery 10515
in accordance with this section and with Chapter 3775. of the 10516
Revised Code. The state lottery commission may adopt rules under 10517
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, in consultation with the Ohio 10518
casino control commission, to implement sections 3770.23 to 10519
3770.24 and 3770.25 of the Revised Code, so long as those rules 10520
are not in conflict with the rules of the Ohio casino control 10521
commission. 10522
(B)(1) Each type C sports gaming proprietor shall contract 10523
with the state lottery commission to operate lottery sports 10524
gaming on behalf of the state lottery commission in exchange for 10525
a portion of the state's proceeds from lottery sports gaming. 10526
(2) All provisions of Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code 10527
that apply to type C sports gaming proprietors and type C sports 10528
gaming hosts apply to those persons when they operate or offer 10529
lottery sports gaming. 10530
(3) A type C sports gaming proprietor may adapt any 10531
existing self-service or clerk-operated lottery terminals owned 10532
or operated by the sports gaming proprietor or the state lottery 10533

S. B. No. 197 Page 359
As Introduced
commission also to serve as lottery sports gaming terminals, 10534
subject to the rules of the Ohio casino control commission and 10535
the state lottery commission. 10536
Sec. 3770.25. (A) The state lottery commission shall offer 10537
lottery sports gaming only at type C sports gaming hosts' 10538
facilities on self-service or clerk-operated terminals, and only 10539
to individuals who are at least twenty-one years of age and who 10540
are physically present on the premises of the facility. 10541
(B) All of the following apply concerning lottery sports 10542
gaming: 10543
(1) If a type C sports gaming proprietor intends to 10544
install more than two terminals in any type C sports gaming 10545
host's facility, the type C sports gaming proprietor shall 10546
notify the Ohio casino control commission of that fact not later 10547
than seven days before installing the additional terminals. The 10548
commission may disallow the installation of more than two 10549
terminals in the facility, in accordance with the commission's 10550
rules. 10551
(2) The self-service terminal or the clerk, as applicable, 10552
shall verify that the lottery sports gaming participant is at 10553
least twenty-one years of age. 10554
(3) A type C sports gaming proprietor may offer only the 10555
following types of wagers on sporting events, as approved by the 10556
Ohio casino control commission: 10557
(a) Spread wagers; 10558
(b) Over-under wagers; 10559
(c) Moneyline wagers; 10560
(d) Parlay wagers that are based on not more than four 10561

S. B. No. 197 Page 360
As Introduced
component wagers. 10562
(4) A self-service terminal or clerk shall accept wagers 10563
only by cash, credit card, debit card, or electronic payment 10564
account. As used in this section, "electronic payment account" 10565
means an account maintained with a third party for purposes of 10566
making electronic payments, such as paypal, google pay, or apple 10567
pay, that is intended for general use and not only for sports 10568
gaming purposes. 10569
(5) (4) A self-service terminal or clerk shall not accept 10570
wagers aggregating more than seven hundred dollars in a calendar 10571
week from any one participant. 10572
(6) (5) The rules of the Ohio casino control commission 10573
and the state lottery commission concerning lottery sports 10574
gaming shall apply identically in all applicable respects to 10575
lottery sports gaming offered on a self-service terminal and to 10576
lottery sports gaming offered on a clerk-operated terminal. 10577
(C)(1) A participant whose winnings from lottery sports 10578
gaming are of an amount that is not subject to withholding under 10579
section 718.031, 3770.071, 3770.072, or 3770.073 of the Revised 10580
Code does not meet or exceed the reportable winnings amount set 10581
by 26 U.S.C. 6041 may receive the participant's winnings by any 10582
of the following methods: 10583
(a) As a credit to the participant's credit card, debit 10584
card, or electronic payment account.; 10585
(b) In cash from any type C sports gaming host; 10586
(c) By any additional method permitted by the state 10587
lottery commission by rule. 10588
(2) A participant whose winnings from lottery sports 10589

S. B. No. 197 Page 361
As Introduced
gaming are of an amount that is subject to withholding under 10590
section 718.031, 3770.071, 3770.072, or 3770.073 of the Revised 10591
Code meets or exceeds the reportable winnings amount set by 26 10592
U.S.C. 6041 may receive the participant's winnings in the same 10593
manner as any other determined by the state lottery prize award 10594
of an amount that is subject to commission, subject to 10595
withholding by the sports gaming proprietor under those section 10596
3772.37 of the Revised Code or subject to withholding by the 10597
state lottery commission under sections 3770.071, 3770.072, and 10598
3770.073 of the Revised Code, as determined by the commission by 10599
rule. 10600
Sec. 3770.26. (A) The state lottery commission may conduc t 10601
internet lottery gaming only in accordance with this section. 10602
The commission shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the 10603
Revised Code to implement internet lottery gaming. 10604
(B) Internet lottery gaming does not include any of the 10605
following: 10606
(1) Electronic facsimiles of any of the following games: 10607
(a) Rule 3770:1-7-20 ("Pick 3") of the Administrative 10608
Code; 10609
(b) Rule 3770:1-7-25 ("Pick 4") of the Administrative 10610
Code; 10611
(c) Rule 3770:1-7-101 ("Pick 5") of the Administrative 10612
Code; 10613
(d) Rule 3770:1-9-23 ("Rolling Cash Five") of the 10614
Administrative Code; 10615
(e) Rule 3770:1-9-53 ("Classic Lotto") of the 10616
Administrative Code. 10617

S. B. No. 197 Page 362
As Introduced
(2) Electronic facsimiles of any game of chance, as 10618
defined in section 2915.01 of the Revised Code; 10619
(3) Charitable gaming authorized under Chapter 3768. of 10620
the Revised Code; 10621
(4) Wagering on horse racing; 10622
(5) Internet gambling authorized under Chapter 3771. of 10623
the Revised Code; 10624
(6) Casino gaming as authorized in Section 6(C)(4) of 10625
Article XV, Ohio Constitution and Chapter 3772. of the Revised 10626
Code; 10627
(7) Fantasy contests authorized under Chapter 3774. of the 10628
Revised Code; 10629
(8) Sports gaming authorized under Chapter 3775. of the 10630
Revised Code, including lottery sports gaming; 10631
(9) Sweepstakes terminal devices or skill-based amusement 10632
machines authorized under Chapter 3777. of the Revised Code; 10633
(10) Any type of game that represents or simulates a 10634
casino game, as defined in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code, 10635
or video lottery terminal game, that features the ability to 10636
reveal all of the symbols in the game through a single action, 10637
such as by activating a "reveal all" game control or operation. 10638
(C) For one year following the effective date of this 10639
section, internet lottery gaming does not include statewide 10640
joint lottery games. 10641
(D) At the end of each calendar quarter, the commission 10642
shall calculate the amount that is equal to three and one-half 10643
per cent of the state's internet lottery gaming sales in that 10644

S. B. No. 197 Page 363
As Introduced
calendar quarter. The commission shall distribute an equal share 10645
of that amount to each lottery sales agent not later than thirty 10646
days after the end of the calendar quarter. 10647
Sec. 3770.99. (A) Whoever is prohibited from claiming a 10648
lottery prize award under division (E) of section 3770.07 of the 10649
Revised Code and attempts to claim or is paid a lottery prize 10650
award is guilty of a minor misdemeanor, and shall provide 10651
restitution to the state lottery commission of any moneys 10652
erroneously paid as a lottery prize award to that person. 10653
(B) Whoever violates section 3770.08 of the Revised Code 10654
is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. 10655
(C) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a 10656
misdemeanor of the first degree on the first offense and a 10657
felony of the fifth degree on a subsequent offense: 10658
(1) Makes a false statement on an application submitted 10659
under sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code; 10660
(2) Permits an individual under twenty-one years of age to 10661
participate in video lottery terminal gaming; 10662
(3) Participates in video lottery terminal gaming in 10663
violation of division (D) of section 3770.214 of the Revised 10664
Code, other than as part of operating video lottery terminal 10665
gaming or as part of the employee's employment. 10666
(D) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a 10667
felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of 10668
the fourth degree on a subsequent offense. If the person is a 10669
video lottery sales agent, the Ohio casino control commission 10670
shall revoke the person's video lottery sales agent license 10671
after the first offense. 10672

S. B. No. 197 Page 364
As Introduced
(1) Manufactures, sells, or distributes any device that is 10673
intended by that person to be used to violate any provision of 10674
sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code; 10675
(2) Claims, collects, or takes anything of value from a 10676
video lottery sales agent with intent to defraud or attempts to 10677
do so without having legitimately won the amount; 10678
(3) Participates in video lottery terminal gaming using 10679
counterfeit currency or other counterfeit form of credit 10680
approved for video lottery terminal gaming; 10681
(4) Possesses any device intended to be used to violate 10682
any provision of sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 or Chapter 3772. of 10683
the Revised Code or any rule adopted under those sections, or 10684
any materials used to manufacture such a device. This division 10685
does not apply to a video lottery sales agent or to an agent or 10686
employee of a video lottery sales agent who is acting in 10687
furtherance of the video lottery sales agent's interest. 10688
(5) Operates video lottery terminal gaming in a manner 10689
other than the manner required under sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 10690
and Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code. Premises or any internet 10691
web site used or occupied in violation of this division 10692
constitute a nuisance subject to abatement under Chapter 3767. 10693
of the Revised Code. 10694
(E) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a 10695
felony of the third degree. If the person is a video lottery 10696
sales agent, the commission shall revoke the person's video 10697
lottery sales agent license after the first offense. If the 10698
person is a public servant or political party official, the 10699
person is forever disqualified from holding any public office, 10700
employment, or position of trust in this state. 10701

S. B. No. 197 Page 365
As Introduced
(1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value or 10702
benefit to a person who is connected with a video lottery sales 10703
agent, an agent or employee of a video lottery sales agent, or a 10704
member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control commission 10705
or the state lottery commission, under an agreement to 10706
influence, or with the intent to influence, the actions of the 10707
person to whom the offer, promise, or gift is made in order to 10708
affect or attempt to affect the outcome of video lottery 10709
terminal gaming or an official action of a member, agent, or 10710
employee of the Ohio casino control commission or the state 10711
lottery commission; 10712
(2) Solicits, accepts, or receives a promise of anything 10713
of value or benefit while the person is connected with a video 10714
lottery sales agent, an agent or employee of a video lottery 10715
sales agent, or a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino 10716
control commission or the state lottery commission, under an 10717
agreement to influence, or with the intent to influence, the 10718
actions of the person to affect or attempt to affect the outcome 10719
of video lottery terminal gaming or an official action of a 10720
member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control commission 10721
or the state lottery commission. 10722
(F) Whoever knowingly does any of the following while 10723
participating in video lottery terminal gaming or otherwise 10724
transacting with a video lottery sales agent as permitted under 10725
sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 and Chapter 3772. of the Revised 10726
Code commits a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and 10727
a felony of the fourth degree on a subsequent offense: 10728
(1) Causes or attempts to cause the person to fail to file 10729
a report required under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any 10730
regulation prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the 10731

S. B. No. 197 Page 366
As Introduced
Revised Code, or to fail to file a report or maintain a record 10732
required by an order issued under section 21 of the "Federal 10733
Deposit Insurance Act," 12 U.S.C. 1829b or section 123 of Pub. 10734
L. No. 91-508; 10735
(2) Causes or attempts to cause the person to file a 10736
report under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any regulation 10737
prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the Revised Code, to 10738
file a report or to maintain a record required by any order 10739
issued under 31 U.S.C. 3126, or to maintain a record required 10740
under any regulation prescribed under section 21 of the "Federal 10741
Deposit Insurance Act," 12 U.S.C. 1829b or section 123 of Pub. 10742
L. No. 91-508 that contains a material omission or misstatement 10743
of fact; 10744
(3) With one or more video lottery sales agents, 10745
structures a transaction, is complicit in structuring a 10746
transaction, attempts to structure a transaction, or is 10747
complicit in an attempt to structure a transaction. As used in 10748
this division: 10749
(a) To be "complicit" means to engage in any conduct of a 10750
type described in divisions (A)(1) to (4) of section 2923.03 of 10751
the Revised Code. 10752
(b) "Structure a transaction" has the same meaning as in 10753
section 1315.51 of the Revised Code. 10754
Sec. 3771.01. As used in this chapter : 10755
(A) "Applicant" means a person that applies to the Ohio 10756
casino control commission for a license under this chapter. 10757
(B) "Casino operator," "key gaming employee," "gaming 10758
employee," and "Ohio voluntary exclusion program" have the same 10759
meanings as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. 10760

S. B. No. 197 Page 367
As Introduced
(C) "Commission" means the Ohio casino control commission. 10761
(D) "Internet gambling" means a form of gaming in which a 10762
wager on an internet gambling game is made and accepted through 10763
an internet gambling system. "Internet gambling" does not 10764
include any of the following: 10765
(1) Pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing authorized under 10766
Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code, including over the internet; 10767
(2) Lottery games authorized under Chapter 3770. of the 10768
Revised Code, including internet lottery gaming, video lottery 10769
terminals, and lottery sports gaming; 10770
(3) Casino gaming authorized under division (C) of Section 10771
6 of Article XV, Ohio Constitution and Chapter 3772. of the 10772
Revised Code; 10773
(4) Fantasy contests authorized under Chapter 3774. of the 10774
Revised Code; 10775
(5) Sports gaming authorized under Chapter 3775. of the 10776
Revised Code; 10777
(6) Sweepstakes terminal devices or skill-based amusement 10778
machines authorized under Chapter 3777. of the Revised Code. 10779
(E) "Internet gambling equipment" means any of the 10780
following that directly relate to or affect, or are used or 10781
consumed in, the operation of internet gambling: 10782
(1) Any mechanical, electronic, or other device, 10783
mechanism, or equipment; 10784
(2) Any software, application, components, or other goods; 10785
(3) Anything to be installed or used on a patron's 10786
personal computer or mobile device. 10787

S. B. No. 197 Page 368
As Introduced
(F) "Internet gambling game" means a game, event, 10788
happening, or other matter used to display the outcome of a 10789
wager placed in the course of internet gambling, as authorized 10790
by the commission by rule. "Internet gambling game" includes 10791
both of the following: 10792
(1) A game involving a virtual representation of spinning 10793
reels or wheels, with the outcome of the game being randomly 10794
generated by a theoretical random-number-generating computer 10795
program; 10796
(2) A game involving a virtual representation of cards, 10797
dice, tiles, or other physical equipment that provides a random 10798
outcome, with the outcome of the game being determined by that 10799
equipment or determined by a theoretical random-number- 10800
generating computer program. 10801
(G) "Internet gambling license" means an internet gambling 10802
operator, internet gambling management company, or internet 10803
gambling supplier license issued by the Ohio casino control 10804
commission under this chapter and a key gaming employee or 10805
gaming employee license issued by the commission under Chapter 10806
3772. of the Revised Code to an individual whose duties relate 10807
to the operation or facilitation of internet gambling under this 10808
chapter. 10809
(H) "Internet gambling licensee" means a person who holds 10810
a valid internet gambling license. 10811
(I) "Internet gambling operator" means a casino operator 10812
or permit holder that holds a valid internet gambling operator 10813
license. 10814
(J) "Internet gambling platform" means an online gaming 10815
web site or mobile application that is operated by an internet 10816

S. B. No. 197 Page 369
As Introduced
gambling operator or internet gambling management company to 10817
operate or conduct internet gambling in this state. 10818
(K) "Internet gambling receipts" has the same meaning as 10819
in section 5753.01 of the Revised Code. 10820
(L) "Internet gambling supplier" means a person or entity 10821
that provides internet gambling equipment or related services to 10822
an internet gambling operator or internet gambling management 10823
company. 10824
(M) "Internet gambling system" means all of the following: 10825
(1) The combination of internet gambling equipment an 10826
internet gambling operator or internet gambling management 10827
company uses to allow a patron to place, review, or modify a 10828
wager, to pay out a winning wager, and to review, manage, and 10829
report information related to user accounts, wager placement, or 10830
wager outcomes; 10831
(2) Any other internet gambling equipment the commission 10832
determines is related to the combination of internet gambling 10833
equipment described in division (M)(1) of this section. 10834
(N) "Permit holder" has the same meaning as in section 10835
3769.01 of the Revised Code. 10836
(O) "Promotional gaming credit" means a credit, discount, 10837
or other similar item issued to a patron to enable the placement 10838
of, or increase in, a wager on an internet gambling game. 10839
(P) "Wager" or "bet" means to risk a sum or money or thing 10840
of value on an uncertain occurrence. 10841
Sec. 3771.02. (A) The Ohio casino control commission has 10842
jurisdiction over all persons conducting or participating in the 10843
conduct of internet gambling authorized by this chapter, 10844

S. B. No. 197 Page 370
As Introduced
including the authority to license, regulate, investigate, and 10845
penalize those persons in a manner that is consistent with the 10846
commission's authority with respect to casino gaming. In all 10847
cases in which this chapter requires or allows the commission to 10848
adopt rules concerning internet gambling, the commission shall 10849
adopt those rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. 10850
(B) The commission shall adopt rules that include the 10851
following: 10852
(1) Procedures for internet gambling operators to accept 10853
wagers on internet games; 10854
(2) The types of internet games to be offered by internet 10855
gambling operators; 10856
(3) The manner in which internet gambling operators are to 10857
offer approved internet gambling games; 10858
(4) The type of records internet gambling operators are to 10859
keep; 10860
(5) The system to be used to place a wager with an 10861
internet gambling operator; 10862
(6) The manner in which internet gambling operators must 10863
verify that their patrons are at least twenty-one years of age; 10864
(7) Protections for a player placing a wager with an 10865
internet gambling operator; 10866
(8) Measures to promote responsible internet gambling; 10867
(9) Penalties and fines for violating this section or 10868
rules adopted under this section; 10869
(10) Restrictions to ensure that internet gambling 10870
operators' advertisements for internet gambling meet the 10871

S. B. No. 197 Page 371
As Introduced
requirements of section 3772.41 of the Revised Code. 10872
(11) A requirement that each internet gambling operator 10873
comply with the requirements of the Ohio voluntary exclusion 10874
program. 10875
(12) Any other procedure or thing the commission 10876
determines necessary to ensure the integrity of internet 10877
gambling regulated by the commission. 10878
(C) The commission shall adopt rules establishing minimum 10879
internal control standards for the administration of internet 10880
gambling platforms, internet gambling systems, internet gambling 10881
equipment, and other systems or items used by internet gambling 10882
operators to conduct internet gambling, and the maintenance of 10883
internet gambling operators' financial records and other 10884
required records. The commission may approve minimum internal 10885
control standards proposed by internet gambling operators. 10886
(D) The commission shall approve all internet gambling 10887
equipment and each form, variation, or composite of internet 10888
gambling to be used by internet gambling operators in accordance 10889
with section 3772.312 of the Revised Code and shall license all 10890
internet gambling suppliers. 10891
(E)(1) The commission shall determine a person's 10892
eligibility to hold or renew an internet gambling license, shall 10893
issue all internet gambling licenses, and shall maintain a 10894
record of all internet gambling licenses issued. 10895
(2) The commission shall conduct a complete investigation 10896
of each applicant for an internet gambling license to determine 10897
whether the applicant meets the requirements of this chapter and 10898
of the commission's rules each time the applicant applies for an 10899
initial or renewed internet gambling license. The commission may 10900

S. B. No. 197 Page 372
As Introduced
initiate an additional licensing investigation or adjudication 10901
or reopen an existing licensing investigation or adjudication at 10902
any time. 10903
(F)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (F)(2) 10904
and (3) of this section, the commission shall levy and collect 10905
all fees and surcharges imposed under this chapter and rules 10906
adopted under this chapter and shall deposit all moneys 10907
collected in the casino control commission fund created under 10908
section 5753.03 of the Revised Code. 10909
(2) The commission shall deposit the license and contract 10910
fees described in division (D) of section 3771.04 and division 10911
(I) of section 3771.05 of the Revised Code in the general 10912
revenue fund. 10913
(3) The commission shall levy and collect fines for 10914
noncriminal violations of the provisions of this chapter and of 10915
rules adopted under this chapter and shall deposit all such 10916
fines in the general revenue fund. 10917
(G)(1) The commission, in an adjudication conducted under 10918
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and in accordance with section 10919
3772.04 of the Revised Code, may do any of the following: 10920
(a) Penalize or fine any internet gambling licensee, 10921
applicant for an internet gambling license, or other person who 10922
is subject to the commission's jurisdiction under this chapter; 10923
(b) Limit, condition, restrict, suspend, revoke, deny, or 10924
refuse to renew any internet gambling license. 10925
(2) The executive director of the commission may issue an 10926
emergency order with respect to internet gambling under division 10927
(G) of section 3772.04 of the Revised Code. 10928

S. B. No. 197 Page 373
As Introduced
(H)(1) The commission shall monitor all internet gambling 10929
conducted in this state by internet gambling operators, or shall 10930
contract with an independent integrity monitoring provider for 10931
that purpose, in order to identify any unusual betting 10932
activities or patterns that may indicate a need for further 10933
investigation. The commission shall require each internet 10934
gambling operator to participate in the monitoring system as 10935
part of the minimum internal control standards described in 10936
division (C) of this section. 10937
(2) The information in the monitoring system described in 10938
division (H)(1) of this section is not a public record. The 10939
commission may disclose the information in the monitoring system 10940
only as necessary for investigative or law enforcement purposes 10941
or pursuant to a court order. 10942
(I)(1) The executive director of the commission promptly 10943
shall report to the commission any facts or circumstances 10944
related to the operation of an internet gambling licensee that 10945
constitute a violation of state or federal law and immediately 10946
report any suspicious wagering to the appropriate state or 10947
federal authorities. 10948
(2) The commission shall cooperate with any investigation 10949
conducted by a law enforcement agency, including by providing, 10950
or facilitating the provision of, wagering information and audio 10951
or video files related to persons placing wagers. 10952
(3) A sheriff, chief of police, or prosecuting attorney 10953
shall furnish to the commission, on forms prescribed by the 10954
commission, any information obtained concerning any apparent 10955
violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. 10956
If the information is considered a confidential law enforcement 10957
investigatory record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code, 10958

S. B. No. 197 Page 374
As Introduced
the commission shall not disclose the information to the public. 10959
(J)(1) The attorney general has a civil cause of action to 10960
restrain any violation of this chapter or of rules adopted under 10961
this chapter. Upon the request of the commission or its 10962
executive director, the attorney general shall commence and 10963
prosecute such an action to completion. The court shall give 10964
priority to such an action over all other civil actions. 10965
(2) An action brought under division (J)(1) of this 10966
section does not preclude an administrative or criminal 10967
proceeding on the same facts. 10968
(3) The attorney general may enter into an agreement with 10969
a state or local law enforcement agency to carry out the duties 10970
described in division (J)(1) of this section. 10971
Sec. 3771.03. (A) No person shall operate, conduct, or 10972
assist in operating or conducting internet gambling in this 10973
state without first obtaining an appropriate internet gambling 10974
license from the commission. An internet gambling license is not 10975
transferable. 10976
(B) Each person applying for an initial or renewed 10977
internet gambling license issued under this section and each 10978
person who has control of the applicant, as described in 10979
division (C) of this section, shall submit two complete sets of 10980
fingerprints to the commission for the purpose of conducting a 10981
criminal records check, including obtaining any available 10982
information from the federal bureau of investigation. The person 10983
shall provide the fingerprints using a method the superintendent 10984
of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation 10985
prescribes pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 109.572 of the 10986
Revised Code and fill out the form the superintendent of the 10987

S. B. No. 197 Page 375
As Introduced
bureau of criminal identification and investigation prescribes 10988
pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised 10989
Code. Upon receiving an application under this section, the 10990
executive director of the commission shall request the 10991
superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and 10992
investigation, or a vendor approved by the bureau, to conduct a 10993
criminal records check based on the fingerprint impressions in 10994
accordance with division (A)(20) of section 109.572 of the 10995
Revised Code. Any fee required under division (C)(3) of section 10996
109.572 of the Revised Code shall be paid by the applicant, or 10997
in the case of an occupational license, by the applicant's 10998
employer. Any applicant convicted of any disqualifying offense, 10999
as defined in section 3772.07 of the Revised Code, shall not be 11000
issued a license. 11001
(C) The commission shall not grant an internet gambling 11002
operator, internet gambling management company, or internet 11003
gambling supplier license until it has determined that each 11004
person who has control of the applicant has met the 11005
qualifications for licensure established in this chapter and in 11006
rules adopted by the commission. All of the following persons 11007
are considered to have control of an applicant: 11008
(1) Each person associated with a corporate applicant, 11009
including any holding company, parent company, or subsidiary 11010
company of the applicant, that has the ability to control the 11011
activities of the corporate applicant or elect a majority of the 11012
board of directors of that corporation, other than any bank or 11013
other licensed lending institution that holds a mortgage or 11014
other lien acquired in the ordinary course of business. As used 11015
in this division, "holding company" means any corporation, firm, 11016
partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, 11017
trust, or other form of business organization not a natural 11018

S. B. No. 197 Page 376
As Introduced
person which directly or indirectly does any of the following: 11019
(a) Has the power or right to control the applicant; 11020
(b) Holds an ownership interest of five per cent or more, 11021
as determined by the commission, in the applicant; 11022
(c) Holds voting rights with the power to vote five per 11023
cent or more of the outstanding voting rights of the applicant. 11024
(2) Each person associated with a noncorporate applicant 11025
that directly or indirectly holds a beneficial or proprietary 11026
interest in the applicant's business operation or that the 11027
commission otherwise determines has the ability to control the 11028
applicant; 11029
(3) Key personnel of an applicant, including any 11030
executive, employee, or agency, having the power to exercise 11031
significant influence over decisions concerning any part of the 11032
applicant's business operation. 11033
(D) An internet gambling licensee shall display its 11034
license conspicuously in its place of business or have the 11035
license available for inspection by any agent of the commission 11036
or any law enforcement agency. 11037
(E) An internet gambling licensee shall give the 11038
commission written notice within ten days of any material change 11039
to any information provided in the licensee's application for a 11040
license or renewal, in accordance with section 3772.113 of the 11041
Revised Code. 11042
Sec. 3771.04. (A) The commission may issue an internet 11043
gambling operator license only to a casino operator or a permit 11044
holder. Subject to division (A) of section 3771.05 of the 11045
Revised Code, an internet gambling operator license authorizes 11046

S. B. No. 197 Page 377
As Introduced
the licensee to operate one internet gambling platform. 11047
(B) The commission shall adopt by rule a procedure 11048
allowing the commission to revoke an internet gambling operator 11049
license if the licensee does not offer internet gambling to 11050
patrons under the license for a continuous period of one year or 11051
more. 11052
(C) An applicant for an initial or renewed internet 11053
gambling operator license shall do all of the following: 11054
(1) Submit a written application on a form furnished by 11055
the commission; 11056
(2) Pay the fee required under division (C)(3) of section 11057
109.572 of the Revised Code, along with a nonrefundable 11058
application fee in an amount prescribed by the commission by 11059
rule; 11060
(3) Submit an audit of the applicant's financial 11061
transactions and the condition of the applicant's total 11062
operations for the previous fiscal year prepared by a certified 11063
public accountant in accordance with generally accepted 11064
accounting principles and state and federal laws; 11065
(4) Submit sufficient documentation to demonstrate that 11066
the applicant is capable of operating internet gambling in this 11067
state in compliance with this chapter and the rules of the 11068
commission; 11069
(5) Satisfy any other requirements for licensure under 11070
this chapter, Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code, and rules 11071
adopted thereunder. 11072
(D) An internet gambling operator shall pay the commission 11073
a nonrefundable license fee of fifty million dollars upon 11074

S. B. No. 197 Page 378
As Introduced
issuance of an initial license and, subject to division (E) of 11075
this section, shall pay a nonrefundable license fee of five 11076
million dollars upon being issued a renewed license. 11077
(E) An internet gambling operator license is valid for a 11078
term of five years, provided that when the commission issues an 11079
initial internet gambling operator license to a person who also 11080
holds a current and valid sports gaming proprietor license 11081
issued under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code, the term of the 11082
initial internet gambling operator license shall be extended to 11083
expire on the date that is five years after the person's sports 11084
gaming proprietor license expires or, if the person holds more 11085
than one sports gaming proprietor license, the date that is five 11086
years after the latest expiration date of any of those licenses. 11087
(F)(1) Subject to division (F)(2) of this section, upon 11088
the expiration of an internet gambling operator license, an 11089
internet gambling operator may apply to renew the license in the 11090
same manner as for an initial license, unless the license is 11091
suspended or revoked or the commission determines that the 11092
internet casino gaming operator is not in compliance with this 11093
chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter. 11094
(2) An applicant for a renewed internet gambling operator 11095
license who currently holds a sports gaming proprietor license 11096
issued under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code is not required 11097
to take action to satisfy any additional requirement for the 11098
renewed internet gambling operator license that is substantially 11099
similar to any requirement the applicant previously has 11100
satisfied in order to obtain or renew the applicant's sports 11101
gaming proprietor license. 11102
Sec. 3771.05. (A) An internet gambling operator may 11103
contract with not more than one internet gambling management 11104

S. B. No. 197 Page 379
As Introduced
company to offer internet gambling on the internet gambling 11105
operator's behalf. If an internet gambling operator contracts 11106
with an internet gambling management company under this section, 11107
the internet gambling operator shall not operate any other 11108
internet gambling platform. 11109
(B) The commission shall adopt by rule a procedure 11110
allowing the commission to revoke an internet gambling 11111
management company's license if the licensee does not actively 11112
offer internet gambling under the license for a continuous 11113
period of one year or more. 11114
(C) An internet gambling management company may offer 11115
internet gambling only in accordance with this chapter and 11116
Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code and with the rules adopted 11117
thereunder. 11118
(D) In order to permit an internet gambling management 11119
company to offer internet gambling on behalf of an internet 11120
gambling operator, the internet gambling operator and internet 11121
gambling management company shall enter into a written contract 11122
that has been approved by the commission. If the internet 11123
gambling operator and internet gambling management company wish 11124
to make a material change to the contract, the internet gambling 11125
operator shall first submit the change to the commission for its 11126
approval or rejection. The internet gambling operator and 11127
internet gambling management company shall not assign, delegate, 11128
subcontract, or transfer the internet gambling management 11129
company's duties and responsibilities under the contract to a 11130
third party. 11131
(E) An internet gambling management company shall be 11132
licensed under this section before entering into a contract with 11133
an internet gambling operator. 11134

S. B. No. 197 Page 380
As Introduced
(F)(1) Subject to division (F)(2) of this section, the 11135
provisions of this chapter and Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code 11136
concerning an internet gambling operator apply to an internet 11137
gambling management company that contracts with an internet 11138
management operator with respect to all rights, duties, and 11139
liabilities of the internet gambling operator assigned, 11140
delegated, subcontracted, or transferred to the internet 11141
gambling management company as though the internet gambling 11142
management company were an internet gambling operator. Unless 11143
the context requires otherwise, references in the Revised Code 11144
to an internet gambling operator apply to an internet gambling 11145
management company to the extent that the internet gambling 11146
management company is acting on behalf of an internet gambling 11147
operator pursuant to the contract. 11148
(2) Division (F)(1) of this section does not permit an 11149
internet gambling management company to operate internet 11150
gambling other than pursuant to a contract with an internet 11151
gambling operator to operate internet gambling on behalf of the 11152
internet gambling operator. 11153
(G) An applicant for an initial or renewed internet 11154
gambling management company license shall meet all requirements 11155
for licensure established by the commission by rule and shall 11156
pay the fee required under division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of 11157
the Revised Code, along with a nonrefundable application fee in 11158
an amount determined by the commission by rule. The licensure 11159
requirements shall require the applicant to submit sufficient 11160
documentation to demonstrate that the applicant is capable of 11161
operating internet gambling in this state in compliance with 11162
this chapter and the rules of the commission. 11163
(H) The commission may accept another jurisdiction's 11164

S. B. No. 197 Page 381
As Introduced
license, if the commission determines it has similar licensing 11165
requirements, as evidence that the applicant meets the 11166
requirements for an internet gambling management company license 11167
issued under this section. 11168
(I)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (I)(2) of 11169
this section, an internet gambling management company is not 11170
required to pay the commission a license fee upon issuance of an 11171
initial or renewed internet gambling management company license. 11172
(2) If the same person does not own or control at least 11173
fifty per cent of both the internet gambling management company 11174
and the internet gambling operator with which it contracts under 11175
this section, then the internet gambling management company 11176
shall pay the commission a nonrefundable license fee of fifty 11177
million dollars upon being issued an initial internet gambling 11178
management company license and a nonrefundable license fee of 11179
five million dollars upon being issued a renewed internet 11180
gambling management company license. 11181
(J) An internet gambling management company license is 11182
valid for a term of five years, provided that when the 11183
commission issues an initial internet gambling management 11184
company license to a person who also holds a current and valid 11185
mobile management services provider or management services 11186
provider license issued under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code, 11187
the term of the initial internet gambling management company 11188
license shall be extended to expire on the date that is five 11189
years after the person's mobile management services provider or 11190
management services provider license expires or, if the person 11191
holds more than one such license under Chapter 3775. of the 11192
Revised Code, the date that is five years after the latest 11193
expiration date of any of those licenses. 11194

S. B. No. 197 Page 382
As Introduced
(K)(1) Subject to division (K)(2) of this section, in 11195
order to renew an internet gambling management company license, 11196
the licensee shall apply to the commission for a renewed license 11197
in the same manner as for an initial license. 11198
(2) An applicant for a renewed internet gambling 11199
management company license who currently holds a mobile 11200
management services company or management services company 11201
license issued under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code is not 11202
required to take action to satisfy any additional requirement 11203
for the renewed internet gambling management company license 11204
that is substantially similar to any requirement the applicant 11205
previously has satisfied in order to obtain or renew the 11206
applicant's mobile management services provider or management 11207
services provider license. 11208
(L) The commission shall adopt a rule setting a maximum 11209
number of internet gambling management company licenses a person 11210
may hold at any one time. 11211
Sec. 3771.06. (A) An internet gambling supplier shall hol d 11212
an appropriate and valid internet gambling supplier license 11213
issued by the Ohio casino control commission at all times. The 11214
commission may accept another jurisdiction's license, if the 11215
commission determines it has similar licensing requirements, as 11216
evidence that the applicant meets the requirements for a license 11217
issued under this section. The commission shall issue an 11218
internet gambling supplier license to a person or entity that 11219
meets the requirements of this chapter and Chapter 3772. of the 11220
Revised Code and of the commission's rules. 11221
(B) An applicant for an initial or renewed internet 11222
gambling supplier license shall apply for the license on a form 11223
prescribed by the commission and shall pay the fee required 11224

S. B. No. 197 Page 383
As Introduced
under division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, 11225
along with a nonrefundable application fee of fifty thousand 11226
dollars. 11227
(C) Upon receiving an initial or renewed internet gambling 11228
supplier license, the applicant shall pay a nonrefundable 11229
license fee of one hundred thousand dollars. 11230
(D) An internet gambling supplier license is valid for a 11231
term of three years, provided that when the commission issues an 11232
initial internet gambling supplier license to a person who also 11233
holds a current and valid sports gaming supplier license issued 11234
under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code, the term of the initial 11235
internet gambling supplier license shall be extended to expire 11236
on the date that is three years after the person's sports gaming 11237
supplier license expires. 11238
(E)(1) Subject to division (E)(2) of this section, in 11239
order to renew an internet gambling supplier license, the 11240
licensee shall apply to the commission for a renewed license in 11241
the same manner as for an initial license. 11242
(2) An applicant for a renewed internet gambling supplier 11243
license who currently holds a sports gaming supplier license 11244
issued under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code is not required 11245
to take action to satisfy any additional requirement for the 11246
renewed internet gambling supplier license that is substantially 11247
similar to any requirement the applicant previously has 11248
satisfied in order to obtain or renew the applicant's sports 11249
gaming supplier license. 11250
Sec. 3771.07. An individual described in division (A) of 11251
section 3772.13 of the Revised Code shall hold a valid key 11252
gaming employee license issued by the commission under that 11253

S. B. No. 197 Page 384
As Introduced
section at all times. An individual whose duties with respect to 11254
internet gambling are as described in division (A) of section 11255
3772.131 of the Revised Code shall hold a valid gaming employee 11256
license issued by the commission under that section at all 11257
times. 11258
Sec. 3771.08. (A) An applicant for an internet gambling 11259
operator, internet gambling management company, or internet 11260
gambling supplier license shall establish the applicant's 11261
suitability for the license by clear and convincing evidence. 11262
(B) In issuing initial and renewed internet gambling 11263
operator, internet gambling management company, and internet 11264
gambling supplier licenses, the commission shall consider all of 11265
the following factors, in addition to all other requirements for 11266
licensure specified under this chapter and in the rules of the 11267
commission: 11268
(1) The reputation, experience, and financial integrity of 11269
the applicant and any person that controls the applicant; 11270
(2) The financial ability of the applicant to purchase and 11271
maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance and to 11272
provide an adequate surety bond; 11273
(3) The past and present compliance of the applicant and 11274
its affiliates or affiliated companies with gambling-related 11275
licensing requirements in this state or any other jurisdiction, 11276
including whether the applicant has a history of noncompliance 11277
with those requirements; 11278
(4) Whether the applicant has been charged with, indicted 11279
for, or convicted of any felony or misdemeanor criminal offense 11280
under the laws of any jurisdiction, not including any traffic 11281
violation; 11282

S. B. No. 197 Page 385
As Introduced
(5) Whether the applicant has filed, or had filed against 11283
it, a proceeding for bankruptcy, or has ever been involved in 11284
any formal process to adjust, defer, suspend, or otherwise work 11285
out the payment of any debt; 11286
(6) Whether the applicant has been served with a complaint 11287
or other notice filed with any public body regarding a payment 11288
of any tax required under federal, state, or local law that has 11289
been delinquent for one or more years; 11290
(7) Whether the applicant is or has been a defendant in 11291
litigation involving its business practices; 11292
(8) Whether awarding a license would undermine the 11293
public's confidence in the gaming industry in this state. 11294
(C) The commission shall not grant an internet gambling 11295
operator, internet gambling management company, or internet 11296
gambling supplier license to an applicant if evidence 11297
satisfactory to the commission exists that the applicant has 11298
done any of the following: 11299
(1) Knowingly made a false statement to the commission; 11300
(2) Been suspended from operating a gambling game, gaming 11301
device, or gaming operation, or had a license revoked by any 11302
governmental unit of a national, state, or local body exercising 11303
governmental functions; 11304
(3) Been convicted of a disqualifying offense, as defined 11305
in section 3772.07 of the Revised Code; 11306
(4) Been directly involved in or employed by any offshore 11307
wagering market that illegally serviced the United States or 11308
otherwise accepted illegal wagers from individuals located in 11309
the United States on or after April 16, 2015. 11310

S. B. No. 197 Page 386
As Introduced
(D) The commission may deny an internet gambling operator 11311
or internet gambling management company license to any 11312
applicant, reprimand any internet gambling operator or internet 11313
gambling management company, or suspend or revoke an internet 11314
gambling operator or internet gambling management company 11315
license if any of the following are true: 11316
(1) The applicant or licensee has not demonstrated to the 11317
commission's satisfaction financial responsibility sufficient to 11318
adequately meet the requirements of the enterprise. 11319
(2) The applicant or licensee is not the true owner of the 11320
business or is not the sole owner and has not disclosed the 11321
existence or identity of other persons who have an ownership 11322
interest in the business. 11323
(3) The applicant or licensee is a corporation that sells 11324
more than five per cent of the corporation's voting stock, or 11325
more than five per cent of the voting stock of a corporation 11326
that controls the corporation, or sells the corporation's 11327
assets, other than those bought and sold in the ordinary course 11328
of business, or any interest in the assets, to any person who, 11329
under division (C) of section 3771.03 of the Revised Code, must 11330
meet the qualifications of an internet gambling operator or 11331
internet gambling management company, as applicable, and who has 11332
not already been determined by the commission to have met the 11333
applicable qualifications. 11334
(E) The commission shall revoke an internet gambling 11335
operator license that was issued to a permit holder if the 11336
licensee ceases to qualify as a permit holder. The commission 11337
shall revoke an internet gambling operator license that was 11338
issued to a casino operator if the licensee ceases to qualify as 11339
a casino operator. 11340

S. B. No. 197 Page 387
As Introduced
(F) The commission shall not grant an internet gambling 11341
license to any of the following persons: 11342
(1) A nonprofit corporation or organization; 11343
(2) An individual who is under twenty-one years of age; 11344
(3) An employee of the commission. 11345
(G) In determining whether a person has control over an 11346
applicant for purposes of this section, the standard described 11347
in division (C) of section 3771.03 of the Revised Code applies. 11348
(H) In reviewing an application for a license under this 11349
chapter, the commission may rely on or consider the last 11350
investigation it conducted concerning the applicant, or the last 11351
license it issued to the applicant, under this chapter or 11352
Chapter 3770., 3772., or 3775. of the Revised Code. 11353
Sec. 3771.09. (A) An internet gambling operator shall do 11354
all of the following: 11355
(1) Conduct all internet gambling activities and functions 11356
in a manner that do not pose a threat to the public health, 11357
safety, or welfare of the citizens of this state; 11358
(2) Keep current in all payments and obligations to the 11359
commission; 11360
(3) Provide a secure location for the placement, 11361
operation, and use of internet gambling equipment; 11362
(4) Prevent any person from tampering with or interfering 11363
with the operation of internet gambling; 11364
(5) Employ commercially reasonable methods to prevent the 11365
internet gambling operator and its agents and employees from 11366
disclosing any confidential information in the possession of the 11367

S. B. No. 197 Page 388
As Introduced
internet gambling operator that could affect the conduct of 11368
internet gambling; 11369
(6) Ensure that internet gambling occurs only in the 11370
manner approved by the commission; 11371
(7) Ensure that all internet gambling is monitored in 11372
accordance with division (H) of section 3771.02 of the Revised 11373
Code; 11374
(8) Maintain sufficient funds and other supplies to 11375
conduct internet gambling at all times; 11376
(9) Maintain daily records showing the internet gambling 11377
operator's internet gambling receipts and timely file with the 11378
commission any additional reports required by rule or other 11379
provisions of the Revised Code; 11380
(10) Comply with all applicable requirements of Chapter 11381
3772. of the Revised Code. 11382
(B) An internet gambling operator is not liable under the 11383
laws of this state to any party, including a patron, for 11384
disclosing information as required under this chapter or for 11385
refusing to disclose information that is not required by law to 11386
be disclosed. 11387
Sec. 3771.10. (A) An internet gambling operator may 11388
operate one internet gambling platform through which the 11389
internet gambling operator accepts wagers from individuals who 11390
are at least twenty-one years of age and who are physically 11391
located in this state. The internet gambling platform shall use 11392
geoblocking technology that meets the requirements of section 11393
3772.313 of the Revised Code and that is obtained from an 11394
internet gambling supplier to prohibit individuals who are not 11395
physically present in this state from participating in internet 11396

S. B. No. 197 Page 389
As Introduced
gambling through the platform. 11397
(B) The server responsible for accepting wagers through an 11398
internet gambling platform shall be located in a secure facility 11399
in this state. 11400
Sec. 3771.11. (A) No individual who is on the commission' s 11401
internet gambling exclusion list created under section 3772.031 11402
of the Revised Code shall participate in the play or operation 11403
of internet gambling in this state. 11404
(B)(1) An internet gambling operator may exclude any 11405
individual from participating in the play or operation of 11406
internet gambling conducted by the internet gambling operator. 11407
The internet gambling operator shall keep a list of all excluded 11408
individuals. No individual who is on an internet gambling 11409
operator's exclusion list shall participate in the play or 11410
operation of internet gambling conducted by the internet 11411
gambling operator under this chapter. 11412
(2) If an internet gambling operator excludes an 11413
individual because the internet gambling operator determines 11414
that the individual engaged or attempted to engage in any 11415
internet gambling related activity that is prohibited under this 11416
chapter or under the commission's rules, the internet gambling 11417
operator shall report that fact to the commission. 11418
(C)(1) An internet gambling operator shall employ 11419
commercially reasonable methods to prevent any person who is 11420
participating in the Ohio voluntary exclusion program from 11421
engaging in internet gambling conducted by the internet casino 11422
gaming operator. 11423
(2) Absent gross negligence, all of the following persons 11424
are immune from any type of civil liability on the basis that a 11425

S. B. No. 197 Page 390
As Introduced
person who is participating in the Ohio voluntary exclusion 11426
program participates in internet gambling conducted under this 11427
chapter: 11428
(a) The commission or any other agency of this state and 11429
its agents or employees; 11430
(b) An internet gambling licensee and its agents or 11431
employees. 11432
(D) No internet gambling operator, no director, officer, 11433
agent, or employee of an internet gambling operator, no other 11434
person who has a financial interest in an internet gambling 11435
operator, and no person living in the same household as any of 11436
those persons, shall engage in any internet gambling conducted 11437
by the internet gambling operator, other than as part of 11438
operating internet gambling or as part of the employee's 11439
employment. An internet gambling operator shall employ 11440
commercially reasonable methods to prevent those persons, and 11441
any other person who has access to confidential information held 11442
by the internet gambling operator, from engaging in internet 11443
gambling conducted by the internet gambling operator. 11444
(E) No member or employee of the Ohio casino control 11445
commission or the state lottery commission shall knowingly 11446
participate in internet gambling conducted by an internet 11447
gambling operator in this state or participate in internet 11448
gambling with any person or entity located outside this state 11449
that is directly or indirectly owned or operated by an internet 11450
gambling operator. An internet gambling operator shall employ 11451
commercially reasonable methods to prevent such a person from 11452
engaging in internet gambling conducted by the internet gambling 11453
operator. 11454

S. B. No. 197 Page 391
As Introduced
Sec. 3771.12. (A) Notwithstanding any contrary provision 11455
of section 149.43 of the Revised Code, the commission shall not 11456
disclose to the public any of the following: 11457
(1) Any of the following information or documents 11458
concerning a person who has applied for or been issued a license 11459
under this chapter or the person's spouse, dependent, or 11460
employee, unless the person authorizes the commission to 11461
disclose the information: 11462
(a) A social security number, passport number, or federal 11463
tax identification number; 11464
(b) A home address, telephone number, or electronic mail 11465
address; 11466
(c) A birth certificate; 11467
(d) A driver's license or state identification card 11468
number; 11469
(e) The name or address of a previous spouse; 11470
(f) A date or place of birth; 11471
(g) Any personal financial information or records, 11472
including personal tax returns and information and records of 11473
criminal proceedings; 11474
(h) Any information concerning a minor child; 11475
(i) Any information concerning a person the commission has 11476
reason to know is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, 11477
or stalking; 11478
(j) Any trade secret, medical records, or patents or 11479
exclusive licenses; 11480
(k) Security information, including risk prevention plans, 11481

S. B. No. 197 Page 392
As Introduced
detection and countermeasures, location of money storage areas, 11482
emergency management plans, security and surveillance plans, 11483
equipment and usage protocols, and theft and fraud prevention 11484
plans and countermeasures; 11485
(l) Any other information that the commission receives 11486
from another jurisdiction relating to a person who holds, held, 11487
or has applied for a license under this chapter. 11488
(B) Except as otherwise provided in division (A) of this 11489
section, all of the following information is subject to 11490
disclosure as a public record under section 149.43 of the 11491
Revised Code: 11492
(1) The information an internet gambling operator or an 11493
applicant for an internet gambling operator or internet gambling 11494
management company license has submitted to the commission as 11495
part of applying for or renewing an internet gambling operator 11496
or internet gambling management company license; 11497
(2) The name, place of employment, job title, and gaming 11498
experience of a person who has applied for or been issued a 11499
license under this chapter; 11500
(3) The commission's reasons for denying or revoking a 11501
license under this chapter or for taking other disciplinary 11502
action under this chapter. 11503
(C) Division (A) of this section does not prohibit the 11504
commission from disclosing information and documents described 11505
in that division to the state lottery commission or to the 11506
inspector general, a prosecuting authority, a law enforcement 11507
agency, or any other appropriate governmental entity or 11508
licensing agency, provided that the recipient shall not disclose 11509
the information and documents to the public. 11510

S. B. No. 197 Page 393
As Introduced
Sec. 3771.13. (A) All shipments of gambling devices, 11511
including any internet gambling equipment, to internet gambling 11512
operators or internet gambling management companies are legal 11513
shipments of gambling devices into this state, as long as the 11514
supplier has completed the registering, recording, and labeling 11515
of the equipment in accordance with the "Gambling Devices Act of 11516
1962," 15 U.S.C. 1171 to 1178. 11517
(B) This state is exempt from section 2 of the "Gambling 11518
Devices Act of 1962," 15 U.S.C. 1172. 11519
Sec. 3771.99. (A) Whoever knowingly does any of the 11520
following commits a misdemeanor of the first degree on the first 11521
offense and a felony of the fifth degree on a subsequent 11522
offense: 11523
(1) Makes a false statement on an application submitted 11524
under this chapter; 11525
(2) Permits an individual under twenty-one years of age to 11526
engage in internet gambling; 11527
(3) Participates in internet gambling in violation of 11528
division (D) of section 3771.11 of the Revised Code, other than 11529
as part of operating internet gambling or as part of the 11530
employee's employment. 11531
(B) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a 11532
felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of 11533
the fourth degree on a subsequent offense. If the person is an 11534
internet gambling licensee, the commission shall revoke the 11535
person's license after the first offense. 11536
(1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value to anyone 11537
for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an internet 11538
gambling game or attempts to do so; 11539

S. B. No. 197 Page 394
As Introduced
(2) Places, increases, or decreases a wager after 11540
acquiring knowledge not available to the general public that 11541
anyone has been offered, promised, or given anything of value 11542
for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an internet 11543
gambling game upon which the wager is placed, increased, or 11544
decreased, or attempts to do so; 11545
(3) Manufactures, sells, or distributes any device that is 11546
intended by that person to be used to violate any provision of 11547
this chapter or Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code or the 11548
internet gambling laws of any other state; 11549
(4) Places a bet or aids any other person in placing a bet 11550
on an internet gambling game after unlawfully acquiring 11551
knowledge of the outcome on which winnings from that bet are 11552
contingent; 11553
(5) Claims, collects, or takes anything of value from an 11554
internet gambling operator with intent to defraud or attempts to 11555
do so without having made a wager in which the amount or value 11556
is legitimately won or owed; 11557
(6) Places a wager using counterfeit currency or other 11558
counterfeit form of credit approved for wagering; 11559
(7) Possesses any device intended to be used to violate 11560
this chapter or Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code or any rule 11561
adopted thereunder, or any materials used to manufacture such a 11562
device. This division does not apply to an internet gambling 11563
operator or to an agent or employee of an internet gambling 11564
operator who is acting in furtherance of the internet gambling 11565
operator's interest. 11566
(8) Changes or alters the normal outcome of any internet 11567
gambling game conducted through an internet gambling platform, 11568

S. B. No. 197 Page 395
As Introduced
including any system used to monitor the internet gambling 11569
platform, or the way in which the outcome is reported to any 11570
patron; 11571
(9) Operates internet gambling in a manner other than the 11572
manner required under this chapter and Chapter 3772. of the 11573
Revised Code. Premises or any internet web site used or occupied 11574
in violation of this division constitute a nuisance subject to 11575
abatement under Chapter 3767. of the Revised Code. 11576
(C) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a 11577
felony of the third degree. If the person is an internet 11578
gambling licensee, the commission shall revoke the person's 11579
license after the first offense. If the person is a public 11580
servant or political party official, the person is forever 11581
disqualified from holding any public office, employment, or 11582
position of trust in this state. 11583
(1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value or 11584
benefit to a person who is connected with an internet gambling 11585
operator, an agent or employee of an internet gambling operator, 11586
or a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control 11587
commission, under an agreement to influence, or with the intent 11588
to influence, the actions of the person to whom the offer, 11589
promise, or gift is made in order to affect or attempt to affect 11590
the outcome of internet gambling or an official action of a 11591
member, agent, or employee of the commission; 11592
(2) Solicits, accepts, or receives a promise of anything 11593
of value or benefit while the person is connected with an 11594
internet gambling operator, an agent or employee of an internet 11595
gambling operator, or a member, agent, or employee of the 11596
commission, under an agreement to influence, or with the intent 11597
to influence, the actions of the person to affect or attempt to 11598

S. B. No. 197 Page 396
As Introduced
affect the outcome of internet gambling or an official action of 11599
a member, agent, or employee of the commission. 11600
(D) Whoever knowingly does any of the following while 11601
participating in internet gambling or otherwise transacting with 11602
an internet gambling operator as permitted under this chapter 11603
and Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code commits a felony of the 11604
fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth 11605
degree on a subsequent offense: 11606
(1) Causes or attempts to cause the person to fail to file 11607
a report required under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any 11608
regulation prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the 11609
Revised Code, or to fail to file a report or maintain a record 11610
required by an order issued under section 21 of the "Federal 11611
Deposit Insurance Act," 12 U.S.C. 1829b or section 123 of Pub. 11612
L. No. 91-508; 11613
(2) Causes or attempts to cause the person to file a 11614
report under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any regulation 11615
prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the Revised Code, to 11616
file a report or to maintain a record required by any order 11617
issued under 31 U.S.C. 3126, or to maintain a record required 11618
under any regulation prescribed under section 21 of the "Federal 11619
Deposit Insurance Act," 12 U.S.C. 1829b or section 123 of Pub. 11620
L. No. 91-508 that contains a material omission or misstatement 11621
of fact; 11622
(3) With one or more internet gambling operators, 11623
structures a transaction, is complicit in structuring a 11624
transaction, attempts to structure a transaction, or is 11625
complicit in an attempt to structure a transaction. As used in 11626
this division: 11627

S. B. No. 197 Page 397
As Introduced
(a) To be "complicit" means to engage in any conduct of a 11628
type described in divisions (A)(1) to (4) of section 2923.03 of 11629
the Revised Code. 11630
(b) "Structure a transaction" has the same meaning as in 11631
section 1315.51 of the Revised Code. 11632
Sec. 3772.01. As used in this chapter: 11633
(A) "Applicant" means any person who applies to the 11634
commission for a license under this chapter. 11635
(B) "Casino control commission fund" means the casino 11636
control commission fund described in Section 6(C)(3)(d) of 11637
Article XV, Ohio Constitution, the money in which shall be used 11638
to fund the commission and its related affairs. 11639
(C) "Casino facility" means a casino facility as defined 11640
in Section 6(C)(9) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution. 11641
(D) "Casino game" means any slot machine or table game as 11642
defined in this chapter. 11643
(E) "Casino gaming" means any type of slot machine or 11644
table game wagering, using money, casino credit, or any 11645
representative of value, authorized in any of the states of 11646
Indiana, Michigan, Pennsylvania, and West Virginia as of January 11647
1, 2009, and includes slot machine and table game wagering 11648
subsequently authorized by, but shall not be limited by, 11649
subsequent restrictions placed on such wagering in such states. 11650
"Casino gaming" does not include bingo, as authorized in Section 11651
6 of Article XV, Ohio Constitution and conducted as of January 11652
1, 2009; horse racing where the pari-mutuel system of wagering 11653
is conducted, as authorized under the laws of this state as of 11654
January 1, 2009; or sports gaming; or internet gambling. 11655

S. B. No. 197 Page 398
As Introduced
(F) "Casino gaming Gaming employee" means any employee of 11656
a casino operator or management company a person who holds a 11657
valid gaming employee license issued under section 3772.131 of 11658
the Revised Code, but does not include a key gaming employee, 11659
and as further defined in section 3772.131 of the Revised Code. 11660
(G) "Casino operator" means any person, trust, 11661
corporation, partnership, limited partnership, association, 11662
limited liability company, or other business enterprise that 11663
directly or indirectly holds an ownership or leasehold interest 11664
in a casino facility. "Casino operator" does not include an 11665
agency of the state, any political subdivision of the state, any 11666
person, trust, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, 11667
association, limited liability company, or other business 11668
enterprise that may have an interest in a casino facility, but 11669
who is legally or contractually restricted from conducting 11670
casino gaming. 11671
(H) "Central system" means a computer system that provides 11672
the following functions related to casino gaming equipment used 11673
in connection with casino gaming authorized under this chapter: 11674
security, auditing, data and information retrieval, and other 11675
purposes deemed necessary and authorized by the commission. 11676
(I) "Cheat" means to alter the result of a casino game, 11677
the element of chance, the operation of a machine used in a 11678
casino game, or the method of selection of criteria that 11679
determines (a) the result of the casino game, (b) the amount or 11680
frequency of payment in a casino game, (c) the value of a 11681
wagering instrument, or (d) the value of a wagering credit. 11682
"Cheat" does not include an individual who, without the 11683
assistance of another individual or without the use of a 11684
physical aid or device of any kind, uses the individual's own 11685

S. B. No. 197 Page 399
As Introduced
ability to keep track of the value of cards played and uses 11686
predictions formed as a result of the tracking information in 11687
the individual's playing and betting strategy. 11688
(J) "Commission" means the Ohio casino control commission. 11689
(K) "Gaming agent" means a peace officer employed by the 11690
commission that is vested with duties to enforce this chapter 11691
and conduct other investigations into the conduct of the casino 11692
gaming and the maintenance of the equipment that the commission 11693
considers necessary and proper and is in compliance with section 11694
109.77 of the Revised Code. 11695
(L) "Gaming-related vendor" means any individual, 11696
partnership, corporation, association, trust, or any other group 11697
of individuals, however organized, who supplies gaming-related 11698
equipment, goods, or services to a casino operator or management 11699
company, that are directly related to or affect casino gaming 11700
authorized under this chapter, including, but not limited to, 11701
the manufacture, sale, distribution, or repair of slot machines 11702
and table game equipment. 11703
(M) "Holding company" means any corporation, firm, 11704
partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, 11705
trust, or other form of business organization not a natural 11706
person which directly or indirectly does any of the following: 11707
(1) Has the power or right to control a casino operator, 11708
management company, or gaming-related vendor license applicant 11709
or licensee; 11710
(2) Holds an ownership interest of five per cent or more, 11711
as determined by the commission, in a casino operator, 11712
management company, or gaming-related vendor license applicant 11713
or licensee; 11714

S. B. No. 197 Page 400
As Introduced
(3) Holds voting rights with the power to vote five per 11715
cent or more of the outstanding voting rights of a casino 11716
operator, management company, or gaming-related vendor applicant 11717
or licensee. 11718
(N) "Initial investment" includes costs related to 11719
demolition, engineering, architecture, design, site preparation, 11720
construction, infrastructure improvements, land acquisition, 11721
fixtures and equipment, insurance related to construction, and 11722
leasehold improvements. 11723
(O) "Institutional investor" means any of the following 11724
entities owning five per cent or more, but less than twenty-five 11725
per cent, of an ownership interest in a casino facility, casino 11726
operator, management company, or holding company: a corporation, 11727
bank, insurance company, pension fund or pension fund trust, 11728
retirement fund, including funds administered by a public 11729
agency, employees' profit-sharing fund or employees' profit- 11730
sharing trust, any association engaged, as a substantial part of 11731
its business or operations, in purchasing or holding securities, 11732
including a hedge fund, mutual fund, or private equity fund, or 11733
any trust in respect of which a bank is trustee or cotrustee, 11734
investment company registered under the "Investment Company Act 11735
of 1940," 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 et seq., collective investment trust 11736
organized by banks under Part Nine of the Rules of the 11737
Comptroller of the Currency, closed-end investment trust, 11738
chartered or licensed life insurance company or property and 11739
casualty insurance company, investment advisor registered under 11740
the "Investment Advisors Act of 1940," 15 U.S.C. 80 b-1 et seq., 11741
and such other persons as the commission may reasonably 11742
determine to qualify as an institutional investor for reasons 11743
consistent with this chapter, and that does not exercise control 11744
over the affairs of a licensee and its ownership interest in a 11745

S. B. No. 197 Page 401
As Introduced
licensee is for investment purposes only, as set forth in 11746
division (F) of section 3772.10 of the Revised Code. 11747
(P) "Key gaming employee" means any executive, employee, 11748
agent, or other individual who has the power to exercise 11749
significant influence over decisions concerning any part of the 11750
operation of a person that has applied for or holds a casino 11751
operator, management company, or gaming-related vendor license 11752
or the operation of a holding company of a person that has 11753
applied for or holds a casino operator, management company, or 11754
gaming-related vendor license, including: 11755
(1) An officer, director, trustee, partner, or an 11756
equivalent fiduciary; 11757
(2) An individual who holds a direct or indirect ownership 11758
interest of five per cent or more; 11759
(3) An individual who performs the function of a principal 11760
executive officer, principal operating officer, principal 11761
accounting officer, or an equivalent officer; 11762
(4) Any other individual the commission determines to have 11763
the power to exercise significant influence over decisions 11764
concerning any part of the operation a person who holds a valid 11765
key gaming employee license issued under section 3772.13 of the 11766
Revised Code. 11767
(Q) "Licensed casino operator" means a casino operator 11768
that has been issued a license by the commission and that has 11769
been certified annually by the commission to have paid all 11770
applicable fees, taxes, and debts to the state. 11771
(R) "Majority ownership interest" in a license or in a 11772
casino facility, as the case may be, means ownership of more 11773
than fifty per cent of such license or casino facility, as the 11774

S. B. No. 197 Page 402
As Introduced
case may be. For purposes of the foregoing, whether a majority 11775
ownership interest is held in a license or in a casino facility, 11776
as the case may be, shall be determined under the rules for 11777
constructive ownership of stock provided in Treas. Reg. 1.409A- 11778
3(i)(5)(iii) as in effect on January 1, 2009. 11779
(S) "Management company" means an organization retained by 11780
a casino operator to manage a casino facility and provide 11781
services such as accounting, general administration, 11782
maintenance, recruitment, and other operational services. 11783
(T) "Ohio law enforcement training fund" means the state 11784
law enforcement training fund described in Section 6(C)(3)(f) of 11785
Article XV, Ohio Constitution, the money in which shall be used 11786
to enhance public safety by providing training opportunities to 11787
the law enforcement community. 11788
(U) "Person" includes, but is not limited to, an 11789
individual or a combination of individuals; a sole 11790
proprietorship, a firm, a company, a joint venture, a 11791
partnership of any type, a joint-stock company, a corporation of 11792
any type, a corporate subsidiary of any type, a limited 11793
liability company, a business trust, or any other business 11794
entity or organization; an assignee; a receiver; a trustee in 11795
bankruptcy; an unincorporated association, club, society, or 11796
other unincorporated entity or organization; entities that are 11797
disregarded for federal income tax purposes; and any other 11798
nongovernmental, artificial, legal entity that is capable of 11799
engaging in business. 11800
(V) "Problem casino gambling and addictions fund" means 11801
the state problem gambling and addictions fund described in 11802
Section 6(C)(3)(g) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution, the money 11803
in which shall be used for treatment of problem gambling and 11804

S. B. No. 197 Page 403
As Introduced
substance abuse, and for related research. 11805
(W) "Promotional gaming credit" means a slot machine or 11806
table game credit, discount, or other similar item issued to a 11807
patron to enable the placement of, or increase in, a wager at a 11808
slot machine or table game. 11809
(X) "Slot machine" means any mechanical, electrical, or 11810
other device or machine which, upon insertion of a coin, token, 11811
ticket, or similar object, or upon payment of any consideration, 11812
is available to play or operate, the play or operation of which, 11813
whether by reason of the skill of the operator or application of 11814
the element of chance, or both, makes individual prize 11815
determinations for individual participants in cash, premiums, 11816
merchandise, tokens, or any thing of value, whether the payoff 11817
is made automatically from the machine or in any other manner, 11818
but does not include any device that is a skill-based amusement 11819
machine, or an electronic instant bingo system, as defined in 11820
section 2915.01 3768.01 of the Revised Code. 11821
(Y) "Table game" means any game played with cards, dice, 11822
or any mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic device or 11823
machine for money, casino credit, or any representative of 11824
value. "Table game" does not include slot machines. 11825
(Z) "Upfront license" means the first plenary license 11826
issued to a casino operator. 11827
(AA) "Voluntary Ohio voluntary exclusion program" means a 11828
the voluntary exclusion program provided by the commission that 11829
allows persons to voluntarily exclude themselves from the gaming 11830
areas of facilities under the jurisdiction of the commission by 11831
placing their name on a voluntary exclusion list and following 11832
the procedures set forth by the commission under section 3772.39 11833

S. B. No. 197 Page 404
As Introduced
of the Revised Code. 11834
(BB) "Sports gaming," "sports gaming proprietor," "sports 11835
gaming equipment," "sports gaming facility," "sporting event," 11836
"mobile management services provider," and "management services 11837
provider," and "type C sports gaming proprietor" have the same 11838
meanings as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. A person is 11839
considered to be involved in a sporting event if division (F)(3) 11840
of section 3775.13 of the Revised Code applies to the person 11841
with respect to that sporting event. 11842
(CC) "Charitable gaming" and "electronic instant bingo 11843
system" have the same meanings as in section 3768.01 of the 11844
Revised Code. 11845
(DD) "Permit holder" and "satellite facility" have the 11846
same meanings as in section 3769.01 of the Revised Code. "Track" 11847
has the same meaning as in that section, but also includes a 11848
satellite facility. 11849
(EE) "Video lottery sales agent" and "video lottery 11850
terminal" have the same meanings as in section 3770.01 of the 11851
Revised Code. 11852
(FF) "Internet gambling," "internet gambling equipment," 11853
"internet gambling operator," and "internet gambling management 11854
company" have the same meanings as in section 3771.01 of the 11855
Revised Code. 11856
(GG) "Skill-based amusement machine," "sweepstakes," 11857
"sweepstakes terminal device," and "sweepstakes terminal device 11858
facility" have the same meanings as in section 3777.01 of the 11859
Revised Code. 11860
Sec. 3772.02. (A) There is hereby created the Ohio casino 11861
control commission described in Section 6(C)(4) of Article XV, 11862

S. B. No. 197 Page 405
As Introduced
Ohio Constitution. 11863
(B) The commission shall consist of seven members 11864
appointed within one month of September 10, 2010, by the 11865
governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor 11866
shall forward all appointments to the senate within twenty-four 11867
hours. 11868
(1) Each commission member is eligible for reappointment 11869
at the discretion of the governor. No commission member shall be 11870
appointed for more than three terms in total. 11871
(2) Each commission member shall be a resident of Ohio. 11872
(3) At least one commission member shall be experienced in 11873
law enforcement and criminal investigation. 11874
(4) At least one commission member shall be a certified 11875
public accountant experienced in accounting and auditing. 11876
(5) At least one commission member shall be an attorney 11877
admitted to the practice of law in Ohio. 11878
(6) At least one commission member shall be a resident of 11879
a county where one of the casino facilities is located. 11880
(7) Not more than four commission members shall be of the 11881
same political party. 11882
(8) No commission member shall have any affiliation with 11883
an Ohio casino operator or facility or , with a permit holder or 11884
management services company that offers pari-mutuel wagering on 11885
horse racing under Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code, with a 11886
video lottery sales agent, with an internet gambling operator or 11887
internet gambling management company, or with a sports gaming 11888
proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management 11889
services provider licensed under Chapter 3775. of the Revised 11890

S. B. No. 197 Page 406
As Introduced
Code. 11891
(C) Commission members shall serve four-year terms, except 11892
that when the governor makes initial appointments to the 11893
commission under this chapter, the governor shall appoint three 11894
members to serve four-year terms with not more than two such 11895
members from the same political party, two members to serve 11896
three-year terms with such members not being from the same 11897
political party, and two members to serve two-year terms with 11898
such members not being from the same political party. 11899
(D) Each commission member shall hold office from the date 11900
of appointment until the end of the term for which the member 11901
was appointed. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring 11902
before the expiration of the term for which the member's 11903
predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of 11904
the unexpired term. Any member shall continue in office after 11905
the expiration date of the member's term until the member's 11906
successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has 11907
elapsed, whichever occurs first. A vacancy in the commission 11908
membership shall be filled in the same manner as the original 11909
appointment. 11910
(E) The governor shall select one member to serve as 11911
chairperson and the commission members shall select one member 11912
from a different party than the chairperson to serve as vice- 11913
chairperson. The governor may remove and replace the chairperson 11914
at any time. No such member shall serve as chairperson for more 11915
than six successive years. The vice-chairperson shall assume the 11916
duties of the chairperson in the absence of the chairperson. The 11917
chairperson and vice-chairperson shall perform but shall not be 11918
limited to additional duties as are prescribed by commission 11919
rule. 11920

S. B. No. 197 Page 407
As Introduced
(F) A commission member is not required to devote the 11921
member's full time to membership on the commission. Beginning on 11922
September 29, 2015, each member of the commission shall receive 11923
compensation of fifty thousand dollars per year. Beginning July 11924
1, 2016, each member of the commission shall receive 11925
compensation of forty thousand dollars per year. Beginning July 11926
1, 2017, each Each member of the commission shall receive 11927
compensation of thirty sixty thousand dollars per year. Each 11928
member shall receive the member's actual and necessary expenses 11929
incurred in the discharge of the member's official duties. 11930
(G) The governor shall not appoint an individual to the 11931
commission, and an individual shall not serve on the commission, 11932
if the individual is ineligible to be appointed or retained 11933
under section 3772.07 of the Revised Code. A member who comes 11934
under indictment or bill of information of an offense that, if 11935
the member were convicted of the offense, would make the member 11936
ineligible to be appointed or retained under that section shall 11937
resign from the commission immediately upon indictment. 11938
(H) At least five commission members shall be present for 11939
the commission to meet. The concurrence of four members is 11940
necessary for the commission to take any action. All members 11941
shall vote on the adoption of rules, and the approval of, and 11942
the suspension or revocation of, the licenses of casino 11943
operators or management companies, unless a member has a written 11944
leave of absence filed with and approved by the chairperson. 11945
(I) A commission member may be removed or suspended from 11946
office in accordance with section 3.04 of the Revised Code. 11947
(J) Each commission member, before entering upon the 11948
discharge of the member's official duties, shall make an oath to 11949
uphold the Ohio Constitution and laws of the state of Ohio and 11950

S. B. No. 197 Page 408
As Introduced
shall give a bond, payable by the commission, to the treasurer 11951
of state, in the sum of ten thousand dollars with sufficient 11952
sureties to be approved by the treasurer of state, which bond 11953
shall be filed with the secretary of state. 11954
(K) The commission shall hold one regular meeting each 11955
month and shall convene other meetings at the request of the 11956
chairperson or a majority of the members. A member who fails to 11957
attend at least three-fifths of the regular and special meetings 11958
of the commission during any two-year period forfeits membership 11959
on the commission. All meetings of the commission shall be open 11960
meetings under section 121.22 of the Revised Code except as 11961
otherwise allowed by law. 11962
(L) Pursuant to divisions (A)(3) and (9) of section 101.82 11963
of the Revised Code, the commission is exempt from the 11964
requirements of sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code. 11965
Sec. 3772.03. (A) To ensure the integrity of casino gaming 11966
in this state, the commission shall have has jurisdiction and 11967
authority to over all of the following: 11968
(1) Casino gaming, pursuant to this chapter. The 11969
commission has authority to complete the functions of licensing, 11970
regulating, investigating, and penalizing casino operators, 11971
management companies, holding companies, key gaming employees, 11972
casino gaming employees, and gaming-related vendors. The 11973
commission also shall have has jurisdiction over all persons 11974
participating in casino gaming authorized by Section 6(C) of 11975
Article XV, Ohio Constitution, and this chapter. 11976
(2) Charitable gaming, pursuant to Chapter 3768. of the 11977
Revised Code; 11978
(3) Horse racing and pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing, 11979

S. B. No. 197 Page 409
As Introduced
pursuant to Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code; 11980
(4) Video lottery terminal gaming, pursuant to sections 11981
3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code; 11982
(5) Internet gambling, pursuant to Chapter 3771. of the 11983
Revised Code; 11984
(6) Fantasy contests, pursuant to Chapter 3774. of the 11985
Revised Code. The commission has jurisdiction over all persons 11986
conducting or participating in the conduct of a fantasy contest 11987
authorized by Chapter 3774. of the Revised Code, including the 11988
authority to license, regulate, investigate, and penalize those 11989
persons in a manner that is consistent with the commission's 11990
authority to do the same with respect to skill-based amusement 11991
machines. To carry out this division, the commission may adopt 11992
rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, including rules 11993
establishing fees and penalties related to the operation of 11994
fantasy contests. All fees imposed pursuant to those rules shall 11995
be deposited into the casino control commission fund. 11996
(7) Sports gaming, pursuant to Chapter 3775. of the 11997
Revised Code; 11998
(8) Skill-based amusement machine operations and 11999
sweepstakes terminal devices, pursuant to Chapter 3777. of the 12000
Revised Code. The commission has jurisdiction over all persons 12001
conducting or participating in the conduct of skill-based 12002
amusement machine operations and sweepstakes terminal devices 12003
authorized by this chapter and Chapter 3777. of the Revised 12004
Code, including the authority to complete the functions of 12005
licensing, regulating, investigating, and penalizing those 12006
persons in a manner that is consistent with the commission's 12007
authority to do the same with respect to casino gaming. To carry 12008

S. B. No. 197 Page 410
As Introduced
out this division, the commission may adopt rules under Chapter 12009
119. of the Revised Code, including rules establishing fees and 12010
penalties related to the operation of skill-based amusement 12011
machines and sweepstakes terminal devices. All fees imposed 12012
pursuant to those rules shall be deposited into the casino 12013
control commission fund. 12014
(B) All rules adopted by the commission under this chapter 12015
shall be adopted under procedures established in Chapter 119. of 12016
the Revised Code. The commission may contract for the services 12017
of experts and consultants to assist the commission in carrying 12018
out its duties under this section. 12019
(C)(C)(1) The commission shall adopt rules as are 12020
necessary for completing the functions stated in division (A) of 12021
this section and for addressing the subjects enumerated in 12022
division (D) of this section. 12023
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the 12024
Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained 12025
in a rule adopted by the commission in accordance with this 12026
chapter or Chapter 3768., 3769., 3770., 3771., 3775., or 3777. 12027
of the Revised Code during the period beginning on the effective 12028
date of this amendment and ending twelve months after that date 12029
is not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised 12030
Code. 12031
(D) The commission shall adopt, and as advisable and 12032
necessary shall amend or repeal, rules that include all of the 12033
following: 12034
(1) The prevention of practices detrimental to the public 12035
interest; 12036
(2) Prescribing the method of applying, and the form of 12037

S. B. No. 197 Page 411
As Introduced
application, that an applicant for a license under this chapter 12038
must follow as otherwise described in this chapter; 12039
(3) Prescribing the information to be furnished by an 12040
applicant or licensee as described in section 3772.11 of the 12041
Revised Code; 12042
(4) Describing the certification standards and duties of 12043
an independent testing laboratory certified under section 12044
3772.31 of the Revised Code and the relationship between the 12045
commission, the laboratory, the gaming-related vendor, and the 12046
casino operator; 12047
(5) The minimum amount of insurance that must be 12048
maintained by a casino operator, management company, holding 12049
company, or gaming-related vendor; 12050
(6) (5) The approval process for a significant change in 12051
ownership or transfer of control of a licensee as provided in 12052
section 3772.091 of the Revised Code; 12053
(7) (6) The design of gaming supplies, devices, and 12054
equipment to be distributed by gaming-related vendors; 12055
(8) (7) Identifying the casino gaming that is permitted, 12056
identifying the gaming supplies, devices, and equipment, that 12057
are permitted, defining the area in which the permitted casino 12058
gaming may be conducted, and specifying the method of operation 12059
according to which the permitted casino gaming is to be 12060
conducted as provided in section 3772.20 of the Revised Code, 12061
and requiring gaming devices and equipment to meet the standards 12062
of this state; 12063
(9) (8) Tournament play in any casino facility; 12064
(10) Establishing and implementing a (9) Implementing the 12065

S. B. No. 197 Page 412
As Introduced
Ohio voluntary exclusion program that provides all of the 12066
following: 12067
(a) Except as provided by commission rule, a person who 12068
participates in the program shall agree to refrain from entering 12069
a casino facility. 12070
(b) The name of a person participating in the program 12071
shall be included on a list of persons excluded from all casino 12072
facilities. 12073
(c) Except as provided by commission rule, no person who 12074
participates in the program shall petition the commission for 12075
admittance into a casino facility. 12076
(d) The list of persons participating in the program and 12077
the personal information of those persons shall be confidential 12078
and shall only be disseminated by the commission to the state 12079
lottery commission, casino operators, sports gaming proprietors, 12080
and their agents and employees for purposes of enforcement and 12081
to other entities, upon request of the participant and agreement 12082
by the commission. 12083
(e) A casino operator shall make all reasonable attempts 12084
as determined by the commission to cease all direct marketing 12085
efforts to a person participating in the program. 12086
(f) A casino operator shall not cash the check of a person 12087
participating in the program or extend credit to the person in 12088
any manner. However, the program shall not exclude a casino 12089
operator from seeking the payment of a debt accrued by a person 12090
before participating in the program. 12091
(g) Any and all locations at which a person may register 12092
as a participant in the program shall be published. 12093

S. B. No. 197 Page 413
As Introduced
(11) Requiring the commission to adopt standards regarding 12094
the marketing materials of a licensed casino operator, including 12095
allowing the commission to prohibit marketing materials that are 12096
contrary to the adopted standards; 12097
(12) Requiring that the records, including financial 12098
statements, of any casino operator, management company, holding 12099
company, and gaming-related vendor be maintained in the manner 12100
prescribed by the commission and made available for inspection 12101
upon demand by the commission, but shall be subject to section 12102
3772.16 of the Revised Code; 12103
(13) (10) Permitting a licensed casino operator, 12104
management company, key gaming employee, or casino gaming 12105
employee to question a person suspected of violating this 12106
chapter; 12107
(14) (11) The chips, tokens, tickets, electronic cards, or 12108
similar objects that may be purchased by means of an agreement 12109
under which credit is extended to a wagerer by a casino 12110
operator; 12111
(15) (12) Establishing standards for provisional key 12112
gaming employee licenses for a person who is required to be 12113
licensed as a key gaming employee and is in exigent 12114
circumstances and standards for provisional licenses for casino 12115
gaming employees who submit complete applications and are 12116
compliant under an instant background check. A provisional 12117
license shall be valid not longer than three months. A 12118
provisional license may be renewed one time, at the commission's 12119
discretion, for an additional three months. In establishing 12120
standards with regard to instant background checks the 12121
commission shall take notice of criminal records checks as they 12122
are conducted under section 311.41 of the Revised Code using 12123

S. B. No. 197 Page 414
As Introduced
electronic fingerprint reading devices. 12124
(16) (13) Establishing approval procedures for third-party 12125
engineering or accounting firms, as described in section 3772.09 12126
of the Revised Code; 12127
(17) (14) Prescribing the manner in which winnings, 12128
compensation from casino gaming, and gross revenue must be 12129
computed and reported by a licensee as described in Chapter 12130
5753. of the Revised Code; 12131
(18) (15) Prescribing conditions under which a licensee's 12132
license may be suspended or revoked as described in section 12133
3772.04 of the Revised Code; 12134
(19) (16) Prescribing the manner and procedure of all 12135
hearings to be conducted by the commission or by any hearing 12136
examiner; 12137
(20) (17) Prescribing technical standards and requirements 12138
that are to be met by security and surveillance equipment that 12139
is used at and standards and requirements to be met by personnel 12140
who are employed at casino facilities, and standards and 12141
requirements for the provision of security at and surveillance 12142
of casino facilities; 12143
(21) (18) Prescribing requirements for a casino operator 12144
to provide unarmed security services at a casino facility by 12145
licensed casino employees, and the training that shall be 12146
completed by these employees; 12147
(22) (19) Prescribing standards according to which casino 12148
operators shall keep accounts and standards according to which 12149
casino accounts shall be audited, and establish means of 12150
assisting the tax commissioner in levying and collecting the 12151
gross casino revenue tax levied under section 5753.02 of the 12152

S. B. No. 197 Page 415
As Introduced
Revised Code; 12153
(23) (20) Defining penalties for violation of commission 12154
rules and a process for imposing such penalties; 12155
(24) (21) Establishing standards for decertifying 12156
contractors that violate statutes or rules of this state or the 12157
federal government; 12158
(25) (22) Establishing standards for the repair of casino 12159
gaming equipment; 12160
(26) (23) Establishing procedures to ensure that casino 12161
operators, management companies, and holding companies are 12162
compliant with the compulsive and problem gambling plan 12163
submitted under section 3772.18 of the Revised Code; 12164
(27) (24) Prescribing, for institutional investors in or 12165
holding companies of a casino operator, management company, 12166
holding company, or gaming-related vendor that fall below the 12167
threshold needed to be considered an institutional investor or a 12168
holding company, standards regarding what any employees, 12169
members, or owners of those investors or holding companies may 12170
do and shall not do in relation to casino facilities and casino 12171
gaming in this state, which standards shall rationally relate to 12172
the need to proscribe conduct that is inconsistent with passive 12173
institutional investment status; 12174
(28) (25) Providing for any other thing necessary and 12175
proper for successful and efficient regulation of casino gaming 12176
under this chapter. 12177
(E) The commission shall employ and assign gaming agents 12178
as necessary to assist the commission in carrying out the duties 12179
of the commission under this chapter and Chapters 2915. and , 12180
3768., 3769., 3770., 3771., 3775., and 3777. of the Revised 12181

S. B. No. 197 Page 416
As Introduced
Code. In order to maintain employment as a gaming agent, the 12182
gaming agent shall successfully complete all continuing training 12183
programs required by the commission and shall not have been 12184
convicted of or pleaded guilty or no contest to an offense that 12185
makes the gaming agent ineligible for appointment or retention 12186
under section 3772.07 of the Revised Code. 12187
(F) The commission, as a law enforcement agency, and its 12188
gaming agents, as law enforcement officers as defined in section 12189
2901.01 of the Revised Code, shall have authority with regard to 12190
the detection and investigation of, the seizure of evidence 12191
allegedly relating to, and the apprehension and arrest of 12192
persons allegedly committing violations of this chapter or 12193
gambling offenses as defined in section 2915.01 of the Revised 12194
Code or violations of any other law of this state that may 12195
affect the integrity or operation of casino any form of gaming, 12196
the operation of skill-based amusement machines, or the 12197
operation of sports gaming described in division (A) of this 12198
section, and shall have access to casino all facilities, skill- 12199
based amusement machine facilities, and sports gaming facilities 12200
used to operate or facilitate any form of gaming described in 12201
division (A) of this section to carry out the requirements of 12202
this chapter and Chapter Chapters 2915., 3768., 3769., 3770., 12203
3771., 3775., and 3777. of the Revised Code. 12204
(G) The commission may eject or exclude or authorize the 12205
ejection or exclusion of and a gaming agent may eject a person 12206
from a casino facility for any of the following reasons: 12207
(1) The person's name is on the list of persons 12208
voluntarily excluding themselves from all casinos in a program 12209
established according to rules adopted by the commission; 12210
(2) The person violates or conspires to violate this 12211

S. B. No. 197 Page 417
As Introduced
chapter or a rule adopted thereunder; or 12212
(3) The commission determines that the person's conduct or 12213
reputation is such that the person's presence within a casino 12214
facility may call into question the honesty and integrity of the 12215
casino gaming operations or interfere with the orderly conduct 12216
of the casino gaming operations. 12217
(H) A person, other than a person participating in a the 12218
Ohio voluntary exclusion program, may petition the commission 12219
for a public hearing on the person's ejection or exclusion under 12220
this chapter. 12221
(I) A casino operator or management company shall have the 12222
same authority to eject or exclude a person from the management 12223
company's casino facilities as authorized in division (G) of 12224
this section. The licensee shall immediately notify the 12225
commission of an ejection or exclusion. 12226
(J) The commission shall submit a written annual report 12227
with the governor, president and minority leader of the senate, 12228
and the speaker and minority leader of the house of 12229
representatives before the first day of September each year. The 12230
annual report shall cover the previous fiscal year and shall 12231
include all of the following: 12232
(1) A statement describing the receipts and disbursements 12233
of the commission; 12234
(2) Relevant financial data regarding casino gaming, 12235
including gross revenues and disbursements made under this 12236
chapter; 12237
(3) Actions taken by the commission; 12238
(4) An update on casino operators', management companies', 12239

S. B. No. 197 Page 418
As Introduced
and holding companies' compulsive and problem gambling plans and 12240
the voluntary exclusion program and list; 12241
(5) Information regarding prosecutions for conduct 12242
described in division (H) of section 3772.99 of the Revised 12243
Code, including, but not limited to, the total number of 12244
prosecutions commenced and the name of each person prosecuted; 12245
(6) Any additional information that the commission 12246
considers useful or that the governor, president or minority 12247
leader of the senate, or speaker or minority leader of the house 12248
of representatives requests. 12249
(K) To ensure the integrity of skill-based amusement 12250
machine operations, the commission shall have jurisdiction over 12251
all persons conducting or participating in the conduct of skill- 12252
based amusement machine operations authorized by this chapter 12253
and Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code, including the authority 12254
to complete the functions of licensing, regulating, 12255
investigating, and penalizing those persons in a manner that is 12256
consistent with the commission's authority to do the same with 12257
respect to casino gaming. To carry out this division, the 12258
commission may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised 12259
Code, including rules establishing fees and penalties related to 12260
the operation of skill-based amusement machines. 12261
(L) To ensure the integrity of fantasy contests, the 12262
commission shall have jurisdiction over all persons conducting 12263
or participating in the conduct of a fantasy contest authorized 12264
by Chapter 3774. of the Revised Code, including the authority to 12265
license, regulate, investigate, and penalize those persons in a 12266
manner that is consistent with the commission's authority to do 12267
the same with respect to skill-based amusement machines. To 12268
carry out this division, the commission may adopt rules under 12269

S. B. No. 197 Page 419
As Introduced
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, including rules establishing 12270
fees and penalties related to the operation of fantasy contests. 12271
(M) All fees imposed pursuant to the rules adopted under 12272
divisions (K) and (L) of this section shall be deposited into 12273
the casino control commission fund. 12274
Sec. 3772.031. (A)(1) The general assembly finds that the 12275
exclusion or ejection of certain persons from casino facilities 12276
and from sports gaming is necessary to effectuate the intents 12277
and purposes of this chapter and Chapter Chapters 3769., 3770., 12278
3771., and 3775. of the Revised Code and to maintain strict and 12279
effective regulation of casino gaming and sports gaming. The 12280
general assembly specifically finds that the exclusion from 12281
sports gaming of persons who threaten violence or harm against 12282
persons who are involved in sporting events, where the threat is 12283
related to sports gaming, is necessary to effectuate the intent 12284
of Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code and to protect the 12285
interests of this state. 12286
(2) The commission, by rule, shall provide for a all of 12287
the following: 12288
(a) A list of persons who are to be excluded or ejected 12289
from a casino facility and a ; 12290
(b) A list of persons who are to be excluded or ejected 12291
from a sports gaming facility and from participating in the play 12292
or operation of sports gaming in this state; 12293
(c) A list of persons who are to be excluded or ejected 12294
from a track and from participating in the play or operation of 12295
video lottery terminal gaming and pari-mutuel wagering on horse 12296
racing in this state; 12297
(d) A list of persons who are to be excluded from 12298

S. B. No. 197 Page 420
As Introduced
participating in the play or operation of internet gambling in 12299
this state. Persons 12300
(3) Persons included on an exclusion list shall be 12301
identified by name and physical description. The commission 12302
shall publish the exclusion lists on its web site, and shall 12303
transmit a copy of the exclusion lists periodically to casino 12304
operators and , sports gaming proprietors, video lottery sales 12305
agents, permit holders, and internet gambling operators, as 12306
applicable, as they are initially issued and thereafter as they 12307
are revised from time to time. 12308
(3) (4) A casino operator shall take steps necessary to 12309
ensure that all its key gaming employees and casino gaming 12310
employees are aware of and understand the casino exclusion list 12311
and its function, and that all its key gaming employees and 12312
casino gaming employees are kept aware of the content of the 12313
casino exclusion list as it is issued and thereafter revised 12314
from time to time. 12315
(4) (5) A sports gaming proprietor shall take steps 12316
necessary to ensure that its appropriate agents and employees 12317
are aware of and understand the sports gaming exclusion list and 12318
its function, and that all its appropriate agents and employees 12319
are kept aware of the content of the sports gaming exclusion 12320
list as it is issued and thereafter revised from time to time. 12321
(6) A video lottery sales agent or other permit holder 12322
shall take steps necessary to ensure that its appropriate agents 12323
and employees are aware of and understand the track exclusion 12324
list and its function, and that all its appropriate agents and 12325
employees are kept aware of the content of the track exclusion 12326
list as it is issued and thereafter revised from time to time. 12327
This division does not apply to a permit holder who holds only a 12328

S. B. No. 197 Page 421
As Introduced
permit issued for a racing meeting at a fair. 12329
(7) An internet gambling operator shall take steps 12330
necessary to ensure that its appropriate agents and employees 12331
are aware of and understand the internet gambling exclusion list 12332
and its function, and that all its appropriate agents and 12333
employees are kept aware of the content of the internet gambling 12334
exclusion list as it is issued and thereafter revised from time 12335
to time. 12336
(B) (B)(1) The casino exclusion list may include any 12337
person whose presence in a casino facility is determined by the 12338
commission to pose a threat to the interests of the state, to 12339
achieving the intents and purposes of this chapter, or to the 12340
strict and effective regulation of casino gaming. The 12341
(2) The sports gaming exclusion list may include any 12342
person who, before, during, or after a sporting event, threatens 12343
violence or harm against any person who is involved in the 12344
sporting event, where the threat is related to sports gaming, or 12345
whose presence in a sports gaming facility or whose 12346
participation in the play or operation of sports gaming in this 12347
state is determined by the commission to pose a threat to the 12348
interests of the state, to achieving the intents and purposes of 12349
Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code, or to the strict and 12350
effective regulation of sports gaming. In 12351
(3) The track exclusion list may include any person whose 12352
presence at a track is determined by the commission to pose a 12353
threat to the interests of the state, to achieving the intents 12354
and purposes of this chapter or Chapter 3769. or 3770. of the 12355
Revised Code, or to the strict and effective regulation of video 12356
lottery terminal gaming or pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing. 12357

S. B. No. 197 Page 422
As Introduced
(4) The internet gambling exclusion list may include any 12358
person whose participation in the play or operation of internet 12359
gambling in this state is determined by the commission to pose a 12360
threat to the interests of the state, to achieving the intents 12361
and purposes of this chapter or Chapter 3771. of the Revised 12362
Code, or to the strict and effective regulation of internet 12363
gambling. 12364
(C) In determining whether to include a person on an 12365
exclusion list, the commission may consider: 12366
(1) Any prior conviction of a crime that is a felony under 12367
the laws of this state, another state, or the United States, a 12368
crime involving moral turpitude, or a violation of the gaming 12369
laws of this state, another state, or the United States; and 12370
(2) A violation, or a conspiracy to violate, any provision 12371
of this chapter or Chapter 3769., 3770., 3771., or 3775. of the 12372
Revised Code, as applicable, that consists of: 12373
(a) A failure to disclose an interest in a gaming facility 12374
or a sports gaming-related person or entity for which the person 12375
must obtain a license; 12376
(b) Purposeful evasion of taxes or fees; 12377
(c) A notorious or unsavory reputation that would 12378
adversely affect public confidence and trust that casino gaming 12379
or sports gaming is free from criminal or corruptive elements; 12380
or 12381
(d) A violation of an order of the commission or of any 12382
other governmental agency that warrants exclusion or ejection of 12383
the person from a casino facility, from a sports gaming 12384
facility, from a track, or from participating in the play or 12385
operation of sports gaming in this state. 12386

S. B. No. 197 Page 423
As Introduced
(3) If the person has pending charges or indictments for a 12387
gaming or gambling crime or a crime related to the integrity of 12388
gaming operations in any state; 12389
(4) If the person's conduct or reputation is such that the 12390
person's presence within a casino facility sports gaming 12391
facility, or track or in the sports gaming industry in this 12392
state may call into question the honesty and integrity of the 12393
casino gaming or sports gaming operations or interfere with the 12394
orderly conduct of the casino gaming or sports gaming 12395
operations; 12396
(5) If the person is a career or professional offender 12397
whose presence in a casino facility, sports gaming facility, or 12398
track or in the sports gaming industry in this state would be 12399
adverse to the interest of licensed gaming in this state; 12400
(6) If the person has a known relationship or connection 12401
with a career or professional offender whose presence in a 12402
casino facility, sports gaming facility, or track or in the 12403
sports gaming industry in this state would be adverse to the 12404
interest of licensed gaming in this state; 12405
(7) If the commission has suspended the person's gaming 12406
privileges; 12407
(8) If the commission has revoked the person's licenses 12408
related to this chapter or Chapter 3769., 3770., 3771., or 3775. 12409
of the Revised Code; 12410
(9) If the commission determines that the person poses a 12411
threat to the safety of patrons or employees of a casino 12412
facility or , a sports gaming facility, or a track; 12413
(10) If the person has threatened violence or harm against 12414
a person who is involved in the sporting event, where the threat 12415

S. B. No. 197 Page 424
As Introduced
was related to sports gaming with respect to that sporting 12416
event; 12417
(11) If the person has a history of conduct involving the 12418
disruption of gaming operations within a casino facility or in 12419
the sports gaming industry in this state. 12420
Race, color, creed, national origin or ancestry, or sex 12421
are not grounds for placing a person on an exclusion list. 12422
(C) (D) The commission shall notify a person of the 12423
commission's intent to include such person on one or both more 12424
exclusion lists. The notice shall be provided by personal 12425
service, by certified mail to the person's last known address, 12426
by commercial carrier utilizing a method of delivery that 12427
provides confirmation of delivery, or, if service cannot be 12428
accomplished by personal service, certified mail, or commercial 12429
carrier, by publication daily for two weeks in a newspaper of 12430
general circulation within the county in which the person 12431
resides and in a newspaper of general circulation within each 12432
county in which a casino facility or , sports gaming facility, 12433
or track, as applicable, is located. 12434
(D)(1) (E)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this 12435
section, a person who receives notice of intent to include the 12436
person on an exclusion list is entitled, upon the person's 12437
request, to an adjudication hearing under Chapter 119. of the 12438
Revised Code, in which the person may demonstrate why the person 12439
should not be included on the exclusion list or lists. The 12440
person shall request such an adjudication hearing not later than 12441
thirty days after the person receives the notice by personal 12442
service, certified mail, or commercial carrier, or not later 12443
than thirty days after the last newspaper publication of the 12444
notice. 12445

S. B. No. 197 Page 425
As Introduced
(2) If the person does not request a hearing in accordance 12446
with division (D)(1) (E)(1) of this section, the commission may, 12447
but is not required to, conduct an adjudication hearing under 12448
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The commission may reopen an 12449
adjudication under this section at any time. 12450
(3) If the adjudication hearing, order, or any appeal 12451
thereof under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code results in an 12452
order that the person should not be included on the exclusion 12453
list or lists, the commission shall publish a revised exclusion 12454
list that does not include the person. The commission also shall 12455
notify casino operators or sports gaming proprietors, as its 12456
applicable, licensees that the person has been removed from the 12457
exclusion list or lists. A casino operator shall take all steps 12458
necessary to ensure its key gaming employees and casino gaming 12459
employees are made aware that the person has been removed from 12460
the casino exclusion list. A sports gaming proprietor, internet 12461
gambling operator, or video lottery sales agent or other permit 12462
holder, other than a permit holder who holds only a permit 12463
issued for a racing meeting at a fair, shall take all steps 12464
necessary to ensure its appropriate agents and employees are 12465
made aware that the person has been removed from the sports 12466
gaming applicable exclusion list. 12467
(E)(F) This section does not apply to any voluntary 12468
exclusion list created as part of a the Ohio voluntary exclusion 12469
program under this chapter or Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code. 12470
Sec. 3772.04. (A)(1) If the commission concludes that an 12471
applicant, licensee, or other person subject to the commission's 12472
jurisdiction under this chapter should be fined or penalized, or 12473
that a license required by this chapter or , Chapter 3769., 12474
3771., 3775., or 3777., or sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 of the 12475

S. B. No. 197 Page 426
As Introduced
Revised Code should be limited, conditioned, restricted, 12476
suspended, revoked, denied, or not renewed, the commission may, 12477
and if so requested by the licensee, applicant, or other person, 12478
shall, conduct a hearing in an adjudication under Chapter 119. 12479
of the Revised Code. After notice and opportunity for a hearing, 12480
the commission may fine or penalize the applicant, licensee, or 12481
other person or limit, condition, restrict, suspend, revoke, 12482
deny, or not renew a license under rules adopted by the 12483
commission. The commission may reopen an adjudication under this 12484
section at any time. 12485
(2) The commission shall appoint a hearing examiner to 12486
conduct the hearing in the adjudication. A party to the 12487
adjudication may file written objections to the hearing 12488
examiner's report and recommendations not later than the 12489
thirtieth day after they are served upon the party or the 12490
party's attorney or other representative of record. The 12491
commission shall not take up the hearing examiner's report and 12492
recommendations earlier than the thirtieth day after the hearing 12493
examiner's report and recommendations were submitted to the 12494
commission. 12495
(3) If the commission finds that a person fails or has 12496
failed to meet has done any requirement under this chapter or 12497
Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code or a rule adopted thereunder 12498
following, or violates or has violated this chapter or Chapter 12499
3775. of the Revised Code or a rule adopted thereunder, the 12500
commission may issue an order under division (A)(4) of this 12501
section: 12502
(a) Violated or failed to meet any applicable provision of 12503
this chapter, Chapter 3769., 3771., 3775., or 3777., or sections 12504
3771.21 to 3771.22 of the Revised Code or any rule adopted 12505

S. B. No. 197 Page 427
As Introduced
thereunder; 12506
(b) Engaged in any material or intentional 12507
misrepresentation or material omission; 12508
(c) Engaged in any fraudulent act; 12509
(d) Failed to cooperate with the commission; 12510
(e) Failed to comply with all the terms and conditions of 12511
a settlement agreement or agreed order with the commission and 12512
any subsequent amendment or modification; 12513
(f) Failed to comply with the terms and conditions of a 12514
commission order or resolution or any subsequent amendment or 12515
modification; 12516
(g) Failed to allow the commission access to records as 12517
required under this chapter, Chapter 3769., 3771., 3775., or 12518
3777., or sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code or any 12519
rule adopted thereunder, to comply with the terms of a subpoena 12520
issued by the commission, or to testify on matters about which 12521
the person may be lawfully questioned; 12522
(h) Engaged in any conduct that undermines the integrity 12523
of, or public's confidence in, gaming in this state. 12524
(4) Upon making a finding under division (A)(3) of this 12525
section, the commission may issue an order doing any of the 12526
following: 12527
(a) Limiting, conditioning, restricting, suspending, 12528
revoking, denying, or not renewing, a license issued under this 12529
chapter or Chapter 3769., 3771., 3775., or 3777. or sections 12530
3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code; 12531
(b) Requiring a casino facility to exclude a licensee from 12532

S. B. No. 197 Page 428
As Introduced
the casino facility or requiring a casino facility not to pay to 12533
the licensee any remuneration for services or any share of 12534
profits, income, or accruals on the licensee's investment in the 12535
casino facility; or 12536
(c) Fining Restricting the licensee's gaming operations; 12537
(d) Imposing a monetary fine or a monetary civil penalty 12538
on a licensee or other person according to the penalties adopted 12539
by the commission. If the violation or failure resulted in the 12540
unlawful obtainment or retention of any money or property, the 12541
commission may impose an additional civil penalty or fine in an 12542
amount equal to the value of the money or property that was 12543
unlawfully obtained or retained. 12544
(e) Imposing any other discipline on the person to which 12545
the person agrees. 12546
(4) (5) A key gaming employee or gaming employee whose 12547
employment has been terminated remains subject to this section. 12548
(6) The commission may find that multiple violations or 12549
failures occurred within a single day if each violation or 12550
failure was the result of a separate and distinct act. 12551
(7) The commission may hold applicants, licensees, or 12552
other persons jointly and severally liable for a violation or 12553
failure. 12554
(8) An order may be judicially reviewed under section 12555
119.12 of the Revised Code. 12556
(B) Without in any manner limiting the authority of the 12557
commission to impose the level and type of discipline the 12558
commission considers appropriate, the commission may take into 12559
consideration the following: 12560

S. B. No. 197 Page 429
As Introduced
(1) If the licensee knew or reasonably should have known 12561
that the action complained of was a violation of any law, rule, 12562
or condition on the licensee's license; 12563
(2) If the licensee has previously been disciplined by the 12564
commission; 12565
(3) If the licensee has previously been subject to 12566
discipline by the commission concerning the violation of any 12567
law, rule, or condition of the licensee's license; 12568
(4) If the licensee reasonably relied upon professional 12569
advice from a lawyer, doctor, accountant, or other recognized 12570
professional that was relevant to the action resulting in the 12571
violation; 12572
(5) If the licensee or the licensee's employer had a 12573
reasonably constituted and functioning compliance program; 12574
(6) If the imposition of a condition requiring the 12575
licensee to establish and implement a written self-enforcement 12576
and compliance program would assist in ensuring the licensee's 12577
future compliance with all statutes, rules, and conditions of 12578
the license; 12579
(7) If the licensee realized a pecuniary gain from the 12580
violation; 12581
(8) If the amount of any fine or other penalty imposed 12582
would result in disgorgement of any gains unlawfully realized by 12583
the licensee; 12584
(9) If the violation was caused by an officer or employee 12585
of the licensee, the level of authority of the individual who 12586
caused the violation; 12587
(10) If the individual who caused the violation acted 12588

S. B. No. 197 Page 430
As Introduced
within the scope of the individual's authority as granted by the 12589
licensee; 12590
(11) The adequacy of any training programs offered by the 12591
licensee or the licensee's employer that were relevant to the 12592
activity that resulted in the violation; 12593
(12) If the licensee's action substantially deviated from 12594
industry standards and customs; 12595
(13) The extent to which the licensee cooperated with the 12596
commission during the investigation of the violation; 12597
(14) If the licensee has initiated remedial measures to 12598
prevent similar violations; 12599
(15) The magnitude of penalties imposed on other licensees 12600
for similar violations; 12601
(16) The proportionality of the penalty in relation to the 12602
misconduct; 12603
(17) The extent to which the amount of any fine imposed 12604
would punish the licensee for the conduct and deter future 12605
violations; 12606
(18) The risk to the public and to the integrity of gaming 12607
in this state; 12608
(19) Any mitigating factors offered by the licensee; and 12609
(19) (20) Any other factors the commission considers 12610
relevant. 12611
(C) For the purpose of conducting any study or 12612
investigation, the commission may direct that public hearings be 12613
held at a time and place, prescribed by the commission, in 12614
accordance with section 121.22 of the Revised Code. The 12615

S. B. No. 197 Page 431
As Introduced
commission shall give notice of all public hearings in such 12616
manner as will give actual notice to all interested parties. 12617
(D)(1) For the purpose of conducting the hearing in an 12618
adjudication under division (A) of this section, or in the 12619
discharge of any duties imposed by this chapter or Chapter 12620
3769., 3770., 3771., 3775., or 3777. of the Revised Code, the 12621
commission may require that testimony be given under oath and 12622
administer such oath, issue subpoenas compelling the attendance 12623
of witnesses and the production of any papers, books, and 12624
accounts, directed to the sheriffs of the counties where such 12625
witnesses or papers, books, and accounts are found and cause the 12626
deposition of any witness. The subpoenas shall be served and 12627
returned in the same manner as subpoenas in criminal cases are 12628
served and returned. The fees of sheriffs shall be the same as 12629
those allowed by the court of common pleas in criminal cases. 12630
(2) In the event of the refusal of any person without good 12631
cause to comply with the terms of a subpoena issued by the 12632
commission or refusal to testify on matters about which the 12633
person may lawfully be questioned, the prosecuting attorney of 12634
the county in which such person resides, upon the petition of 12635
the commission, may bring a proceeding for contempt against such 12636
person in the court of common pleas of that county. 12637
(3) Witnesses shall be paid the fees and mileage provided 12638
for in section 119.094 of the Revised Code. 12639
(4) All fees and mileage expenses incurred at the request 12640
of a party shall be paid in advance by the party. 12641
(E) When conducting a public hearing, the commission shall 12642
not limit the number of speakers who may testify. However, the 12643
commission may set reasonable time limits on the length of an 12644

S. B. No. 197 Page 432
As Introduced
individual's testimony or the total amount of time allotted to 12645
proponents and opponents of an issue before the commission. 12646
(F) The commission may rely, in whole or in part, upon 12647
investigations, conclusions, or findings of other casino gaming 12648
or sports gaming commissions, as applicable, or other government 12649
regulatory bodies in connection with licensing, investigations, 12650
or other matters relating to an applicant or licensee under this 12651
chapter. 12652
(G) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 12653
chapter or Chapter 3769., 3770., 3771., 3775., or 3777. of the 12654
Revised Code, and except with respect to a license issued under 12655
this chapter to a casino operator, management company, or 12656
holding company, the executive director may issue an emergency 12657
order for the suspension, limitation, or conditioning of any 12658
license, registration, approval, or certificate issued, 12659
approved, granted, or otherwise authorized by the commission 12660
under Chapter 3769., 3770., 3771., 3772. or , 3775., or 3777. of 12661
the Revised Code or the rules adopted thereunder, requiring the 12662
inclusion of persons on the casino an exclusion list or sports 12663
gaming exclusion list provided for under section 3772.031 of the 12664
Revised Code or Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code and the rules 12665
adopted thereunder, and requiring a casino facility not to pay a 12666
licensee, registrant, or approved or certified person any 12667
remuneration for services or any share of profits, income, or 12668
accruals on that person's investment in the casino facility. 12669
(1) An emergency order may be issued when the executive 12670
director finds either of the following: 12671
(a) A licensee, registrant, or approved or certified 12672
person has been charged with a violation of any of the criminal 12673
laws of this state, another state, or the federal government; 12674

S. B. No. 197 Page 433
As Introduced
(b) Such an action is necessary to prevent a violation of 12675
this chapter or Chapter 3769., 3770., 3771., 3775., or 3777. of 12676
the Revised Code or a rule adopted thereunder. 12677
(2) An emergency order issued under division (G) of this 12678
section shall state the reasons for the commission's action, 12679
cite the law or rule directly involved, and state that the party 12680
will be afforded a hearing if the party requests it within 12681
thirty days after the time of mailing or personal delivery of 12682
the order. 12683
(3)(a) Not later than the next business day after the 12684
issuance of the emergency order, the order shall be sent by 12685
registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or by 12686
commercial carrier utilizing any form of delivery requiring a 12687
signed receipt, to the party at the party's last known mailing 12688
address appearing in the commission's records or personally 12689
delivered at any time to the party by an employee or agent of 12690
the commission. 12691
(b) A copy of the order shall be mailed or an electronic 12692
copy provided to the attorney or other representative of record 12693
representing the party. 12694
(c) If the order sent by registered or certified mail or 12695
by commercial carrier is returned because the party fails to 12696
claim the order, the commission shall send the order by ordinary 12697
mail to the party at the party's last known address and shall 12698
obtain a certificate of mailing. Service by ordinary mail is 12699
complete when the certificate of mailing is obtained unless the 12700
order is returned showing failure of delivery. 12701
(d) If the order sent by commercial carrier or registered, 12702
certified, or ordinary mail is returned for failure of delivery, 12703

S. B. No. 197 Page 434
As Introduced
the commission shall either make personal delivery of the order 12704
by an employee or agent of the commission or cause a summary of 12705
the substantive provisions of the order to be published once a 12706
week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general 12707
circulation in the county where the last known address of the 12708
party is located. 12709
(i) Failure of delivery occurs only when a mailed order is 12710
returned by the postal authorities or commercial carrier marked 12711
undeliverable, address or addressee unknown, or forwarding 12712
address unknown or expired. 12713
(ii) When service is completed by publication, a proof of 12714
publication affidavit, with the first publication of the summary 12715
set forth in the affidavit, shall be mailed by ordinary mail to 12716
the party at the party's last known address and the order shall 12717
be deemed received as of the date of the last publication. 12718
(e) Refusal of delivery of the order sent by mail or 12719
personally delivered to the party is not failure of delivery and 12720
service is deemed to be complete. 12721
(4) The emergency order shall be effective immediately 12722
upon service of the order on the party. The emergency order 12723
shall remain effective until further order of the executive 12724
director or the commission. 12725
(5) The commission may, and if so requested by the person 12726
affected by the emergency order shall, promptly conduct a 12727
hearing in an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised 12728
Code. 12729
(H)(1) A person whose license under this chapter, Chapter 12730
3769., 3771., 3775., or 3777., or sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 of 12731
the Revised Code is denied or revoked is ineligible to apply for 12732

S. B. No. 197 Page 435
As Introduced
a license under this chapter, Chapter 3769., 3771., 3775., or 12733
3777., or sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code for a 12734
period of three years after the date of the denial or 12735
revocation. 12736
(2) Division (H)(1) of this section does not apply to 12737
either of the following: 12738
(a) A person who withdraws the person's license 12739
application with the approval of the executive director of the 12740
commission before the license is denied; 12741
(b) A person who is not issued a license solely due to a 12742
limit on the number of available licenses. 12743
Sec. 3772.062. (A)(1) The executive director of the 12744
commission shall enter into an agreement with the department of 12745
mental health and addiction services under which the department 12746
provides a program of problem gambling and addiction services, 12747
including services to alleviate problem sports gaming, on behalf 12748
of the commission. 12749
(2) The commission shall use the moneys in the problem 12750
sports gaming gambling fund established under section 5753.031 12751
of the Revised Code for the purpose of paying the costs of 12752
program services to alleviate problem sports gaming gambling in 12753
this state. 12754
(B) The executive director of the commission, in 12755
conjunction with the department of mental health and addiction 12756
services and the state lottery commission, shall establish, 12757
operate, and publicize an in-state, toll-free telephone number 12758
Ohio residents may call to obtain basic information about 12759
problem gambling, the gambling addiction services available to 12760
problem gamblers, and how a problem gambler may obtain help. The 12761

S. B. No. 197 Page 436
As Introduced
telephone number shall be staffed twenty-four hours per day, 12762
seven days a week, to respond to inquiries and provide that 12763
information. The costs of establishing, operating, and 12764
publicizing the telephone number shall be paid for with money in 12765
the problem casino gambling and addictions fund. 12766
Sec. 3772.07. The following appointing or licensing 12767
authorities shall obtain a criminal records check of the person 12768
who is to be appointed or licensed: 12769
(A) The governor, before appointing an individual as a 12770
member of the commission; 12771
(B) The commission, before appointing an individual as 12772
executive director or a gaming agent; 12773
(C) The commission, before issuing a license for a key 12774
gaming employee or casino gaming employee, and before issuing a 12775
license for each investor, except an institutional investor, for 12776
a casino operator, management company, holding company, or 12777
gaming-related vendor; 12778
(D) The executive director, before appointing an 12779
individual as a professional, technical, or clerical employee of 12780
the commission. 12781
Thereafter, such an appointing or licensing authority 12782
shall obtain a criminal records check of the same individual at 12783
three-year intervals. 12784
The appointing or licensing authority shall make available 12785
to each person of whom a criminal records check is required a 12786
copy of the form and the standard fingerprint impression sheet 12787
prescribed under divisions (C)(1) and (2) of section 109.572 of 12788
the Revised Code. The person shall complete the form and 12789
impression sheet and return them as directed by the appointing 12790

S. B. No. 197 Page 437
As Introduced
or licensing authority. If a person fails to complete and return 12791
the form and impression sheet within a reasonable time, the 12792
person is ineligible to be appointed or licensed or to continue 12793
in the appointment or licensure. 12794
The appointing or licensing authority shall cause the 12795
completed form and impression sheet to be forwarded to the 12796
superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and 12797
investigation. The appointing or licensing authority shall 12798
request the superintendent also to obtain information from the 12799
federal bureau of investigation, including fingerprint-based 12800
checks of the national crime information databases, and from 12801
other states and the federal government under the national crime 12802
prevention and privacy compact as part of the criminal records 12803
check. 12804
For all criminal records checks conducted under this 12805
section, the applicant for a casino operator, management 12806
company, holding company, or gaming-related vendor, key 12807
employee, or casino gaming employee license shall pay the fee 12808
charged by the bureau of criminal identification and 12809
investigation or by a vendor approved by the bureau to conduct a 12810
criminal records check based on the applicant's fingerprints in 12811
accordance with division (A)(15) of section 109.572 of the 12812
Revised Code. If the applicant for a key employee or casino 12813
gaming employee license is applying at the request of a casino 12814
operator, management company, holding company, or gaming-related 12815
vendor, the casino operator, management company, holding 12816
company, or gaming-related vendor shall pay the fee charged for 12817
all criminal records checks conducted under this section. 12818
The appointing or licensing authority shall review the 12819
results of a criminal records check. An appointee for a 12820

S. B. No. 197 Page 438
As Introduced
commission member shall forward the results of the criminal 12821
records check to the president of the senate before the senate 12822
advises and consents to the appointment of the commission 12823
member. The appointing authority shall not appoint or retain the 12824
appointment of a person a criminal records check discloses has 12825
been convicted of or has pleaded guilty or no contest to any 12826
gambling offense, any theft offense, any offense having an 12827
element of fraud or misrepresentation, any offense having an 12828
element of moral turpitude, and any felony not otherwise 12829
included in the foregoing list, except as otherwise provided in 12830
section 3772.10 of the Revised Code. The licensing authority 12831
shall not license a person if a criminal records check discloses 12832
that the person has been convicted of a disqualifying offense. 12833
As used in this section, "disqualifying offense" means a 12834
disqualifying offense as determined by the licensing authority 12835
under section 9.79 of the Revised Code. 12836
The report of a criminal records check is not a public 12837
record that is open to public inspection and copying. The 12838
commission shall not make the report available to any person 12839
other than the person who was the subject of the criminal 12840
records check; an appointing or licensing authority; a member, 12841
the executive director, or an employee of the commission; or any 12842
court or agency, including a hearing examiner, in a judicial or 12843
administrative proceeding relating to the person's employment or 12844
application for a license under this chapter. 12845
Sec. 3772.09. (A) No casino operator, management company, 12846
holding company, gaming-related vendor, key gaming employee, or 12847
casino gaming employee shall conduct or participate in 12848
conducting casino gaming without first obtaining a license from 12849
the commission. 12850

S. B. No. 197 Page 439
As Introduced
(B) Before a licensed casino operator may conduct casino 12851
gaming at a casino facility, a licensed casino operator shall 12852
engage a third-party engineering or accounting firm to certify 12853
expenses of its initial investment, as required by section 12854
3772.27 of the Revised Code, and provide documentation to the 12855
commission. The third-party engineering or accounting firm shall 12856
be approved by the commission and shall certify expenses in 12857
accordance with rules adopted by the commission under section 12858
3772.03 of the Revised Code. The commission may request the 12859
department of administrative services to assist the commission 12860
in carrying out its duties under this section. 12861
Sec. 3772.091. (A) No license issued under this chapter is 12862
transferable. Except as provided in division (B) of this 12863
section, new majority ownership interest or control of a 12864
licensee shall require a new license. The commission may reopen 12865
a licensing investigation at any time. A significant change in 12866
or transfer of control, as determined by the commission, shall 12867
require the filing of an application for a new license and 12868
submission of a license fee with the commission before any such 12869
change or transfer of control is approved. A change in or 12870
transfer of control to an immediate family member is not 12871
considered a significant change under this section. 12872
(B) An initial license shall not be considered 12873
transferred, and a new license shall not be required, when an 12874
initial licensee that is licensed before June 1, 2013, does or 12875
has done both of the following: 12876
(1) Obtains a majority ownership interest in, or a change 12877
in or transfer of control of, another initial licensee for the 12878
same casino facility; and 12879
(2) Was investigated under this chapter as a parent, 12880

S. B. No. 197 Page 440
As Introduced
affiliate, subsidiary, key gaming employee, or partner, or joint 12881
venturer with another initial licensee that has held for the 12882
same casino facility a majority ownership interest in or control 12883
of the initial license when the initial license was issued and 12884
when such an initial licensee obtains a majority ownership 12885
interest in or a change in or transfer of control. 12886
(C) As used in this section: 12887
(1) "Control" means either of the following: 12888
(a) Either: 12889
(i) Holding fifty per cent or more of the outstanding 12890
voting securities of a licensee; or 12891
(ii) For an unincorporated licensee, having the right to 12892
fifty per cent or more of the profits of the licensee, or having 12893
the right in the event of dissolution to fifty per cent or more 12894
of the assets of the licensee. 12895
(b) Having the contractual power presently to designate 12896
fifty per cent or more of the directors of a for-profit or not- 12897
for-profit corporation, or in the case of trusts described in 12898
paragraphs (c)(3) to (5) of 16 C.F.R. 801.1, the trustees of 12899
such a trust. 12900
(2) "Initial license" means the first plenary license 12901
issued to an initial licensee. 12902
(3) "Initial licensee" means any of the persons issued an 12903
initial license to conduct or participate in conducting casino 12904
gaming at each casino facility as either a casino operator, a 12905
management company, or a holding company of a casino operator or 12906
management company. 12907
Sec. 3772.10. (A) In determining whether to grant or 12908

S. B. No. 197 Page 441
As Introduced
maintain the privilege of a casino operator, management company, 12909
holding company, key employee, casino gaming employee, or 12910
gaming-related vendor license, the Ohio casino control 12911
commission shall, except as provided in division (D) of this 12912
section, consider all of the following, as applicable: 12913
(1) The reputation, experience, and financial integrity of 12914
the applicant, its holding company, if applicable, and any other 12915
person that directly or indirectly controls the applicant; 12916
(2) The financial ability of the applicant to purchase and 12917
maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance and to 12918
provide an adequate surety bond; 12919
(3) The past and present compliance of the applicant and 12920
its affiliates or affiliated companies with casino-related 12921
licensing requirements in this state or any other jurisdiction, 12922
including whether the applicant has a history of noncompliance 12923
with the casino licensing requirements of any jurisdiction; 12924
(4) If the applicant has been indicted, convicted, pleaded 12925
guilty or no contest, or forfeited bail concerning any criminal 12926
offense under the laws of any jurisdiction, either felony or 12927
misdemeanor, not including traffic violations; 12928
(5) If the applicant has filed, or had filed against it a 12929
proceeding for bankruptcy or has ever been involved in any 12930
formal process to adjust, defer, suspend, or otherwise work out 12931
the payment of any debt; 12932
(6) If the applicant has been served with a complaint or 12933
other notice filed with any public body regarding a payment of 12934
any tax required under federal, state, or local law that has 12935
been delinquent for one or more years; 12936
(7) If the applicant is or has been a defendant in 12937

S. B. No. 197 Page 442
As Introduced
litigation involving its business practices; 12938
(8) If awarding a license would undermine the public's 12939
confidence in the casino gaming industry in this state; 12940
(9) If the applicant meets other standards for the 12941
issuance of a license that the commission adopts by rule, which 12942
shall not be arbitrary, capricious, or contradictory to the 12943
expressed provisions of this chapter. 12944
(B) All applicants for a license under this chapter shall 12945
establish their suitability for a license by clear and 12946
convincing evidence. If the commission determines that a person 12947
is eligible under this chapter to be issued a license as a 12948
casino operator, management company, holding company, key 12949
employee, casino gaming employee, or gaming-related vendor, the 12950
commission shall issue such license for not more than three 12951
years, as determined by commission rule, if all other 12952
requirements of this chapter have been satisfied. 12953
(C) The commission shall not, except as provided in 12954
division (D) of this section, issue a casino operator, 12955
management company, holding company, key employee, casino gaming 12956
employee, or gaming-related vendor license under this chapter to 12957
an applicant if: 12958
(1) The applicant has been convicted of a disqualifying 12959
offense, as defined in section 3772.07 of the Revised Code. 12960
(2) The applicant has submitted an application for license 12961
under this chapter that contains false information. 12962
(3) The applicant is a commission member. 12963
(4) The applicant owns an ownership interest that is 12964
unlawful under this chapter, unless waived by the commission. 12965

S. B. No. 197 Page 443
As Introduced
(5) The applicant violates specific rules adopted by the 12966
commission related to denial of licensure. 12967
(6) The applicant is a member of or employed by a gaming 12968
regulatory body of a governmental unit in this state, another 12969
state, or the federal government, or is an employee of a 12970
governmental unit of this state and in that capacity has 12971
significant influence or control, as determined by the 12972
commission, over the ability of a casino operator, management 12973
company, holding company, institutional investor, or gaming- 12974
related vendor to conduct business in this state. This division 12975
does not prohibit a casino operator or management company from 12976
hiring special duty law enforcement officers if the officers are 12977
not specifically involved in gaming-related regulatory 12978
functions. 12979
(7) The commission otherwise determines the applicant is 12980
ineligible for the license. 12981
(D) The commission shall not refuse to issue a license to 12982
an applicant because the applicant was convicted of or pleaded 12983
guilty to an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with 12984
section 9.79 of the Revised Code. 12985
(E)(1) The commission shall investigate the qualifications 12986
of each applicant under this chapter before any license is 12987
issued and before any finding with regard to acts or 12988
transactions for which commission approval is required is made. 12989
The commission shall continue to observe the conduct of all 12990
licensees and all other persons having a material involvement 12991
directly or indirectly with a casino operator, management 12992
company, or holding company to ensure that licenses are not 12993
issued to or held by, or that there is not any material 12994
involvement with a casino operator, management company, or 12995

S. B. No. 197 Page 444
As Introduced
holding company by, an unqualified, disqualified, or unsuitable 12996
person or a person whose operations are conducted in an 12997
unsuitable manner or in unsuitable or prohibited places or 12998
locations. 12999
(2) The executive director may recommend to the commission 13000
that it deny any application, or limit, condition, or restrict, 13001
or suspend or revoke, any license or finding, or impose any fine 13002
upon any licensee or other person according to this chapter and 13003
the rules adopted thereunder. 13004
(3) A license issued under this chapter is a revocable 13005
privilege. No licensee has a vested right in or under any 13006
license issued under this chapter. The initial determination of 13007
the commission to deny, or to limit, condition, or restrict, a 13008
license may be appealed under section 2505.03 of the Revised 13009
Code. 13010
(4) In reviewing an application for a license under this 13011
chapter, the commission may rely on or consider the last 13012
investigation it conducted concerning the applicant, or the last 13013
license it issued to the applicant, under this chapter or 13014
Chapter 3770., 3771., or 3775. of the Revised Code. 13015
(F)(1) An institutional investor may be found to be 13016
suitable or qualified by the commission under this chapter and 13017
the rules adopted under this chapter. An institutional investor 13018
shall be presumed suitable or qualified upon submitting 13019
documentation sufficient to establish qualifications as an 13020
institutional investor and upon certifying all of the following: 13021
(a) The institutional investor owns, holds, or controls 13022
securities issued by a licensee or holding, intermediate, or 13023
parent company of a licensee or in the ordinary course of 13024

S. B. No. 197 Page 445
As Introduced
business for investment purposes only. 13025
(b) The institutional investor does not exercise influence 13026
over the affairs of the issuer of such securities nor over any 13027
licensed subsidiary of the issuer of such securities. 13028
(c) The institutional investor does not intend to exercise 13029
influence over the affairs of the issuer of such securities, nor 13030
over any licensed subsidiary of the issuer of such securities, 13031
in the future, and that it agrees to notify the commission in 13032
writing within thirty days if such intent changes. 13033
(2) The exercise of voting privileges with regard to 13034
securities shall not be deemed to constitute the exercise of 13035
influence over the affairs of a licensee. 13036
(3) The commission shall rescind the presumption of 13037
suitability for an institutional investor at any time if the 13038
institutional investor exercises or intends to exercise 13039
influence or control over the affairs of the licensee. 13040
(4) This division shall not be construed to preclude the 13041
commission from requesting information from or investigating the 13042
suitability or qualifications of an institutional investor if: 13043
(a) The commission becomes aware of facts or information 13044
that may result in the institutional investor being found 13045
unsuitable or disqualified; or 13046
(b) The commission has any other reason to seek 13047
information from the investor to determine whether it qualifies 13048
as an institutional investor. 13049
(5) If the commission finds an institutional investor to 13050
be unsuitable or unqualified, the commission shall so notify the 13051
investor and the casino operator, holding company, management 13052

S. B. No. 197 Page 446
As Introduced
company, or gaming-related vendor licensee in which the investor 13053
invested. The commission shall allow the investor and the 13054
licensee a reasonable amount of time, as specified by the 13055
commission on a case-by-case basis, to cure the conditions that 13056
caused the commission to find the investor unsuitable or 13057
unqualified. If during the specified period of time the investor 13058
or the licensee does not or cannot cure the conditions that 13059
caused the commission to find the investor unsuitable or 13060
unqualified, the commission may allow the investor or licensee 13061
more time to cure the conditions or the commission may begin 13062
proceedings to deny, suspend, or revoke the license of the 13063
casino operator, holding company, management company, or gaming- 13064
related vendor in which the investor invested or to deny any of 13065
the same the renewal of any such license. 13066
(6) A private licensee or holding company shall provide 13067
the same information to the commission as a public company would 13068
provide in a form 13d or form 13g filing to the securities and 13069
exchange commission. 13070
(G) Information provided on the application shall be used 13071
as a basis for a thorough background investigation of each 13072
applicant. A false or incomplete application is cause for denial 13073
of a license by the commission. All applicants and licensees 13074
shall consent to inspections, searches, and seizures and to the 13075
disclosure to the commission and its agents of confidential 13076
records, including tax records, held by any federal, state, or 13077
local agency, credit bureau, or financial institution and to 13078
provide handwriting exemplars, photographs, fingerprints, and 13079
information as authorized in this chapter and in rules adopted 13080
by the commission. 13081
(H) The commission shall provide a written statement to 13082

S. B. No. 197 Page 447
As Introduced
each applicant for a license under this chapter who is denied 13083
the license that describes the reason or reasons for which the 13084
applicant was denied the license. 13085
(I) Not later than January 31 in each calendar year, the 13086
commission shall provide to the general assembly and the 13087
governor a report that, for each type of license issued under 13088
this chapter, specifies the number of applications made in the 13089
preceding calendar year for each type of such license, the 13090
number of applications denied in the preceding calendar year for 13091
each type of such license, and the reasons for those denials. 13092
The information regarding the reasons for the denials shall 13093
specify each reason that resulted in, or that was a factor 13094
resulting in, denial for each type of license issued under this 13095
chapter and, for each of those reasons, the total number of 13096
denials for each such type that involved that reason. 13097
Sec. 3772.113. (A) An applicant or licensee under this 13098
chapter or Chapter 3769., 3771., or 3775. or sections 3770.21 to 13099
3770.22 of the Revised Code shall notify the commission in 13100
writing within ten days of any material change to any 13101
information the person provided in an application for an initial 13102
or renewed license, including all of the following: 13103
(1) Any change of name; 13104
(2) Any change of home or business address; 13105
(3) Any change of primary telephone number or electronic 13106
mail address; 13107
(4) Any change to the person's state of incorporation or 13108
principal place of business; 13109
(5) Any change in the ownership or control of the person; 13110

S. B. No. 197 Page 448
As Introduced
(6) Any bankruptcy filed, discharged, or dismissed; 13111
(7) Any arrest, charge, plea, or conviction for any crime 13112
or offense occurring in any jurisdiction, excluding minor 13113
misdemeanor traffic offenses; 13114
(8) Any investigation commenced by or action filed by a 13115
gaming regulatory agency or government gaming authority, except 13116
for routine renewal application reviews; 13117
(9) Any rejection, suspension, revocation, or denial of 13118
any gaming-related application or license, and any fine, 13119
penalty, or settled amount related to any gaming-related license 13120
imposed upon or agreed to in any jurisdiction; 13121
(10) Any other changes designated on an applicable update 13122
form prescribed by the commission; 13123
(11) Any other information affecting the person's 13124
suitability for the license; 13125
(12) Any other information required by the commission by 13126
rule. 13127
(B)(1) A licensee that is not an individual shall display 13128
its license conspicuously in its place of business or shall make 13129
the license available for inspection by the commission or any 13130
law enforcement agency upon request. 13131
(2) A key gaming employee or gaming employee who is 13132
present at a track, casino facility, or sports gaming facility 13133
shall prominently display evidence of the person's license, in a 13134
manner determined by the commission, while actively performing 13135
the person's duties. 13136
Sec. 3772.13. (A) No person may be employed as a key 13137
employee of a casino operator, management company, or holding 13138

S. B. No. 197 Page 449
As Introduced
company unless the person is the holder of a valid key employee 13139
license issued by the commission. Any executive, employee, 13140
agent, or other individual who, as determined by the commission, 13141
has the power to exercise significant influence over decisions 13142
concerning any part of the operation of a person that is 13143
licensed as any of the following shall hold a valid key gaming 13144
employee license issued by the commission: 13145
(1) A permit holder, management services company, or 13146
totalizator company, for purposes of operating under Chapter 13147
3769. of the Revised Code; 13148
(2) A video lottery sales agent, for purposes of operating 13149
under sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code; 13150
(3) An internet gambling operator, internet gambling 13151
management company, or internet gambling supplier, for purposes 13152
of operating under Chapter 3771. of the Revised Code; 13153
(4) A casino operator, management company, or gaming- 13154
related vendor or a holding company of a casino operator, 13155
management company, or gaming-related vendor, for purposes of 13156
operating under this chapter; 13157
(5) A sports gaming proprietor other than a professional 13158
sports organization, a mobile management services provider, a 13159
management services provider, or a sports gaming supplier, for 13160
purposes of operating under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code. 13161
(B) No person may be employed as a key employee of a 13162
gaming-related vendor unless that person is either the holder of 13163
a valid key gaming employee license issued by the commission, or 13164
the person, at least five business days prior to the first day 13165
of employment as a key employee, has filed a notification of 13166
employment with the commission and subsequently files a 13167

S. B. No. 197 Page 450
As Introduced
completed application for a key gaming employee license within 13168
the first thirty days of employment as a key employee. 13169
(C) Each applicant for a key gaming employee license 13170
shall, before the issuance of any key employee license, produce 13171
the information, documentation, and assurances as are required 13172
by this chapter and rules adopted thereunder. In addition, each 13173
applicant shall, in writing, authorize the examination of all 13174
bank accounts and records as may be deemed necessary by the 13175
commission. 13176
(D) To be eligible for a key gaming employee license, the 13177
applicant shall be at least twenty-one years of age and shall 13178
meet the criteria set forth by rule by the commission. 13179
(E) Each application for a key gaming employee license 13180
shall be on a form prescribed by the commission and shall 13181
contain all information required by the commission. The 13182
applicant shall set forth in the application if the applicant 13183
has been issued prior gambling-related licenses; if the 13184
applicant has been licensed in any other state under any other 13185
name, and, if so, the name under which the license was issued 13186
and the applicant's age at the time the license was issued; any 13187
criminal conviction the applicant has had; and if a permit or 13188
license issued to the applicant in any other state has been 13189
suspended, restricted, or revoked, and, if so, the cause and the 13190
duration of each action. The applicant also shall complete a 13191
cover sheet for the application on which the applicant shall 13192
disclose the applicant's name, the business address and 13193
telephone number of the casino operator, management company, 13194
holding company, or gaming-related vendor person employing the 13195
applicant, the business address and telephone number of such 13196
employer, and the county, state, and country in which the 13197

S. B. No. 197 Page 451
As Introduced
applicant's residence is located. 13198
(F) Each applicant shall submit with each application, on 13199
a form provided by the commission, two sets of fingerprints. The 13200
commission shall charge each applicant an the applicant's 13201
employer the fee required under division (C)(3) of section 13202
109.572 of the Revised Code, along with a nonrefundable 13203
application fee of not more than one thousand seven hundred 13204
fifty dollars, as set by the commission, to cover the actual 13205
costs generated by each licensee and the background checks under 13206
this section and section 3772.07 of the Revised Code. Upon 13207
issuing the license, the commission shall charge the applicant's 13208
employer a nonrefundable license fee of fifty dollars. 13209
(G)(1) The casino operator, management company, or holding 13210
company person by whom a person is employed as a key gaming 13211
employee shall terminate the person's employment in any capacity 13212
requiring a key gaming employee license under this chapter and 13213
shall not in any manner permit the person to exercise a 13214
significant influence over the operation of a casino facility 13215
person's operations if: 13216
(a) The person does not apply for and receive a key gaming 13217
employee license within three months of being issued a 13218
provisional license, as established under commission rule. 13219
(b) The person's application for a key gaming employee 13220
license is denied by the commission. 13221
(c) The person's key gaming employee license is revoked by 13222
the commission. 13223
The commission shall notify the casino operator, 13224
management company, or holding company who employs such a person 13225
employer by certified mail, personal service, common carrier 13226

S. B. No. 197 Page 452
As Introduced
service utilizing any form of delivery requiring a signed 13227
receipt or by an electronic means that provides evidence of 13228
delivery, of any such finding, denial, or revocation. 13229
(2) A casino operator, management company, or holding 13230
company An employer shall not pay to a person whose employment 13231
is terminated under division (G)(1) of this section, any 13232
remuneration for any services performed in any capacity in which 13233
the person is required to be licensed as a key gaming employee, 13234
except for amounts due for services rendered before notice was 13235
received under that division. A contract or other agreement for 13236
personal services or for the conduct of any casino gaming at a 13237
casino facility between a casino operator, management company, 13238
or holding company an employer and a person whose employment is 13239
terminated under division (G)(1) of this section may be 13240
terminated by the casino operator, management company, or 13241
holding company employer without further liability on the part 13242
of the casino operator, management company, or holding company 13243
employer. Any such contract or other agreement is deemed to 13244
include a term authorizing its termination without further 13245
liability on the part of the casino operator, management 13246
company, or holding company employer upon receiving notice under 13247
division (G)(1) of this section. That a contract or other 13248
agreement does not expressly include such a term is not a 13249
defense in any action brought to terminate the contract or other 13250
agreement, and is not grounds for relief in any action brought 13251
questioning termination of the contract or other agreement. 13252
(3) A casino operator, management company, or holding 13253
company person described in divisions (A)(1) to (5) of this 13254
section, without having obtained the prior approval of the 13255
commission, shall not enter into any contract or other agreement 13256
with a person who has been found unsuitable, who has been denied 13257

S. B. No. 197 Page 453
As Introduced
a key gaming employee license, or whose license has been revoked 13258
under division (G)(1) of this section, or with any business 13259
enterprise under the control of such a person, after the date on 13260
which the casino operator, management company, or holding 13261
company person described in divisions (A)(1) to (5) of this 13262
section receives notice under that division. 13263
(H) Notwithstanding the requirements for a license under 13264
this section, the commission shall issue a key gaming employee 13265
license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to 13266
an applicant if either of the following applies: 13267
(1) The applicant holds a license in another state. 13268
(2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a 13269
government certification, or a private certification as 13270
described in that chapter as a key gaming employee of a casino 13271
operator, management company, or holding company in a state that 13272
does not issue that license. 13273
(I) A key gaming employee license is valid for a term of 13274
three years. In order to renew a key gaming employee license, 13275
the licensee shall apply to the commission for a renewed license 13276
in the same manner as for an initial license, except as 13277
otherwise provided by the commission by rule. 13278
(J) An individual who is required under this section to 13279
hold a key gaming employee license by reason of the individual's 13280
role with respect to more than one type of gaming is required to 13281
hold only one key gaming employee license. 13282
Sec. 3772.131. (A) All casino gaming employees are 13283
required to have An individual whose duties are such that the 13284
individual has the ability to alter material aspects of pari- 13285
mutuel wagering on horse racing, video lottery terminal gaming, 13286

S. B. No. 197 Page 454
As Introduced
internet gambling, casino gaming, or sports gaming, including 13287
any of the following duties, shall hold a casino valid gaming 13288
employee license. "Casino gaming employee" means the following 13289
and their supervisors issued by the commission at all times: 13290
(1) Individuals involved in operating Operating a casino 13291
gaming pit or casino games, including dealers, shills, clerks, 13292
hosts, and junket representatives; 13293
(2) Individuals involved in handling Accepting wagers of 13294
any kind; 13295
(3) Handling money as part of a gaming operation, 13296
including cashiers, change persons, count teams, and coin 13297
wrappers; 13298
(3) Individuals involved in operating casino games; 13299
(4) Individuals involved in operating Operating and 13300
maintaining slot machines, including mechanics, floor persons, 13301
and change and payoff persons, or operating and maintaining a 13302
totalizator, video lottery terminal, internet gambling 13303
equipment, or sports gaming equipment; 13304
(5) Individuals involved in (4) Providing security for any 13305
gaming operation, including guards and game observers, other 13306
than providing general security at a type C sports gaming host's 13307
facility; 13308
(6) Individuals with (5) Performing duties similar to 13309
those described in divisions (A)(1) to (5) (4) of this section 13310
or other persons ; 13311
(6) Performing other duties, as the commission determines. 13312
"Casino gaming employee" does not include an 13313
(B)(1) An individual whose is not required to have a 13314

S. B. No. 197 Page 455
As Introduced
gaming employee license if the individual has a key gaming 13315
employee license. 13316
(2) An individual is not required to have a gaming 13317
employee license if the individual's duties are related solely 13318
to nongaming activities such as entertainment, hotel operation, 13319
maintenance, or preparing or serving food and beverages, 13320
including an individual who is, or is employed by, a type C 13321
sports gaming host. 13322
(B) (C) The commission may issue a casino gaming employee 13323
license to an applicant after it has determined that the 13324
applicant is eligible for a license under rules adopted by the 13325
commission and paid any applicable fee set by the commission by 13326
rule in the amount necessary to cover the commission's costs 13327
associated with the review of the application. The applicant's 13328
employer shall pay all application and license fees on behalf of 13329
the applicant. All applications shall be certified as true. 13330
(C) (D) To be eligible for a casino gaming employee 13331
license, an applicant shall be at least twenty-one years of age. 13332
(D) (E) Each application for a casino gaming employee 13333
license shall be on a form prescribed by the commission and 13334
shall contain all information required by the commission. The 13335
applicant shall set forth in the application if the applicant 13336
has been issued prior gambling-related licenses; if the 13337
applicant has been licensed in any other state under any other 13338
name, and, if so, the name under which the license was issued 13339
and the applicant's age at the time the license was issued; any 13340
criminal conviction the applicant has had; and if a permit or 13341
license issued to the applicant in any other state has been 13342
suspended, restricted, or revoked, and, if so, the cause and the 13343
duration of each action. 13344

S. B. No. 197 Page 456
As Introduced
(E) (F) Each applicant shall submit with each application, 13345
on a form provided by the commission, two sets of the 13346
applicant's fingerprints. The commission shall charge each 13347
applicant an application the applicant's employer the fee to 13348
cover all actual costs generated by each licensee and all 13349
background checks required under division (C)(3) of section 13350
109.572 of the Revised Code, along with a nonrefundable 13351
application fee of one hundred dollars. Upon issuing the 13352
license, the commission shall charge the applicant's employer a 13353
nonrefundable license fee of fifty dollars. 13354
(F) (G) Notwithstanding the requirements for a license 13355
under this section, the commission shall issue a casino gaming 13356
employee license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised 13357
Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: 13358
(1) The applicant holds a license in another state. 13359
(2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a 13360
government certification, or a private certification as 13361
described in that chapter as a casino gaming employee in a state 13362
that does not issue that license. 13363
(H) A gaming employee license is valid for a term of three 13364
years. In order to renew a gaming employee license, the licensee 13365
shall apply to the commission for a renewed license in the same 13366
manner as for an initial license, except as otherwise provided 13367
by the commission by rule. 13368
(I) An individual who is required under this section to 13369
hold a gaming employee license by reason of the individual's 13370
duties with respect to more than one type of gaming is required 13371
to hold only one gaming employee license. 13372
Sec. 3772.132. (A) An applicant for a key gaming employee 13373

S. B. No. 197 Page 457
As Introduced
or gaming employee license shall establish the applicant's 13374
suitability for the license by clear and convincing evidence. 13375
(B) The commission shall not grant a key gaming employee 13376
or gaming employee license to an applicant if evidence 13377
satisfactory to the commission exists that the applicant has 13378
done any of the following: 13379
(1) Knowingly made a false statement to the commission; 13380
(2) Been suspended from operating a gambling game, gaming 13381
device, or gaming operation, or had a license revoked by any 13382
governmental unit of a national, state, or local body exercising 13383
governmental functions; 13384
(3) Been convicted of a disqualifying offense, as defined 13385
in section 3772.07 of the Revised Code; 13386
(4) Been directly involved in or employed by any offshore 13387
wagering market that illegally serviced the United States or 13388
otherwise accepted illegal wagers from individuals located in 13389
the United States on or after April 16, 2015. 13390
(C) The commission shall not grant a key gaming employee 13391
or gaming employee license to an individual to whom any of the 13392
following apply: 13393
(1) The individual is under twenty-one years of age; 13394
(2) The individual is a member or employee of the 13395
commission or of the state lottery commission; 13396
(3) The individual is a member or employee of a gaming 13397
regulatory body of another state or the federal government; 13398
(4) The individual is an employee of a governmental unit 13399
of this state who, in that capacity, has significant influence 13400

S. B. No. 197 Page 458
As Introduced
or control, as determined by the commission, over the ability of 13401
a person described in divisions (A)(1) to (5) of section 3772.13 13402
of the Revised Code to conduct business in this state. This 13403
division does not prohibit a special duty law enforcement 13404
officer from receiving a gaming employee license if the officer 13405
is not specifically involved in gaming-related regulatory 13406
functions. 13407
(5) The commission otherwise determines the individual is 13408
ineligible for the license. 13409
(D) In determining whether to grant, maintain, or renew a 13410
key gaming employee or gaming employee license, the commission 13411
shall evaluate and consider all of the following factors: 13412
(1) Whether the individual possesses good character, 13413
honesty, and integrity; 13414
(2) Whether the individual possesses financial stability, 13415
integrity, and responsibility; 13416
(3) The criminal history of the individual in any 13417
jurisdiction; 13418
(4) Whether the individual has filed or had filed against 13419
the individual a proceeding for bankruptcy or has ever been 13420
involved in any formal process to adjust, defer, suspend, or 13421
otherwise resolve the payment of any debt in the last ten years; 13422
(5) Whether the individual has been served with a 13423
complaint or other notice filed with any public body regarding 13424
any payment of tax required under federal, state, or local law 13425
that has been delinquent for one or more years in the last ten 13426
years; 13427
(6) Whether the individual is a party to any currently 13428

S. B. No. 197 Page 459
As Introduced
pending litigation or has been a defendant in litigation during 13429
the last ten years; 13430
(7) The extent to which the individual has cooperated with 13431
the commission in connection with the background investigation; 13432
(8) The extent to which the individual has provided 13433
accurate and complete information as required by the commission; 13434
(9) Whether the individual has been issued a comparable 13435
license in another jurisdiction with similar licensing 13436
requirements, as determined by the commission, including the 13437
individual's related compliance history; 13438
(10) The extent to which the individual has complied with 13439
the requirements of the Revised Code with respect to gaming and 13440
the rules adopted thereunder. 13441
(E) In reviewing an application for a license, the 13442
commission may rely on or consider the last investigation it 13443
conducted concerning the applicant, or the last license it 13444
issued to the applicant, under this chapter or Chapter 3770., 13445
3771., or 3775. of the Revised Code. 13446
Sec. 3772.15. (A) Unless a license issued under this 13447
chapter is suspended, expires, or is revoked, the license shall 13448
be renewed for three years, as determined by commission rule, 13449
after a determination by the commission that the licensee is in 13450
compliance with this chapter and rules authorized by this 13451
chapter and after the licensee pays a fee. The commission may 13452
assess the license renewal applicant a reasonable fee in the 13453
amount necessary to cover the commission's costs associated with 13454
the review of the license renewal application. 13455
(B) A licensee shall undergo a complete investigation at 13456
least every three years, as determined by commission rule, to 13457

S. B. No. 197 Page 460
As Introduced
determine that the licensee remains in compliance with this 13458
chapter. 13459
(C) Notwithstanding division (B) of this section, the 13460
commission may investigate a licensee at any time the commission 13461
determines it is necessary to ensure that the licensee remains 13462
in compliance with this section. 13463
(D) The holder of a license shall bear the cost of an 13464
investigation, except that the employer shall pay the 13465
investigation cost for key gaming employees and casino gaming 13466
employees who are employed by a casino operator, in which case 13467
the casino operator shall pay the investigation cost. 13468
Sec. 3772.16. (A) Any information concerning the following 13469
submitted, collected, or gathered as part of an application to 13470
the commission for a license under this chapter is confidential 13471
and not subject to disclosure by any state agency or political 13472
subdivision as a record under section 149.43 of the Revised 13473
Code: 13474
(1) A minor child of an applicant; 13475
(2) The social security number, passport number, or 13476
federal tax identification number of an applicant or the spouse 13477
of an applicant; 13478
(3) The home address and telephone number of an applicant 13479
or the spouse or dependent of an applicant; 13480
(4) An applicant's birth certificate; 13481
(5) The driver's license number of an applicant or the 13482
applicant's spouse; 13483
(6) The name or address of a previous spouse of the 13484
applicant; 13485

S. B. No. 197 Page 461
As Introduced
(7) The date of birth of the applicant and the spouse of 13486
an applicant; 13487
(8) The place of birth of the applicant and the spouse of 13488
an applicant; 13489
(9) The personal financial information and records of an 13490
applicant or of an employee or the spouse or dependent of an 13491
applicant, including tax returns and information, and records of 13492
criminal proceedings; 13493
(10) Any information concerning a victim of domestic 13494
violence, sexual assault, or stalking; 13495
(11) The electronic mail address of the spouse or family 13496
member of the applicant; 13497
(12) Any trade secret, medical records, and patents or 13498
exclusive licenses; 13499
(13) Security information, including risk prevention 13500
plans, detection and countermeasures, location of count rooms or 13501
other money storage areas, emergency management plans, security 13502
and surveillance plans, equipment and usage protocols, and theft 13503
and fraud prevention plans and countermeasures; 13504
(14) Information provided in a multijurisdictional 13505
personal history disclosure form, including the Ohio supplement, 13506
exhibits, attachments, and updates. 13507
(B) Notwithstanding any other law, upon written request 13508
from a person, the commission shall provide the following 13509
information to the person except as provided in this chapter: 13510
(1) The information provided under this chapter concerning 13511
a licensee or an applicant; 13512

S. B. No. 197 Page 462
As Introduced
(2) The amount of the wagering tax and admission tax paid 13513
daily to the state by a licensed applicant or an operating 13514
agent; and 13515
(3) A copy of a letter providing the reasons for the 13516
denial of an applicant's license or an operating agent's 13517
contract and a copy of a letter providing the reasons for the 13518
commission's refusal to allow an applicant to withdraw the 13519
applicant's application, but with confidential information 13520
redacted if that information is the reason for the denial or 13521
refusal to withdraw. 13522
(C) The individual's name, the individual's place of 13523
employment, the individual's job title, and the individual's 13524
gaming experience that is provided for an individual who holds, 13525
held, or has applied for a license under this chapter is not 13526
confidential. The reason for denial or revocation of a license 13527
or for disciplinary action against the individual and 13528
information submitted by the individual for a felony waiver 13529
request is not confidential. The cover sheet completed by an 13530
applicant for a key gaming employee license under section 13531
3772.13 of the Revised Code is not confidential. 13532
(D) An individual who holds, held, or has applied for a 13533
license under this chapter may waive the confidentiality 13534
requirements of division (A) of this section. 13535
(E) Confidential information received by the commission 13536
from another jurisdiction relating to a person who holds, held, 13537
or has applied for a license under this chapter is confidential 13538
and not subject to disclosure as a public record under section 13539
149.43 of the Revised Code. The commission may share the 13540
information referenced in this division with, or disclose the 13541
information to, the inspector general, any appropriate 13542

S. B. No. 197 Page 463
As Introduced
prosecuting authority, any law enforcement agency, or any other 13543
appropriate governmental or licensing agency, if the agency that 13544
receives the information complies with the same requirements 13545
regarding confidentiality as those with which the commission 13546
must comply. 13547
Sec. 3772.17. (A) The upfront license fee to obtain a 13548
license as a casino operator shall be fifty million dollars per 13549
casino facility and shall be paid upon each casino operator's 13550
filing of its casino operator license application with the 13551
commission. The upfront license fee, once paid to the 13552
commission, shall be deposited into the economic development 13553
programs fund, which is created in the state treasury. 13554
(B) New casino operator, management company, and holding 13555
company license and renewal license fees shall be set by rule. 13556
If an applicant for a license as a management company or holding 13557
company is related through a joint venture or controlled by or 13558
under common control with another applicant for a license as a 13559
casino operator, management company, or holding company for the 13560
same casino facility and the applicant for a license as a 13561
management company or holding company was reviewed for 13562
suitability as part of the investigation of the casino operator, 13563
only one license fee shall be assessed against both applicants 13564
for that casino facility. 13565
(C) The fee to obtain an application for a casino 13566
operator, management company, or holding company license shall 13567
be one million five hundred thousand dollars per application. 13568
The application fee for a casino operator, management company, 13569
or holding company license may be increased to the extent that 13570
the actual review and investigation costs relating to an 13571
applicant exceed the application fee set forth in this division. 13572

S. B. No. 197 Page 464
As Introduced
If an applicant for a license as a management company or holding 13573
company is related through a joint venture or controlled by or 13574
under common control with another applicant for a license as a 13575
casino operator, management company, or holding company for the 13576
same casino facility, with the exception of actual costs of the 13577
review and investigation of the additional applicant, only one 13578
application fee shall be required of such applicants for that 13579
casino facility. The application fee shall be deposited into the 13580
casino control commission fund. The application fee is 13581
nonrefundable. 13582
(D) The license fees for a gaming-related vendor shall be 13583
set by rule. Additionally, the commission may assess an 13584
applicant a reasonable fee in the amount necessary to process a 13585
gaming-related vendor license application. 13586
(E) The license fees for a key employee shall be set by 13587
rule. Additionally, the commission may assess an applicant a 13588
reasonable fee in the amount necessary to process a key employee 13589
license application. If the license is being sought at the 13590
request of a casino operator, such fees shall be paid by the 13591
casino operator. 13592
(F) The license fees for a casino gaming employee shall be 13593
set by rule. If the license is being sought at the request of a 13594
casino operator, the fee shall be paid by the casino operator. 13595
Sec. 3772.18. (A) Each casino operator, management 13596
company, and holding company involved in the application and 13597
ownership or management of a casino facility shall provide to 13598
the commission as applicable: 13599
(1) An annual balance sheet; 13600
(2) An annual income statement; 13601

S. B. No. 197 Page 465
As Introduced
(3) An annual audited financial statement; 13602
(4) A list of the stockholders or other persons having at 13603
least a five per cent ownership interest in the casino operator, 13604
management company, or holding company and any other information 13605
the commission considers necessary for the effective 13606
administration of this chapter; 13607
(5) Notification of any material changes to the 13608
applicant's or licensee's stockholders must be provided to the 13609
commission within sixty days of the change. Notification of any 13610
refinancing and debt issuance shall be in accordance with rules 13611
adopted by the commission under Chapter 119. of the Revised 13612
Code; and 13613
(6) An applicant's compulsive and problem gambling plan. A 13614
casino operator shall submit an annual summary of its compulsive 13615
and problem gambling plan to the commission. The plan at a 13616
minimum shall contain the following elements: 13617
(a) The goals of the plan and procedures and timetables to 13618
implement the plan; 13619
(b) The identification of the individual who will be 13620
responsible for the implementation and maintenance of the plan; 13621
(c) Policies and procedures including the following: 13622
(i) The commitment of the casino operator to train 13623
appropriate employees; 13624
(ii) The duties and responsibilities of the employees 13625
designated to implement or participate in the plan; 13626
(iii) The responsibility of patrons with respect to 13627
responsible gambling; 13628

S. B. No. 197 Page 466
As Introduced
(iv) Procedures for providing information to individuals 13629
regarding community, public and private treatment services, 13630
gamblers anonymous programs, and similar treatment or addiction 13631
therapy programs designed to prevent, treat, or monitor 13632
compulsive and problem gamblers and to counsel family members; 13633
(v) The provision of printed material to educate patrons 13634
about compulsive and problem gambling and to inform them about 13635
treatment services available to compulsive and problem gamblers 13636
and their families; 13637
(vi) The employee training program; 13638
(vii) Procedures to prevent underage gambling; 13639
(viii) Procedures to prevent intoxicated patrons from 13640
gambling; 13641
(ix) The plan for posting signs within the casino facility 13642
containing gambling treatment information. 13643
(B) Each casino operator shall submit quarterly updates 13644
and an annual report to the commission of its adherence to the 13645
plans and goals submitted under division (A) of this section. 13646
(C) Preference shall be given to each of the following to 13647
train employees for casino-related employment opportunities: 13648
(1) State institutions of higher education as defined in 13649
section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; 13650
(2) Private career schools holding program authorizations 13651
issued by the state board of career colleges and schools under 13652
division (C) of section 3332.05 of the Revised Code; 13653
(3) Private institutions exempt from regulation under 13654
Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code as prescribed in section 13655

S. B. No. 197 Page 467
As Introduced
3333.046 of the Revised Code. 13656
Sec. 3772.221. (A) Before a patron places a wager with an y 13657
of the following persons over the internet, the person shall 13658
require the patron to establish a wagering account with the 13659
person and place all wagers with the person through that 13660
account: 13661
(1) A permit holder; 13662
(2) 13663
An internet gambling operator; 13664
(3) A sports gaming proprietor. 13665
(B) A wagering account shall include all of the following 13666
information, which the person described in division (A) of this 13667
section shall update whenever the person becomes aware of a 13668
change: 13669
(1) The patron's full legal name; 13670
(2) The patron's date of birth; 13671
(3) The patron's primary address; 13672
(4) The patron's wagering account number or user name; 13673
(5) If the person examined the patron's government-issued 13674
identification under division (C)(1) of this section, the type 13675
of identification examined, the identification number, and a 13676
digital copy of the identification; 13677
(6) The method and any other information used to verify 13678
the patron's identity; 13679
(7) The date of identity verification; 13680
(8) A history of the patron's transactions with the 13681

S. B. No. 197 Page 468
As Introduced
person. 13682
(C) Before creating a wagering account, a person described 13683
in division (A) of this section shall verify and document the 13684
patron's identity by doing one of the following: 13685
(1) Examining the patron's government-issued 13686
identification, including the use of verification software 13687
designed to confirm the authenticity of the identification; 13688
(2) Conducting multi-source authentication, which may 13689
include third party and governmental databases, as approved by 13690
the executive director. 13691
(D) The person described in division (A) of this section 13692
shall require the patron, upon creating a wagering account, to 13693
do both of the following: 13694
(1) Certify that the information provided to the person is 13695
accurate and that the patron is not excluded from or otherwise 13696
prohibited from wagering with the person. The person shall 13697
document the certification. 13698
(2) Acknowledge the applicable minimum age to participate 13699
in wagering with the person and that the patron is prohibited 13700
from allowing any other person to access or use the patron's 13701
wagering account. The person shall document the acknowledgment. 13702
(E) A person described in division (A) of this section 13703
shall implement procedures to ensure that wagering accounts 13704
comply with this section and with other applicable laws and 13705
rules, including ensuring, through commercially reasonable 13706
means, that all of the following are true: 13707
(1) An individual who is prohibited from placing a wager 13708
with the person is not permitted to create a wagering account. 13709

S. B. No. 197 Page 469
As Introduced
(2) An individual who becomes prohibited from placing a 13710
wager with the person is not permitted to continue to place 13711
wagers with the person while the individual is prohibited from 13712
doing so. 13713
(3) A patron's identity is re-verified whenever reasonable 13714
suspicion exists that the patron's identification or wagering 13715
account has been compromised. 13716
(4) The person complies with applicable state and federal 13717
requirements and industry standards for protecting the privacy 13718
and security of the person's patrons and their wagering 13719
accounts. 13720
(F) A wagering account described in this section may allow 13721
the patron to place wagers with the person described in division 13722
(A) of this section by funding the wagering account through 13723
advance deposits. If the account does so, the person shall do 13724
all of the following: 13725
(1) Allow the patron to fund the account only by the 13726
following means, in accordance with the person's house rules: 13727
(a) Cash or vouchers deposited at an approved cashiering 13728
or kiosk location; 13729
(b) Credit or debit card; 13730
(c) Promotional credit; 13731
(d) Winnings; 13732
(e) Corrections made by the person with documented 13733
notification to the patron; 13734
(f) Automated clearing house transfer; 13735
(g) Wire transfer; 13736

S. B. No. 197 Page 470
As Introduced
(h) Any other means approved by the executive director. 13737
(2) Notify the patron of the establishment of a wagering 13738
account via electronic mail or regular mail; 13739
(3) Apply a default deposit and wager limit on the account 13740
of five hundred dollars per week, subject to adjustment by the 13741
patron; 13742
(4) Apply a default time limit of five hours per week 13743
spent using the person's web site or application through the 13744
account, subject to adjustment by the patron; 13745
(5) Allow the patron, through an easy and obvious method, 13746
to impose additional limitations on the patron's wagering. The 13747
person shall comply with all of the following: 13748
(a) Upon receiving any self-imposed limitation request, 13749
the person shall ensure that all specified limits are correctly 13750
implemented immediately or at the point in time that was clearly 13751
indicated by the patron. 13752
(b) The patron's self-imposed limitations shall not 13753
override any more restrictive limitation imposed by the person. 13754
(c) Once established by a patron and implemented by the 13755
person, it shall be possible to reduce the severity of a self- 13756
imposed limitation only upon the expiration of the self-imposed 13757
period. 13758
(d) The person shall provide the patron with an option to 13759
set automatically renewing self-imposed limits. 13760
(6) Require the patron to provide all of the following 13761
additional information, which the person shall update each time 13762
the person becomes aware of changes: 13763

S. B. No. 197 Page 471
As Introduced
(a) The patron's telephone number; 13764
(b) The patron's electronic mail address; 13765
(c) The patron's social security number, the last four 13766
digits of the patron's social security number, or an equivalent 13767
identification number for a noncitizen patron, such as a 13768
passport or taxpayer identification number. 13769
(7) Require the patron to protect access to the account 13770
using multi-factor authentication or a similar authentication 13771
method, as approved by the executive director; 13772
(8) Prohibit a patron from transferring funds from one 13773
wagering account to another; 13774
(9) Process a patron's request to withdraw the funds in 13775
the account within five business days, regardless of whether the 13776
account is open or closed, provided that if the person believes 13777
in good faith that the patron engaged in fraudulent conduct or 13778
other conduct that would cause the person to violate the law, 13779
the person may delay the withdrawal of funds to investigate or 13780
otherwise comply with the law. In such a case, the person shall 13781
provide notice to the patron of the general nature of the 13782
investigation of the account and conduct the investigation in a 13783
reasonable and expedient fashion, providing the patron with 13784
additional written notice of the status of the investigation at 13785
least every tenth business day starting from the day the 13786
original notice is provided to the patron. 13787
(10) Refund any balance remaining in a wagering account 13788
closed by a patron in accordance with division (F)(9) of this 13789
section; 13790
(11) Require that any manual addition or subtraction to or 13791
from the account of five hundred dollars or less be reviewed by 13792

S. B. No. 197 Page 472
As Introduced
supervisory personnel and that any other manual addition or 13793
subtraction to or from the account be authorized in advance by 13794
supervisory personnel. 13795
(G) A person described in division (A) of this section 13796
shall provide each patron with all of the following: 13797
(1) Notice of available responsible gaming resources; 13798
(2) A readily accessible method for closing an account 13799
through the person's web site or application or upon contact 13800
with the person's customer service team; 13801
(3) On-demand access to a summary statement of all of the 13802
patron's wagering activity with the person during the past year, 13803
accessible through the person's web site or application; 13804
(4) Access, upon request, to a summary statement of all of 13805
the patron's wagering activity with the person during the past 13806
five years, accessible through the person's web site or 13807
application; 13808
(5) A copy of the person's privacy policy governing the 13809
person's use and storage of patrons' confidential information. 13810
Sec. 3772.23. (A) All tokens, chips, or electronic cards 13811
that are used to make wagers shall be purchased from the casino 13812
operator or management company while at a casino facility that 13813
has been approved by the commission. Chips, tokens, tickets, 13814
electronic cards, or similar objects may be used while at the 13815
casino facility only for the purpose of making wagers on casino 13816
games. 13817
(B) Casino operators and management companies may provide 13818
promotional gaming credits or bonuses to their patrons in 13819
accordance with section 3775.231 of the Revised Code and the 13820

S. B. No. 197 Page 473
As Introduced
rules of the commission. Promotional gaming credits shall be 13821
subject to oversight by the commission. 13822
(C) Casino operators and management companies shall not do 13823
any of the following: 13824
(1) Obtain a license to operate a check-cashing business 13825
under sections 1315.01 to 1315.30 of the Revised Code; 13826
(2) Obtain a license to provide loans under sections 13827
1321.01 to 1321.19 of the Revised Code; 13828
(3) Obtain a license to provide loans under sections 13829
1321.35 to 1321.48 of the Revised Code. 13830
Sec. 3772.231. (A) The requirements of this section apply 13831
to promotional gaming credits or bonuses issued by any of the 13832
following persons: 13833
(1) A permit holder; 13834
(2) A video lottery sales agent; 13835
(3) An internet gambling operator; 13836
(4) A casino operator or management company; 13837
(5) A sports gaming proprietor. 13838
(B) A person described in division (A) of this section may 13839
issue promotional gaming credits or bonuses to patrons only in 13840
accordance with this section and with the rules of the 13841
commission. 13842
(C) A person described in division (A) of this section 13843
shall adopt procedures for issuing, accepting, and tracking all 13844
promotional gaming credits and bonuses and shall adopt rules 13845
governing them. The person shall make the rules available to its 13846
patrons and to the commission. The rules shall be clear and 13847

S. B. No. 197 Page 474
As Introduced
unambiguous and shall include all of the following: 13848
(1) The date and time the promotion or bonus is active and 13849
expires; 13850
(2) The rules of play; 13851
(3) The nature and value of prizes or awards; 13852
(4) All eligibility restrictions or limitations; 13853
(5) All wagering and redemption requirements, including 13854
any limitations; 13855
(6) All eligible events or wagers; 13856
(7) All cancellation requirements; 13857
(8) Terms and conditions that are full, accurate, concise, 13858
transparent, and do not contain misleading information. 13859
(D)(1) Any promotional gaming credit or bonus that a 13860
person described in division (A) of this section describes as 13861
free or risk-free shall not require the patron to incur any loss 13862
or risk the patron's own money to use or withdraw winnings from 13863
the free wager. 13864
(2) A promotional gaming credit or bonus may require the 13865
patron to play the credit or bonus through in order to withdraw 13866
it. 13867
(3) A promotional gaming credit or bonus shall not 13868
restrict the patron from withdrawing the patron's own funds or 13869
withdrawing winnings from wagers placed using the patron's own 13870
funds. 13871
(E)(1) A person described in division (A) of this section 13872
may offer a promotional gaming credit or bonus in connection 13873
with, or as a result of, a nongaming consumer transaction only 13874

S. B. No. 197 Page 475
As Introduced
if all of the following apply: 13875
(a) The promotion or bonus does not target individuals 13876
under the minimum age to participate in the applicable form of 13877
gaming, other individuals who are ineligible to participate in 13878
that gaming, individuals with gambling problems, or other 13879
vulnerable individuals. 13880
(b) The promotion or bonus is offered only to individuals 13881
who have been verified as having attained the minimum age to 13882
participate in the applicable form of gaming and as not being 13883
participants in the Ohio voluntary exclusion program. 13884
(c) The promotion or bonus includes an opt out method that 13885
meets the requirements of division (D) of section 3772.41 of the 13886
Revised Code. 13887
(2) Division (E)(1) of this section does not prohibit a 13888
person described in division (A) of this section from operating 13889
or participating in a consumer loyalty program approved by the 13890
executive director. 13891
(F) Upon the occurrence of either of the following, a 13892
person described in division (A) of this section immediately 13893
shall stop offering a promotional gaming credit or bonus: 13894
(1) The person becomes aware that the promotion or bonus 13895
is in violation of this section or of other applicable 13896
provisions of the Revised Code regarding gaming or the rules of 13897
the commission. 13898
(2) The executive director of the commission orders the 13899
person to stop offering the promotion or bonus because it fails 13900
to comply with this section or with other applicable provisions 13901
of the Revised Code or the rules of the commission, or because 13902
it otherwise undermines the integrity of gaming. 13903

S. B. No. 197 Page 476
As Introduced
Sec. 3772.28. (A) All of the following persons shall adop t 13904
and implement house rules in accordance with this section: 13905
(1) A permit holder; 13906
(2) A video lottery sales agent; 13907
(3) An internet gambling operator; 13908
(4) A casino operator or management company; 13909
(5) A sports gaming proprietor. 13910
(B) House rules adopted under division (A) of this section 13911
shall address all of the following: 13912
(1) The types of wagers accepted; 13913
(2) The method for calculating and paying winning wagers; 13914
(3) The effect of scheduling changes or cancellations of 13915
horse races, sporting events, or other events, as applicable; 13916
(4) The process for handling incorrectly posted horse 13917
racing or sporting events, odds, or results, if applicable; 13918
(5) The method of notifying patrons of odds or proposition 13919
changes, if applicable; 13920
(6) The methods by which a wager or wagering account may 13921
be funded; 13922
(7) The methods for redeeming a winning wager; 13923
(8) A policy regarding lost or damaged betting slips or 13924
tickets, if applicable; 13925
(9) A requirement that any winning betting slip or ticket 13926
expire one year after the date the ticket outcome is determined, 13927
if applicable; 13928

S. B. No. 197 Page 477
As Introduced
(10) Any process for accepting wagers at other than the 13929
posted terms; 13930
(11) A process for canceling wagers for obvious errors, 13931
including notification of the patron; 13932
(12) A process for patrons to contact the person to submit 13933
questions or complaints; 13934
(13) An explanation of the process to resolve any dispute 13935
with a patron in accordance with division (E) of this section; 13936
(14) A notification to patrons regarding the Ohio 13937
voluntary exclusion program; 13938
(15) Any other matter required by the executive director 13939
of the commission. 13940
(C)(1) A person described in division (A) of this section 13941
shall submit its house rules and any proposed change to its 13942
house rules to the commission in the manner and form required by 13943
the executive director for approval before implementing them. 13944
(2) In the case of a proposed change, if the person does 13945
not receive a response from the executive director regarding the 13946
change within five days after submitting it, the change is 13947
considered to be approved. 13948
(3) The executive director may, at any time, require a 13949
change to a person's house rules to ensure compliance with 13950
applicable laws or rules. 13951
(D) A person described in division (A) of this section 13952
shall do all of the following: 13953
(1) Make its current house rules available to the 13954
commission in a manner prescribed by the executive director; 13955

S. B. No. 197 Page 478
As Introduced
(2) Display its current house rules, together with any 13956
other information the commission considers appropriate, 13957
conspicuously in each track, casino facility, or sports gaming 13958
facility and in any other place or manner prescribed by the 13959
commission; 13960
(3) Make copies of its current house rules readily 13961
available to patrons. 13962
(E)(1) Whenever a person described in division (A) of this 13963
section refuses payment of alleged winnings to a patron or there 13964
is otherwise a dispute with a patron regarding the patron's 13965
wagering account, wagers, wins, or losses, and the person and 13966
the patron are unable to resolve the dispute to the satisfaction 13967
of the patron, the person shall notify the patron of the 13968
patron's right to file a written complaint, the procedure for 13969
filing a written complaint, and the person's complaint 13970
resolution process. The notice requirement of this division is 13971
satisfied if the person directs the patron to information 13972
available on the person's web site or mobile application. 13973
(2) Upon receiving a written complaint under division (E) 13974
(1) of this section, the person shall investigate and provide a 13975
written response to the patron within ten business days. If the 13976
person needs additional time to investigate or resolve the 13977
complaint beyond the ten business days, the person shall notify 13978
the patron of the need for additional time and give the patron 13979
an expected time frame in which the complaint may be resolved. 13980
The person's ultimate response may include a statement that if 13981
the dispute is not resolved to the satisfaction of the patron, 13982
the patron may submit the patron's complaint in writing to the 13983
commission. 13984
Sec. 3772.281. (A) All of the following persons shall 13985

S. B. No. 197 Page 479
As Introduced
adopt procedures designed to protect the integrity of each form 13986
of gaming the person conducts, in accordance with this section: 13987
(1) A permit holder; 13988
(2) A video lottery sales agent; 13989
(3) An internet gambling operator; 13990
(4) A casino operator or management company; 13991
(5) A sports gaming proprietor. 13992
(B)(1) A person described in division (A) of this section 13993
shall submit its integrity procedures and any proposed change to 13994
its integrity procedures to the commission in the manner and 13995
form required by the executive director for approval before 13996
implementing them. 13997
(2) In the case of a proposed change, if the person does 13998
not receive a response from the executive director regarding the 13999
change within five days after submitting it, the change is 14000
considered to be approved. 14001
(3) The executive director may, at any time, require a 14002
change to a person's integrity procedures to ensure compliance 14003
with applicable laws or rules. 14004
(C) A person described in division (A) of this section 14005
shall make its current integrity procedures available to the 14006
commission at all times. 14007
Sec. 3772.31. (A) The commission, by and through the 14008
executive director of the commission and as required under 14009
section 125.05 of the Revised Code, may enter into contracts 14010
necessary to ensure the proper operation and reporting of all 14011
casino gaming authorized under this chapter. The commission 14012

S. B. No. 197 Page 480
As Introduced
shall not require use of a central system by a casino operator 14013
if the casino operator is in compliance with this chapter. If 14014
the commission determines, after written notice to the casino 14015
operator and a hearing under section 3772.04 of the Revised 14016
Code, that a casino operator is not in compliance with this 14017
chapter, the commission may determine it is necessary to require 14018
the casino operator to install and implement a central system 14019
under such conditions as the commission may require. Before any 14020
such hearing, the commission shall provide the casino operator 14021
with written notice that the casino operator is not in 14022
compliance with a specific requirement of this chapter, describe 14023
the requirement, and provide the casino operator at least thirty 14024
days to cure the noncompliance or, if the cure cannot be 14025
reasonably rectified within thirty days, require the casino 14026
operator to demonstrate to the commission's satisfaction that 14027
the casino operator is diligently pursuing the required cure. 14028
The system shall be operated by or under the commission's 14029
control. If the commission determines that a central system is 14030
necessary and adopts rules authorizing a central system, casino 14031
operators shall be responsible for the costs of the central 14032
system as it relates to casino facilities. 14033
(B) The commission shall certify independent testing 14034
laboratories to scientifically test and technically evaluate all 14035
slot machines, mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic 14036
table games, slot accounting systems, and other electronic 14037
gaming equipment for compliance with this chapter. The certified 14038
independent testing laboratories shall be accredited by a 14039
national accreditation body. The commission shall certify an 14040
independent testing laboratory if it is competent and qualified 14041
to scientifically test and evaluate electronic gaming equipment 14042
for compliance with this chapter and to otherwise perform the 14043

S. B. No. 197 Page 481
As Introduced
functions assigned to an independent testing laboratory under 14044
this chapter. An independent testing laboratory shall not be 14045
owned or controlled by, or have any interest in, a gaming- 14046
related vendor of electronic gaming equipment. The commission 14047
shall prepare a list of certified independent testing 14048
laboratories from which independent testing laboratories shall 14049
be chosen for all purposes under this chapter. 14050
Sec. 3772.311. (A) The commission shall certify 14051
independent testing laboratories to scientifically test and 14052
technically evaluate all of the following for compliance with 14053
applicable laws and the rules of the commission: 14054
(1) All electronic instant bingo systems, pursuant to 14055
section 3768.12 of the Revised Code; 14056
(2) All totalizator equipment and other equipment used in 14057
the operation of pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing under 14058
Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code; 14059
(3) All video lottery terminals; 14060
(4) All internet gambling equipment and all forms, 14061
variations, or composites of internet gambling; 14062
(5) All slot machines, mechanical, electromechanical, or 14063
electronic table games, slot accounting systems, and other 14064
electronic gaming equipment; 14065
(6) All sports gaming equipment and all forms, variations, 14066
or composites of sports gaming. 14067
(B)(1) An independent testing laboratory shall apply to 14068
the commission, on a form prescribed by the commission, for 14069
certification with respect to the testing and evaluation of each 14070
type of equipment described in division (A) of this section that 14071

S. B. No. 197 Page 482
As Introduced
the laboratory wishes to be certified to test. The laboratory 14072
shall pay the commission a nonrefundable certification fee in an 14073
amount determined by the commission by rule, sufficient to pay 14074
the cost of processing the application. 14075
(2) A certification issued under this section is valid for 14076
a term of five years. The laboratory may apply to renew its 14077
certification in the same manner as for initial certification 14078
not later than ninety days before the certification expires. If 14079
the commission has investigated the laboratory for compliance 14080
under this section within the past year, the executive director 14081
of the commission may apply the results of the previous 14082
compliance investigation to the renewal application. 14083
(3) The laboratory shall pay all costs of its compliance 14084
investigation for purposes of an initial or renewed 14085
certification under this section. The investigation may include 14086
a review of all of the following: 14087
(a) The laboratory's business structure, including its 14088
ownership and controlling interests; 14089
(b) The laboratory's policies and procedures, to determine 14090
whether they prevent conflicts of interest, provide for 14091
segregation of duties, detect and prevent fraud, and ensure 14092
impartiality; 14093
(c) The laboratory's staff's experience and expertise; 14094
(d) The sufficiency of the laboratory's staff, equipment, 14095
and test scripts; 14096
(e) The laboratory's financial viability; 14097
(f) The laboratory's compliance with division (C) of this 14098
section and the rules of the commission. 14099

S. B. No. 197 Page 483
As Introduced
(C) In order to be certified, an independent testing 14100
laboratory shall meet all of the following requirements: 14101
(1) It shall be competent and qualified to scientifically 14102
test and evaluate the applicable equipment for compliance with 14103
applicable laws and rules and to otherwise perform the functions 14104
assigned to an independent testing laboratory under this 14105
chapter. 14106
(2) It shall be accredited by a national accreditation 14107
body to international organization for standardization (ISO) 14108
standards 17020 and 17025 and any other standards as required by 14109
the executive director. 14110
(3) It shall be independent of any entity or product for 14111
which it provides testing services. 14112
(4) It shall maintain professional liability (errors and 14113
omissions) insurance of not less than one million dollars. 14114
(5) It shall employ a full-time quality manager who is 14115
responsible for ensuring compliance with national accreditation 14116
standards and applicable laws and rules. 14117
(6) It shall maintain physical security at each laboratory 14118
facility, including surveillance systems and alarms, to minimize 14119
the risk that confidential information is misappropriated. 14120
(7) It shall maintain the information technology security 14121
necessary to minimize the risk that confidential information is 14122
misappropriated. 14123
(8) It shall utilize the verification methodologies 14124
required by the executive director. The laboratory shall request 14125
approval from the executive director to use alternative 14126
verification methodologies. If approved, the laboratory shall 14127

S. B. No. 197 Page 484
As Introduced
provide the verification tool utilizing the alternative 14128
verification methodologies to the commission. 14129
(9) It shall ensure that testing and support procedures 14130
are performed consistently at all laboratory locations. 14131
(10) It shall make available to the commission, upon 14132
request, all its policies, procedures, and records. 14133
(11) It shall make available to the commission, upon 14134
request, a master list of all test methods, standards, forms, 14135
and other relevant documents it uses. 14136
(12) It shall not subcontract any testing without the 14137
prior written approval of the executive director. 14138
(13) It shall maintain all records for a minimum of five 14139
years unless otherwise specified, as follows: 14140
(a) It shall maintain, for a minimum of five years after 14141
an associated commission approval is no longer in effect, an 14142
electronic database containing testing data, reports, and 14143
related materials and provide access to the commission. Data, 14144
reports, and related materials shall be provided in a format and 14145
through a mechanism required by the commission. 14146
(b) If not available from the manufacturer, it shall 14147
maintain an inventory of gaming equipment and versions of 14148
software tested by the laboratory and approved by the commission 14149
for a minimum of five years after an associated commission 14150
approval is no longer in effect. 14151
(c) It shall maintain, for a minimum of five years after 14152
the end of the laboratory's certification period in which the 14153
submission occurred, all software and associated documentation 14154
and source code submitted for testing but not subsequently 14155

S. B. No. 197 Page 485
As Introduced
approved by the commission. The information shall be stored in a 14156
manner that is secure and readily accessible to appropriately 14157
approved laboratory personnel. 14158
(14) It shall assist the commission in investigations when 14159
requested, at the expense of the laboratory. The laboratory may 14160
seek reimbursement from the owner of the devices subject to 14161
investigation. 14162
(15) When requested, it shall assist or train commission 14163
agents in accounting, auditing, compliance, security, 14164
technology, and verification practices for any submission to 14165
that laboratory seeking approval from the commission. 14166
(16) It shall meet any additional condition imposed by the 14167
commission at a meeting held under section 3772.02 of the 14168
Revised Code. 14169
(D) A certified independent testing laboratory shall do 14170
all of the following: 14171
(1) Provide a recommendation as to whether any equipment 14172
submitted to it for testing complies with the applicable laws 14173
and rules; 14174
(2) Provide a report to the commission, in a format 14175
approved by the commission, of its test results for each 14176
submission to be considered for approval by the commission; 14177
(3) Testify at any administrative hearing or court 14178
proceeding as requested by the commission; 14179
(4) Annually review each of its employees, including 14180
conducting a criminal background check and an assessment of the 14181
employee's training, experience, performance, and competence; 14182
(5) Take corrective action whenever any nonconforming work 14183

S. B. No. 197 Page 486
As Introduced
is discovered, laboratory procedures are not followed, 14184
procedures are required to be changed, or other unsatisfactory 14185
conditions exist. The quality manager shall file an internal 14186
report with the laboratory, describing why the problem occurred, 14187
what was done to resolve the problem, and how the problem will 14188
be prevented in the future. The laboratory shall make the report 14189
available to the commission upon request. 14190
(6) Establish and maintain a training program for its 14191
employees to ensure the employees maintain the experience and 14192
expertise to conduct all testing required by the commission. The 14193
laboratory shall maintain training records for all employees and 14194
make them available to the commission upon request. 14195
(7) Test and verify that all testing equipment and 14196
software used internally is suitable for use. The laboratory 14197
shall have internal policies to verify that the equipment and 14198
software will perform as needed. The laboratory shall maintain 14199
records of test cases involving the validation of equipment, 14200
software, and methods. All testing performed by the laboratory 14201
shall be traceable to a test method that has been suitably 14202
validated. 14203
(8) Notify the executive director immediately if it fails 14204
to maintain compliance with any requirement of division (C) of 14205
this section. 14206
(E) The commission shall maintain a list of certified 14207
independent testing laboratories from which independent testing 14208
laboratories shall be chosen for all purposes under this 14209
chapter. 14210
Sec. 3772.312. (A)(1) A licensee that seeks the approval 14211
of a piece of equipment or a game described in division (A) of 14212

S. B. No. 197 Page 487
As Introduced
section 3772.311 of the Revised Code shall do all of the 14213
following: 14214
(a) Submit a written request to a certified independent 14215
testing laboratory that identifies the equipment or game and, at 14216
a minimum, specifically references the scientific testing and 14217
technical evaluation necessary to determine compliance with the 14218
applicable laws and rules; 14219
(b) Submit all necessary items and information to the 14220
laboratory and, if requested by the commission, to the 14221
commission; 14222
(c) Pay all costs associated with the testing and 14223
evaluation. 14224
(2) A licensee shall engage not more than one certified 14225
independent testing laboratory to test and evaluate any 14226
particular version of a piece of equipment or any particular 14227
version of a game, unless the executive director of the 14228
commission gives prior written authorization for testing and 14229
evaluation by an additional laboratory. 14230
(B) Except as otherwise approved by the executive director 14231
of the commission, no equipment or game described in division 14232
(A) of section 3772.311 of the Revised Code shall be used in 14233
this state unless it has been tested by a certified independent 14234
testing laboratory and the executive director has certified the 14235
test results. The commission shall publish a catalog of all 14236
approved equipment and games. 14237
(C) Any equipment or game described in division (A) of 14238
section 3772.311 of the Revised Code, or any component of any 14239
such equipment or game, that the commission deems to be critical 14240
shall be capable of verification using a verification method 14241

S. B. No. 197 Page 488
As Introduced
approved by the executive director. 14242
(D) The executive director may require that a previously 14243
approved piece of equipment or game be retested under this 14244
section if the executive director determines that the equipment 14245
or game fails to meet any applicable requirement of law or rule 14246
or jeopardizes the integrity of gaming in any way. 14247
Sec. 3772.313. (A) Both of the following systems shall 14248
meet the requirements of this section: 14249
(1) 14250
An internet gambling system; 14251
(2) Sports gaming equipment used to accept wagers on 14252
sporting events. 14253
(B) A system described in division (A) of this section 14254
shall meet all of the following requirements: 14255
(1) It shall monitor and record all gaming-related data in 14256
real time, including any changes made to the data or system. 14257
(2) It shall provide accurate reporting using a method and 14258
format approved by the executive director. 14259
(3) It shall be capable of automatically preparing a 14260
report summarizing the results of all wagering transactions 14261
conducted in this state by the permit holder, internet gambling 14262
operator, or sports gaming proprietor. The reporting function 14263
shall be tested by a certified independent testing laboratory 14264
under section 3772.312 of the Revised Code to confirm that it 14265
accurately calculates and displays the results of wagering. 14266
(4) The executive director of the commission shall 14267
determine the format and required periods of the report. 14268

S. B. No. 197 Page 489
As Introduced
(5) The servers or other equipment responsible for 14269
accepting wagers shall meet all of the following requirements: 14270
(a) They shall be located in this state, provided that 14271
data may be stored or accessed elsewhere, including in a cloud 14272
based environment. 14273
(b) They shall be managed by a person that holds an 14274
appropriate license issued by the commission for that purpose. 14275
(c) The data center where they are housed shall be secure 14276
and shall have controls in place to prevent unauthorized access. 14277
(6) The system shall utilize disk redundancy, and the data 14278
shall be backed up to prevent the loss of data and to minimize 14279
down time. 14280
(7) All communication with the system shall be secured 14281
utilizing an encryption methodology that ensures data integrity 14282
and prevents data theft. 14283
(8) The system shall perform an authentication check on 14284
any gaming equipment that connects to it and shall not accept 14285
any wagers or player account requests from gaming equipment that 14286
fails the authentication check. The authentication check shall 14287
meet all of the following requirements: 14288
(a) It shall occur at least once every twenty-four hours. 14289
(b) It shall determine, with a high degree of accuracy, 14290
whether the gaming equipment has been altered in a way that may 14291
threaten the integrity of the system or its data. 14292
(c) It shall log all of the following information: 14293
(i) The date and time; 14294
(ii) A device identifier; 14295

S. B. No. 197 Page 490
As Introduced
(iii) The device type; 14296
(iv) The device's location; 14297
(v) The disposition of the authentication check. 14298
(9) It shall be designed to prevent and detect all of the 14299
following: 14300
(a) Unauthorized use of an account by someone other than 14301
the account holder; 14302
(b) Unauthorized withdrawals from patron accounts; 14303
(c) Wagering by any person who is prohibited from making a 14304
wager, including any person who is underage, a participant in 14305
the Ohio voluntary exclusion program, or a person who is on an 14306
involuntary exclusion list. 14307
(C) A permit holder, internet gambling operator, or sports 14308
gaming proprietor shall do all of the following: 14309
(1) Provide read-only remote access to its systems, and 14310
any hardware or software required to facilitate that access, to 14311
the commission in a manner prescribed by the executive director; 14312
(2) Pay all costs associated with providing access to the 14313
commission under division (C)(1) of this section; 14314
(3) Test the system's recovery procedures on a sample 14315
basis at least annually, document the results, and make them 14316
available to the commission upon request; 14317
(4) Implement change management policies and procedures 14318
for tracking and controlling changes made to the system, 14319
including all of the following: 14320
(a) Procedures for testing proposed changes in a non- 14321
production environment. The non-production environment shall be 14322

S. B. No. 197 Page 491
As Introduced
segregated from the production environment and shall not have 14323
the capability to alter data in the production environment. 14324
(b) Procedures for classifying changes as follows: 14325
(i) High impact, meaning any change to, or addition of, 14326
components that impact the operational integrity of the system. 14327
As used in this division, "components" includes any component 14328
deemed to be critical by the certified independent testing 14329
laboratory. 14330
(ii) Low impact, meaning any other change to the system. 14331
(c) Procedures for the installation of changes into the 14332
production environment; 14333
(d) Procedures for the rollback of changes; 14334
(e) Procedures for documenting each phase of the change 14335
management process; 14336
(f) Procedures for logging all changes to the system; 14337
(g) Policies to ensure appropriate segregation of duties 14338
to prevent unintended changes from occurring. 14339
(5)(a) Subject to division (C)(5)(b) of this section, 14340
notify the commission at least five business days before 14341
installing any change designated as high impact. The executive 14342
director may deny or delay the installation. 14343
(b) A change that is necessary to remediate an immediate 14344
threat or liability may be installed immediately. The commission 14345
shall be notified of the change within forty-eight hours of 14346
implementation. 14347
(D) The executive director may require that any change be 14348
tested by a certified independent testing laboratory, with 14349

S. B. No. 197 Page 492
As Introduced
testing completed and a testing laboratory letter provided to 14350
the commission within ninety days. 14351
Sec. 3772.314. (A) The requirements of this section apply 14352
to any geoblocking technology that is used for the purpose of 14353
preventing individuals who are not physically present in this 14354
state from participating in internet gambling or sports gaming, 14355
as required under sections 3771.10 and 3775.11 of the Revised 14356
Code. 14357
(B) The geoblocking technology shall be provided by a 14358
licensed internet gambling supplier or sports gaming supplier, 14359
as applicable, and shall be approved by the commission under 14360
section 3772.312 of the Revised Code. The internet gambling 14361
operator or sports gaming proprietor shall report to the 14362
commission the name of the supplier of its geoblocking 14363
technology. 14364
(C) The geoblocking technology shall do all of the 14365
following: 14366
(1) Determine a patron's location within a margin of error 14367
determined by the executive director and dynamically monitor the 14368
patron's location throughout the patron's placement of wagers 14369
with the internet gambling operator or sports gaming proprietor; 14370
(2) Provide reporting and analytics to allow for effective 14371
monitoring of patrons' locations; 14372
(3) Prevent a patron who is not physically present in this 14373
state from placing wagers with the internet gambling operator or 14374
sports gaming proprietor; 14375
(4) Alert a patron who is prevented from placing wagers 14376
under division (C)(3) of this section that the patron appears 14377
not to be physically present in this state; 14378

S. B. No. 197 Page 493
As Introduced
(5) Comply with the requirements of this chapter and 14379
Chapters 3771. and 3775. of the Revised Code and of rules 14380
adopted thereunder. 14381
(D) The supplier shall do all of the following: 14382
(1) Record all attempts to participate in internet 14383
gambling or the online sports pool, as applicable, from both 14384
authorized and unauthorized locations, and make the records 14385
available to the commission in a format approved by the 14386
executive director; 14387
(2) Provide the commission with access to real-time 14388
geoblocking data, including any equipment necessary to view the 14389
data. The executive director shall approve the method, format, 14390
and equipment for accessing the data. 14391
(3) Ensure the integrity of the data used to make location 14392
determinations; 14393
(4) Conduct maintenance and updates to the technology to 14394
ensure proper functionality; 14395
(5) Meet any other requirement prescribed by the executive 14396
director. 14397
Sec. 3772.315. (A) All of the following persons shall 14398
maintain an information technology department that is 14399
responsible for the quality, reliability, and accuracy of all 14400
electronic systems used in the person's gaming operation: 14401
(1) A permit holder, other than a person who holds only a 14402
permit issued for a horse racing meeting at a fair; 14403
(2) A video lottery sales agent; 14404
(3) An internet gambling operator; 14405

S. B. No. 197 Page 494
As Introduced
(4) A casino operator or management company; 14406
(5) A sports gaming proprietor. 14407
(B) A person described in division (A) of this section 14408
shall do all of the following: 14409
(1) Maintain information technology security insurance as 14410
approved by the executive director of the commission; 14411
(2) Ensure that the person's information technology staff 14412
are adequately segregated and monitored to detect procedural 14413
errors or unauthorized access to financial transactions and 14414
assets and to prevent the concealment of fraud; 14415
(3) Maintain the information technology environment and 14416
infrastructure in a secured physical location that is restricted 14417
to authorized employees; 14418
(4) Adopt procedures for responding to, monitoring, 14419
investigating, resolving, documenting, and reporting security 14420
incidents associated with the person's information technology 14421
systems. 14422
(C)(1) Each person described in division (A) of this 14423
section shall contract with an independent third party to 14424
perform an annual information technology audit. The third party 14425
shall be approved by the executive director of the commission as 14426
qualified, independent, and capable of performing the audit. The 14427
audit and corresponding report shall assess all of the 14428
following: 14429
(a) The design, controls, maintenance, and security of the 14430
person's information technology systems; 14431
(b) The person's compliance with the information 14432
technology and gaming system requirements of the Revised Code 14433

S. B. No. 197 Page 495
As Introduced
and the rules of the commission; 14434
(c) Any other subject required by the executive director. 14435
(2) The audit described in division (C)(1) of this section 14436
shall be performed at least once each fiscal year and within 14437
ninety days before a person commences initial operations on or 14438
after the effective date of this section. The person shall file 14439
the audit report with the commission, in a format determined by 14440
the executive director, within one hundred twenty days following 14441
the end of the fiscal year or upon receipt receiving the report 14442
from the auditor, whichever is earlier. 14443
(3) The commission may require a person described in 14444
division (A) of this section to terminate its engagement of an 14445
auditor under division (C)(1) of this section if the commission 14446
determines that the auditor lacks the appropriate 14447
qualifications, independence, or capacity or that the engagement 14448
or an audit performed under the engagement poses a material risk 14449
to the integrity of gaming in this state. An action under this 14450
division is an action against the person described in division 14451
(A) of this section that is subject to the hearing procedures 14452
and disciplinary actions provided for under this chapter and the 14453
rules of the commission. If the commission orders a person to 14454
terminate its engagement of an auditor, the person shall engage 14455
a different auditor to ensure that the requirements of this 14456
section and the rules of the commission are met. 14457
Sec. 3772.316. (A) All of the following persons shall 14458
comply with the accounting, record keeping, and internal 14459
auditing requirements of this section: 14460
(1) A permit holder; 14461
(2) A video lottery sales agent; 14462

S. B. No. 197 Page 496
As Introduced
(3) An internet gambling operator; 14463
(4) A casino operator or management company; 14464
(5) A sports gaming proprietor. 14465
(B) A person described in division (A) of this section 14466
shall do all of the following: 14467
(1) Maintain general accounting records using a double- 14468
entry system of accounting with transactions recorded on a basis 14469
consistent with generally accepted accounting principles; 14470
(2) Have documented revenue audit procedures and maintain 14471
documentation evidencing the performance of all revenue audit 14472
procedures, any exceptions noted, and follow-up of all 14473
exceptions; 14474
(3) Comply with all applicable requirements of Chapter 14475
5753. of the Revised Code and with any requests of the tax 14476
commissioner; 14477
(4) Include on all books, forms, records, documents, and 14478
data submitted to the commission the name of the person, the 14479
date of completion, and the title of the book, form, record, 14480
document, or stored data. 14481
(C)(1) A person described in division (A) of this section 14482
shall cause an annual audit of the person's gaming operation to 14483
be conducted to assess the person's compliance with the gaming 14484
requirements of the Revised Code and the rules of the 14485
commission. The audit shall be conducted by one of the 14486
following: 14487
(a) A separate internal audit department that is 14488
independent of the person's gaming operation. The department may 14489
be the internal audit department of a parent entity of the 14490

S. B. No. 197 Page 497
As Introduced
person. 14491
(b) A third party independent registered certified public 14492
accounting firm licensed to practice in this state. Before the 14493
start of the engagement, the person shall report to the 14494
commission the name of the firm and of the lead audit partner or 14495
other person responsible for the engagement. 14496
(2) An annual audit conducted under division (C)(1) of 14497
this section shall meet all of the following requirements: 14498
(a) It shall audit the person's compliance with the gaming 14499
requirements of the Revised Code and the rules adopted 14500
thereunder, the person's house rules, required procedures, and 14501
any other applicable rules and regulations, as required by the 14502
executive director. 14503
(b) The auditor shall follow the standards, conventions, 14504
and rules governing audits in the United States. 14505
(c) The auditor shall document the results in an audit 14506
report and provide them to the commission. The auditor shall 14507
maintain documentation to evidence all work performed as it 14508
relates to the requirements of this section, including all 14509
instances of noncompliance. 14510
(d) Within six months after the auditor notifies the 14511
person being audited of any instance of noncompliance, the 14512
auditor shall perform follow-up observations and examinations to 14513
verify that corrective action has been taken regarding all such 14514
instances of noncompliance. 14515
(3) The commission may require a person described in 14516
division (A) of this section to terminate its engagement of an 14517
auditor under division (C)(1) of this section if the commission 14518
determines that the auditor lacks the appropriate 14519

S. B. No. 197 Page 498
As Introduced
qualifications, independence, or capacity or that the engagement 14520
or an audit performed under the engagement poses a material risk 14521
to the integrity of gaming in this state. An action under this 14522
division is an action against the person described in division 14523
(A) of this section that is subject to the hearing procedures 14524
and disciplinary actions provided for under this chapter and the 14525
rules of the commission. If the commission orders a person to 14526
terminate its engagement of an auditor, the person shall engage 14527
a different auditor to ensure that the requirements of this 14528
section and the rules of the commission are met. 14529
Sec. 3772.317. (A) All of the following persons shall 14530
comply with the external auditing requirements of this section: 14531
(1) A permit holder; 14532
(2) A video lottery sales agent; 14533
(3) An internet gambling operator; 14534
(4) A casino operator or management company; 14535
(5) A sports gaming proprietor, other than a professional 14536
sports organization. 14537
(B)(1) A person described in division (A) of this section 14538
shall have its annual financial statements audited by an 14539
independent registered certified public accounting firm licensed 14540
to practice in this state. The audit shall be in accordance with 14541
generally accepted auditing standards and, when applicable, the 14542
standards of the accountancy board. 14543
(2) The person shall report to the commission the name of 14544
the independent registered certified public accounting firm and 14545
the name of the lead audit partner or other individual taking 14546
primary responsibility for the financial statement audit 14547

S. B. No. 197 Page 499
As Introduced
engagement before the start of the engagement. The lead audit 14548
partner or other individual taking primary responsibility for 14549
the financial statement audit engagement may serve a maximum of 14550
five consecutive years in such a position. 14551
(3) The annual financial statements audit shall be 14552
prepared on a comparative basis for the current and prior fiscal 14553
years and shall present the person's financial position and 14554
results of operations in conformity with generally accepted 14555
accounting principles. 14556
(4) The audit shall be filed with the commission, in a 14557
format determined by the executive director, within one hundred 14558
twenty days following the end of the fiscal year. 14559
(C) At any time, the executive director may require a 14560
special audit of a person described in division (A) of this 14561
section by commission personnel, an independent registered 14562
certified public accounting firm, or any other third party the 14563
executive director approves as qualified, independent, and 14564
capable of performing the special audit. 14565
(D) The commission may require a person described in 14566
division (A) of this section to terminate its engagement of an 14567
auditor under this section if the commission determines that the 14568
auditor lacks the appropriate qualifications, independence, or 14569
capacity or that the engagement or an audit performed under the 14570
engagement poses a material risk to the integrity of gaming in 14571
this state. An action under this division is an action against 14572
the person described in division (A) of this section that is 14573
subject to the hearing procedures and disciplinary actions 14574
provided for under this chapter and the rules of the commission. 14575
If the commission orders a person to terminate its engagement of 14576
an auditor, the person shall engage a different auditor to 14577

S. B. No. 197 Page 500
As Introduced
ensure that the requirements of this section and the rules of 14578
the commission are met. 14579
(E) A person described in division (A) of this section 14580
shall do both of the following: 14581
(1) Notify the commission of any report that is filed, or 14582
required to be filed, with the securities and exchange 14583
commission or other securities regulatory agency; 14584
(2) File with the commission a copy of any suspicious 14585
activity report filed with the financial crimes enforcement 14586
network related to the conduct of gaming in this state. 14587
Sec. 3772.37. (A) Pursuant to section 131.02 of the 14588
Revised Code, the attorney general shall develop and implement a 14589
real time data match program and make it available to each 14590
casino operator and management company to identify patrons who 14591
owe amounts to the state or a political subdivision. 14592
(B)(1) (A)(1) Before disbursing any casino of the 14593
following types of winnings to a patron that meet or exceed the 14594
reportable winnings amount set by 26 U.S.C. 6041, a casino 14595
operator or management company the following persons shall 14596
withhold amounts from the winnings as required under divisions 14597
(B) to (E) of this section: 14598
(a) A permit holder, with respect to winnings from pari- 14599
mutuel wagering on horse racing; 14600
(b) A video lottery sales agent, with respect to winnings 14601
from a video lottery terminal; 14602
(c) An internet gambling operator, with respect to 14603
winnings from internet gambling; 14604
(d) A casino operator or management company, with respect 14605

S. B. No. 197 Page 501
As Introduced
to casino winnings; 14606
(e) A sports gaming proprietor, with respect to winnings 14607
from sports gaming, except as otherwise provided regarding a 14608
type C sports gaming proprietor by rule of the state lottery 14609
commission adopted under section 3770.03 of the Revised Code. 14610
(2) For purposes of division (A)(1) of this section, a 14611
patron's amount of winnings shall be determined each time the 14612
patron exchanges amounts won in tokens, chips, credit, betting 14613
slips or tickets, or other prepaid representations of value for 14614
cash or a cash equivalent. 14615
(B) The person shall withhold state income tax under 14616
section 5747.063 of the Revised Code. 14617
(C) If required, the person shall withhold federal income 14618
tax under 26 U.S.C. 3402. 14619
(D) In the case of winnings won in person at a track, 14620
casino facility, or sports gaming facility, the person shall 14621
withhold any applicable municipal income tax under section 14622
718.031 of the Revised Code. 14623
(E) The person shall consult the data match program 14624
described in section 3123.90 of the Revised Code to determine 14625
whether the patron is in default under a support order and, if 14626
so, shall withhold an amount sufficient to satisfy any past due 14627
support under that section. 14628
(F)(1) The person shall consult the data match program 14629
described in section 131.02 of the Revised Code to determine 14630
whether the patron owes any amounts to the state or a political 14631
subdivision. If the data match program indicates that the patron 14632
owes any amounts to the state or a political subdivision, the 14633
casino operator or management company person shall withhold from 14634

S. B. No. 197 Page 502
As Introduced
the patron's winnings an amount sufficient to satisfy those 14635
amounts, up to the amount of the winnings. 14636
(2) If the data match program described in section 3123.90 14637
of the Revised Code indicates that the patron also is in default 14638
under a support order, the casino operator or management company 14639
person shall transmit to the department of job and family 14640
services an amount sufficient to satisfy any past due support 14641
owed by the patron, up to the amount of the winnings, before 14642
transmitting any remaining amount to the attorney general under 14643
division (C) (F)(1) of this section. 14644
(C)(1) (3) Not later than seven days after withholding an 14645
amount under division (B) (F)(1) of this section, the casino 14646
operator or management company person shall transmit to the 14647
attorney general any amount withheld and not already disbursed 14648
to the department of job and family services under section 14649
3123.90 of the Revised Code as payment on the amount owed. 14650
(2) (4) If the patron owes more than one amount to the 14651
state or a political subdivision as identified by the data match 14652
program described in this section, the amount owed to the state 14653
shall be satisfied first, except that any amounts owed under 14654
section 5739.33 and division (G) of section 5747.07 of the 14655
Revised Code shall have first priority. 14656
(D) (5) Except as otherwise provided in section 131.021 of 14657
the Revised Code, division (F) of this section applies only to 14658
amounts owed that have become final. 14659
(E) (6) The attorney general, in consultation with the 14660
commission, may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised 14661
Code as necessary to implement division (F) of this section. 14662
Sec. 3772.38. (A) All of the following persons shall 14663

S. B. No. 197 Page 503
As Introduced
retain records in accordance with this section: 14664
(1) A permit holder, management services company, or 14665
totalizator company, with respect to its operations under 14666
Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code; 14667
(2) A video lottery sales agent, with respect to its 14668
operations under sections 3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised 14669
Code; 14670
(3) An internet gambling operator, internet gambling 14671
management company, or internet gambling supplier, with respect 14672
to its operations under Chapter 3771. of the Revised Code; 14673
(4) A casino operator, management company, or gaming- 14674
related vendor or a holding company of a casino operator, 14675
management company, or gaming-related vendor; 14676
(5) A sports gaming proprietor, a mobile management 14677
services provider, a management services provider, or a sports 14678
gaming supplier, with respect to its operations under Chapter 14679
3775. of the Revised Code. 14680
(B) A person described in division (A) of this section 14681
shall retain and maintain all of the following records, in 14682
addition to any other records required to be maintained under 14683
this chapter, Chapter 3769., 3771., 3775., or 3777., or sections 14684
3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code, as applicable, or the 14685
rules of the commission, for at least five years after the 14686
records are created, in a place secure from theft, loss, or 14687
destruction: 14688
(1) The person's business and organizational structure; 14689
(2) Correspondence, including reports, to or from the 14690
commission or any local, state, or federal governmental agency, 14691

S. B. No. 197 Page 504
As Introduced
or foreign gaming regulatory body; 14692
(3) Any acquisition, construction, remodeling, or 14693
maintenance of a proposed or existing track, casino facility, or 14694
sports gaming facility in this state; 14695
(4) All transactions and other records related to the 14696
lease, purchase, installation, operation, maintenance, or repair 14697
of equipment stored, maintained, operated, possessed, or 14698
otherwise used in conducting gaming in this state; 14699
(5) Financial statements, accounting records, ledgers, and 14700
internal and external audit records; 14701
(6) Records related to the conduct of gaming in this 14702
state; 14703
(7) Any other books, records, or documents the commission 14704
requires, in writing, to be retained and maintained. 14705
(C) A person described in division (A) of this section 14706
shall retain and maintain, in a manner consistent with division 14707
(B) of this section, the personnel files for all key gaming 14708
employee and gaming employee applicants or licensees for three 14709
years from the employment decision or last date of employment, 14710
as applicable. 14711
(D) A person described in division (A) of this section 14712
shall retain and maintain, in a manner consistent with division 14713
(B) of this section, any materials used to advertise, publicize, 14714
or otherwise promote gaming in this state for two years from the 14715
end of the advertising, promotional, or publicity campaign. If 14716
an affiliate marketer advertises, publicizes, or otherwise 14717
promotes gaming on the person's behalf, either the person or the 14718
affiliate marketer shall retain those records. 14719

S. B. No. 197 Page 505
As Introduced
(E) A person described in division (A) of this section 14720
shall organize the records required to be maintained under this 14721
section and furnish them to the commission in a manner that 14722
enables the commission to locate, inspect, review, and analyze 14723
the records with reasonable ease and efficiency, when requested 14724
by the commission. 14725
(F)(1) The commission and its employees may demand access 14726
to and inspect, examine, photocopy, and audit all books, 14727
accounts, records, and memoranda of any person that is not 14728
protected by privilege and that is subject to the provisions of 14729
this chapter, Chapter 3769., 3771., 3775., or 3777., or sections 14730
3770.21 to 3770.22 of the Revised Code and may examine under 14731
oath any officer, agent, or employee of that person. 14732
(2) Nothing in this section requires disclosure of a 14733
record that is protected by the attorney-client privilege. If 14734
the commission requests a record that is protected by the 14735
attorney-client privilege, the record holder shall provide the 14736
commission with written notification of the record's existence, 14737
including a general description of the record's contents and the 14738
basis for the privilege. 14739
Sec. 3772.39. (A) The commission shall operate the Ohio 14740
voluntary exclusion program for the purpose of reducing the 14741
incidence of disordered and problem gambling in this state. 14742
(B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a 14743
participant in the program shall agree to refrain from entering 14744
a track, casino facility, or sports gaming facility and from 14745
engaging in pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing, video lottery 14746
terminal gaming, internet gambling, casino gaming, or sports 14747
gaming in this state. The participant's name shall be included 14748
on a voluntary exclusion list with respect to all forms of 14749

S. B. No. 197 Page 506
As Introduced
gaming from which the participant is excluded. 14750
(2) An individual who is a participant as of the effective 14751
date of this section is excluded only from the forms of gaming 14752
indicated on the individual's most recently submitted 14753
application for voluntary exclusion. 14754
(3) An individual who becomes a participant remains 14755
entitled to both of the following: 14756
(a) Any amount owed to the individual by a permit holder, 14757
video lottery sales agent, internet gambling operator, casino 14758
operator or management company, or sports gaming proprietor or 14759
an agent of any of those persons before the individual becomes a 14760
participant, including the value of any points, promotional 14761
credits, or complimentaries that may be redeemed for cash under 14762
a marketing program and the value of any voided or canceled 14763
wager; 14764
(b) Any winnings from a wager placed by an individual 14765
before becoming a participant that is pending when the 14766
individual becomes a participant. Such a wager shall not be 14767
voided or canceled by either party solely because the individual 14768
becomes a participant. 14769
(4) A participant remains liable for any debt to a permit 14770
holder, video lottery sales agent, internet gambling operator, 14771
casino operator or management company, or sports gaming 14772
proprietor accrued before becoming a participant. 14773
(5) A participant is not prohibited from entering a track, 14774
casino facility, or sports gaming facility for any of the 14775
following purposes: 14776
(a) Carrying out the duties of the participant's 14777
employment. A participant who requires access for that purpose 14778

S. B. No. 197 Page 507
As Introduced
shall notify the commission in the manner and on a form 14779
prescribed by the commission. 14780
(b) Applying for renewed or extended participation in, or 14781
removal from, the program; 14782
(c) Claiming any money or thing of value owed to the 14783
participant under division (B)(3) of this section; 14784
(d) Paying any debt owed under division (B)(4) of this 14785
section. 14786
(C)(1) An applicant to participate in the program shall 14787
apply on a form prescribed by the commission, either in person 14788
at a track or casino facility in the presence of commission 14789
staff or through an online portal established by the commission. 14790
(2) The applicant shall choose to be excluded for one of 14791
the following periods: 14792
(a) A minimum of one year; 14793
(b) A minimum of five years; 14794
(c) For life, subject to division (C)(8) of this section. 14795
(3) No fee is required to participate in or be removed 14796
from the program. 14797
(4) If, in the opinion of the commission staff who are 14798
present when an applicant applies in person, the applicant 14799
appears to be impaired or appears to be applying involuntarily, 14800
the commission shall reject the application. 14801
(5) After enrolling a participant in the program, the 14802
commission shall deliver written confirmation to the 14803
participant. Any failure to deliver confirmation to the 14804
participant does not affect the participant's status as a 14805

S. B. No. 197 Page 508
As Introduced
participant. 14806
(6) A participant who chooses a one-year or five-year 14807
minimum exclusion period shall not be removed from the program 14808
before the expiration of the applicable minimum period. Upon the 14809
expiration of that period, the participant remains a participant 14810
unless the participant submits an application to the commission 14811
for removal from the program. The application shall be on a form 14812
prescribed by the commission and shall be made in the same 14813
manner as an application to participate in the program. 14814
(7) A participant who chooses a lifetime exclusion and 14815
participates in the program for at least five years may apply to 14816
the commission to be removed from the program. The application 14817
shall be on a form prescribed by the commission and shall be 14818
made in the same manner as an application to participate in the 14819
program. Upon receiving a properly completed application for 14820
removal under this division, the commission shall grant the 14821
application if the participant has completed an education 14822
program on problem gambling awareness, as prescribed by the 14823
commission. 14824
(8) A participant may apply to the commission in the 14825
manner described in division (C)(1) of this section to renew or 14826
extend the participant's participation in the program at any 14827
time. 14828
(D) An applicant to participate in the program shall agree 14829
in writing to all of the following: 14830
(1) That the applicant will refrain from entering any 14831
track, casino facility, or sports gaming facility, except as 14832
otherwise permitted under division (E) of this section, and that 14833
the applicant may be charged with criminal trespass for doing 14834

S. B. No. 197 Page 509
As Introduced
so; 14835
(2) That the applicant will refrain from engaging in, or 14836
attempting to engage in, pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing, 14837
video lottery terminal gaming, internet gambling, casino gaming, 14838
and sports gaming in this state; 14839
(3) That the applicant will forfeit all points, 14840
promotional credits, or complimentaries received from a permit 14841
holder, video lottery sales agent, internet gambling operator, 14842
casino operator or management company, or sports gaming 14843
proprietor on or before the date the applicant completes the 14844
application, except for any points, credits, or complimentaries 14845
that may be redeemed for cash under a marketing program; 14846
(4) That the applicant will surrender both of the 14847
following to the commission: 14848
(a) Any money or thing of value the applicant converts, or 14849
attempts to convert, into chips, tokens, tickets, electronic 14850
wagering credit, or any other wagering instrument for the 14851
purpose of pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing, video lottery 14852
terminal gaming, internet gambling, casino gaming, or sports 14853
gaming in this state after becoming a participant; 14854
(b) Any prize the applicant wins, claims, or attempts to 14855
claim from pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing, video lottery 14856
terminal gaming, internet gambling, casino gaming, or sports 14857
gaming in this state after becoming a participant, except for 14858
any winnings from a wager described in division (B)(3) of this 14859
section. 14860
(5) That the applicant remains liable for any debt to a 14861
permit holder, video lottery sales agent, internet gambling 14862
operator, casino operator or management company, or sports 14863

S. B. No. 197 Page 510
As Introduced
gaming proprietor accrued before becoming a participant; 14864
(6) That the applicant cannot be removed from the program 14865
before the expiration of the applicable minimum period; 14866
(7) That the applicant may renew or extend the applicant's 14867
participation in the program at any time. 14868
(E) A permit holder, video lottery sales agent, internet 14869
gambling operator, casino operator or management company, or 14870
sports gaming proprietor shall employ commercially reasonable 14871
methods to do all of the following: 14872
(1) Maintain a system for determining whether an 14873
individual is a participant, including procedures approved by 14874
the commission for updating the system with changes in 14875
participants' enrollment status at least once every seven days; 14876
(2) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(4) of 14877
this section, prohibit a participant from entering a track, 14878
casino facility, or sports gaming facility, as applicable. If 14879
the person finds a participant on the premises in violation of 14880
this division, all of the following apply: 14881
(a) If any member of the commission's staff is present at 14882
the facility, the person immediately shall notify the 14883
commission's staff. 14884
(b) Within seventy-two hours, the person shall notify the 14885
commission in writing of the participant's name and date of 14886
birth, the circumstances of the violation or attempted violation 14887
of the terms of the program, and the gaming activity, if any, in 14888
which the participant engaged. 14889
(c) The person may press charges against the participant 14890
for criminal trespass under section 2911.21 of the Revised Code 14891

S. B. No. 197 Page 511
As Introduced
or a comparable provision of a local ordinance. 14892
(3) Prohibit a participant from participating in gaming 14893
operated by the person. Within seventy-two hours after 14894
discovering that a participant has violated or attempted to 14895
violate the terms of the program, the person shall notify the 14896
commission in writing of the participant's name and date of 14897
birth, the circumstances of the violation or attempted 14898
violation, and the gaming activity, if any, in which the 14899
participant engaged. 14900
(4) Refrain from accepting any form of payment from a 14901
participant or extending credit to a participant in any manner, 14902
except as payment of a debt accrued by a participant before 14903
becoming a participant; 14904
(5) Remit both of the following to the commission: 14905
(a) Any money or thing of value a participant converts, or 14906
attempts to convert, into chips, tokens, tickets, electronic 14907
wagering credit, or any other wagering instrument for the 14908
purpose of pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing, video lottery 14909
terminal gaming, internet gambling, casino gaming, or sports 14910
gaming in this state after becoming a participant; 14911
(b) Any prize a participant wins, claims, or attempts to 14912
claim from pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing, video lottery 14913
terminal gaming, internet gambling, casino gaming, or sports 14914
gaming in this state after becoming a participant, except for 14915
any winnings from a wager described in division (B)(3) of this 14916
section. 14917
(6) Make all reasonable attempts, as determined by the 14918
commission, to cease all direct marketing efforts to a 14919
participant; 14920

S. B. No. 197 Page 512
As Introduced
(7) Provide the commission reports on a quarterly basis of 14921
the number of participants the person denied entry or access to 14922
a track, casino facility, sports gaming facility, or online 14923
gaming platform; 14924
(8) Make program applications available at any track or 14925
casino facility the person operates. 14926
(F)(1) Subject to division (F)(2) of this section, the 14927
voluntary exclusion list and the personal information of current 14928
or former participants are confidential and are not subject to 14929
disclosure as a public record. The commission shall distribute 14930
that information only to the following persons: 14931
(a) Permit holders, video lottery sales agents, internet 14932
gambling operators, casino operators or management companies, 14933
sports gaming proprietors, and their agents and employees, for 14934
purposes of implementing the program; 14935
(b) A person to whom the participant requests the 14936
commission to disclose the participant's information, with the 14937
consent of the commission. 14938
(2) The commission may disclose anonymized information 14939
from the program and any predecessor gambling voluntary 14940
exclusion program to one or more research entities selected by 14941
the commission for the purpose of evaluating the program's 14942
effectiveness and ensuring its proper administration. 14943
(G)(1) Any money or thing of value surrendered or remitted 14944
to the commission under division (D)(4) or (E)(5) of this 14945
section at a casino facility shall be deposited in the problem 14946
casino gambling and addictions fund. 14947
(2) Any other money or thing of value surrendered or 14948
remitted to the commission under those divisions shall be 14949

S. B. No. 197 Page 513
As Introduced
deposited in the problem gambling fund established under section 14950
5753.031 of the Revised Code. 14951
(H) The requirements of this section do not apply to a 14952
permit holder who holds only a permit issued for a horse racing 14953
meeting at a fair. 14954
Sec. 3772.40. (A) Each of the following persons shall 14955
develop and implement a compulsive and problem gambling plan: 14956
(1) A permit holder, other than a person who holds only a 14957
permit issued for a horse racing meeting at a fair; 14958
(2) A video lottery sales agent; 14959
(3) An internet gambling operator; 14960
(4) A casino operator or management company; 14961
(5) A sports gaming proprietor. 14962
(B) At a minimum, the plan shall contain all of the 14963
following elements: 14964
(1) The goals of the plan and procedures and timetables to 14965
implement the plan; 14966
(2) The identification of the individual who will be 14967
responsible for the implementation and maintenance of the plan; 14968
(3) Policies and procedures, including the following: 14969
(a) Procedures for compliance with the Ohio voluntary 14970
exclusion plan, including, at a minimum, all of the following: 14971
(i) Procedures preventing an individual in the program 14972
from entering the person's facility or engaging in, or 14973
attempting to engage in, gaming operated by the person; 14974
(ii) Procedures for identifying and removing participants 14975

S. B. No. 197 Page 514
As Introduced
in the program from the person's facility, if applicable; 14976
(iii) Procedures for preventing the dissemination of any 14977
advertisement, promotion, or other direct marketing mailing 14978
beginning fifteen days after an individual becomes a 14979
participant; 14980
(iv) Procedures for preventing a participant from having 14981
access to credit or from receiving complimentary services, 14982
check-cashing services, and other benefits; 14983
(v) Procedures for ensuring the confidentiality of 14984
participants' identities and information; 14985
(vi) Any other procedure required by the executive 14986
director of the commission. 14987
(b) The duties and responsibilities of the employees 14988
designated to implement or participate in the plan; 14989
(c) The responsibility of patrons with respect to safer 14990
gambling practices; 14991
(d) Procedures to identify patrons and employees with 14992
suspected or known disordered or problem gambling behavior, 14993
including procedures specific to loyalty and other rewards and 14994
marketing programs; 14995
(e) Procedures for providing information to individuals 14996
regarding the Ohio voluntary exclusion program and community, 14997
public and private treatment services, peer support groups, and 14998
similar treatment or addiction therapy programs designed to 14999
prevent, treat, or monitor individuals with a gambling problem 15000
or gambling disorder and to counsel family members, including 15001
for providing the information upon the request of a patron or 15002
employee; 15003

S. B. No. 197 Page 515
As Introduced
(f) The provision of written material to educate patrons 15004
and employees about disordered and problem gambling and to 15005
inform them about the Ohio voluntary exclusion program and 15006
treatment services available to individuals with a gambling 15007
problem or gambling disorder and their families. The person 15008
shall provide the commission with examples of the materials to 15009
be used and a description of how they will be disseminated. 15010
(g) Advertising and other marketing and outreach to 15011
educate the general public about disordered and problem 15012
gambling; 15013
(h) An employee training program, including training 15014
materials to be utilized, a plan for periodic reinforcement 15015
training, and a certification process established by the person 15016
to verify that each employee has completed the training required 15017
by the plan; 15018
(i) Procedures to prevent underage gambling; 15019
(j) Procedures for the operator of a track, casino 15020
facility, or sports gaming facility to prevent patrons impaired 15021
by drugs or alcohol, or both, from gambling; 15022
(k) The plan for posting signs or other notices containing 15023
information on gambling treatment and on the Ohio voluntary 15024
exclusion program, including examples of the language and 15025
graphics to be used. 15026
(4) A list of public and private treatment services, peer 15027
recovery support groups, and similar treatment or addiction 15028
therapy programs designed to prevent, treat, or monitor 15029
individuals with a gambling problem or gambling disorder and to 15030
counsel family members; 15031
(5) Any other information, documents, and policies and 15032

S. B. No. 197 Page 516
As Introduced
procedures the commission requires. 15033
(C) Each person described in division (A) of this section 15034
shall submit quarterly updates and an annual report to the 15035
commission concerning the person's adherence to the plan and the 15036
goals of the plan. The annual report shall include any 15037
information the person has received related to any individual's 15038
bankruptcy, divorce, criminal offense, suicide attempt, or death 15039
by suicide related to gambling offered by the person, including 15040
the individual's name and date of birth, how the person came to 15041
know of the incident, and a brief description of the incident. 15042
Sec. 3772.41. (A) As used in this section : 15043
(1) "Affiliate marketer" means a person who conducts 15044
promotion, marketing, advertising or patron recruitment for a 15045
permit holder, video lottery sales agent, online gambling 15046
operator, casino operator or management company, or sports 15047
gaming proprietor in this state in either of the following 15048
manners: 15049
(a) Through a web site or mobile application; 15050
(b) In exchange for a commission or variable fee based 15051
upon the number of users recruited, wagering activity generated, 15052
revenue generated, or any other metric. 15053
(2) "Gaming advertisement" means a notice, announcement, 15054
or communication to the public or to any specific member or 15055
members of the public, to which both of the following apply: 15056
(a) It is made by or on behalf of a permit holder, video 15057
lottery sales agent, online gambling operator, casino operator 15058
or management company, or sports gaming proprietor. 15059
(b) It is designed to solicit or entice an individual to 15060

S. B. No. 197 Page 517
As Introduced
participate in gaming operated by the person described in 15061
division (A)(1)(a) of this section through broadcasting, 15062
publication, or any other means of dissemination in this state. 15063
(3) "Direct gaming advertisement" means a gaming 15064
advertisement that is disseminated to a specific individual or 15065
individuals. 15066
(B) A gaming advertisement shall do all of the following: 15067
(1) Clearly convey the conditions under which the gaming 15068
is being offered, including information about the cost to 15069
participate and the nature of any promotions and information to 15070
assist patrons in understanding the odds of winning. Any 15071
material conditions or limiting factors shall be clearly and 15072
conspicuously specified. If the advertisement is not of 15073
sufficient size or duration to permit inclusion of that 15074
information, the advertisement shall refer to a web site or 15075
application that prominently includes that information within 15076
one click. 15077
(2) Disclose the identity of the person conducting the 15078
gaming; 15079
(3) Clearly and conspicuously include messages designed to 15080
prevent problem gambling and provide information about how to 15081
access resources related to problem gambling, including one of 15082
the following: 15083
(a) The national council on problem gambling's twenty-four 15084
hour confidential helpline; 15085
(b) The problem gambling helpline number established under 15086
section 3772.062 of the Revised Code; 15087
(c) Another helpline approved by the executive director of 15088

S. B. No. 197 Page 518
As Introduced
the commission that is free of charge to the caller. 15089
(C) No gaming advertisement shall do any of the following: 15090
(1) Depict any individual under the minimum age to 15091
participate in the applicable form of gaming in any way that may 15092
be construed as the individual participating in or endorsing the 15093
gaming. This division does not prohibit the use of footage or 15094
images of participants in sporting events or horse races on 15095
which wagering is permitted. 15096
(2) Target individuals under the minimum age to 15097
participate in the applicable form of gaming, other individuals 15098
who are ineligible to participate in that gaming, individuals 15099
with gambling problems, or other vulnerable individuals; 15100
(3) Target college or university students or the area of a 15101
college or university campus. This division does not prohibit 15102
advertising that is generally available, such as by television, 15103
radio, or the internet, and that does not target those students 15104
or the area of such a campus. 15105
(4) Appear, or be used or licensed for use, on any 15106
product, clothing, toy, game, or gaming equipment that is 15107
intended primarily for individuals who are under the minimum age 15108
to participate in the applicable form of gaming, including by 15109
means of a logo, trademark, or brand; 15110
(5) Advertise any gaming that is not permitted in this 15111
state. A gaming advertisement does not violate this division if 15112
it makes clear that the gaming or offering is not available or 15113
intended for use in this state. 15114
(6) Obscure any material fact; 15115
(7) Be false, deceptive, or misleading; 15116

S. B. No. 197 Page 519
As Introduced
(8) Promote irresponsible or excessive participation in 15117
gaming, or suggest that social, financial, or personal success 15118
is guaranteed by engaging in gaming. 15119
(D)(1) Each direct gaming advertisement shall clearly and 15120
conspicuously describe a method by which an individual may opt 15121
out of receiving future advertisements from the permit holder, 15122
video lottery sales agent, online gambling operator, casino 15123
operator or management company, or sports gaming proprietor. 15124
(2) If the direct gaming advertisement is sent via 15125
electronic mail, the opt out method shall include either 15126
electronic mail or a linked web site. 15127
(3) A direct gaming advertisement sent other than by 15128
electronic mail shall include at least one of the following 15129
methods to opt out: 15130
(a) By telephone; 15131
(b) By regular United States mail; 15132
(c) Using a web site or mobile application; 15133
(d) By electronic mail. 15134
(4) The permit holder, video lottery sales agent, online 15135
gambling operator, casino operator or management company, or 15136
sports gaming proprietor shall act upon a request for opt out 15137
pursuant to division (D) of this section within fifteen days of 15138
receipt to ensure that the individual will no longer receive 15139
advertisements from the person. 15140
(E) Upon the occurrence of either of the following, a 15141
person who disseminates a gaming advertisement immediately shall 15142
stop disseminating the advertisement: 15143

S. B. No. 197 Page 520
As Introduced
(1) The person becomes aware that the gaming advertisement 15144
is in violation of this section or of other applicable 15145
provisions of the Revised Code regarding gaming or the rules of 15146
the commission. 15147
(2) The executive director of the commission orders the 15148
person to stop disseminating the gaming advertisement because it 15149
fails to comply with this section or with other applicable 15150
provisions of the Revised Code or the rules of the commission, 15151
or because it otherwise undermines the integrity of gaming. 15152
(F)(1) An affiliate marketer is not required to be 15153
licensed by the commission solely as a result of the person's 15154
conduct as an affiliate marketer. 15155
(2) The requirements of this section apply to a gaming 15156
advertisement disseminated by an affiliate marketer. 15157
(3) The commission may require a permit holder, video 15158
lottery sales agent, online gambling operator, casino operator 15159
or management company, or sports gaming proprietor to terminate 15160
its contract with an affiliate marketer if the commission 15161
determines that the affiliate marketer has violated this 15162
section, another applicable provision of the Revised Code 15163
regarding gaming, or the rules of the commission. 15164
Sec. 3772.98. (A) All of the following persons shall make 15165
incident reports to the commission and adopt anti-money 15166
laundering procedures in accordance with this section: 15167
(1) A permit holder; 15168
(2) A video lottery sales agent; 15169
(3) An internet gambling operator; 15170
(4) A casino operator or management company; 15171

S. B. No. 197 Page 521
As Introduced
(5) A sports gaming proprietor. 15172
(B) A person described in division (A) of this section 15173
immediately shall report to the commission, in a manner 15174
prescribed by its executive director, any information in the 15175
person's possession related to any of the following: 15176
(1) Any wager in violation of the Revised Code or the 15177
rules adopted thereunder or of federal law; 15178
(2) Any conduct that corrupts a betting outcome for 15179
purposes of financial gain; 15180
(3) Any information technology security breach or other 15181
compromising information technology risk; 15182
(4) Any breach of confidentiality of a patron's personal 15183
information; 15184
(5) Any physical security breach or other compromising 15185
risk to patrons, employees, or the commission; 15186
(6) Any other type of incident required by the executive 15187
director. 15188
(C) A person described in division (A) of this section 15189
shall adopt and implement procedures to prevent, detect, and 15190
report to the commission any attempt to launder money through 15191
any gaming the person conducts in this state. 15192
Sec. 3772.99. (A) The commission shall levy and collect 15193
penalties for noncriminal violations of this chapter. 15194
Noncriminal violations include using the term "casino" in any 15195
advertisement in regard to a facility operating video lottery 15196
terminals, as defined in section 3770.21 of the Revised Code, in 15197
this state. Moneys collected from such penalty levies shall be 15198
credited to the general revenue fund. 15199

S. B. No. 197 Page 522
As Introduced
(B) If a licensed casino operator, management company, 15200
holding company, gaming-related vendor, or key gaming employee 15201
violates this chapter or engages in a fraudulent act, the 15202
commission may suspend or revoke the license and may do either 15203
or both of the following: 15204
(1) Suspend, revoke, or restrict the casino gaming 15205
operations of a casino operator; 15206
(2) Require the removal of a management company, key 15207
gaming employee, or discontinuance of services from a gaming- 15208
related vendor. 15209
(C) The commission shall impose civil penalties against a 15210
person who violates this chapter under the penalties adopted by 15211
commission rule. 15212
(D) A person who purposely or knowingly does any of the 15213
following commits a misdemeanor of the first degree on the first 15214
offense and a felony of the fifth degree for a subsequent 15215
offense: 15216
(1) Makes a false statement on an application submitted 15217
under this chapter; 15218
(2) Permits a person less than twenty-one years of age to 15219
make a wager at a casino facility; 15220
(3) Aids, induces, or causes a person less than twenty-one 15221
years of age who is not an employee of the casino gaming 15222
operation to enter or attempt to enter a casino facility; 15223
(4) Enters or attempts to enter a casino facility while 15224
under twenty-one years of age, unless the person enters a 15225
designated area as described in section 3772.24 of the Revised 15226
Code; 15227

S. B. No. 197 Page 523
As Introduced
(5) Is a casino operator or employee and participates in 15228
casino gaming at the casino facility at which the casino 15229
operator or employee has an interest or is employed or at an 15230
affiliated casino facility in this state other than as part of 15231
operation or employment. 15232
(E) A person who purposely or knowingly does any of the 15233
following commits a felony of the fifth degree on a first 15234
offense and a felony of the fourth degree for a subsequent 15235
offense. If the person is a licensee under this chapter, the 15236
commission shall revoke the person's license after the first 15237
offense. 15238
(1) Uses or possesses with the intent to use a device to 15239
assist in projecting the outcome of the casino game, keeping 15240
track of the cards played, analyzing the probability of the 15241
occurrence of an event relating to the casino game, or analyzing 15242
the strategy for playing or betting to be used in the casino 15243
game, except as permitted by the commission; 15244
(2) Cheats at a casino game; 15245
(3) Manufactures, sells, or distributes any cards, chips, 15246
dice, game, or device that is intended to be used to violate 15247
this chapter; 15248
(4) Alters or misrepresents the outcome of a casino game 15249
on which wagers have been made after the outcome is made sure 15250
but before the outcome is revealed to the players; 15251
(5) Places, increases, or decreases a wager on the outcome 15252
of a casino game after acquiring knowledge that is not available 15253
to all players and concerns the outcome of the casino game that 15254
is the subject of the wager; 15255
(6) Aids a person in acquiring the knowledge described in 15256

S. B. No. 197 Page 524
As Introduced
division (E)(5) of this section for the purpose of placing, 15257
increasing, or decreasing a wager contingent on the outcome of a 15258
casino game; 15259
(7) Claims, collects, takes, or attempts to claim, 15260
collect, or take money or anything of value in or from a casino 15261
game with the intent to defraud or without having made a wager 15262
contingent on winning a casino game; 15263
(8) Claims, collects, or takes an amount of money or thing 15264
of value of greater value than the amount won in a casino game; 15265
(9) Uses or possesses counterfeit chips, tokens, or 15266
cashless wagering instruments in or for use in a casino game; 15267
(10) Possesses a key or device designed for opening, 15268
entering, or affecting the operation of a casino game, drop box, 15269
or an electronic or a mechanical device connected with the 15270
casino game or removing coins, tokens, chips, or other contents 15271
of a casino game. This division does not apply to a casino 15272
operator, management company, or gaming-related vendor or their 15273
agents and employees in the course of agency or employment. 15274
(11) Possesses materials used to manufacture a device 15275
intended to be used in a manner that violates this chapter; 15276
(12) Operates a casino gaming operation in which wagering 15277
is conducted or is to be conducted in a manner other than the 15278
manner required under this chapter or a skill-based amusement 15279
machine operation in a manner other than the manner required 15280
under Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code. 15281
(F) The possession of more than one of the devices 15282
described in division (E)(9), (10), or (11) of this section 15283
creates a rebuttable presumption that the possessor intended to 15284
use the devices for cheating. 15285

S. B. No. 197 Page 525
As Introduced
(G) A person who purposely or knowingly does any of the 15286
following commits a felony of the third degree. If the person is 15287
a licensee under this chapter, the commission shall revoke the 15288
person's license after the first offense. A public servant or 15289
party official who is convicted under this division is forever 15290
disqualified from holding any public office, employment, or 15291
position of trust in this state. 15292
(1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value or 15293
benefit to a person who is connected with the casino operator, 15294
management company, holding company, or gaming-related vendor, 15295
including their officers and employees, under an agreement to 15296
influence or with the intent to influence the actions of the 15297
person to whom the offer, promise, or gift was made in order to 15298
affect or attempt to affect the outcome of a casino game or an 15299
official action of a commission member, agent, or employee; 15300
(2) Solicits, accepts, or receives a promise of anything 15301
of value or benefit while the person is connected with a casino, 15302
including an officer or employee of a casino operator, 15303
management company, or gaming-related vendor, under an agreement 15304
to influence or with the intent to influence the actions of the 15305
person to affect or attempt to affect the outcome of a casino 15306
game or an official action of a commission member, agent, or 15307
employee; 15308
(H) A person who knowingly or intentionally does any of 15309
the following while participating in casino gaming or otherwise 15310
transacting with a casino facility as permitted by Chapter 3772. 15311
of the Revised Code commits a felony of the fifth degree on a 15312
first offense and a felony of the fourth degree for a subsequent 15313
offense: 15314
(1) Causes or attempts to cause a casino facility to fail 15315

S. B. No. 197 Page 526
As Introduced
to file a report required under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any 15316
regulation prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the 15317
Revised Code, or to fail to file a report or maintain a record 15318
required by an order issued under section 21 of the "Federal 15319
Deposit Insurance Act," 12 U.S.C. 1829b or section 123 of Pub. 15320
L. No. 91-508; 15321
(2) Causes or attempts to cause a casino facility to file 15322
a report required under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any 15323
regulation prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the 15324
Revised Code, to file a report or to maintain a record required 15325
by any order issued under 31 U.S.C. 5326, or to maintain a 15326
record required under any regulation prescribed under section 21 15327
of the "Federal Deposit Insurance Act," 12 U.S.C. 1829b or 15328
section 123 of Pub. L. No. 91-508 that contains a material 15329
omission or misstatement of fact; 15330
(3) With one or more casino facilities, structures a 15331
transaction, is complicit in structuring a transaction, attempts 15332
to structure a transaction, or is complicit in an attempt to 15333
structure a transaction. 15334
(I) A person who is convicted of a felony described in 15335
this chapter may be barred for life from entering a casino 15336
facility by the commission. 15337
(J) As used in division (H) of this section: 15338
(1) To be "complicit" means to engage in any conduct of a 15339
type described in divisions (A)(1) to (4) of section 2923.03 of 15340
the Revised Code. 15341
(2) "Structure a transaction" has the same meaning as in 15342
section 1315.51 of the Revised Code. 15343
(K) Premises used or occupied in violation of division (E) 15344

S. B. No. 197 Page 527
As Introduced
(12) of this section constitute a nuisance subject to abatement 15345
under Chapter 3767. of the Revised Code. 15346
Sec. 3774.01. As used in this chapter: 15347
(A) "Commission" means the Ohio casino control commission. 15348
(B) "Entry fee" means cash or cash equivalent that a 15349
fantasy contest operator requires to be paid by a fantasy 15350
contest player to participate in a fantasy contest. 15351
(C) "Fantasy contest" means a simulated game or contest 15352
with an entry fee that satisfies all of the following 15353
conditions: 15354
(1) The value of all prizes and awards offered to winning 15355
fantasy contest players is established and made known to the 15356
players in advance of the contest. 15357
(2) All winning outcomes reflect the relative knowledge 15358
and skill of the fantasy contest players and are determined 15359
predominantly by accumulated statistical results of the 15360
performance of managing rosters of athletes whose performance 15361
directly corresponds with the actual performance of athletes in 15362
professional sports competitions. 15363
(3) Winning outcomes are not based on randomized or 15364
historical events, or on the score, point spread, or any 15365
performance of any single actual team or combination of teams or 15366
solely on any single performance of an individual athlete or 15367
player in any single actual event. 15368
(4) The game or contest does not involve horses or horse 15369
racing. 15370
(D) "Fantasy contest operator" means a person that offers 15371
fantasy contests with an entry fee for a prize or award to the 15372

S. B. No. 197 Page 528
As Introduced
general public. Fantasy contest operator does not include a 15373
person that offers a pool not conducted for profit as defined 15374
under division (XX) (M) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code. 15375
(E) "Fantasy contest platform" means any digital or online 15376
method through which a fantasy contest operator provides access 15377
to a fantasy contest. 15378
(F) "Fantasy contest player" means a person who 15379
participates in a fantasy contest offered by a fantasy contest 15380
operator. 15381
(G) "Holding company" means any corporation, firm, 15382
partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, 15383
trust, or other form of business organization not a natural 15384
person that directly or indirectly does any of the following: 15385
(1) Has the power or right to control a fantasy contest 15386
operator; 15387
(2) Holds an ownership interest of ten per cent or more, 15388
as determined by the commission, in a fantasy contest operator; 15389
(3) Holds voting rights with the power to vote ten per 15390
cent or more of the outstanding voting rights of a fantasy 15391
contest operator. 15392
(H) "Key employee" means a person, employed by a fantasy 15393
contest operator, who is responsible for ensuring, and has the 15394
authority necessary to ensure, that all requirements under this 15395
chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter and division 15396
(L) (A)(6) of section 3772.03 of the Revised Code are met. 15397
(I) "Management company" means an organization retained by 15398
a fantasy contest operator to manage a fantasy contest platform 15399
and provide services such as accounting, general administration, 15400

S. B. No. 197 Page 529
As Introduced
maintenance, recruitment, and other operational services. 15401
(J) "Material nonpublic information" means information 15402
related to the play of a fantasy contest by a fantasy contest 15403
player that is not readily available to the general public and 15404
is obtained as a result of a person's employment. 15405
(K) "Script" means a list of commands that a fantasy- 15406
contest-related computer program can execute and that is created 15407
by a fantasy contest player, or by a third party for a fantasy 15408
contest player, to automate processes on a fantasy contest 15409
platform. 15410
Sec. 3774.02. (A) A fantasy contest operator may not offer 15411
a fantasy contest in this state without first obtaining a 15412
license from the commission. 15413
(B)(1) In order to obtain or renew a license to operate 15414
fantasy contests in this state, a fantasy contest operator shall 15415
pay to the commission a nonrefundable license fee. 15416
(2) Unless a license issued under this chapter is 15417
suspended, expires, or is revoked, a license may be renewed. 15418
After a determination by the commission that the licensee is in 15419
compliance with this chapter and rules adopted by the commission 15420
under this chapter or division (L) (A)(6) of section 3772.03 of 15421
the Revised Code, the license shall be renewed for not more than 15422
three years, as determined by commission rule adopted under this 15423
chapter or division (L) (A)(6) of section 3772.03 of the Revised 15424
Code. 15425
(C) Notwithstanding division (B) of this section, the 15426
commission may investigate a licensee at any time the commission 15427
determines it is necessary to ensure that the licensee remains 15428
in compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted under this 15429

S. B. No. 197 Page 530
As Introduced
chapter or division (L) of section 3772.03 of the Revised Code. 15430
Any fantasy contest operator that applies for or holds a license 15431
under this chapter shall establish the operator's suitability 15432
for a license by clear and convincing evidence. 15433
Sec. 3774.03. The commission shall adopt rules under 15434
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as are necessary to complete 15435
the functions and address the subjects enumerated in division 15436
(A) of this section. 15437
(A) The commission may adopt, and as advisable and 15438
necessary may amend or repeal, rules that include all of the 15439
following: 15440
(1) Prohibiting fantasy contest operator's employees, 15441
relatives living in the same household as those employees, and 15442
athletes and referees in the underlying professional sports 15443
competitions from competing in any public fantasy contest 15444
offered by a fantasy contest operator or from sharing any 15445
material nonpublic information with third parties; 15446
(2) Ensuring fantasy contest operators prohibit access to 15447
both of the following: 15448
(a) Individuals under eighteen years of age; 15449
(b) Individuals who, upon request, seek to restrict 15450
themselves from entering fantasy contests. 15451
(3) Ensuring fantasy contest operators segregate fantasy 15452
contest player funds from operational funds or maintain a 15453
reserve that exceeds the amount of player funds on deposit, 15454
which reserve may not be used for operational activities. These 15455
reserve funds may take the form of cash, cash equivalents, 15456
payment processor reserves, payment processor receivables, an 15457
irrevocable letter of credit, a bond, any other method approved 15458

S. B. No. 197 Page 531
As Introduced
by the commission, or a combination thereof, in an amount that 15459
must exceed the total balances of the fantasy contest player's 15460
accounts. All reserve funds, except payment processor reserves, 15461
shall be maintained by or otherwise under the control of a 15462
licensed fantasy contest operator, unless otherwise authorized 15463
by the commission. 15464
(4) Prescribing requirements related to beginning players 15465
and highly experienced players; 15466
(5) Prescribing requirements for internal procedures, 15467
including at a minimum, procedures for all of the following: 15468
(a) Complying with all applicable state and federal 15469
requirements to protect the privacy and online security of 15470
fantasy contest players and their accounts; 15471
(b) Suspending the accounts of players who violate this 15472
chapter and the rules adopted by the commission under this 15473
chapter or division (L) (A)(6) of section 3772.03 of the Revised 15474
Code; 15475
(c) Providing fantasy contest players with access to 15476
information on playing responsibly and seeking assistance for 15477
compulsive behavior; 15478
(d) Establishing the maximum number of entries that a 15479
fantasy contest player may submit to each fantasy contest; 15480
(e) Any other procedure that the commission determines 15481
necessary in the rules adopted under this chapter or division 15482
(L) (A)(6) of section 3772.03 of the Revised Code. 15483
(6) Requiring a license application to require an 15484
applicant for a fantasy contest operator license to designate at 15485
least one key employee as a condition to obtain a license; 15486

S. B. No. 197 Page 532
As Introduced
(7) Establishing the length of time, which shall be not 15487
more than three years, that a fantasy contest operator license 15488
and renewal license shall be valid; 15489
(8) Establishing the fee for obtaining or renewing a 15490
license, which shall not exceed ten thousand dollars for each 15491
year of a license and a total of thirty thousand dollars for a 15492
three-year license, and which may be paid in equal installments 15493
on an annual basis over the term of the license; and 15494
(9) Any other procedure or thing that the commission 15495
determines necessary to ensure the integrity of fantasy 15496
contests. 15497
(B) The commission may not adopt rules to do either of the 15498
following: 15499
(1) Limit or regulate the statistical makeup of a game or 15500
contest, or the digital platform of a fantasy contest operator; 15501
or 15502
(2) Require licensure of any persons other than fantasy 15503
contest operators, holding companies, or management companies. 15504
(C) Nothing in this section prohibits the commission from 15505
adopting rules establishing consumer protections. 15506
Sec. 3774.04. (A) Each fantasy contest operator shall 15507
retain and maintain in a place secure from theft, loss, or 15508
destruction all of the records required to be maintained by this 15509
chapter for at least five years from the date of the record's 15510
creation. 15511
(B) Each fantasy contest operator shall retain and 15512
maintain accurate, complete, legible, and permanent records, 15513
whether in electronic or other format, of any books, records, or 15514

S. B. No. 197 Page 533
As Introduced
documents relating to the fantasy contest operator's business 15515
and accounting operations, which includes all of the following: 15516
(1) The fantasy contest operator's business and 15517
organizational structure; 15518
(2) Correspondence with or by, or reports to or from, the 15519
commission, or any local, state, or federal governmental agency, 15520
foreign or domestic; 15521
(3) The fantasy contest operator's financial statements, 15522
accounting records, ledgers, and internal and external audit 15523
records; 15524
(4) All records related to the conduct of fantasy contests 15525
by the fantasy contest operator in this state; 15526
(5) Any materials used to advertise, publicize, or 15527
otherwise promote the fantasy contest operator's fantasy 15528
contests in this state; 15529
(6) Any other books, records, or documents the commission 15530
requires the fantasy contest operator to retain and maintain, in 15531
rules adopted by the commission under this chapter or division 15532
(L) (A)(6) of section 3772.03 of the Revised Code. 15533
(C) Each fantasy contest operator shall organize all 15534
required records in a manner that enables the commission to 15535
locate, inspect, review, and analyze the records with reasonable 15536
ease and efficiency and, upon request, provide the commission or 15537
its executive director, or duly authorized designee thereof, 15538
with the records required to be retained and maintained by this 15539
section. 15540
Sec. 3774.09. Fantasy contests offered in accordance with 15541
this chapter and the rules adopted by the commission under this 15542

S. B. No. 197 Page 534
As Introduced
chapter or division (L) (A)(6) of section 3772.03 of the Revised 15543
Code are exempt from Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code. 15544
Sec. 3775.01. As used in this chapter: 15545
(A) "Applicant" means a person that applies to the Ohio 15546
casino control commission for a license under this chapter. 15547
(B) "Casino operator" has and "Ohio voluntary exclusion 15548
program" have the same meaning meanings as in section 3772.01 of 15549
the Revised Code. 15550
(C) "Collegiate sport or athletic event" means a sport or 15551
athletic event offered or sponsored by, or played in connection 15552
with, a public or private institution that offers educational 15553
services beyond the secondary level. 15554
(D) "Commission" means the Ohio casino control commission. 15555
(E) "Esports event" means an organized video game 15556
competition that is regulated by a sports governing body and 15557
that is held between professional players who play individually 15558
or as teams. 15559
(F) "Lottery sports gaming" has the same meaning as in 15560
section 3770.23 3770.01 of the Revised Code. 15561
(G)(1) "Mobile management services provider" means a 15562
person that contracts with a type A sports gaming proprietor 15563
under section 3775.05 of the Revised Code to operate sports 15564
gaming on behalf of the sports gaming proprietor and that is 15565
licensed by the Ohio casino control commission as a mobile 15566
management services provider under that section. 15567
(2) "Management services provider" means a person that 15568
contracts with a type B sports gaming proprietor under section 15569
3775.051 of the Revised Code to operate sports gaming on behalf 15570

S. B. No. 197 Page 535
As Introduced
of the sports gaming proprietor and that is licensed by the Ohio 15571
casino control commission as a management services provider 15572
under that section. 15573
(H) "Official league data" means statistics, results, 15574
outcomes, and other data related to a sporting event provided by 15575
the appropriate sports governing body or its designee. 15576
(I) "Online sports pool" means sports gaming in which a 15577
wager on a sporting event is made through a computer or mobile 15578
device and accepted through an online gaming web site that is 15579
operated by a type A sports gaming proprietor or mobile 15580
management services provider. 15581
(J) "Professional sport or athletic event" means an event 15582
at which two or more persons participate in sports or athletic 15583
events and receive compensation, or the potential for 15584
compensation based on their performance, in excess of actual 15585
expenses for their participation in the event. 15586
(K) "Professional sports organization" means any of the 15587
following: 15588
(1) The owner of a professional sports team in this state 15589
that is a member of the national football league, the national 15590
hockey league, major league baseball, major league soccer, or 15591
the national basketball association; 15592
(2) The owner of a sports facility in this state that 15593
hosts an annual tournament on the professional golf association 15594
tour or a wholly owned for-profit subsidiary of the owner, if 15595
the owner is a nonprofit corporation or organization; 15596
(3) A promoter of a national association for stock car 15597
auto racing national touring race conducted in this state. 15598

S. B. No. 197 Page 536
As Introduced
(L) "Promotional gaming credit" means a credit, discount, 15599
or other similar item issued to a patron to enable the placement 15600
of, or increase in, a wager on a sporting event. 15601
(M) "Proposition bet" means a wager on a sporting event 15602
that is based on whether an identified instance or statistical 15603
achievement will occur, will be achieved, or will be surpassed, 15604
other than the score or outcome of the sporting event or parts 15605
of the sporting event, such as quarters, halves, periods, or 15606
innings. 15607
(N)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (N)(2) 15608
and (3) of this section, "sporting event" means any professional 15609
sport or athletic event, any collegiate sport or athletic event, 15610
any Olympic or international sports competition event, any motor 15611
race event, any esports event, or any other special event the 15612
Ohio casino control commission authorizes for sports gaming, the 15613
individual performance statistics of athletes or participants in 15614
such an event, or a combination of those. 15615
(2) "Sporting event" does not include an event for primary 15616
or secondary school students, whether conducted or sponsored by 15617
a primary or secondary school or by another person, or the 15618
individual performance statistics of athletes or participants in 15619
such an event. 15620
(3) "Sporting event" includes an event that involves 15621
athletes or participants who are under eighteen years of age, or 15622
the individual performance statistics of athletes or 15623
participants in the event, only if the Ohio casino control 15624
commission authorizes the event for sports gaming. 15625
(O)(1) "Sports gaming" means the business of accepting 15626
wagers on sporting events. 15627

S. B. No. 197 Page 537
As Introduced
(2) Except as otherwise provided in division (O)(3) of 15628
this section and in section 3770.25 of the Revised Code, "sports 15629
gaming" includes any system or method of wagering on sporting 15630
events that the Ohio casino control commission approves, 15631
including exchange wagering, parlays, spreads, over-under, 15632
moneyline, in-game wagering, single game bets, teaser bets, in- 15633
play bets, proposition bets, pools, pari-mutuel sports wagering 15634
pools, or straight bets. 15635
(3) "Sports gaming" does not include any of the following: 15636
(a) Wagering on horse racing; 15637
(b) Lottery games authorized under Chapter 3770. of the 15638
Revised Code, including video lottery terminals, other than 15639
lottery sports gaming authorized under sections 3770.23 to 15640
3770.24 and 3770.25 of the Revised Code; 15641
(c) Casino gaming authorized under division (C) of Section 15642
6 of Article XV, Ohio Constitution and Chapter 3772. of the 15643
Revised Code; 15644
(d) Fantasy contests authorized under Chapter 3774. of the 15645
Revised Code. 15646
(P) "Sports gaming equipment" means any of the following 15647
that directly relate to or affect, or are used or consumed in, 15648
the operation of sports gaming: 15649
(1) Any mechanical, electronic, or other device, 15650
mechanism, or equipment, including a self-service sports gaming 15651
terminal; 15652
(2) Any software, application, components, or other goods; 15653
(3) Anything to be installed or used on a patron's 15654
personal device. 15655

S. B. No. 197 Page 538
As Introduced
(Q) "Sports gaming facility" means a designated area of a 15656
building or structure in which patrons may place wagers on 15657
sporting events with a type B sports gaming proprietor either in 15658
person or using self-service sports gaming terminals. 15659
(R) "Sports gaming license" means a sports gaming 15660
proprietor license, a mobile management services provider 15661
license, a management services provider license, a sports gaming 15662
occupational license, a type C sports gaming host license, or a 15663
sports gaming supplier license issued by the Ohio casino control 15664
commission under this chapter and a key gaming employee or 15665
gaming employee license issued by the commission under Chapter 15666
3772. of the Revised Code to an individual whose duties relate 15667
to the operation or facilitation of sports gaming under this 15668
chapter. 15669
(S) "Sports gaming licensee" means a person who holds a 15670
valid sports gaming license. 15671
(T) "Sports gaming proprietor" means a person licensed by 15672
the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming in 15673
this state as a type A, type B, or type C sports gaming 15674
proprietor. 15675
(U) "Sports gaming receipts" has the same meaning as in 15676
section 5753.01 of the Revised Code. 15677
(V)(1) "Sports gaming supplier" means a person or entity 15678
that provides sports gaming equipment or related services to a 15679
sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, 15680
or management services provider, including providing services, 15681
directly or indirectly, that are necessary to create a betting 15682
market or to determine bet outcomes. 15683
(2) A sports gaming supplier that provides sports gaming 15684

S. B. No. 197 Page 539
As Introduced
equipment or services to be used through a sports gaming 15685
proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management 15686
services provider is not considered a sports gaming proprietor, 15687
mobile management services provider, or management services 15688
provider solely on that basis. 15689
(3) A sports governing body that provides official league 15690
data concerning its own sporting event to a sports gaming 15691
proprietor, mobile management services provider, management 15692
services provider, or sports gaming supplier is not considered a 15693
sports gaming supplier solely on that basis. 15694
(W) "Sports gaming voluntary exclusion program" means the 15695
program described in division (B)(11) of section 3775.02 of the 15696
Revised Code. 15697
(X) "Sports governing body" means a regional, national, or 15698
international organization having ultimate authority over the 15699
rules and codes of conduct with respect to a sporting event and 15700
the participants in the sporting event. 15701
(Y) "Type A sports gaming proprietor" means a sports 15702
gaming proprietor licensed by the Ohio casino control commission 15703
to offer sports gaming through an online sports pool. 15704
(Z) "Type B sports gaming proprietor" means a sports 15705
gaming proprietor licensed by the Ohio casino control commission 15706
to offer sports gaming at a sports gaming facility. 15707
(AA) "Type C sports gaming proprietor" means a sports 15708
gaming proprietor licensed by the Ohio casino control commission 15709
to offer sports gaming through self-service or clerk-operated 15710
sports gaming terminals located at type C sports gaming hosts' 15711
facilities. 15712
(BB) "Type C sports gaming host" means the owner of a 15713

S. B. No. 197 Page 540
As Introduced
facility with an A-1-A, A-1c, D-1, D-2, or D-5 liquor permit 15714
issued under Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code who is licensed 15715
by the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming at 15716
the facility through a type C sports gaming proprietor. 15717
(CC) "Video lottery sales agent" means an agent of the 15718
state lottery authorized to operate video lottery terminals 15719
under has the same meaning as in section 3770.21 3770.01 of the 15720
Revised Code. 15721
(DD) "Wager" or "bet" means to risk a sum of money or 15722
thing of value on an uncertain occurrence. 15723
Sec. 3775.02. (A) The Ohio casino control commission shall 15724
have jurisdiction over all persons conducting or participating 15725
in the conduct of sports gaming authorized by this chapter or by 15726
sections 3770.23 to 3770.24 and 3770.25 of the Revised Code, 15727
including the authority to license, regulate, investigate, and 15728
penalize those persons in a manner that is consistent with the 15729
commission's authority with respect to casino gaming. In all 15730
cases in which this chapter requires or allows the commission to 15731
adopt rules concerning sports gaming, the commission shall adopt 15732
those rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. 15733
(B) The commission shall adopt rules that include all of 15734
the following: 15735
(1) Procedures for a sports gaming proprietor to accept 15736
wagers on a sporting event or series of sporting events; 15737
(2) The types of wagering tickets sports gaming 15738
proprietors are to use; 15739
(3) The manner in which sports gaming proprietors are to 15740
issue tickets; 15741

S. B. No. 197 Page 541
As Introduced
(4) The type of records sports gaming licensees are to 15742
keep; 15743
(5) The system to be used to place a wager with a sports 15744
gaming proprietor; 15745
(6) The manner in which sports gaming proprietors must 15746
verify that their patrons are at least twenty-one years of age; 15747
(7) Protections for a player placing a wager with a sports 15748
gaming proprietor; 15749
(8) Measures to promote responsible sports gaming; 15750
(9) Penalties and fines for violating this section or 15751
rules adopted under this section; 15752
(10) Restrictions to ensure that sports gaming 15753
proprietors' advertisements for sports gaming meet all of the 15754
following requirements: 15755
(a) They clearly convey the conditions under which sports 15756
gaming is being offered, including information about the cost to 15757
participate and the nature of any promotions and information to 15758
assist patrons in understanding the odds of winning; 15759
(b) They disclose the identity of the sports gaming 15760
proprietor and, if applicable, the mobile management services 15761
provider or management services provider; 15762
(c) They do not target individuals under twenty-one years 15763
of age, other individuals who are ineligible to participate in 15764
sports gaming, problem gamblers, or other vulnerable 15765
individuals; 15766
(d) They include messages designed to prevent problem 15767
gambling and provide information about how to access resources 15768

S. B. No. 197 Page 542
As Introduced
related to problem gambling; 15769
(e) They are not false, misleading, or deceptive to a 15770
reasonable consumer of section 3772.41 of the Revised Code. 15771
(11) A requirement that each sports gaming proprietor 15772
comply with the requirements of the Ohio voluntary exclusion 15773
program, which shall allow a person to voluntarily exclude the 15774
person's self from participating in sports gaming conducted 15775
under this chapter by placing the person's name on a voluntary 15776
exclusion list and following procedures set forth by the 15777
commission. 15778
(a) All of the following apply to the sports gaming 15779
voluntary exclusion program: 15780
(i) Except as provided by the commission by rule, a person 15781
who participates in the program shall agree to refrain from 15782
participating in sports gaming conducted under this chapter. 15783
(ii) The name of a person participating in the program 15784
shall be included on a list of persons excluded from 15785
participating in sports gaming conducted under this chapter. 15786
(iii) Except as provided by the commission by rule, no 15787
person who participates in the program shall petition the 15788
commission for admittance into a sports gaming facility or for 15789
permission to participate in sports gaming conducted under this 15790
chapter. 15791
(iv) The list of persons participating in the program and 15792
the personal information of those persons shall be confidential 15793
and shall only be disseminated by the commission to the state 15794
lottery commission, to a sports gaming proprietor and its agents 15795
and employees for purposes of enforcement, and to other 15796
entities, upon request of the participant and agreement by the 15797

S. B. No. 197 Page 543
As Introduced
commission. 15798
(v) A sports gaming proprietor shall make all reasonable 15799
attempts as determined by the commission to cease all direct 15800
marketing efforts to a person participating in the program. 15801
(vi) A sports gaming proprietor shall not cash the check 15802
of a person participating in the program or extend credit to the 15803
person in any manner. However, the program shall not exclude a 15804
sports gaming proprietor from seeking the payment of a debt 15805
accrued by a person before participating in the program. 15806
(vii) Any and all locations at which a person may register 15807
as a participant in the program shall be published. 15808
(b) The commission shall determine, by rule, whether a 15809
participant in the sports gaming voluntary exclusion program 15810
also automatically becomes a participant in the voluntary 15811
exclusion program established under Chapter 3772. of the Revised 15812
Code. The state lottery commission shall determine, by rule, 15813
whether a participant in the sports gaming voluntary exclusion 15814
program also automatically becomes a participant in any 15815
voluntary exclusion program established under Chapter 3770. of 15816
the Revised Code. 15817
(12) A procedure by which a sports governing body may 15818
request anonymized sports gaming data from a sports gaming 15819
proprietor if the sports governing body believes that the 15820
integrity of one of its sporting events is in question. 15821
(13) A procedure by which a state university may request 15822
anonymized sports gaming data from a sports gaming proprietor 15823
for the purpose of conducting research to assist the commission 15824
in ensuring the integrity of sports gaming or to improve state- 15825
funded services related to responsible gambling and problem 15826

S. B. No. 197 Page 544
As Introduced
gambling. The data are not a public record, and the state 15827
university shall not disclose the data to any person, except for 15828
the purpose of conducting the research described in this 15829
division, as part of a peer-reviewed research report, or 15830
pursuant to an agreement between the state university and the 15831
sports gaming proprietor. As used in this division, "state 15832
university" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the 15833
Revised Code. 15834
(14) Any other procedure or thing the commission 15835
determines necessary to ensure the integrity of sports gaming 15836
regulated by the commission. 15837
(C)(1) The commission may, independently or at the request 15838
of any person, including a sports governing body, adopt rules to 15839
prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting 15840
wagers on a particular sporting event or to prohibit or restrict 15841
sports gaming proprietors from accepting a particular type of 15842
wager. 15843
(2) The commission shall adopt rules prescribing a process 15844
by which the commission may prohibit or restrict sports gaming 15845
proprietors from accepting wagers on a particular sporting event 15846
or prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting 15847
a particular type of wager on a temporary emergency basis 15848
instead of by rule. 15849
(3)(a) A sports governing body may formally request the 15850
commission to prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors 15851
from accepting wagers on a particular sporting event or to 15852
prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting a 15853
particular type of wager. The sports governing body shall submit 15854
the formal request in the form and manner prescribed by the 15855
commission. Upon receiving the request, the commission promptly 15856

S. B. No. 197 Page 545
As Introduced
shall send written notice of the request to every sports gaming 15857
proprietor and shall consider any timely response submitted by a 15858
sports gaming proprietor. 15859
(b) If the commission determines that the sports governing 15860
body has shown good cause through its formal request to grant 15861
the requested prohibition or restriction, the commission 15862
promptly shall adopt the prohibition or restriction. 15863
(c) If the commission determines that the sports governing 15864
body has not shown good cause through its formal request to 15865
grant the requested prohibition or restriction, the commission 15866
promptly shall provide the sports governing body with notice and 15867
an opportunity for a hearing to offer further evidence in 15868
support of granting the requested prohibition or restriction. 15869
(D) The commission shall adopt rules establishing minimum 15870
internal control standards for the administration of sports 15871
gaming proprietors' operations, sports gaming equipment, 15872
systems, or other items used by sports gaming proprietors to 15873
conduct sports gaming, and the maintenance of sports gaming 15874
proprietors' financial records and other required records. The 15875
commission may approve minimum internal control standards 15876
proposed by sports gaming proprietors. 15877
(E)(1) (E) The commission shall approve all sports gaming 15878
equipment and each form, variation, or composite of sports 15879
gaming to be used by sports gaming proprietors in accordance 15880
with section 3772.312 of the Revised Code and shall license all 15881
sports gaming suppliers. 15882
(2)(a) Before approving a piece of sports gaming equipment 15883
or a form, variation, or composite of sports gaming, the 15884
commission shall require it to undergo scientific testing or 15885

S. B. No. 197 Page 546
As Introduced
technical evaluation, as the commission determines appropriate. 15886
The commission may require the testing or evaluation to be 15887
conducted at the expense of the sports gaming supplier or sports 15888
gaming proprietor, as applicable, by an independent testing 15889
laboratory certified by the commission. 15890
(b) The commission may certify an independent testing 15891
laboratory to test and evaluate sports gaming equipment and 15892
forms, variations, or composites of sports gaming if both of the 15893
following apply: 15894
(i) The laboratory is competent and qualified to 15895
scientifically test and technically evaluate sports gaming 15896
equipment and forms, variations, or composites of sports gaming 15897
for compliance with this chapter and with the rules of the 15898
commission and otherwise to perform the functions assigned to 15899
the laboratory by the commission; 15900
(ii) The laboratory is not owned or controlled by, is not 15901
affiliated with, and does not have any interest in a sports 15902
gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, 15903
management services provider, sports gaming supplier, or sports 15904
governing body. 15905
(c) The commission shall adopt rules prescribing the 15906
certification standards, fees, and duties that apply to a 15907
certified independent testing laboratory under division (E) of 15908
this section. 15909
(3) The commission shall adopt rules requiring sports 15910
gaming licensees and sports gaming facilities to use only 15911
approved sports gaming equipment acquired from a licensed sports 15912
gaming supplier and to use only approved forms, variations, or 15913
composites of sports gaming. 15914

S. B. No. 197 Page 547
As Introduced
(F)(1) The commission shall determine a person's 15915
eligibility to hold or renew a sports gaming license under this 15916
chapter, shall issue all sports gaming licenses, and shall 15917
maintain a record of all sports gaming licenses issued under 15918
this chapter. 15919
(2) The commission shall conduct a complete investigation 15920
of each applicant for a sports gaming license to determine 15921
whether the applicant meets the requirements of this chapter and 15922
of the commission's rules each time the applicant applies for an 15923
initial or renewed sports gaming license. The commission may 15924
initiate an additional licensing investigation or adjudication 15925
or reopen an existing licensing investigation or adjudication at 15926
any time. 15927
(G)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (G)(2) 15928
and (3) of this section, the commission shall levy and collect 15929
all fees and surcharges imposed under this chapter and rules 15930
adopted under this chapter and shall deposit all moneys 15931
collected in the casino control commission fund created under 15932
section 5753.03 of the Revised Code. 15933
(2) Of the license fees described in division (E) of 15934
section 3775.04, division (B)(3) of section 3775.05, and 15935
division (B)(3) of section 3775.051 of the Revised Code, the 15936
commission shall deposit one half one-half of one per cent in 15937
the sports gaming profits veterans fund created under section 15938
5902.22 of the Revised Code and shall deposit the remainder in 15939
the sports gaming revenue fund created under section 5753.031 of 15940
the Revised Code. 15941
(3) The commission shall levy and collect fines for 15942
noncriminal violations of the provisions of this chapter and of 15943
rules adopted under this chapter and shall deposit all such 15944

S. B. No. 197 Page 548
As Introduced
fines in the sports gaming revenue fund created under section 15945
5753.031 of the Revised Code. 15946
(H)(1) The commission, in an adjudication conducted under 15947
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and in accordance with section 15948
3772.04 of the Revised Code, may do any of the following: 15949
(a) Penalize or fine any sports gaming licensee, applicant 15950
for a sports gaming license, or other person who is subject to 15951
the commission's jurisdiction under this chapter; 15952
(b) Limit, condition, restrict, suspend, revoke, deny, or 15953
refuse to renew any sports gaming license. 15954
(2) The executive director of the commission may issue an 15955
emergency order with respect to sports gaming under division (G) 15956
of section 3772.04 of the Revised Code. 15957
(I)(1) The commission shall monitor all sports gaming 15958
conducted in this state by sports gaming proprietors, or shall 15959
contract with an independent integrity monitoring provider for 15960
that purpose, in order to identify any unusual betting 15961
activities or patterns that may indicate a need for further 15962
investigation. The commission shall require each sports gaming 15963
proprietor to participate in the monitoring system as part of 15964
the minimum internal control standards described in division (D) 15965
of this section. 15966
(2) The information in the monitoring system described in 15967
division (I)(1) of this section is not a public record. The 15968
commission may disclose the information in the monitoring system 15969
only as necessary for investigative or law enforcement purposes 15970
or pursuant to a court order. 15971
(J)(1) The executive director of the commission promptly 15972
shall report to the commission any facts or circumstances 15973

S. B. No. 197 Page 549
As Introduced
related to the operation of a sports gaming licensee that 15974
constitute a violation of state or federal law and immediately 15975
report any suspicious wagering to the appropriate state or 15976
federal authorities. 15977
(2) The commission shall cooperate with any investigation 15978
conducted by a law enforcement agency or sports governing body, 15979
including by providing, or facilitating the provision of, 15980
wagering information and audio or video files related to persons 15981
placing wagers, provided that the commission shall not be 15982
required to provide any information to a sports governing body 15983
that would jeopardize an ongoing criminal investigation. 15984
(3) A sheriff, chief of police, or prosecuting attorney 15985
shall furnish to the commission, on forms prescribed by the 15986
commission, any information obtained concerning any apparent 15987
violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. 15988
If the information is considered a confidential law enforcement 15989
investigatory record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code, 15990
the commission shall not disclose the information to the public. 15991
(K)(1) The attorney general has a civil cause of action to 15992
restrain any violation of this chapter or of rules adopted under 15993
this chapter. Upon the request of the commission or its 15994
executive director, the attorney general shall commence and 15995
prosecute such an action to completion. The court shall give 15996
priority to such an action over all other civil actions. 15997
(2) An action brought under division (K)(1) of this 15998
section does not preclude an administrative or criminal 15999
proceeding on the same facts. 16000
(3) The attorney general may enter into an agreement with 16001
a state or local law enforcement agency to carry out the duties 16002

S. B. No. 197 Page 550
As Introduced
described in division (K)(1) of this section. 16003
Sec. 3775.03. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in 16004
division (A)(2) of this section, no person shall operate, 16005
conduct, or assist in operating or conducting sports gaming in 16006
this state without first obtaining an appropriate sports gaming 16007
license from the Ohio casino control commission. A sports gaming 16008
license is not transferable. 16009
(2) The state lottery commission is not required to 16010
receive a sports gaming license in order to operate lottery 16011
sports gaming under sections 3770.23 to 3770.24 and 3770.25 of 16012
the Revised Code. 16013
(B) Each person applying for an initial or renewed sports 16014
gaming license issued under this chapter, other than a type C 16015
sports gaming host license, and each individual who has control 16016
of the applicant as described in division (C) of this section, 16017
shall submit two complete sets of fingerprints to the commission 16018
for the purpose of conducting a criminal records check, 16019
including obtaining any available information from the federal 16020
bureau of investigation. The person shall provide the 16021
fingerprints using a method the superintendent of the bureau of 16022
criminal identification and investigation prescribes pursuant to 16023
division (C)(2) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and fill 16024
out the form the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 16025
identification and investigation prescribes pursuant to division 16026
(C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code. Upon receiving an 16027
application under this section, the executive director of the 16028
Ohio casino control commission shall request the superintendent 16029
of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, or a 16030
vendor approved by the bureau, to conduct a criminal records 16031
check based on the fingerprint impressions in accordance with 16032

S. B. No. 197 Page 551
As Introduced
division (A)(19) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code. Any fee 16033
required under division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised 16034
Code shall be paid by the applicant, or in the case of an 16035
occupational license, by the applicant's employer. Any applicant 16036
convicted of any disqualifying offense, as defined in section 16037
3772.07 of the Revised Code, shall not be issued a license. 16038
(C) The Ohio casino control commission shall not grant a 16039
sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, 16040
management services provider, or sports gaming supplier license 16041
until it has determined that each person who has control of the 16042
applicant has met the qualifications for sports gaming licensure 16043
established in this chapter and in rules adopted by the 16044
commission. All of the following persons are considered to have 16045
control of an applicant: 16046
(1) Each person associated with a corporate applicant, 16047
including any corporate holding company, parent company, or 16048
subsidiary company of the applicant, that has the ability to 16049
control the activities of the corporate applicant or elect a 16050
majority of the board of directors of that corporation, other 16051
than any bank or other licensed lending institution that holds a 16052
mortgage or other lien acquired in the ordinary course of 16053
business; 16054
(2) Each person associated with a noncorporate applicant 16055
that directly or indirectly holds a beneficial or proprietary 16056
interest in the applicant's business operation or that the 16057
commission otherwise determines has the ability to control the 16058
applicant; 16059
(3) Key personnel of an applicant, including any 16060
executive, employee, or agency, having the power to exercise 16061
significant influence over decisions concerning any part of the 16062

S. B. No. 197 Page 552
As Introduced
applicant's business operation. 16063
(D) A sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services 16064
provider, or management services provider shall display its 16065
license conspicuously in its place of business or have the 16066
license available for inspection by any agent of the Ohio casino 16067
control commission or any law enforcement agency. Each holder of 16068
an occupational license issued under section 3775.06 of the 16069
Revised Code shall have an indicator of licensure prominently 16070
displayed when present in a sports gaming facility at all times, 16071
in accordance with the rules of the commission. Each type C 16072
sports gaming host shall display its license conspicuously in 16073
its place of business. 16074
(E) A (E)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (E) 16075
(2) of this section, a sports gaming licensee proprietor, mobile 16076
management services provider, management services provider, or 16077
sports gaming supplier or an applicant for one of those licenses 16078
shall give the Ohio casino control commission written notice 16079
within ten days of any material change to any information 16080
provided in the licensee's application for a license or renewal, 16081
as required under section 3772.113 of the Revised Code. The 16082
commission shall specify by rule which changes to that 16083
information it considers to be material. 16084
(2) A sports gaming proprietor that is a professional 16085
sports organization or an applicant for such a license shall 16086
give the commission written notice within ten days of any of the 16087
following: 16088
(a) Any change of name; 16089
(b) Any change of address; 16090
(c) Any change of primary telephone number or electronic 16091

S. B. No. 197 Page 553
As Introduced
mail address; 16092
(d) Any change to the state of incorporation or principal 16093
place of business; 16094
(e) Any investigation commenced by or action filed by a 16095
gaming regulatory agency or government gaming authority, except 16096
for routine renewal application reviews; 16097
(f) Any changes to the professional sports organization's 16098
status, including changes regarding its membership in a league, 16099
association, or organization with a policy preventing it from 16100
being subject to the regulatory control of the commission or 16101
from otherwise operating under a license, as well as any changes 16102
to that policy itself; 16103
(g) Any other changes designated on an applicable update 16104
form prescribed by the commission; 16105
(h) Any other information required by the commission by 16106
rule. 16107
(3) A type C sports gaming host or an applicant for such a 16108
license shall give the commission written notice within ten days 16109
of any of the following: 16110
(a) Any change of name; 16111
(b) Any change of address; 16112
(c) Any change of primary telephone number or electronic 16113
mail address; 16114
(d) Any change to any A-1A, A-1C, D-1, D-2, or D-5 liquor 16115
permit held and issued under Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code; 16116
(e) Any change to any lottery sales agent license held and 16117
issued Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code; 16118

S. B. No. 197 Page 554
As Introduced
(f) Any change to the person's recommendation for the 16119
license from the state lottery commission; 16120
(g) Any other changes designated on an applicable update 16121
form prescribed by the commission; 16122
(h) Any other information required by the commission by 16123
rule. 16124
Sec. 3775.06. (A)(1) An individual described in division 16125
(A) of section 3772.13 of the Revised Code shall hold a valid 16126
key gaming employee license issued by the Ohio casino control 16127
commission under that section at all times. An individual whose 16128
duties include any of the following with respect to sports 16129
gaming are as described in division (A) of section 3772.131 of 16130
the Revised Code shall hold an appropriate and a valid sports 16131
gaming occupational employee license issued by the Ohio casino 16132
control commission under that section at all times:. 16133
(a) Accepting wagers on sporting events on behalf of a 16134
sports gaming proprietor; 16135
(b) Handling money as part of operating sports gaming on 16136
behalf of a sports gaming proprietor, including a cashier, 16137
change person, count team, or coin wrapper; 16138
(c) Providing security for the operation of sports gaming 16139
by a sports gaming proprietor, including a guard or observer, 16140
other than providing general security at a type C sports gaming 16141
host's facility; 16142
(d) Performing other duties such that the individual has 16143
the ability to alter material aspects of sports gaming conducted 16144
by a sports gaming proprietor. 16145
(2) An individual is not required to have a sports gaming 16146

S. B. No. 197 Page 555
As Introduced
occupational license if the individual's duties are related 16147
solely to nongaming activities such as entertainment, 16148
maintenance, or preparing or serving food or beverages, 16149
including an individual who is, or is employed by, a type C 16150
sports gaming host. 16151
(3) The commission shall issue a sports gaming 16152
occupational license to an individual who meets the requirements 16153
of this chapter and of the commission's rules, provided that the 16154
commission's rules shall not require an applicant for a sports 16155
gaming occupational license who currently holds a video lottery 16156
license issued under Chapter 3770. or a license issued under 16157
Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code to take action to satisfy any 16158
additional requirement for the sports gaming occupational 16159
license that is substantially similar to any requirement the 16160
applicant previously has satisfied in order to obtain or renew 16161
the applicant's video lottery license or license issued under 16162
Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code. 16163
(B) A sports gaming occupational license permits the 16164
licensee to be employed in the capacity the commission 16165
designates during the duration of the license. The commission 16166
may establish by rule job classifications with different 16167
requirements. 16168
(C)(1) An applicant for an initial or renewed sports 16169
gaming occupational license shall apply for the license on a 16170
form prescribed by the commission and shall pay the fee required 16171
under division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, 16172
along with a nonrefundable application fee of one hundred 16173
dollars. The commission may annually increase the amount of the 16174
application fee in an amount that does not exceed the percentage 16175
increase in the consumer price index for the previous year, as 16176

S. B. No. 197 Page 556
As Introduced
necessary to cover the cost of processing the application. As 16177
used in this division, "consumer price index" means the consumer 16178
price index for all urban consumers or its successive 16179
equivalent, as determined by the United States department of 16180
labor, bureau of labor statistics, or its successor in 16181
responsibility, for all items, Series A. 16182
(2) Upon receiving an initial or renewed sports gaming 16183
occupational license, the applicant shall pay a nonrefundable 16184
license fee of fifty dollars. 16185
(3) An applicant's employer may pay the fees described in 16186
divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section on behalf of the 16187
applicant. 16188
(D) The commission may adopt rules allowing an individual 16189
who holds a sports gaming occupational license from another 16190
jurisdiction to be licensed in this state by reciprocity, so 16191
long as that jurisdiction's requirements to receive that license 16192
and the activities authorized by the license are substantially 16193
similar to those of this state with respect to the license the 16194
individual seeks. 16195
(E) A sports gaming occupational license shall be valid 16196
for a term of three years. In order to renew a sports gaming 16197
occupational license, the licensee shall apply to the commission 16198
for a renewed license in the same manner as for an initial 16199
license. 16200
Sec. 3775.09. (A) An applicant for a sports gaming 16201
license, other than a type C sports gaming host license, shall 16202
establish the applicant's suitability for the license by clear 16203
and convincing evidence. 16204
(B) The Ohio casino control commission shall not grant a 16205

S. B. No. 197 Page 557
As Introduced
sports gaming license, other than a type C sports gaming host 16206
license, to an applicant if evidence satisfactory to the 16207
commission exists that the applicant has done any of the 16208
following: 16209
(1) Knowingly made a false statement to the commission; 16210
(2) Been suspended from operating a gambling game, gaming 16211
device, or gaming operation, or had a license revoked by any 16212
governmental unit of a national, state, or local body exercising 16213
governmental functions; 16214
(3) Been convicted of a disqualifying offense, as defined 16215
in section 3772.07 of the Revised Code; 16216
(4) Been directly involved in or employed by any offshore 16217
wagering market that illegally serviced the United States or 16218
otherwise accepted illegal wagers from individuals located in 16219
the United States on or after April 16, 2015. 16220
(C) The commission may deny a sports gaming proprietor, 16221
mobile management services provider, or management services 16222
provider license to any applicant, reprimand any sports gaming 16223
proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management 16224
services provider, or suspend or revoke a sports gaming 16225
proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management 16226
services provider license if any of the following are true: 16227
(1) The applicant or licensee has not demonstrated to the 16228
commission's satisfaction financial responsibility sufficient to 16229
adequately meet the requirements of the enterprise. 16230
(2) The applicant or licensee is not the true owner of the 16231
business or is not the sole owner and has not disclosed the 16232
existence or identity of other persons who have an ownership 16233
interest in the business. 16234

S. B. No. 197 Page 558
As Introduced
(3) The applicant or licensee is a corporation that sells 16235
more than five per cent of the corporation's voting stock, or 16236
more than five per cent of the voting stock of a corporation 16237
that controls the corporation, or sells the corporation's 16238
assets, other than those bought and sold in the ordinary course 16239
of business, or any interest in the assets, to any person who, 16240
under division (C) of section 3775.03 of the Revised Code, must 16241
meet the qualifications of a sports gaming proprietor, mobile 16242
management services provider, or management services provider, 16243
as applicable, and who has not already been determined by the 16244
commission to have met the applicable qualifications. 16245
(D)(1) The commission shall revoke a sports gaming 16246
proprietor license that was issued or renewed because of the 16247
preference described in division (A) of section 3775.041 of the 16248
Revised Code if the sports gaming proprietor ceases to qualify 16249
as a professional sports organization, if the casino operator 16250
ceases to be a casino operator, or if the video lottery sales 16251
agent ceases to be a video lottery sales agent, as applicable. 16252
(2) The commission shall revoke a type C sports gaming 16253
host license if the licensee ceases to hold a valid class D 16254
liquor permit for the facility issued under Chapter 4303. of the 16255
Revised Code. 16256
(E) The commission shall not grant a sports gaming license 16257
to any of the following persons: 16258
(1) A nonprofit corporation or organization; 16259
(2) An individual who is under twenty-one years of age; 16260
(3) An employee of the commission. 16261
(F) In reviewing an application for a license under this 16262
chapter, the commission may rely on or consider the last 16263

S. B. No. 197 Page 559
As Introduced
investigation it conducted concerning the applicant, or the last 16264
license it issued to the applicant, under this chapter or 16265
Chapter 3770., 3771., or 3772. of the Revised Code. 16266
Sec. 3775.10. (A) A sports gaming proprietor shall do all 16267
of the following: 16268
(1) Conduct all sports gaming activities and functions in 16269
a manner that does not pose a threat to the public health, 16270
safety, or welfare of the citizens of this state; 16271
(2) Adopt comprehensive house rules for game play 16272
governing sports gaming transactions with its patrons, including 16273
rules that specify the amounts to be paid on winning wagers and 16274
the effect of schedule changes, and submit them to the Ohio 16275
casino control commission for approval before implementing them. 16276
The sports gaming proprietor shall publish its house rules as 16277
part of its minimum internal control standards, shall display 16278
the house rules, together with any other information the 16279
commission considers appropriate, conspicuously in each sports 16280
gaming facility and in any other place or manner prescribed by 16281
the commission, and shall make copies of its house rules readily 16282
available to patrons. 16283
(3) Keep current in all payments and obligations to the 16284
commission; 16285
(4) (3) Provide a secure location for the placement, 16286
operation, and use of sports gaming equipment; 16287
(5) (4) Prevent any person from tampering with or 16288
interfering with the operation of sports gaming; 16289
(6) (5) Employ commercially reasonable methods to prevent 16290
the sports gaming proprietor and its agents and employees from 16291
disclosing any confidential information in the possession of the 16292

S. B. No. 197 Page 560
As Introduced
sports gaming proprietor that could affect the conduct of sports 16293
gaming; 16294
(7) (6) Ensure that sports gaming conducted at a sports 16295
gaming facility is within the sight and control of designated 16296
employees of the sports gaming proprietor and that sports gaming 16297
is conducted under continuous observation by security equipment 16298
in conformity with the specifications and requirements of the 16299
commission; 16300
(8) (7) Ensure that sports gaming occurs only in the 16301
locations and manner approved by the commission; 16302
(9) (8) Ensure that all sports gaming is monitored in 16303
accordance with division (I) of section 3775.02 of the Revised 16304
Code; 16305
(10) (9) Maintain sufficient funds and other supplies to 16306
conduct sports gaming at all times; 16307
(11) (10) Maintain daily records showing the sports gaming 16308
proprietor's sports gaming receipts and timely file with the 16309
commission any additional reports required by rule or by other 16310
provisions of the Revised Code; 16311
(12) Withhold all required amounts from patrons' sports 16312
gaming winnings; 16313
(13) Submit to the commission, each fiscal year, an audit 16314
of the sports gaming proprietor's financial transactions and the 16315
condition of the sports gaming proprietor's total operations 16316
prepared by a certified public accountant in accordance with 16317
generally accepted accounting principles and applicable state 16318
and federal laws; 16319
(14) Submit to the commission, at least once every three 16320

S. B. No. 197 Page 561
As Introduced
years, an audit of the sports gaming proprietor's information 16321
technology systems and security protocols prepared by a 16322
qualified, independent, and capable third party, as determined 16323
by, and in a manner approved by, the commission; 16324
(15) (11) Promptly provide anonymized sports gaming data 16325
to a sports governing body or a state university that submits a 16326
valid request for the data under division (B)(13) or (14) of 16327
section 3775.02 of the Revised Code; 16328
(12) Comply with all applicable requirements of Chapter 16329
3772. of the Revised Code. 16330
(B) A sports gaming proprietor immediately shall report to 16331
the commission any information in the sports gaming proprietor's 16332
possession related to any of the following: 16333
(1) Any wager in violation of this chapter or rules 16334
adopted under this chapter or of federal law; 16335
(2) Abnormal sports gaming activity or patterns that may 16336
indicate a concern regarding the integrity of a sporting event; 16337
(3) Suspicious wagering activities; 16338
(4) Any conduct that corrupts a wagering outcome of a 16339
sporting event for purposes of financial gain; 16340
(5) Any criminal or disciplinary proceedings commenced 16341
against the sports gaming proprietor by any person other than 16342
the commission in connection with the sports gaming proprietor's 16343
operations. 16344
(C) A sports gaming proprietor may manage risk associated 16345
with wagers by rejecting or pooling one or more wagers or by 16346
laying off one or more wagers with another sports gaming 16347
proprietor. 16348

S. B. No. 197 Page 562
As Introduced
(D) (C) A sports gaming proprietor may employ a system 16349
that offsets loss or manages risk in the operation of sports 16350
gaming under this chapter through the use of a liquidity pool in 16351
another jurisdiction in which the sports gaming proprietor or an 16352
affiliate or other third party also holds licensure, provided 16353
that at all times adequate protections are maintained to ensure 16354
sufficient funds are available to pay patrons. 16355
(E) (D) A sports gaming proprietor may provide promotional 16356
gaming credits or bonuses to patrons, subject to the 16357
requirements of section 3772.231 of the Revised Code and 16358
oversight by the commission. 16359
(F) (E) If a sports gaming patron does not claim a winning 16360
wager from a sports gaming proprietor within one year from the 16361
last day on which the sporting event is held, the sports gaming 16362
proprietor's obligation to pay the winnings shall expire, and 16363
the sports gaming proprietor shall remit the winnings to the 16364
commission, which shall deposit them in the sports gaming 16365
revenue fund. 16366
(G) (F) A sports gaming proprietor is not liable under the 16367
laws of this state to any party, including a patron, for 16368
disclosing information as required under this chapter or for 16369
refusing to disclose information that is not required by law to 16370
be disclosed. 16371
(H)(1) (G)(1) A sports gaming proprietor shall maintain 16372
the confidentiality of any information provided to the sports 16373
gaming proprietor by a sports governing body that the sports 16374
governing body designates as confidential, except as otherwise 16375
required by law or by order of the commission. The sports gaming 16376
proprietor shall not use such confidential information for 16377
business or marketing purposes, except with the express written 16378

S. B. No. 197 Page 563
As Introduced
approval of the sports governing body. 16379
(2) A sports governing body shall maintain the 16380
confidentiality of any information provided to the sports 16381
governing body by a sports gaming proprietor that the sports 16382
gaming proprietor designates as confidential, except as 16383
otherwise required by law or by order of the commission. The 16384
sports governing body shall not use such confidential 16385
information for business or marketing purposes, except with the 16386
express written approval of the sports gaming proprietor. 16387
Sec. 3775.11. (A) A type A sports gaming proprietor may 16388
operate one or more online sports pool web sites and 16389
accompanying mobile applications through which the sports gaming 16390
proprietor accepts wagers from individuals who are at least 16391
twenty-one years of age and who are physically located in this 16392
state. The sports gaming proprietor shall use location based 16393
geoblocking technology that meets the requirements of section 16394
3772.313 of the Revised Code and that is obtained from a sports 16395
gaming supplier to prohibit individuals who are not physically 16396
present in this state from participating in sports gaming 16397
through an online sports pool. 16398
(B)(1) As used in division (B) of this section, "sports 16399
gaming account" means an electronic account that an individual 16400
may establish for the purpose of sports gaming, including making 16401
deposits and withdrawals, wagering amounts, and receiving 16402
payouts on winning wagers. 16403
(2) A sports gaming proprietor may accept a wager from an 16404
individual through an online sports pool only using the 16405
individual's sports gaming account. The sports gaming account 16406
shall be in the individual's full legal name and shall not be in 16407
the name of any beneficiary, custodian, joint trust, 16408

S. B. No. 197 Page 564
As Introduced
corporation, partnership, or other organization or entity. 16409
(3) A sports gaming account may be established and funded 16410
in person through employees or sales agents of a sports gaming 16411
proprietor or, pursuant to rules adopted by the Ohio casino 16412
control commission, over the internet through a sports gaming 16413
proprietor's web site or mobile application in a manner that 16414
complies with the sports gaming proprietor's internal controls. 16415
(C) (B) The server responsible for accepting wagers 16416
through an online sports pool shall be located in a secure 16417
facility in this state. 16418
(D) (C) An online sports pool web site and its 16419
accompanying mobile application shall include the name or logo 16420
of each of the following in a conspicuous manner: 16421
(1) The type A sports gaming proprietor; 16422
(2) The mobile management services provider that operates 16423
the online sports pool on behalf of the type A sports gaming 16424
proprietor, if applicable. 16425
Sec. 3775.13. (A) No individual who is on the Ohio casino 16426
control commission's sports gaming exclusion list created under 16427
section 3772.031 of the Revised Code shall enter a sports gaming 16428
facility or the grounds of a sports gaming facility or 16429
participate in the play or operation of sports gaming in this 16430
state. A sports gaming proprietor shall employ commercially 16431
reasonable methods to prevent an individual who is on the 16432
commission's sports gaming exclusion list from engaging in 16433
sports gaming conducted by the sports gaming proprietor. 16434
(B)(1) A sports gaming proprietor may exclude any 16435
individual from entering a sports gaming facility, or the 16436
grounds of a sports gaming facility, that is under the control 16437

S. B. No. 197 Page 565
As Introduced
of the sports gaming proprietor and may exclude any individual 16438
from participating in the play or operation of sports gaming 16439
conducted by the sports gaming proprietor. The sports gaming 16440
proprietor shall keep a list of all excluded individuals. No 16441
individual who is on a sports gaming proprietor's exclusion list 16442
shall enter a sports gaming facility, or the grounds of a sports 16443
gaming facility, that is under the control of the sports gaming 16444
proprietor or participate in the play or operation of sports 16445
gaming conducted by the sports gaming proprietor under this 16446
chapter. 16447
(2) If a sports gaming proprietor excludes an individual 16448
because the sports gaming proprietor determines that the 16449
individual engaged or attempted to engage in any sports gaming 16450
related activity that is prohibited under this chapter or under 16451
the commission's rules, the sports gaming proprietor shall 16452
report that fact to the Ohio casino control commission. 16453
(C)(1) A sports gaming proprietor shall employ 16454
commercially reasonable methods to prevent any person who is 16455
participating in the sports gaming comply with the requirements 16456
of the Ohio voluntary exclusion program from engaging in sports 16457
gaming conducted by the sports gaming proprietor described in 16458
section 3772.39 of the Revised Code. 16459
(2) Absent gross negligence, all of the following persons 16460
are immune from any type of civil liability on the basis that a 16461
person who is participating in the sports gaming voluntary 16462
exclusion program enters or accesses a sports gaming facility or 16463
participates in sports gaming conducted under this chapter: 16464
(a) The commission or any other agency of this state and 16465
its agents or employees; 16466

S. B. No. 197 Page 566
As Introduced
(b) A sports gaming licensee and its agents or employees. 16467
(D) No sports gaming proprietor, no director, officer, 16468
agent, or employee of a sports gaming proprietor, no other 16469
person who has a financial interest in a sports gaming 16470
proprietor, and no person living in the same household as any of 16471
those persons, shall engage in any sports gaming conducted by 16472
the sports gaming proprietor, other than as part of operating 16473
sports gaming or as part of the employee's employment. A sports 16474
gaming proprietor shall employ commercially reasonable methods 16475
to prevent those persons, and any other person who has access to 16476
confidential information held by the sports gaming proprietor, 16477
from engaging in sports gaming conducted by the sports gaming 16478
proprietor. 16479
(E) No member or employee of the Ohio casino control 16480
commission or the state lottery commission shall knowingly 16481
participate in sports gaming conducted by a sports gaming 16482
proprietor in this state or participate in sports gaming with 16483
any person or entity located outside this state that is directly 16484
or indirectly owned or operated by a sports gaming proprietor. A 16485
sports gaming proprietor shall employ commercially reasonable 16486
methods to prevent such a person from engaging in sports gaming 16487
conducted by the sports gaming proprietor. 16488
(F)(1) A sports gaming proprietor shall employ 16489
commercially reasonable methods to prevent any person involved 16490
in a sporting event with respect to which sports gaming is 16491
permitted from engaging in any sports gaming with the sports 16492
gaming proprietor, based on publicly available information and 16493
any information provided by a sports governing body under 16494
division (F)(2) of this section. 16495
(2) The Ohio casino control commission shall adopt rules 16496

S. B. No. 197 Page 567
As Introduced
specifying a procedure for a sports governing body to provide to 16497
the commission a list of persons who are involved in sporting 16498
events, including those persons' full legal names, dates of 16499
birth, and social security numbers, for the purpose of 16500
preventing those persons from engaging in sports gaming. The 16501
commission shall make the list available to each sports gaming 16502
proprietor and to the state lottery commission. The Ohio casino 16503
control commission, the state lottery commission, and each 16504
sports gaming proprietor shall keep the information in the list 16505
confidential. 16506
(3) For purposes of division (F) of this section, a person 16507
is considered to be involved in a sporting event if the person 16508
is an athlete, participant, coach, referee, team owner, or 16509
sports governing body with respect to the sporting event; any 16510
agent or employee of such an athlete, participant, coach, 16511
referee, team owner, or sports governing body; and any agent or 16512
employee of an athlete, participant, or referee union with 16513
respect to the sporting event. 16514
(G) A sports gaming proprietor shall employ commercially 16515
reasonable methods to prevent any person from placing a wager 16516
with the sports gaming proprietor on behalf of another person. 16517
Sec. 3775.99. (A) Whoever knowingly does any of the 16518
following commits a misdemeanor of the first degree on the first 16519
offense and a felony of the fifth degree on a subsequent 16520
offense: 16521
(1) Makes a false statement on an application submitted 16522
under this chapter; 16523
(2) Permits an individual under twenty-one years of age to 16524
engage in sports gaming; 16525

S. B. No. 197 Page 568
As Introduced
(3) Aids, induces, or causes an individual under twenty- 16526
one years of age who is not an employee of the sports gaming 16527
proprietor to enter or attempt to enter a sports gaming 16528
facility; 16529
(4) Enters or attempts to enter a sports gaming facility 16530
while under twenty-one years of age, except as permitted under 16531
division (C) of section 3775.12 of the Revised Code; 16532
(5) Participates in sports gaming in violation of division 16533
(D) of section 3775.13 of the Revised Code, other than as part 16534
of operating sports gaming or as part of the employee's 16535
employment. 16536
(B) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a 16537
felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of 16538
the fourth degree on a subsequent offense. If the person is a 16539
sports gaming licensee under this chapter, the Ohio casino 16540
control commission shall revoke the person's license issued 16541
under this chapter after the first offense. 16542
(1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value to anyone 16543
for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a sporting event 16544
or attempts to do so; 16545
(2) Places, increases, or decreases a wager after 16546
acquiring knowledge not available to the general public that 16547
anyone has been offered, promised, or given anything of value 16548
for the purpose of influencing the outcome of the sporting event 16549
upon which the wager is placed, increased, or decreased, or 16550
attempts to do so; 16551
(3) Manufactures, sells, or distributes any device that is 16552
intended by that person to be used to violate any provision of 16553
this chapter or the sports gaming laws of any other state; 16554

S. B. No. 197 Page 569
As Introduced
(4) Places a bet or aids any other person in placing a bet 16555
on a sporting event after unlawfully acquiring knowledge of the 16556
outcome on which winnings from that bet are contingent; 16557
(5) Claims, collects, or takes anything of value from a 16558
sports gaming proprietor with intent to defraud or attempts to 16559
do so without having made a wager in which the amount or value 16560
is legitimately won or owed; 16561
(6) Places a wager using counterfeit currency or other 16562
counterfeit form of credit approved for wagering; 16563
(7) Possesses any device intended to be used to violate 16564
this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, or any 16565
materials used to manufacture such a device. This division does 16566
not apply to a sports gaming proprietor or to an agent or 16567
employee of a sports gaming proprietor who is acting in 16568
furtherance of the sports gaming proprietor's interest. 16569
(8) Changes or alters the normal outcome of any sports 16570
gaming conducted through an online sports pool, including any 16571
system used to monitor the online sports pool, or the way in 16572
which the outcome is reported to any patron; 16573
(9) Operates sports gaming in a manner other than the 16574
manner required under this chapter. Premises or any internet web 16575
site used or occupied in violation of this division constitute a 16576
nuisance subject to abatement under Chapter 3767. of the Revised 16577
Code. 16578
(C) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a 16579
felony of the third degree. If the person is a sports gaming 16580
licensee under this chapter, the commission shall revoke the 16581
person's license issued under this chapter after the first 16582
offense. If the person is a public servant or political party 16583

S. B. No. 197 Page 570
As Introduced
official, the person is forever disqualified from holding any 16584
public office, employment, or position of trust in this state. 16585
(1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value or 16586
benefit to a person who is connected with a sports gaming 16587
proprietor, an agent or employee of a sports gaming proprietor, 16588
or a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control 16589
commission or the state lottery commission, under an agreement 16590
to influence, or with the intent to influence, the actions of 16591
the person to whom the offer, promise, or gift is made in order 16592
to affect or attempt to affect the outcome of sports gaming or 16593
an official action of a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio 16594
casino control commission or the state lottery commission; 16595
(2) Solicits, accepts, or receives a promise of anything 16596
of value or benefit while the person is connected with a sports 16597
gaming proprietor, an agent or employee of a sports gaming 16598
proprietor, or a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino 16599
control commission or the state lottery commission, under an 16600
agreement to influence, or with the intent to influence, the 16601
actions of the person to affect or attempt to affect the outcome 16602
of sports gaming or an official action of a member, agent, or 16603
employee of the Ohio casino control commission or the state 16604
lottery commission. 16605
(D) Whoever knowingly does any of the following while 16606
participating in sports gaming or otherwise transacting with a 16607
sports gaming proprietor as permitted under this chapter or 16608
sections 3770.23 to 3770.24 and 3770.25 of the Revised Code 16609
commits a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a 16610
felony of the fourth degree on a subsequent offense: 16611
(1) Causes or attempts to cause the person to fail to file 16612
a report required under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any 16613

S. B. No. 197 Page 571
As Introduced
regulation prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the 16614
Revised Code, or to fail to file a report or maintain a record 16615
required by an order issued under section 21 of the "Federal 16616
Deposit Insurance Act," 12 U.S.C. 1829b or section 123 of Pub. 16617
L. No. 91-508; 16618
(2) Causes or attempts to cause the person to file a 16619
report under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any regulation 16620
prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the Revised Code, to 16621
file a report or to maintain a record required by any order 16622
issued under 31 U.S.C. 3126, or to maintain a record required 16623
under any regulation prescribed under section 21 of the "Federal 16624
Deposit Insurance Act," 12 U.S.C. 1829b or section 123 of Pub. 16625
L. No. 91-508 that contains a material omission or misstatement 16626
of fact; 16627
(3) With one or more sports gaming proprietors, structures 16628
a transaction, is complicit in structuring a transaction, 16629
attempts to structure a transaction, or is complicit in an 16630
attempt to structure a transaction. As used in this division: 16631
(a) To be "complicit" means to engage in any conduct of a 16632
type described in divisions (A)(1) to (4) of section 2923.03 of 16633
the Revised Code. 16634
(b) "Structure a transaction" has the same meaning as in 16635
section 1315.51 of the Revised Code. 16636
Sec. 3777.01. As used in this chapter : 16637
(A) "Bingo" has the same meaning as in section 3768.01 of 16638
the Revised Code. 16639
(B) "Commission" means the Ohio casino control commission 16640
described in section 3772.02 of the Revised Code. 16641

S. B. No. 197 Page 572
As Introduced
(C) "Conduct" means to back, promote, organize, manage, 16642
carry on, sponsor, or prepare for the operation of a 16643
sweepstakes. 16644
(D) "Game of chance" has the same meaning as in section 16645
2915.01 of the Revised Code. 16646
(E) "Merchandise prize" means any item of value, other 16647
than a non-merchandise prize. 16648
(F) "Non-merchandise prize" means any of the following: 16649
(1) Cash, gift cards, or any equivalent thereof; 16650
(2) Plays on games of chance, state lottery tickets, or 16651
bingo; 16652
(3) Firearms, tobacco, or alcoholic beverages; 16653
(4) A redeemable voucher that is redeemable for any of the 16654
items listed in division (F)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. 16655
(G) "Redeemable voucher" means any ticket, token, coupon, 16656
receipt, or other noncash representation of value. 16657
(H)(1) "Skill-based amusement machine" means a mechanical, 16658
video, digital, or electronic device that rewards the player or 16659
players, if at all, only with merchandise prizes or with 16660
redeemable vouchers redeemable only for merchandise prizes, 16661
provided that with respect to rewards for playing the game all 16662
of the following apply: 16663
(a) The wholesale value of a merchandise prize awarded as 16664
a result of the single play of a machine does not exceed ten 16665
dollars; 16666
(b) Redeemable vouchers awarded for any single play of a 16667
machine are not redeemable for a merchandise prize with a 16668

S. B. No. 197 Page 573
As Introduced
wholesale value of more than ten dollars; 16669
(c) Redeemable vouchers are not redeemable for a 16670
merchandise prize that has a wholesale value of more than ten 16671
dollars times the fewest number of single plays necessary to 16672
accrue the redeemable vouchers required to obtain that prize; 16673
(d) Any redeemable vouchers or merchandise prizes are 16674
distributed at the site of the skill-based amusement machine at 16675
the time of play. 16676
A card for the purchase of gasoline is a redeemable 16677
voucher for purposes of division (H)(1) of this section even if 16678
the skill-based amusement machine for the play of which the card 16679
is awarded is located at a place where gasoline may not be 16680
legally distributed to the public or the card is not redeemable 16681
at the location of, or at the time of playing, the skill-based 16682
amusement machine. 16683
(2) A device shall not be considered a skill-based 16684
amusement machine and shall be considered a slot machine if it 16685
pays cash or one or more of the following apply: 16686
(a) The ability of a player to succeed at the game is 16687
impacted by the number or ratio of prior wins to prior losses of 16688
players playing the game. 16689
(b) Any reward of redeemable vouchers is not based solely 16690
on the player achieving the object of the game or the player's 16691
score; 16692
(c) The outcome of the game, or the value of the 16693
redeemable voucher or merchandise prize awarded for winning the 16694
game, can be controlled by a source other than any player 16695
playing the game. 16696

S. B. No. 197 Page 574
As Introduced
(d) The success of any player is or may be determined by a 16697
chance event that cannot be altered by player actions. 16698
(e) The ability of any player to succeed at the game is 16699
determined by game features not visible or known to the player. 16700
(f) The ability of the player to succeed at the game is 16701
impacted by the exercise of a skill that no reasonable player 16702
could exercise. 16703
(3) All of the following apply to any machine that is 16704
operated as described in division (H)(1) of this section: 16705
(a) As used in division (H) of this section, "game" and 16706
"play" mean one event from the initial activation of the machine 16707
until the results of play are determined without payment of 16708
additional consideration. An individual utilizing a machine that 16709
involves a single game, play, contest, competition, or 16710
tournament may be awarded redeemable vouchers or merchandise 16711
prizes based on the results of play. 16712
(b) Advance play for a single game, play, contest, 16713
competition, or tournament participation may be purchased. The 16714
cost of the contest, competition, or tournament participation 16715
may be greater than a single noncontest, competition, or 16716
tournament play. 16717
(c) To the extent that the machine is used in a contest, 16718
competition, or tournament, that contest, competition, or 16719
tournament has a defined starting and ending date and is open to 16720
participants in competition for scoring and ranking results 16721
toward the awarding of redeemable vouchers or merchandise prizes 16722
that are stated prior to the start of the contest, competition, 16723
or tournament. 16724
(4) For purposes of division (H)(1) of this section, the 16725

S. B. No. 197 Page 575
As Introduced
mere presence of a device, such as a pin-setting, ball- 16726
releasing, or scoring mechanism, that does not contribute to or 16727
affect the outcome of the play of the game does not make the 16728
device a skill-based amusement machine. 16729
(I) "Slot machine" has the same meaning as in section 16730
2915.01 of the Revised Code. 16731
(J) "Sweepstakes" means any game, contest, advertising 16732
scheme or plan, or other promotion where consideration is not 16733
required for a person to enter to win or become eligible to 16734
receive any prize, the determination of which is based upon 16735
chance. "Sweepstakes" does not include bingo as authorized under 16736
Chapter 3768. of the Revised Code, pari-mutuel wagering as 16737
authorized by Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code, lotteries 16738
conducted by the state lottery commission as authorized by 16739
Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, internet gambling as 16740
authorized by Chapter 3771. of the Revised Code, casino gaming 16741
as authorized by Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code, or sports 16742
gaming as authorized by Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code. 16743
(K)(1) "Sweepstakes terminal device" means a mechanical, 16744
video, digital, or electronic machine or device that is owned, 16745
leased, or otherwise possessed by any person conducting a 16746
sweepstakes, or by that person's partners, affiliates, 16747
subsidiaries, or contractors, that is intended to be used by a 16748
sweepstakes participant, and that is capable of displaying 16749
information on a screen or other mechanism. A device is a 16750
sweepstakes terminal device if any of the following apply: 16751
(a) The device uses a simulated game terminal as a 16752
representation of the prizes associated with the results of the 16753
sweepstakes entries. 16754

S. B. No. 197 Page 576
As Introduced
(b) The device utilizes software such that the simulated 16755
game influences or determines the winning of or value of the 16756
prize. 16757
(c) The device selects prizes from a predetermined finite 16758
pool of entries. 16759
(d) The device utilizes a mechanism that reveals the 16760
content of a predetermined sweepstakes entry. 16761
(e) The device predetermines the prize results and stores 16762
those results for delivery at the time the sweepstakes entry 16763
results are revealed. 16764
(f) The device utilizes software to create a game result. 16765
(g) The device reveals the prize incrementally, even 16766
though the device does not influence the awarding of the prize 16767
or the value of any prize awarded. 16768
(h) The device determines and associates the prize with an 16769
entry or entries at the time the sweepstakes is entered. 16770
(2) As used in this division and in section 3777.02 of the 16771
Revised Code: 16772
(a) "Enter" means the act by which a person becomes 16773
eligible to receive any prize offered in a sweepstakes. 16774
(b) "Entry" means one event from the initial activation of 16775
the sweepstakes terminal device until all the sweepstakes prize 16776
results from that activation are revealed. 16777
(c) "Prize" means any gift, award, gratuity, good, 16778
service, credit, reward, or any other thing of value that may be 16779
transferred to a person, whether possession of the prize is 16780
actually transferred, or placed on an account or other record as 16781

S. B. No. 197 Page 577
As Introduced
evidence of the intent to transfer the prize. 16782
(d) "Sweepstakes terminal device facility" means any 16783
location in this state where a sweepstakes terminal device is 16784
provided to a sweepstakes participant, except as provided in 16785
division (C) of section 3777.02 of the Revised Code. 16786
Sec. 3777.02. (A) No person shall do either of the 16787
following: 16788
(1) Conduct, or participate in the conduct of, a 16789
sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal device at a 16790
sweepstakes terminal device facility and either: 16791
(a) Give to another person any non-merchandise prize as a 16792
prize for playing or participating in a sweepstakes; 16793
(b) Give to another person any merchandise prize, or a 16794
redeemable voucher for a merchandise prize, the wholesale value 16795
of which is in excess of ten dollars and which is awarded as a 16796
single entry for playing or participating in a sweepstakes. 16797
Redeemable vouchers shall not be redeemable for a merchandise 16798
prize that has a wholesale value of more than ten dollars. 16799
(2) Conduct, or participate in the conduct of, a 16800
sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal device at a 16801
sweepstakes terminal device facility without first obtaining a 16802
current annual certificate of registration from the commission 16803
as required by this section. 16804
(B) Any person desiring to conduct, or participate in the 16805
conduct of, a sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal 16806
device at a sweepstakes terminal device facility shall first 16807
register with the commission and obtain an annual certificate of 16808
registration by providing a filing fee of two hundred dollars 16809
and all information as required by rule adopted under division 16810

S. B. No. 197 Page 578
As Introduced
(F) of this section. Not later than the tenth day of each month, 16811
each sweepstakes terminal device operator shall file a 16812
sweepstakes terminal device monthly report with the commission 16813
and provide a filing fee of fifty dollars and all information 16814
required by rule adopted under division (F) of this section. All 16815
information provided to the commission under this division shall 16816
be available to law enforcement upon request. 16817
(C) A person may apply to the commission, on a form 16818
prescribed by the attorney general, for a certificate of 16819
compliance that the person is not operating a sweepstakes 16820
terminal device facility. The form shall require the person to 16821
include the address of the business location where sweepstakes 16822
terminal devices will be used and to make the following 16823
certifications: 16824
(1) That the person will not use more than two sweepstakes 16825
terminal devices at the business location; 16826
(2) That the retail value of sweepstakes prizes to be 16827
awarded at the business location using sweepstakes terminal 16828
devices during a reporting period will be less than three per 16829
cent of the gross revenue received at the business location 16830
during the reporting period; 16831
(3) That no other form of gaming except lottery ticket 16832
sales as authorized under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code will 16833
be conducted at the business location or in an adjoining area of 16834
the business location; 16835
(4) That any sweepstakes terminal device at the business 16836
location will not allow any deposit of any money, coin, or 16837
token, or the use of any credit card, debit card, prepaid card, 16838
or any other method of similar payment to be used, directly or 16839

S. B. No. 197 Page 579
As Introduced
indirectly, to participate in a sweepstakes; 16840
(5) That notification of any prize will not take place on 16841
the same day as a participant's sweepstakes entry; 16842
(6) That the person consents to provide any other 16843
information to the commission as required by rule adopted under 16844
division (F) of this section. 16845
(D) The filing fee for a certificate of compliance is two 16846
hundred fifty dollars. The commission may charge up to an 16847
additional two hundred fifty dollars for reasonable expenses 16848
resulting from any investigation related to an application for a 16849
certificate of compliance. 16850
(E) A certificate of compliance is effective for one year. 16851
The certificate holder may reapply for a certificate of 16852
compliance. A person issued a certificate of compliance shall 16853
file semiannual reports with the commission stating the number 16854
of sweepstakes terminal devices at the business location and 16855
that the retail value of prizes awarded at the business location 16856
using sweepstakes terminal devices is less than three per cent 16857
of the gross revenue received at the business location. 16858
(F) The commission shall adopt rules setting forth both of 16859
the following: 16860
(1) The required information to be submitted by persons 16861
conducting a sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal 16862
device at a sweepstakes terminal device facility as described in 16863
division (B) of this section; 16864
(2) The requirements pertaining to a certificate of 16865
compliance under division (C) of this section, which shall 16866
provide for a person to file a consolidated application and a 16867
consolidated semiannual report if a person has more than one 16868

S. B. No. 197 Page 580
As Introduced
business location. 16869
(G) The commission shall issue a certificate of 16870
registration or a certificate of compliance to all persons who 16871
have successfully satisfied the applicable requirements of this 16872
section. The commission shall post online a registry of all 16873
properly registered and certified sweepstakes terminal device 16874
operators. 16875
(H) The commission may refuse to issue an annual 16876
certificate of registration or certificate of compliance to any 16877
person or, if one has been issued, the commission may revoke a 16878
certificate of registration or a certificate of compliance if 16879
the applicant has provided any information to the commission as 16880
part of a registration, certification, monthly report, 16881
semiannual report, or any other information that is materially 16882
false or misleading, or if the applicant or any officer, 16883
partner, or owner of five per cent or more interest in the 16884
applicant has violated any provision of this chapter. 16885
(I) The commission may take any necessary and reasonable 16886
action to determine a violation of this chapter, including 16887
requesting documents and information, performing inspections of 16888
premises, or requiring the attendance of any person at an 16889
examination under oath. 16890
(J) Whoever violates this section is guilty of gambling, a 16891
misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has 16892
been convicted of any gambling offense, gambling is a felony of 16893
the fifth degree. Notwithstanding this division, failing to file 16894
a sweepstakes terminal device monthly report as required by 16895
division (B) of this section or the semiannual report required 16896
by division (E) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first 16897
degree. 16898

S. B. No. 197 Page 581
As Introduced
Sec. 2915.06 3777.03. (A) (A)(1) No person shall give to 16899
another person any item described in division (VV)(1), (2), (3), 16900
or (4) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code non-merchandise 16901
prize in exchange for a noncash prize, toy, or novelty received 16902
as a reward for playing or operating a skill-based amusement 16903
machine or for a free or reduced-price game won on a skill-based 16904
amusement machine. 16905
(B) (2) Whoever violates division (A) (A)(1) of this 16906
section is guilty of skill-based amusement machine prohibited 16907
conduct. A violation of division (A) (A)(1) of this section is a 16908
misdemeanor of the first degree for each redemption of a prize 16909
that is involved in the violation. If the offender previously 16910
has been convicted of a violation of division (A) (A)(1) of this 16911
section, a violation of that division is a felony of the fifth 16912
degree for each redemption of a prize that is involved in the 16913
violation. The maximum fine authorized to be imposed for a 16914
felony of the fifth degree shall be imposed upon the offender. 16915
(B) Whoever purposely or knowingly operates a skill-based 16916
amusement machine operation in a manner other than the manner 16917
required under this chapter commits a felony of the fifth degree 16918
on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree for a 16919
subsequent offense. If the person is a licensee under this 16920
chapter, the commission shall revoke the person's license after 16921
the first offense. 16922
Sec. 2915.061 3777.04. Any regulation of skill-based 16923
amusement machines shall be governed by this chapter and 16924
Chapters 2915. and 3772. of the Revised Code and not by Chapter 16925
1345. of the Revised Code. 16926
Sec. 3777.05. The commission may take any necessary and 16927
reasonable action to determine a violation of this chapter, 16928

S. B. No. 197 Page 582
As Introduced
including requesting documents and information, performing 16929
inspections of premises, or requiring the attendance of any 16930
person at an examination under oath. 16931
Sec. 3777.06. All fees received by the commission under 16932
this chapter shall be deposited in the state treasury to the 16933
credit of the casino control commission fund, as defined in 16934
section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. 16935
Sec. 4301.03. The liquor control commission may adopt and 16936
promulgate, repeal, rescind, and amend, in the manner required 16937
by this section, rules, standards, requirements, and orders 16938
necessary to carry out this chapter and Chapter 4303. of the 16939
Revised Code, but all rules of the board of liquor control that 16940
were in effect immediately prior to April 17, 1963, shall remain 16941
in full force and effect as rules of the liquor control 16942
commission until and unless amended or repealed by the liquor 16943
control commission. The rules of the commission may include the 16944
following: 16945
(A) Rules with reference to applications for and the 16946
issuance of permits for the manufacture, distribution, 16947
transportation, and sale of beer and intoxicating liquor, and 16948
the sale of alcohol; and rules governing the procedure of the 16949
division of liquor control in the suspension, revocation, and 16950
cancellation of those permits; 16951
(B) Rules and orders providing in detail for the conduct 16952
of any retail business authorized under permits issued pursuant 16953
to this chapter and Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code, with a 16954
view to ensuring compliance with those chapters and laws 16955
relative to them, and the maintenance of public decency, 16956
sobriety, and good order in any place licensed under the 16957
permits. No rule or order shall prohibit the operation of video 16958

S. B. No. 197 Page 583
As Introduced
lottery terminal games at a commercial race track where live 16959
horse racing and simulcasting are conducted in accordance with 16960
Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code or the sale of lottery tickets 16961
issued pursuant to Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code by any 16962
retail business authorized under permits issued pursuant to that 16963
chapter. 16964
No rule or order shall prohibit pari-mutuel wagering on 16965
simulcast horse races at a satellite facility that has been 16966
issued a D liquor permit under Chapter 4303. of the Revised 16967
Code. No rule or order shall prohibit a charitable organization 16968
that holds a D-4 permit from selling or serving beer or 16969
intoxicating liquor under its permit in a portion of its 16970
premises merely because that portion of its premises is used for 16971
the conduct of a bingo game, as described in division (O) of 16972
section 2915.01 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, 16973
"bingo" and "charitable organization" has have the same meaning 16974
meanings as in division (H) of section 2915.01 3768.01 of the 16975
Revised Code. No rule or order pertaining to visibility into the 16976
premises of a permit holder after the legal hours of sale shall 16977
be adopted or maintained by the commission. 16978
(C) Standards, not in conflict with those prescribed by 16979
any law of this state or the United States, to secure the use of 16980
proper ingredients and methods in the manufacture of beer, mixed 16981
beverages, and wine to be sold within this state; 16982
(D) Rules determining the nature, form, and capacity of 16983
all packages and bottles to be used for containing beer or 16984
intoxicating liquor, except for spirituous liquor to be kept or 16985
sold, governing the form of all seals and labels to be used on 16986
those packages and bottles; 16987
(E) Rules requiring the label on every package, bottle, 16988

S. B. No. 197 Page 584
As Introduced
and container to state all of the following, as applicable: 16989
(1) The ingredients in the contents; 16990
(2) Except for beer, the terms of weight, volume, or proof 16991
spirits; 16992
(3) Except for spirituous liquor, whether the product is 16993
beer, wine, alcohol, or any intoxicating liquor; 16994
(4) Regarding beer that contains more than twelve per cent 16995
of alcohol by volume, the percentage of alcohol by volume and 16996
that the beer is a "high alcohol beer." 16997
(F) Uniform rules governing all advertising with reference 16998
to the sale of beer and intoxicating liquor throughout the state 16999
and advertising upon and in the premises licensed for the sale 17000
of beer or intoxicating liquor; 17001
(G) Rules restricting and placing conditions upon the 17002
transfer of permits; 17003
(H) Rules and orders limiting the number of permits of any 17004
class within the state or within any political subdivision of 17005
the state; and, for that purpose, adopting reasonable 17006
classifications of persons or establishments to which any 17007
authorized class of permits may be issued within any political 17008
subdivision; 17009
(I) Rules and orders with reference to the hours of the 17010
day during which and the persons to whom intoxicating liquor of 17011
any class may be sold, and rules with reference to the manner of 17012
sale; 17013
(J) Rules requiring permit holders buying beer to pay and 17014
permit holders selling beer to collect minimum cash deposits for 17015
kegs, cases, bottles, or other returnable containers of the 17016

S. B. No. 197 Page 585
As Introduced
beer; requiring the repayment, or credit, of the minimum cash 17017
deposit charges upon the return of the empty containers; and 17018
requiring the posting of such form of indemnity or such other 17019
conditions with respect to the charging, collection, and 17020
repayment of minimum cash deposit charges for returnable 17021
containers of beer as are necessary to ensure the return of the 17022
empty containers or the repayment upon that return of the 17023
minimum cash deposits paid; 17024
(K) Rules establishing the method by which alcohol 17025
products may be imported for sale by wholesale distributors and 17026
the method by which manufacturers and suppliers may sell alcohol 17027
products to wholesale distributors. 17028
Every rule, standard, requirement, or order of the 17029
commission and every repeal, amendment, or rescission of them 17030
shall be posted for public inspection in the principal office of 17031
the commission and the principal office of the division of 17032
liquor control, and a certified copy of them shall be filed in 17033
the office of the secretary of state. An order applying only to 17034
persons named in it shall be served on the persons affected by 17035
personal delivery of a certified copy, or by mailing a certified 17036
copy to each person affected by it or, in the case of a 17037
corporation, to any officer or agent of the corporation upon 17038
whom a service of summons may be served in a civil action. The 17039
posting and filing required by this section constitutes 17040
sufficient notice to all persons affected by such rule or order 17041
which is not required to be served. General rules of the 17042
commission promulgated pursuant to this section shall be 17043
published in the manner the commission determines. 17044
Sec. 4301.58. (A) As used in this section: 17045
(1) "Charitable organization" is an organization described 17046

S. B. No. 197 Page 586
As Introduced
under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and exempt 17047
from federal income taxation under section 501(a) of the 17048
Internal Revenue Code. 17049
(2) "Fundraiser" means a raffle, silent auction, or event 17050
where a door prize is awarded. 17051
(3) "Political organization" means a political 17052
organization defined under section 527 of the Internal Revenue 17053
Code. 17054
(4) "Raffle" means a raffle conducted in accordance with 17055
Chapter 2915. 3768. of the Revised Code. 17056
(5) "Silent auction" means a method of submitting bids in 17057
writing by one or more persons and, after a review of all the 17058
bids received, personal property is awarded to the highest and 17059
most responsive bidder. 17060
(B) No person, personally or by the person's clerk, agent, 17061
or employee, who is not the holder of an A permit issued by the 17062
division of liquor control, in force at the time, and 17063
authorizing the manufacture of beer or intoxicating liquor, or 17064
who is not an agent or employee of the division authorized to 17065
manufacture such beer or intoxicating liquor, shall manufacture 17066
any beer or intoxicating liquor for sale, or shall manufacture 17067
spirituous liquor. 17068
(C) No person, personally or by the person's clerk, agent, 17069
or employee, who is not the holder of an A, B, C, D, E, F, G, I, 17070
or S permit issued by the division, in force at the time, and 17071
authorizing the sale of beer, intoxicating liquor, or alcohol, 17072
or who is not an agent or employee of the division or the tax 17073
commissioner authorized to sell such beer, intoxicating liquor, 17074
or alcohol, shall sell, keep, or possess beer, intoxicating 17075

S. B. No. 197 Page 587
As Introduced
liquor, or alcohol for sale to any persons other than those 17076
authorized by Chapters 4301. and 4303. of the Revised Code to 17077
purchase any beer or intoxicating liquor, or sell any alcohol at 17078
retail. 17079
(D) No person, personally or by the person's clerk, agent, 17080
or employee, who is the holder of a permit issued by the 17081
division, shall sell, keep, or possess for sale any intoxicating 17082
liquor not purchased from the division or from the holder of a 17083
permit issued by the division authorizing the sale of such 17084
intoxicating liquor unless the same has been purchased with the 17085
special consent of the division. The division shall revoke the 17086
permit of any person convicted of a violation of division (C) of 17087
this section. 17088
(E) Division (C) of this section does not apply to either 17089
of the following: 17090
(1) The sale or possession for sale of any low-alcohol 17091
beverage; 17092
(2) Beer and intoxicating liquor that is given away if all 17093
of the following apply: 17094
(a) The beer or intoxicating liquor is given away by a 17095
charitable or political organization to a participant in a 17096
fundraiser. 17097
(b) Any beer, wine, or mixed beverages given away via the 17098
fundraiser is purchased from a person issued a permit under 17099
Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code. 17100
(c) Any spirituous liquor given away via the fundraiser is 17101
purchased from an agency store located in this state. 17102
(d) Regarding any spirituous liquor donated to the 17103

S. B. No. 197 Page 588
As Introduced
charitable or political organization for purposes of the 17104
fundraiser, the donor is not an agency store located in this 17105
state and submits to the charitable or political organization 17106
receipts showing that the donor purchased the spirituous liquor 17107
from an agency store located in this state. 17108
(e) The charitable or political organization submits 17109
purchase receipts for the spirituous liquor given away via a 17110
fundraiser to the division of liquor control as proof that the 17111
spirituous liquor was purchased from an agency store located in 17112
this state. The charitable or political organization shall 17113
submit the receipts in accordance with procedures that the 17114
division shall establish. 17115
Sec. 4303.17. (A)(1) Permit D-4 may be issued to a club 17116
that has been in existence for three years or more prior to the 17117
issuance of the permit to sell beer and any intoxicating liquor 17118
to its members only, in glass or container, for consumption on 17119
the premises where sold. The fee for this permit is four hundred 17120
sixty-nine dollars. 17121
No D-4 permit shall be granted or retained until all 17122
elected officers of the organization controlling the club have 17123
filed with the division of liquor control a statement certifying 17124
that the club is operated in the interest of the membership of a 17125
reputable organization, which is maintained by a dues paying 17126
membership, and setting forth the amount of initiation fee and 17127
yearly dues. 17128
The roster of membership of a D-4 permit holder shall be 17129
submitted at the request of the superintendent of liquor 17130
control. Any information acquired by the superintendent or the 17131
division with respect to that membership shall not be open to 17132
public inspection or examination and may be divulged by the 17133

S. B. No. 197 Page 589
As Introduced
superintendent and the division only in hearings before the 17134
liquor control commission or in a court action in which the 17135
division or the superintendent is named a party. 17136
(2) The requirement that a club shall have been in 17137
existence for three years in order to qualify for a D-4 permit 17138
does not apply to units of organizations chartered by congress 17139
or to a subsidiary unit of a national fraternal organization if 17140
the parent organization has been in existence for three years or 17141
more at the time application for a permit is made by that unit. 17142
(B) No rule or order of the division or commission shall 17143
prohibit a charitable organization that holds a D-4 permit from 17144
selling or serving beer or intoxicating liquor under its permit 17145
in a portion of its premises merely because that portion of its 17146
premises is used for the conduct of a bingo game as described in 17147
division (O)(1) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code. As used 17148
in this division, "bingo" and "charitable organization" has have 17149
the same meaning meanings as in division (H) of section 2915.01 17150
3768.01 of the Revised Code. 17151
(C) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of sections 17152
4301.32 to 4301.41, division (C)(1) of section 4303.29, and 17153
section 4305.14 of the Revised Code, the holder of a D-4 permit 17154
may transfer the location of the permit and sell beer and wine 17155
at the new location if that location is in an election precinct 17156
in which the sale of beer and wine, but not spirituous liquor, 17157
otherwise is permitted by law. 17158
Sec. 5701.11. The effective date to which this section 17159
refers is the effective date of this section as amended by H.B. 17160
14 of the 136th general assembly. 17161
(A)(1) Except as provided under division (A)(2) or (B) of 17162

S. B. No. 197 Page 590
As Introduced
this section, any reference in Title LVII or section 149.311, 17163
718.031, 3123.90, 3770.07, 3770.071, 3770.072, 3770.073, or 17164
3772.37 of the Revised Code to the Internal Revenue Code, to the 17165
Internal Revenue Code "as amended," to other laws of the United 17166
States, or to other laws of the United States, "as amended," 17167
means the Internal Revenue Code or other laws of the United 17168
States as they exist on the effective date. 17169
(2) This section does not apply to any reference in Title 17170
LVII of the Revised Code to the Internal Revenue Code as of a 17171
date certain specifying the day, month, and year, or to other 17172
laws of the United States as of a date certain specifying the 17173
day, month, and year. 17174
(B)(1) For purposes of applying section 5733.04, 5745.01, 17175
or 5747.01 of the Revised Code to a taxpayer's taxable year 17176
ending after March 15, 2023, and before the effective date, a 17177
taxpayer may irrevocably elect to incorporate the provisions of 17178
the Internal Revenue Code or other laws of the United States 17179
that are in effect for federal income tax purposes for that 17180
taxable year if those provisions differ from the provisions 17181
that, under division (A) of this section, would otherwise apply. 17182
The filing by the taxpayer for that taxable year of a report or 17183
return that incorporates the provisions of the Internal Revenue 17184
Code or other laws of the United States applicable for federal 17185
income tax purposes for that taxable year, and that does not 17186
include any adjustments to reverse the effects of any 17187
differences between those provisions and the provisions that 17188
would otherwise apply, constitutes the making of an irrevocable 17189
election under this division for that taxable year. 17190
(2) Elections under prior versions of division (B)(1) of 17191
this section remain in effect for the taxable years to which 17192

S. B. No. 197 Page 591
As Introduced
they apply. 17193
Sec. 5747.01. Except as otherwise expressly provided or 17194
clearly appearing from the context, any term used in this 17195
chapter that is not otherwise defined in this section has the 17196
same meaning as when used in a comparable context in the laws of 17197
the United States relating to federal income taxes or if not 17198
used in a comparable context in those laws, has the same meaning 17199
as in section 5733.40 of the Revised Code. Any reference in this 17200
chapter to the Internal Revenue Code includes other laws of the 17201
United States relating to federal income taxes. 17202
As used in this chapter: 17203
(A) "Adjusted gross income" or "Ohio adjusted gross 17204
income" means federal adjusted gross income, as defined and used 17205
in the Internal Revenue Code, adjusted as provided in this 17206
section: 17207
(1) Add interest or dividends on obligations or securities 17208
of any state or of any political subdivision or authority of any 17209
state, other than this state and its subdivisions and 17210
authorities. 17211
(2) Add interest or dividends on obligations of any 17212
authority, commission, instrumentality, territory, or possession 17213
of the United States to the extent that the interest or 17214
dividends are exempt from federal income taxes but not from 17215
state income taxes. 17216
(3) Deduct interest or dividends on obligations of the 17217
United States and its territories and possessions or of any 17218
authority, commission, or instrumentality of the United States 17219
to the extent that the interest or dividends are included in 17220
federal adjusted gross income but exempt from state income taxes 17221

S. B. No. 197 Page 592
As Introduced
under the laws of the United States. 17222
(4) Deduct disability and survivor's benefits to the 17223
extent included in federal adjusted gross income. 17224
(5) Deduct the following, to the extent not otherwise 17225
deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross 17226
income: 17227
(a) Benefits under Title II of the Social Security Act and 17228
tier 1 railroad retirement; 17229
(b) Railroad retirement benefits, other than tier 1 17230
railroad retirement benefits, to the extent such amounts are 17231
exempt from state taxation under federal law. 17232
(6) Deduct the amount of wages and salaries, if any, not 17233
otherwise allowable as a deduction but that would have been 17234
allowable as a deduction in computing federal adjusted gross 17235
income for the taxable year, had the work opportunity tax credit 17236
allowed and determined under sections 38, 51, and 52 of the 17237
Internal Revenue Code not been in effect. 17238
(7) Deduct any interest or interest equivalent on public 17239
obligations and purchase obligations to the extent that the 17240
interest or interest equivalent is included in federal adjusted 17241
gross income. 17242
(8) Add any loss or deduct any gain resulting from the 17243
sale, exchange, or other disposition of public obligations to 17244
the extent that the loss has been deducted or the gain has been 17245
included in computing federal adjusted gross income. 17246
(9) Deduct or add amounts, as provided under section 17247
5747.70 of the Revised Code, related to contributions made to or 17248
tuition units purchased under a qualified tuition program 17249

S. B. No. 197 Page 593
As Introduced
established pursuant to section 529 of the Internal Revenue 17250
Code. 17251
(10)(a) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise allowable as a 17252
deduction or exclusion in computing federal or Ohio adjusted 17253
gross income for the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer paid 17254
during the taxable year for medical care insurance and qualified 17255
long-term care insurance for the taxpayer, the taxpayer's 17256
spouse, and dependents. No deduction for medical care insurance 17257
under division (A)(10)(a) of this section shall be allowed 17258
either to any taxpayer who is eligible to participate in any 17259
subsidized health plan maintained by any employer of the 17260
taxpayer or of the taxpayer's spouse, or to any taxpayer who is 17261
entitled to, or on application would be entitled to, benefits 17262
under part A of Title XVIII of the "Social Security Act," 49 17263
Stat. 620 (1935), 42 U.S.C. 301, as amended. For the purposes of 17264
division (A)(10)(a) of this section, "subsidized health plan" 17265
means a health plan for which the employer pays any portion of 17266
the plan's cost. The deduction allowed under division (A)(10)(a) 17267
of this section shall be the net of any related premium refunds, 17268
related premium reimbursements, or related insurance premium 17269
dividends received during the taxable year. 17270
(b) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17271
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income 17272
during the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer paid during the 17273
taxable year, not compensated for by any insurance or otherwise, 17274
for medical care of the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and 17275
dependents, to the extent the expenses exceed seven and one-half 17276
per cent of the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income. 17277
(c) For purposes of division (A)(10) of this section, 17278
"medical care" has the meaning given in section 213 of the 17279

S. B. No. 197 Page 594
As Introduced
Internal Revenue Code, subject to the special rules, 17280
limitations, and exclusions set forth therein, and "qualified 17281
long-term care" has the same meaning given in section 7702B(c) 17282
of the Internal Revenue Code. Solely for purposes of division 17283
(A)(10)(a) of this section, "dependent" includes a person who 17284
otherwise would be a "qualifying relative" and thus a 17285
"dependent" under section 152 of the Internal Revenue Code but 17286
for the fact that the person fails to meet the income and 17287
support limitations under section 152(d)(1)(B) and (C) of the 17288
Internal Revenue Code. 17289
(11)(a) Deduct any amount included in federal adjusted 17290
gross income solely because the amount represents a 17291
reimbursement or refund of expenses that in any year the 17292
taxpayer had deducted as an itemized deduction pursuant to 17293
section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable United 17294
States department of the treasury regulations. The deduction 17295
otherwise allowed under division (A)(11)(a) of this section 17296
shall be reduced to the extent the reimbursement is attributable 17297
to an amount the taxpayer deducted under this section in any 17298
taxable year. 17299
(b) Add any amount not otherwise included in Ohio adjusted 17300
gross income for any taxable year to the extent that the amount 17301
is attributable to the recovery during the taxable year of any 17302
amount deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio 17303
adjusted gross income in any taxable year. 17304
(12) Deduct any portion of the deduction described in 17305
section 1341(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, for repaying 17306
previously reported income received under a claim of right, that 17307
meets both of the following requirements: 17308
(a) It is allowable for repayment of an item that was 17309

S. B. No. 197 Page 595
As Introduced
included in the taxpayer's adjusted gross income for a prior 17310
taxable year and did not qualify for a credit under division (A) 17311
or (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code for that year; 17312
(b) It does not otherwise reduce the taxpayer's adjusted 17313
gross income for the current or any other taxable year. 17314
(13) Deduct an amount equal to the deposits made to, and 17315
net investment earnings of, a medical savings account during the 17316
taxable year, in accordance with section 3924.66 of the Revised 17317
Code. The deduction allowed by division (A)(13) of this section 17318
does not apply to medical savings account deposits and earnings 17319
otherwise deducted or excluded for the current or any other 17320
taxable year from the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income. 17321
(14)(a) Add an amount equal to the funds withdrawn from a 17322
medical savings account during the taxable year, and the net 17323
investment earnings on those funds, when the funds withdrawn 17324
were used for any purpose other than to reimburse an account 17325
holder for, or to pay, eligible medical expenses, in accordance 17326
with section 3924.66 of the Revised Code; 17327
(b) Add the amounts distributed from a medical savings 17328
account under division (A)(2) of section 3924.68 of the Revised 17329
Code during the taxable year. 17330
(15) Add any amount claimed as a credit under section 17331
5747.059 of the Revised Code to the extent that such amount 17332
satisfies either of the following: 17333
(a) The amount was deducted or excluded from the 17334
computation of the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income as 17335
required to be reported for the taxpayer's taxable year under 17336
the Internal Revenue Code; 17337
(b) The amount resulted in a reduction of the taxpayer's 17338

S. B. No. 197 Page 596
As Introduced
federal adjusted gross income as required to be reported for any 17339
of the taxpayer's taxable years under the Internal Revenue Code. 17340
(16) Deduct the amount contributed by the taxpayer to an 17341
individual development account program established by a county 17342
department of job and family services pursuant to sections 17343
329.11 to 329.14 of the Revised Code for the purpose of matching 17344
funds deposited by program participants. On request of the tax 17345
commissioner, the taxpayer shall provide any information that, 17346
in the tax commissioner's opinion, is necessary to establish the 17347
amount deducted under division (A)(16) of this section. 17348
(17)(a)(i) Subject to divisions (A)(17)(a)(iii), (iv), and 17349
(v) of this section, add five-sixths of the amount of 17350
depreciation expense allowed by subsection (k) of section 168 of 17351
the Internal Revenue Code, including the taxpayer's 17352
proportionate or distributive share of the amount of 17353
depreciation expense allowed by that subsection to a pass- 17354
through entity in which the taxpayer has a direct or indirect 17355
ownership interest. 17356
(ii) Subject to divisions (A)(17)(a)(iii), (iv), and (v) 17357
of this section, add five-sixths of the amount of qualifying 17358
section 179 depreciation expense, including the taxpayer's 17359
proportionate or distributive share of the amount of qualifying 17360
section 179 depreciation expense allowed to any pass-through 17361
entity in which the taxpayer has a direct or indirect ownership 17362
interest. 17363
(iii) Subject to division (A)(17)(a)(v) of this section, 17364
for taxable years beginning in 2012 or thereafter, if the 17365
increase in income taxes withheld by the taxpayer is equal to or 17366
greater than ten per cent of income taxes withheld by the 17367
taxpayer during the taxpayer's immediately preceding taxable 17368

S. B. No. 197 Page 597
As Introduced
year, "two-thirds" shall be substituted for "five-sixths" for 17369
the purpose of divisions (A)(17)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section. 17370
(iv) Subject to division (A)(17)(a)(v) of this section, 17371
for taxable years beginning in 2012 or thereafter, a taxpayer is 17372
not required to add an amount under division (A)(17) of this 17373
section if the increase in income taxes withheld by the taxpayer 17374
and by any pass-through entity in which the taxpayer has a 17375
direct or indirect ownership interest is equal to or greater 17376
than the sum of (I) the amount of qualifying section 179 17377
depreciation expense and (II) the amount of depreciation expense 17378
allowed to the taxpayer by subsection (k) of section 168 of the 17379
Internal Revenue Code, and including the taxpayer's 17380
proportionate or distributive shares of such amounts allowed to 17381
any such pass-through entities. 17382
(v) If a taxpayer directly or indirectly incurs a net 17383
operating loss for the taxable year for federal income tax 17384
purposes, to the extent such loss resulted from depreciation 17385
expense allowed by subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal 17386
Revenue Code and by qualifying section 179 depreciation expense, 17387
"the entire" shall be substituted for "five-sixths of the" for 17388
the purpose of divisions (A)(17)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section. 17389
The tax commissioner, under procedures established by the 17390
commissioner, may waive the add-backs related to a pass-through 17391
entity if the taxpayer owns, directly or indirectly, less than 17392
five per cent of the pass-through entity. 17393
(b) Nothing in division (A)(17) of this section shall be 17394
construed to adjust or modify the adjusted basis of any asset. 17395
(c) To the extent the add-back required under division (A) 17396
(17)(a) of this section is attributable to property generating 17397

S. B. No. 197 Page 598
As Introduced
nonbusiness income or loss allocated under section 5747.20 of 17398
the Revised Code, the add-back shall be sitused to the same 17399
location as the nonbusiness income or loss generated by the 17400
property for the purpose of determining the credit under 17401
division (A) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code. Otherwise, 17402
the add-back shall be apportioned, subject to one or more of the 17403
four alternative methods of apportionment enumerated in section 17404
5747.21 of the Revised Code. 17405
(d) For the purposes of division (A)(17)(a)(v) of this 17406
section, net operating loss carryback and carryforward shall not 17407
include the allowance of any net operating loss deduction 17408
carryback or carryforward to the taxable year to the extent such 17409
loss resulted from depreciation allowed by section 168(k) of the 17410
Internal Revenue Code and by the qualifying section 179 17411
depreciation expense amount. 17412
(e) For the purposes of divisions (A)(17) and (18) of this 17413
section: 17414
(i) "Income taxes withheld" means the total amount 17415
withheld and remitted under sections 5747.06 and 5747.07 of the 17416
Revised Code by an employer during the employer's taxable year. 17417
(ii) "Increase in income taxes withheld" means the amount 17418
by which the amount of income taxes withheld by an employer 17419
during the employer's current taxable year exceeds the amount of 17420
income taxes withheld by that employer during the employer's 17421
immediately preceding taxable year. 17422
(iii) "Qualifying section 179 depreciation expense" means 17423
the difference between (I) the amount of depreciation expense 17424
directly or indirectly allowed to a taxpayer under section 179 17425
of the Internal Revised Code, and (II) the amount of 17426

S. B. No. 197 Page 599
As Introduced
depreciation expense directly or indirectly allowed to the 17427
taxpayer under section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code as that 17428
section existed on December 31, 2002. 17429
(18)(a) If the taxpayer was required to add an amount 17430
under division (A)(17)(a) of this section for a taxable year, 17431
deduct one of the following: 17432
(i) One-fifth of the amount so added for each of the five 17433
succeeding taxable years if the amount so added was five-sixths 17434
of qualifying section 179 depreciation expense or depreciation 17435
expense allowed by subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal 17436
Revenue Code; 17437
(ii) One-half of the amount so added for each of the two 17438
succeeding taxable years if the amount so added was two-thirds 17439
of such depreciation expense; 17440
(iii) One-sixth of the amount so added for each of the six 17441
succeeding taxable years if the entire amount of such 17442
depreciation expense was so added. 17443
(b) If the amount deducted under division (A)(18)(a) of 17444
this section is attributable to an add-back allocated under 17445
division (A)(17)(c) of this section, the amount deducted shall 17446
be sitused to the same location. Otherwise, the add-back shall 17447
be apportioned using the apportionment factors for the taxable 17448
year in which the deduction is taken, subject to one or more of 17449
the four alternative methods of apportionment enumerated in 17450
section 5747.21 of the Revised Code. 17451
(c) No deduction is available under division (A)(18)(a) of 17452
this section with regard to any depreciation allowed by section 17453
168(k) of the Internal Revenue Code and by the qualifying 17454
section 179 depreciation expense amount to the extent that such 17455

S. B. No. 197 Page 600
As Introduced
depreciation results in or increases a federal net operating 17456
loss carryback or carryforward. If no such deduction is 17457
available for a taxable year, the taxpayer may carry forward the 17458
amount not deducted in such taxable year to the next taxable 17459
year and add that amount to any deduction otherwise available 17460
under division (A)(18)(a) of this section for that next taxable 17461
year. The carryforward of amounts not so deducted shall continue 17462
until the entire addition required by division (A)(17)(a) of 17463
this section has been deducted. 17464
(19) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17465
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for 17466
the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received during the 17467
taxable year as reimbursement for life insurance premiums under 17468
section 5919.31 of the Revised Code. 17469
(20) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17470
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for 17471
the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received during the 17472
taxable year as a death benefit paid by the adjutant general 17473
under section 5919.33 of the Revised Code. 17474
(21) Deduct, to the extent included in federal adjusted 17475
gross income and not otherwise allowable as a deduction or 17476
exclusion in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for 17477
the taxable year, military pay and allowances received by the 17478
taxpayer during the taxable year for active duty service in the 17479
United States army, air force, navy, marine corps, or coast 17480
guard or reserve components thereof or the national guard. The 17481
deduction may not be claimed for military pay and allowances 17482
received by the taxpayer while the taxpayer is stationed in this 17483
state. 17484
(22) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise allowable as a 17485

S. B. No. 197 Page 601
As Introduced
deduction or exclusion in computing federal or Ohio adjusted 17486
gross income for the taxable year and not otherwise compensated 17487
for by any other source, the amount of qualified organ donation 17488
expenses incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year, not 17489
to exceed ten thousand dollars. A taxpayer may deduct qualified 17490
organ donation expenses only once for all taxable years 17491
beginning with taxable years beginning in 2007. 17492
For the purposes of division (A)(22) of this section: 17493
(a) "Human organ" means all or any portion of a human 17494
liver, pancreas, kidney, intestine, or lung, and any portion of 17495
human bone marrow. 17496
(b) "Qualified organ donation expenses" means travel 17497
expenses, lodging expenses, and wages and salary forgone by a 17498
taxpayer in connection with the taxpayer's donation, while 17499
living, of one or more of the taxpayer's human organs to another 17500
human being. 17501
(23) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17502
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for 17503
the taxable year, amounts received by the taxpayer as retired 17504
personnel pay for service in the uniformed services or reserve 17505
components thereof, or the national guard, or received by the 17506
surviving spouse or former spouse of such a taxpayer under the 17507
survivor benefit plan on account of such a taxpayer's death. If 17508
the taxpayer receives income on account of retirement paid under 17509
the federal civil service retirement system or federal employees 17510
retirement system, or under any successor retirement program 17511
enacted by the congress of the United States that is established 17512
and maintained for retired employees of the United States 17513
government, and such retirement income is based, in whole or in 17514
part, on credit for the taxpayer's uniformed service, the 17515

S. B. No. 197 Page 602
As Introduced
deduction allowed under this division shall include only that 17516
portion of such retirement income that is attributable to the 17517
taxpayer's uniformed service, to the extent that portion of such 17518
retirement income is otherwise included in federal adjusted 17519
gross income and is not otherwise deducted under this section. 17520
Any amount deducted under division (A)(23) of this section is 17521
not included in a taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the 17522
purposes of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code. No amount may 17523
be deducted under division (A)(23) of this section on the basis 17524
of which a credit was claimed under section 5747.055 of the 17525
Revised Code. 17526
(24) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17527
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for 17528
the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received during the 17529
taxable year from the military injury relief fund created in 17530
section 5902.05 of the Revised Code. 17531
(25) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17532
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for 17533
the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received as a veterans 17534
bonus during the taxable year from the Ohio department of 17535
veterans services as authorized by Section 2r of Article VIII, 17536
Ohio Constitution. 17537
(26) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17538
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for 17539
the taxable year, any income derived from a transfer agreement 17540
or from the enterprise transferred under that agreement under 17541
section 4313.02 of the Revised Code. 17542
(27) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17543
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for 17544
the taxable year, Ohio college opportunity or federal Pell grant 17545

S. B. No. 197 Page 603
As Introduced
amounts received by the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse or 17546
dependent pursuant to section 3333.122 of the Revised Code or 20 17547
U.S.C. 1070a, et seq., and used to pay room or board furnished 17548
by the educational institution for which the grant was awarded 17549
at the institution's facilities, including meal plans 17550
administered by the institution. For the purposes of this 17551
division, receipt of a grant includes the distribution of a 17552
grant directly to an educational institution and the crediting 17553
of the grant to the enrollee's account with the institution. 17554
(28) Deduct from the portion of an individual's federal 17555
adjusted gross income that is business income, to the extent not 17556
otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal adjusted 17557
gross income for the taxable year, one hundred twenty-five 17558
thousand dollars for each spouse if spouses file separate 17559
returns under section 5747.08 of the Revised Code or two hundred 17560
fifty thousand dollars for all other individuals. 17561
(29) Deduct, as provided under section 5747.78 of the 17562
Revised Code, contributions to ABLE savings accounts made in 17563
accordance with sections 113.50 to 113.56 of the Revised Code. 17564
(30)(a) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17565
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income 17566
during the taxable year, all of the following: 17567
(i) Compensation paid to a qualifying employee described 17568
in division (A)(14)(a) of section 5703.94 of the Revised Code to 17569
the extent such compensation is for disaster work conducted in 17570
this state during a disaster response period pursuant to a 17571
qualifying solicitation received by the employee's employer; 17572
(ii) Compensation paid to a qualifying employee described 17573
in division (A)(14)(b) of section 5703.94 of the Revised Code to 17574

S. B. No. 197 Page 604
As Introduced
the extent such compensation is for disaster work conducted in 17575
this state by the employee during the disaster response period 17576
on critical infrastructure owned or used by the employee's 17577
employer; 17578
(iii) Income received by an out-of-state disaster business 17579
for disaster work conducted in this state during a disaster 17580
response period, or, if the out-of-state disaster business is a 17581
pass-through entity, a taxpayer's distributive share of the 17582
pass-through entity's income from the business conducting 17583
disaster work in this state during a disaster response period, 17584
if, in either case, the disaster work is conducted pursuant to a 17585
qualifying solicitation received by the business. 17586
(b) All terms used in division (A)(30) of this section 17587
have the same meanings as in section 5703.94 of the Revised 17588
Code. 17589
(31) For a taxpayer who is a qualifying Ohio educator, 17590
deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in 17591
computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable 17592
year, the lesser of two hundred fifty dollars or the amount of 17593
expenses described in subsections (a)(2)(D)(i) and (ii) of 17594
section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code paid or incurred by the 17595
taxpayer during the taxpayer's taxable year in excess of the 17596
amount the taxpayer is authorized to deduct for that taxable 17597
year under subsection (a)(2)(D) of that section. 17598
(32) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17599
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for 17600
the taxable year, amounts received by the taxpayer as a 17601
disability severance payment, computed under 10 U.S.C. 1212, 17602
following discharge or release under honorable conditions from 17603
the armed forces of the United States, as defined in section 17604

S. B. No. 197 Page 605
As Introduced
5907.01 of the Revised Code. 17605
(33) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17606
excluded in computing federal adjusted gross income or Ohio 17607
adjusted gross income, amounts not subject to tax due to an 17608
agreement entered into under division (A)(2) of section 5747.05 17609
of the Revised Code. 17610
(34) Deduct amounts as provided under section 5747.79 of 17611
the Revised Code related to the taxpayer's qualifying capital 17612
gains and deductible payroll. 17613
To the extent a qualifying capital gain described under 17614
division (A)(34) of this section is business income, the 17615
taxpayer shall deduct those gains under this division before 17616
deducting any such gains under division (A)(28) of this section. 17617
(35)(a) For taxable years beginning in or after 2026, 17618
deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in 17619
computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable 17620
year: 17621
(i) One hundred per cent of the capital gain received by 17622
the taxpayer in the taxable year from a qualifying interest in 17623
an Ohio venture capital operating company attributable to the 17624
company's investments in Ohio businesses during the period for 17625
which the company was an Ohio venture operating company; and 17626
(ii) Fifty per cent of the capital gain received by the 17627
taxpayer in the taxable year from a qualifying interest in an 17628
Ohio venture capital operating company attributable to the 17629
company's investments in all other businesses during the period 17630
for which the company was an Ohio venture operating company. 17631
(b) Add amounts previously deducted by the taxpayer under 17632
division (A)(35)(a) of this section if the director of 17633

S. B. No. 197 Page 606
As Introduced
development certifies to the tax commissioner that the 17634
requirements for the deduction were not met. 17635
(c) All terms used in division (A)(35) of this section 17636
have the same meanings as in section 122.851 of the Revised 17637
Code. 17638
(d) To the extent a capital gain described in division (A) 17639
(35)(a) of this section is business income, the taxpayer shall 17640
apply that division before applying division (A)(28) of this 17641
section. 17642
(36) Add, to the extent not otherwise included in 17643
computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for any taxable 17644
year, the taxpayer's proportionate share of the amount of the 17645
tax levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code and paid by 17646
an electing pass-through entity for the taxable year. 17647
Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the 17648
contrary, the portion of the addition required by division (A) 17649
(36) of this section related to the apportioned business income 17650
of the pass-through entity shall be considered business income 17651
under division (B) of this section. Such addition is eligible 17652
for the deduction in division (A)(28) of this section, subject 17653
to the applicable dollar limitations, and the tax rate 17654
prescribed by division (A)(4)(a) of section 5747.02 of the 17655
Revised Code. The taxpayer shall provide, upon request of the 17656
tax commissioner, any documentation necessary to verify the 17657
portion of the addition that is business income under this 17658
division. 17659
(37) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17660
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for 17661
the taxable year, amounts delivered to a qualifying institution 17662

S. B. No. 197 Page 607
As Introduced
pursuant to section 3333.128 of the Revised Code for the benefit 17663
of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse or dependent. 17664
(38) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or 17665
excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for 17666
the taxable year, amounts received under the Ohio adoption grant 17667
program pursuant to section 5101.191 of the Revised Code. 17668
(39) Deduct, to the extent included in federal adjusted 17669
gross income, income attributable to amounts provided to a 17670
taxpayer for any of the purposes for which an exclusion would 17671
have been authorized under section 139 of the Internal Revenue 17672
Code if the train derailment near the city of East Palestine on 17673
February 3, 2023, had been a qualified disaster pursuant to that 17674
section, or to compensate for lost business resulting from that 17675
derailment, if such amounts are provided by any of the 17676
following: 17677
(a) A federal, state, or local government agency; 17678
(b) A railroad company, as that term is defined in section 17679
5727.01 of the Revised Code; 17680
(c) Any subsidiary, insurer, or agent of a railroad 17681
company or any related person. 17682
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the 17683
derailment is not required to meet the definition of a 17684
"qualified disaster" pursuant to section 139 of the Internal 17685
Revenue Code to qualify for the deduction under this section. 17686
(40) Deduct, to the extent included in federal adjusted 17687
gross income, income attributable to loan repayments on behalf 17688
of the taxpayer under the rural practice incentive program under 17689
section 3333.135 of the Revised Code. 17690

S. B. No. 197 Page 608
As Introduced
(41) Add any income taxes deducted in computing federal or 17691
Ohio adjusted gross income to the extent the income taxes were 17692
derived from income subject to a tax levied in another state or 17693
the District of Columbia when such tax was enacted for purposes 17694
of complying with internal revenue service notice 2020-75. 17695
Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the 17696
contrary, the portion of the addition required by division (A) 17697
(41) of this section related to the apportioned business income 17698
of the pass-through entity shall be considered business income 17699
under division (B) of this section. Such addition is eligible 17700
for the deduction in division (A)(28) of this section, subject 17701
to the applicable dollar limitations, and the tax rate 17702
prescribed by division (A)(4)(a) of section 5747.02 of the 17703
Revised Code. The taxpayer shall provide, upon request of the 17704
tax commissioner, any documentation necessary to verify the 17705
portion of the addition that is business income under this 17706
division. 17707
(42) Deduct amounts contributed to a homeownership savings 17708
account and calculated pursuant to divisions (B) and (C) of 17709
section 5747.85 of the Revised Code. 17710
(43) If the taxpayer is the account owner, add the amount 17711
of funds withdrawn from a homeownership savings account not used 17712
for eligible expenses, regardless of who deposited those funds. 17713
As used in division (A)(43) of this section, "homeownership 17714
savings account," "account owner," and "eligible expenses" have 17715
the same meanings as in section 5747.85 of the Revised Code. 17716
(B) "Business income" means income, including gain or 17717
loss, arising from transactions, activities, and sources in the 17718
regular course of a trade or business and includes income, gain, 17719
or loss from real property, tangible property, and intangible 17720

S. B. No. 197 Page 609
As Introduced
property if the acquisition, rental, management, and disposition 17721
of the property constitute integral parts of the regular course 17722
of a trade or business operation. "Business income" includes 17723
income, including gain or loss, from a partial or complete 17724
liquidation of a business, including, but not limited to, gain 17725
or loss from the sale or other disposition of goodwill or the 17726
sale of an equity or ownership interest in a business. 17727
As used in this division, the "sale of an equity or 17728
ownership interest in a business" means sales to which either or 17729
both of the following apply: 17730
(1) The sale is treated for federal income tax purposes as 17731
the sale of assets. 17732
(2) The seller materially participated, as described in 26 17733
C.F.R. 1.469-5T, in the activities of the business during the 17734
taxable year in which the sale occurs or during any of the five 17735
preceding taxable years. 17736
(C) "Nonbusiness income" means all income other than 17737
business income and may include, but is not limited to, 17738
compensation, rents and royalties from real or tangible personal 17739
property, capital gains, interest, dividends and distributions, 17740
patent or copyright royalties, or lottery winnings, prizes, and 17741
awards. 17742
(D) "Compensation" means any form of remuneration paid to 17743
an employee for personal services. 17744
(E) "Fiduciary" means a guardian, trustee, executor, 17745
administrator, receiver, conservator, or any other person acting 17746
in any fiduciary capacity for any individual, trust, or estate. 17747
(F) "Fiscal year" means an accounting period of twelve 17748
months ending on the last day of any month other than December. 17749

S. B. No. 197 Page 610
As Introduced
(G) "Individual" means any natural person. 17750
(H) "Internal Revenue Code" means the "Internal Revenue 17751
Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 1, as amended. 17752
(I) "Resident" means any of the following: 17753
(1) An individual who is domiciled in this state, subject 17754
to section 5747.24 of the Revised Code; 17755
(2) The estate of a decedent who at the time of death was 17756
domiciled in this state. The domicile tests of section 5747.24 17757
of the Revised Code are not controlling for purposes of division 17758
(I)(2) of this section. 17759
(3) A trust that, in whole or part, resides in this state. 17760
If only part of a trust resides in this state, the trust is a 17761
resident only with respect to that part. 17762
For the purposes of division (I)(3) of this section: 17763
(a) A trust resides in this state for the trust's current 17764
taxable year to the extent, as described in division (I)(3)(d) 17765
of this section, that the trust consists directly or indirectly, 17766
in whole or in part, of assets, net of any related liabilities, 17767
that were transferred, or caused to be transferred, directly or 17768
indirectly, to the trust by any of the following: 17769
(i) A person, a court, or a governmental entity or 17770
instrumentality on account of the death of a decedent, but only 17771
if the trust is described in division (I)(3)(e)(i) or (ii) of 17772
this section; 17773
(ii) A person who was domiciled in this state for the 17774
purposes of this chapter when the person directly or indirectly 17775
transferred assets to an irrevocable trust, but only if at least 17776
one of the trust's qualifying beneficiaries is domiciled in this 17777

S. B. No. 197 Page 611
As Introduced
state for the purposes of this chapter during all or some 17778
portion of the trust's current taxable year; 17779
(iii) A person who was domiciled in this state for the 17780
purposes of this chapter when the trust document or instrument 17781
or part of the trust document or instrument became irrevocable, 17782
but only if at least one of the trust's qualifying beneficiaries 17783
is a resident domiciled in this state for the purposes of this 17784
chapter during all or some portion of the trust's current 17785
taxable year. If a trust document or instrument became 17786
irrevocable upon the death of a person who at the time of death 17787
was domiciled in this state for purposes of this chapter, that 17788
person is a person described in division (I)(3)(a)(iii) of this 17789
section. 17790
(b) A trust is irrevocable to the extent that the 17791
transferor is not considered to be the owner of the net assets 17792
of the trust under sections 671 to 678 of the Internal Revenue 17793
Code. 17794
(c) With respect to a trust other than a charitable lead 17795
trust, "qualifying beneficiary" has the same meaning as 17796
"potential current beneficiary" as defined in section 1361(e)(2) 17797
of the Internal Revenue Code, and with respect to a charitable 17798
lead trust "qualifying beneficiary" is any current, future, or 17799
contingent beneficiary, but with respect to any trust 17800
"qualifying beneficiary" excludes a person or a governmental 17801
entity or instrumentality to any of which a contribution would 17802
qualify for the charitable deduction under section 170 of the 17803
Internal Revenue Code. 17804
(d) For the purposes of division (I)(3)(a) of this 17805
section, the extent to which a trust consists directly or 17806
indirectly, in whole or in part, of assets, net of any related 17807

S. B. No. 197 Page 612
As Introduced
liabilities, that were transferred directly or indirectly, in 17808
whole or part, to the trust by any of the sources enumerated in 17809
that division shall be ascertained by multiplying the fair 17810
market value of the trust's assets, net of related liabilities, 17811
by the qualifying ratio, which shall be computed as follows: 17812
(i) The first time the trust receives assets, the 17813
numerator of the qualifying ratio is the fair market value of 17814
those assets at that time, net of any related liabilities, from 17815
sources enumerated in division (I)(3)(a) of this section. The 17816
denominator of the qualifying ratio is the fair market value of 17817
all the trust's assets at that time, net of any related 17818
liabilities. 17819
(ii) Each subsequent time the trust receives assets, a 17820
revised qualifying ratio shall be computed. The numerator of the 17821
revised qualifying ratio is the sum of (1) the fair market value 17822
of the trust's assets immediately prior to the subsequent 17823
transfer, net of any related liabilities, multiplied by the 17824
qualifying ratio last computed without regard to the subsequent 17825
transfer, and (2) the fair market value of the subsequently 17826
transferred assets at the time transferred, net of any related 17827
liabilities, from sources enumerated in division (I)(3)(a) of 17828
this section. The denominator of the revised qualifying ratio is 17829
the fair market value of all the trust's assets immediately 17830
after the subsequent transfer, net of any related liabilities. 17831
(iii) Whether a transfer to the trust is by or from any of 17832
the sources enumerated in division (I)(3)(a) of this section 17833
shall be ascertained without regard to the domicile of the 17834
trust's beneficiaries. 17835
(e) For the purposes of division (I)(3)(a)(i) of this 17836
section: 17837

S. B. No. 197 Page 613
As Introduced
(i) A trust is described in division (I)(3)(e)(i) of this 17838
section if the trust is a testamentary trust and the testator of 17839
that testamentary trust was domiciled in this state at the time 17840
of the testator's death for purposes of the taxes levied under 17841
Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code. 17842
(ii) A trust is described in division (I)(3)(e)(ii) of 17843
this section if the transfer is a qualifying transfer described 17844
in any of divisions (I)(3)(f)(i) to (vi) of this section, the 17845
trust is an irrevocable inter vivos trust, and at least one of 17846
the trust's qualifying beneficiaries is domiciled in this state 17847
for purposes of this chapter during all or some portion of the 17848
trust's current taxable year. 17849
(f) For the purposes of division (I)(3)(e)(ii) of this 17850
section, a "qualifying transfer" is a transfer of assets, net of 17851
any related liabilities, directly or indirectly to a trust, if 17852
the transfer is described in any of the following: 17853
(i) The transfer is made to a trust, created by the 17854
decedent before the decedent's death and while the decedent was 17855
domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter, and, 17856
prior to the death of the decedent, the trust became irrevocable 17857
while the decedent was domiciled in this state for the purposes 17858
of this chapter. 17859
(ii) The transfer is made to a trust to which the 17860
decedent, prior to the decedent's death, had directly or 17861
indirectly transferred assets, net of any related liabilities, 17862
while the decedent was domiciled in this state for the purposes 17863
of this chapter, and prior to the death of the decedent the 17864
trust became irrevocable while the decedent was domiciled in 17865
this state for the purposes of this chapter. 17866

S. B. No. 197 Page 614
As Introduced
(iii) The transfer is made on account of a contractual 17867
relationship existing directly or indirectly between the 17868
transferor and either the decedent or the estate of the decedent 17869
at any time prior to the date of the decedent's death, and the 17870
decedent was domiciled in this state at the time of death for 17871
purposes of the taxes levied under Chapter 5731. of the Revised 17872
Code. 17873
(iv) The transfer is made to a trust on account of a 17874
contractual relationship existing directly or indirectly between 17875
the transferor and another person who at the time of the 17876
decedent's death was domiciled in this state for purposes of 17877
this chapter. 17878
(v) The transfer is made to a trust on account of the will 17879
of a testator who was domiciled in this state at the time of the 17880
testator's death for purposes of the taxes levied under Chapter 17881
5731. of the Revised Code. 17882
(vi) The transfer is made to a trust created by or caused 17883
to be created by a court, and the trust was directly or 17884
indirectly created in connection with or as a result of the 17885
death of an individual who, for purposes of the taxes levied 17886
under Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code, was domiciled in this 17887
state at the time of the individual's death. 17888
(g) The tax commissioner may adopt rules to ascertain the 17889
part of a trust residing in this state. 17890
(J) "Nonresident" means an individual or estate that is 17891
not a resident. An individual who is a resident for only part of 17892
a taxable year is a nonresident for the remainder of that 17893
taxable year. 17894
(K) "Pass-through entity" has the same meaning as in 17895

S. B. No. 197 Page 615
As Introduced
section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. 17896
(L) "Return" means the notifications and reports required 17897
to be filed pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of 17898
reporting the tax due and includes declarations of estimated tax 17899
when so required. 17900
(M) "Taxable year" means the calendar year or the 17901
taxpayer's fiscal year ending during the calendar year, or 17902
fractional part thereof, upon which the adjusted gross income is 17903
calculated pursuant to this chapter. 17904
(N) "Taxpayer" means any person subject to the tax imposed 17905
by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code or any pass-through 17906
entity that makes the election under division (D) of section 17907
5747.08 of the Revised Code. 17908
(O) "Dependents" means one of the following: 17909
(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 17910
2018, and before January 1, 2026, dependents as defined in the 17911
Internal Revenue Code; 17912
(2) For all other taxable years, dependents as defined in 17913
the Internal Revenue Code and as claimed in the taxpayer's 17914
federal income tax return for the taxable year or which the 17915
taxpayer would have been permitted to claim had the taxpayer 17916
filed a federal income tax return. 17917
(P) "Principal county of employment" means, in the case of 17918
a nonresident, the county within the state in which a taxpayer 17919
performs services for an employer or, if those services are 17920
performed in more than one county, the county in which the major 17921
portion of the services are performed. 17922
(Q) As used in sections 5747.50 to 5747.55 of the Revised 17923

S. B. No. 197 Page 616
As Introduced
Code: 17924
(1) "Subdivision" means any county, municipal corporation, 17925
park district, or township. 17926
(2) "Essential local government purposes" includes all 17927
functions that any subdivision is required by general law to 17928
exercise, including like functions that are exercised under a 17929
charter adopted pursuant to the Ohio Constitution. 17930
(R) "Overpayment" means any amount already paid that 17931
exceeds the figure determined to be the correct amount of the 17932
tax. 17933
(S) "Taxable income" or "Ohio taxable income" applies only 17934
to estates and trusts, and means federal taxable income, as 17935
defined and used in the Internal Revenue Code, adjusted as 17936
follows: 17937
(1) Add interest or dividends, net of ordinary, necessary, 17938
and reasonable expenses not deducted in computing federal 17939
taxable income, on obligations or securities of any state or of 17940
any political subdivision or authority of any state, other than 17941
this state and its subdivisions and authorities, but only to the 17942
extent that such net amount is not otherwise includible in Ohio 17943
taxable income and is described in either division (S)(1)(a) or 17944
(b) of this section: 17945
(a) The net amount is not attributable to the S portion of 17946
an electing small business trust and has not been distributed to 17947
beneficiaries for the taxable year; 17948
(b) The net amount is attributable to the S portion of an 17949
electing small business trust for the taxable year. 17950
(2) Add interest or dividends, net of ordinary, necessary, 17951

S. B. No. 197 Page 617
As Introduced
and reasonable expenses not deducted in computing federal 17952
taxable income, on obligations of any authority, commission, 17953
instrumentality, territory, or possession of the United States 17954
to the extent that the interest or dividends are exempt from 17955
federal income taxes but not from state income taxes, but only 17956
to the extent that such net amount is not otherwise includible 17957
in Ohio taxable income and is described in either division (S) 17958
(1)(a) or (b) of this section; 17959
(3) Add the amount of personal exemption allowed to the 17960
estate pursuant to section 642(b) of the Internal Revenue Code; 17961
(4) Deduct interest or dividends, net of related expenses 17962
deducted in computing federal taxable income, on obligations of 17963
the United States and its territories and possessions or of any 17964
authority, commission, or instrumentality of the United States 17965
to the extent that the interest or dividends are exempt from 17966
state taxes under the laws of the United States, but only to the 17967
extent that such amount is included in federal taxable income 17968
and is described in either division (S)(1)(a) or (b) of this 17969
section; 17970
(5) Deduct the amount of wages and salaries, if any, not 17971
otherwise allowable as a deduction but that would have been 17972
allowable as a deduction in computing federal taxable income for 17973
the taxable year, had the work opportunity tax credit allowed 17974
under sections 38, 51, and 52 of the Internal Revenue Code not 17975
been in effect, but only to the extent such amount relates 17976
either to income included in federal taxable income for the 17977
taxable year or to income of the S portion of an electing small 17978
business trust for the taxable year; 17979
(6) Deduct any interest or interest equivalent, net of 17980
related expenses deducted in computing federal taxable income, 17981

S. B. No. 197 Page 618
As Introduced
on public obligations and purchase obligations, but only to the 17982
extent that such net amount relates either to income included in 17983
federal taxable income for the taxable year or to income of the 17984
S portion of an electing small business trust for the taxable 17985
year; 17986
(7) Add any loss or deduct any gain resulting from sale, 17987
exchange, or other disposition of public obligations to the 17988
extent that such loss has been deducted or such gain has been 17989
included in computing either federal taxable income or income of 17990
the S portion of an electing small business trust for the 17991
taxable year; 17992
(8) Except in the case of the final return of an estate, 17993
add any amount deducted by the taxpayer on both its Ohio estate 17994
tax return pursuant to section 5731.14 of the Revised Code, and 17995
on its federal income tax return in determining federal taxable 17996
income; 17997
(9)(a) Deduct any amount included in federal taxable 17998
income solely because the amount represents a reimbursement or 17999
refund of expenses that in a previous year the decedent had 18000
deducted as an itemized deduction pursuant to section 63 of the 18001
Internal Revenue Code and applicable treasury regulations. The 18002
deduction otherwise allowed under division (S)(9)(a) of this 18003
section shall be reduced to the extent the reimbursement is 18004
attributable to an amount the taxpayer or decedent deducted 18005
under this section in any taxable year. 18006
(b) Add any amount not otherwise included in Ohio taxable 18007
income for any taxable year to the extent that the amount is 18008
attributable to the recovery during the taxable year of any 18009
amount deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio taxable 18010
income in any taxable year, but only to the extent such amount 18011

S. B. No. 197 Page 619
As Introduced
has not been distributed to beneficiaries for the taxable year. 18012
(10) Deduct any portion of the deduction described in 18013
section 1341(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, for repaying 18014
previously reported income received under a claim of right, that 18015
meets both of the following requirements: 18016
(a) It is allowable for repayment of an item that was 18017
included in the taxpayer's taxable income or the decedent's 18018
adjusted gross income for a prior taxable year and did not 18019
qualify for a credit under division (A) or (B) of section 18020
5747.05 of the Revised Code for that year. 18021
(b) It does not otherwise reduce the taxpayer's taxable 18022
income or the decedent's adjusted gross income for the current 18023
or any other taxable year. 18024
(11) Add any amount claimed as a credit under section 18025
5747.059 of the Revised Code to the extent that the amount 18026
satisfies either of the following: 18027
(a) The amount was deducted or excluded from the 18028
computation of the taxpayer's federal taxable income as required 18029
to be reported for the taxpayer's taxable year under the 18030
Internal Revenue Code; 18031
(b) The amount resulted in a reduction in the taxpayer's 18032
federal taxable income as required to be reported for any of the 18033
taxpayer's taxable years under the Internal Revenue Code. 18034
(12) Deduct any amount, net of related expenses deducted 18035
in computing federal taxable income, that a trust is required to 18036
report as farm income on its federal income tax return, but only 18037
if the assets of the trust include at least ten acres of land 18038
satisfying the definition of "land devoted exclusively to 18039
agricultural use" under section 5713.30 of the Revised Code, 18040

S. B. No. 197 Page 620
As Introduced
regardless of whether the land is valued for tax purposes as 18041
such land under sections 5713.30 to 5713.38 of the Revised Code. 18042
If the trust is a pass-through entity investor, section 5747.231 18043
of the Revised Code applies in ascertaining if the trust is 18044
eligible to claim the deduction provided by division (S)(12) of 18045
this section in connection with the pass-through entity's farm 18046
income. 18047
Except for farm income attributable to the S portion of an 18048
electing small business trust, the deduction provided by 18049
division (S)(12) of this section is allowed only to the extent 18050
that the trust has not distributed such farm income. 18051
(13) Add the net amount of income described in section 18052
641(c) of the Internal Revenue Code to the extent that amount is 18053
not included in federal taxable income. 18054
(14) Deduct the amount the taxpayer would be required to 18055
deduct under division (A)(18) of this section if the taxpayer's 18056
Ohio taxable income were was computed in the same manner as an 18057
individual's Ohio adjusted gross income is computed under this 18058
section. 18059
(15) Add, to the extent not otherwise included in 18060
computing taxable income or Ohio taxable income for any taxable 18061
year, the taxpayer's proportionate share of the amount of the 18062
tax levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code and paid by 18063
an electing pass-through entity for the taxable year. 18064
(16) Add any income taxes deducted in computing federal 18065
taxable income or Ohio taxable income to the extent the income 18066
taxes were derived from income subject to a tax levied in 18067
another state or the District of Columbia when such tax was 18068
enacted for purposes of complying with internal revenue service 18069

S. B. No. 197 Page 621
As Introduced
notice 2020-75. 18070
(T) "School district income" and "school district income 18071
tax" have the same meanings as in section 5748.01 of the Revised 18072
Code. 18073
(U) As used in divisions (A)(7), (A)(8), (S)(6), and (S) 18074
(7) of this section, "public obligations," "purchase 18075
obligations," and "interest or interest equivalent" have the 18076
same meanings as in section 5709.76 of the Revised Code. 18077
(V) "Limited liability company" means any limited 18078
liability company formed under former Chapter 1705. of the 18079
Revised Code as that chapter existed prior to February 11, 2022, 18080
Chapter 1706. of the Revised Code, or the laws of any other 18081
state. 18082
(W) "Pass-through entity investor" means any person who, 18083
during any portion of a taxable year of a pass-through entity, 18084
is a partner, member, shareholder, or equity investor in that 18085
pass-through entity. 18086
(X) "Banking day" has the same meaning as in section 18087
1304.01 of the Revised Code. 18088
(Y) "Month" means a calendar month. 18089
(Z) "Quarter" means the first three months, the second 18090
three months, the third three months, or the last three months 18091
of the taxpayer's taxable year. 18092
(AA)(1) "Modified business income" means the business 18093
income included in a trust's Ohio taxable income after such 18094
taxable income is first reduced by the qualifying trust amount, 18095
if any. 18096
(2) "Qualifying trust amount" of a trust means capital 18097

S. B. No. 197 Page 622
As Introduced
gains and losses from the sale, exchange, or other disposition 18098
of equity or ownership interests in, or debt obligations of, a 18099
qualifying investee to the extent included in the trust's Ohio 18100
taxable income, but only if the following requirements are 18101
satisfied: 18102
(a) The book value of the qualifying investee's physical 18103
assets in this state and everywhere, as of the last day of the 18104
qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately 18105
prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the gain or 18106
loss, is available to the trust. 18107
(b) The requirements of section 5747.011 of the Revised 18108
Code are satisfied for the trust's taxable year in which the 18109
trust recognizes the gain or loss. 18110
Any gain or loss that is not a qualifying trust amount is 18111
modified business income, qualifying investment income, or 18112
modified nonbusiness income, as the case may be. 18113
(3) "Modified nonbusiness income" means a trust's Ohio 18114
taxable income other than modified business income, other than 18115
the qualifying trust amount, and other than qualifying 18116
investment income, as defined in section 5747.012 of the Revised 18117
Code, to the extent such qualifying investment income is not 18118
otherwise part of modified business income. 18119
(4) "Modified Ohio taxable income" applies only to trusts, 18120
and means the sum of the amounts described in divisions (AA)(4) 18121
(a) to (c) of this section: 18122
(a) The fraction, calculated under section 5747.013, and 18123
applying section 5747.231 of the Revised Code, multiplied by the 18124
sum of the following amounts: 18125
(i) The trust's modified business income; 18126

S. B. No. 197 Page 623
As Introduced
(ii) The trust's qualifying investment income, as defined 18127
in section 5747.012 of the Revised Code, but only to the extent 18128
the qualifying investment income does not otherwise constitute 18129
modified business income and does not otherwise constitute a 18130
qualifying trust amount. 18131
(b) The qualifying trust amount multiplied by a fraction, 18132
the numerator of which is the sum of the book value of the 18133
qualifying investee's physical assets in this state on the last 18134
day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending 18135
immediately prior to the day on which the trust recognizes the 18136
qualifying trust amount, and the denominator of which is the sum 18137
of the book value of the qualifying investee's total physical 18138
assets everywhere on the last day of the qualifying investee's 18139
fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the day on 18140
which the trust recognizes the qualifying trust amount. If, for 18141
a taxable year, the trust recognizes a qualifying trust amount 18142
with respect to more than one qualifying investee, the amount 18143
described in division (AA)(4)(b) of this section shall equal the 18144
sum of the products so computed for each such qualifying 18145
investee. 18146
(c)(i) With respect to a trust or portion of a trust that 18147
is a resident as ascertained in accordance with division (I)(3) 18148
(d) of this section, its modified nonbusiness income. 18149
(ii) With respect to a trust or portion of a trust that is 18150
not a resident as ascertained in accordance with division (I)(3) 18151
(d) of this section, the amount of its modified nonbusiness 18152
income satisfying the descriptions in divisions (B)(2) to (5) of 18153
section 5747.20 of the Revised Code, except as otherwise 18154
provided in division (AA)(4)(c)(ii) of this section. With 18155
respect to a trust or portion of a trust that is not a resident 18156

S. B. No. 197 Page 624
As Introduced
as ascertained in accordance with division (I)(3)(d) of this 18157
section, the trust's portion of modified nonbusiness income 18158
recognized from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of a 18159
debt interest in or equity interest in a section 5747.212 18160
entity, as defined in section 5747.212 of the Revised Code, 18161
without regard to division (A) of that section, shall not be 18162
allocated to this state in accordance with section 5747.20 of 18163
the Revised Code but shall be apportioned to this state in 18164
accordance with division (B) of section 5747.212 of the Revised 18165
Code without regard to division (A) of that section. 18166
If the allocation and apportionment of a trust's income 18167
under divisions (AA)(4)(a) and (c) of this section do not fairly 18168
represent the modified Ohio taxable income of the trust in this 18169
state, the alternative methods described in division (C) of 18170
section 5747.21 of the Revised Code may be applied in the manner 18171
and to the same extent provided in that section. 18172
(5)(a) Except as set forth in division (AA)(5)(b) of this 18173
section, "qualifying investee" means a person in which a trust 18174
has an equity or ownership interest, or a person or unit of 18175
government the debt obligations of either of which are owned by 18176
a trust. For the purposes of division (AA)(2)(a) of this section 18177
and for the purpose of computing the fraction described in 18178
division (AA)(4)(b) of this section, all of the following apply: 18179
(i) If the qualifying investee is a member of a qualifying 18180
controlled group on the last day of the qualifying investee's 18181
fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on 18182
which the trust recognizes the gain or loss, then "qualifying 18183
investee" includes all persons in the qualifying controlled 18184
group on such last day. 18185
(ii) If the qualifying investee, or if the qualifying 18186

S. B. No. 197 Page 625
As Introduced
investee and any members of the qualifying controlled group of 18187
which the qualifying investee is a member on the last day of the 18188
qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately 18189
prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the gain or 18190
loss, separately or cumulatively own, directly or indirectly, on 18191
the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar 18192
year ending immediately prior to the date on which the trust 18193
recognizes the qualifying trust amount, more than fifty per cent 18194
of the equity of a pass-through entity, then the qualifying 18195
investee and the other members are deemed to own the 18196
proportionate share of the pass-through entity's physical assets 18197
which the pass-through entity directly or indirectly owns on the 18198
last day of the pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year 18199
ending within or with the last day of the qualifying investee's 18200
fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on 18201
which the trust recognizes the qualifying trust amount. 18202
(iii) For the purposes of division (AA)(5)(a)(iii) of this 18203
section, "upper level pass-through entity" means a pass-through 18204
entity directly or indirectly owning any equity of another pass- 18205
through entity, and "lower level pass-through entity" means that 18206
other pass-through entity. 18207
An upper level pass-through entity, whether or not it is 18208
also a qualifying investee, is deemed to own, on the last day of 18209
the upper level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year, 18210
the proportionate share of the lower level pass-through entity's 18211
physical assets that the lower level pass-through entity 18212
directly or indirectly owns on the last day of the lower level 18213
pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year ending within or 18214
with the last day of the upper level pass-through entity's 18215
fiscal or calendar year. If the upper level pass-through entity 18216
directly and indirectly owns less than fifty per cent of the 18217

S. B. No. 197 Page 626
As Introduced
equity of the lower level pass-through entity on each day of the 18218
upper level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year in 18219
which or with which ends the calendar or fiscal year of the 18220
lower level pass-through entity and if, based upon clear and 18221
convincing evidence, complete information about the location and 18222
cost of the physical assets of the lower pass-through entity is 18223
not available to the upper level pass-through entity, then 18224
solely for purposes of ascertaining if a gain or loss 18225
constitutes a qualifying trust amount, the upper level pass- 18226
through entity shall be deemed as owning no equity of the lower 18227
level pass-through entity for each day during the upper level 18228
pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year in which or with 18229
which ends the lower level pass-through entity's calendar or 18230
fiscal year. Nothing in division (AA)(5)(a)(iii) of this section 18231
shall be construed to provide for any deduction or exclusion in 18232
computing any trust's Ohio taxable income. 18233
(b) With respect to a trust that is not a resident for the 18234
taxable year and with respect to a part of a trust that is not a 18235
resident for the taxable year, "qualifying investee" for that 18236
taxable year does not include a C corporation if both of the 18237
following apply: 18238
(i) During the taxable year the trust or part of the trust 18239
recognizes a gain or loss from the sale, exchange, or other 18240
disposition of equity or ownership interests in, or debt 18241
obligations of, the C corporation. 18242
(ii) Such gain or loss constitutes nonbusiness income. 18243
(6) "Available" means information is such that a person is 18244
able to learn of the information by the due date plus 18245
extensions, if any, for filing the return for the taxable year 18246
in which the trust recognizes the gain or loss. 18247

S. B. No. 197 Page 627
As Introduced
(BB) "Qualifying controlled group" has the same meaning as 18248
in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. 18249
(CC) "Related member" has the same meaning as in section 18250
5733.042 of the Revised Code. 18251
(DD)(1) For the purposes of division (DD) of this section: 18252
(a) "Qualifying person" means any person other than a 18253
qualifying corporation. 18254
(b) "Qualifying corporation" means any person classified 18255
for federal income tax purposes as an association taxable as a 18256
corporation, except either of the following: 18257
(i) A corporation that has made an election under 18258
subchapter S, chapter one, subtitle A, of the Internal Revenue 18259
Code for its taxable year ending within, or on the last day of, 18260
the investor's taxable year; 18261
(ii) A subsidiary that is wholly owned by any corporation 18262
that has made an election under subchapter S, chapter one, 18263
subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code for its taxable year 18264
ending within, or on the last day of, the investor's taxable 18265
year. 18266
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, unless expressly 18267
stated otherwise, no qualifying person indirectly owns any asset 18268
directly or indirectly owned by any qualifying corporation. 18269
(EE) For purposes of this chapter and Chapter 5751. of the 18270
Revised Code: 18271
(1) "Trust" does not include a qualified pre-income tax 18272
trust. 18273
(2) A "qualified pre-income tax trust" is any pre-income 18274

S. B. No. 197 Page 628
As Introduced
tax trust that makes a qualifying pre-income tax trust election 18275
as described in division (EE)(3) of this section. 18276
(3) A "qualifying pre-income tax trust election" is an 18277
election by a pre-income tax trust to subject to the tax imposed 18278
by section 5751.02 of the Revised Code the pre-income tax trust 18279
and all pass-through entities of which the trust owns or 18280
controls, directly, indirectly, or constructively through 18281
related interests, five per cent or more of the ownership or 18282
equity interests. The trustee shall notify the tax commissioner 18283
in writing of the election on or before April 15, 2006. The 18284
election, if timely made, shall be effective on and after 18285
January 1, 2006, and shall apply for all tax periods and tax 18286
years until revoked by the trustee of the trust. 18287
(4) A "pre-income tax trust" is a trust that satisfies all 18288
of the following requirements: 18289
(a) The document or instrument creating the trust was 18290
executed by the grantor before January 1, 1972; 18291
(b) The trust became irrevocable upon the creation of the 18292
trust; and 18293
(c) The grantor was domiciled in this state at the time 18294
the trust was created. 18295
(FF) "Uniformed services" means all of the following: 18296
(1) "Armed forces of the United States" as defined in 18297
section 5907.01 of the Revised Code; 18298
(2) The commissioned corps of the national oceanic and 18299
atmospheric administration; 18300
(3) The commissioned corps of the public health service. 18301

S. B. No. 197 Page 629
As Introduced
(GG) "Taxable business income" means the amount by which 18302
an individual's business income that is included in federal 18303
adjusted gross income exceeds the amount of business income the 18304
individual is authorized to deduct under division (A)(28) of 18305
this section for the taxable year. 18306
(HH) "Employer" does not include a franchisor with respect 18307
to the franchisor's relationship with a franchisee or an 18308
employee of a franchisee, unless the franchisor agrees to assume 18309
that role in writing or a court of competent jurisdiction 18310
determines that the franchisor exercises a type or degree of 18311
control over the franchisee or the franchisee's employees that 18312
is not customarily exercised by a franchisor for the purpose of 18313
protecting the franchisor's trademark, brand, or both. For 18314
purposes of this division, "franchisor" and "franchisee" have 18315
the same meanings as in 16 C.F.R. 436.1. 18316
(II) "Modified adjusted gross income" means Ohio adjusted 18317
gross income plus any amount deducted under divisions (A)(28) 18318
and (34) of this section for the taxable year. 18319
(JJ) "Qualifying Ohio educator" means an individual who, 18320
for a taxable year, qualifies as an eligible educator, as that 18321
term is defined in section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code, and 18322
who holds a certificate, license, or permit described in Chapter 18323
3319. or section 3301.071 of the Revised Code. 18324
(KK)(1) "Charitable gaming" has the same meaning as in 18325
section 3768.01 of the Revised Code. 18326
(2) "Permit holder" and "track" have the same meanings as 18327
in section 3769.01 of the Revised Code. 18328
(3) "Lottery sports gaming," "transferee," "video lottery 18329
sales agent," and "video lottery terminal" have the same 18330

S. B. No. 197 Page 630
As Introduced
meanings as in section 3770.01 of the Revised Code. 18331
(4) "Lottery prize award" has the same meaning as in 18332
section 3770.01 of the Revised Code, except that "lottery prize 18333
award" does not include a prize award from a video lottery 18334
terminal and does not include winnings from lottery sports 18335
gaming from which, under the rules of the state lottery 18336
commission, the type C sports gaming proprietor is responsible 18337
for withholding amounts. 18338
(5) "Internet gambling" and "internet gambling operator" 18339
have the same meanings as in section 3771.01 of the Revised 18340
Code. 18341
(6) "Casino facility," "casino gaming," "casino operator," 18342
and "management company" have the same meanings as in section 18343
3772.01 of the Revised Code. 18344
(7) "Sports gaming," "sports gaming proprietor," "sports 18345
gaming facility," and "type C sports gaming proprietor" have the 18346
same meanings as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. 18347
Sec. 5747.02. (A) For the purpose of providing revenue for 18348
the support of schools and local government functions, to 18349
provide relief to property taxpayers, to provide revenue for the 18350
general revenue fund, and to meet the expenses of administering 18351
the tax levied by this chapter, there is hereby levied on every 18352
individual, trust, and estate residing in or earning or 18353
receiving income in this state, on every individual, trust, and 18354
estate earning or receiving lottery gambling winnings, prizes, 18355
or awards pursuant to Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, on 18356
every individual, trust, and estate earning or receiving 18357
winnings on casino or sports gaming, and on every individual, 18358
trust, and estate otherwise having nexus with or in this state 18359

S. B. No. 197 Page 631
As Introduced
under the Constitution of the United States, an annual tax 18360
measured as prescribed in divisions (A)(1) to (4) of this 18361
section. 18362
(1) In the case of trusts, the tax imposed by this section 18363
shall be measured by modified Ohio taxable income under division 18364
(D) of this section and levied in the same amount as the tax is 18365
imposed on estates as prescribed in division (A)(2) of this 18366
section. 18367
(2) In the case of estates, the tax imposed by this 18368
section shall be measured by Ohio taxable income. The tax shall 18369
be levied at the rate of 1.38462% for the first twenty-six 18370
thousand fifty dollars of such income and, for income in excess 18371
of that amount, the tax shall be levied at the same rates 18372
prescribed in division (A)(3) of this section for individuals. 18373
(3) In the case of individuals, the tax imposed by this 18374
section on income other than taxable business income shall be 18375
measured by Ohio adjusted gross income, less taxable business 18376
income and less an exemption for the taxpayer, the taxpayer's 18377
spouse, and each dependent as provided in section 5747.025 of 18378
the Revised Code. If the balance thus obtained is equal to or 18379
less than twenty-six thousand fifty dollars, no tax shall be 18380
imposed on that balance. If the balance thus obtained is greater 18381
than twenty-six thousand fifty dollars, the tax is hereby levied 18382
as follows: 18383
(a) For taxable years beginning in 2023: 18384
18385
1 2
A OHIO ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME LESS TAX
TAXABLE BUSINESS INCOME AND EXEMPTIONS

S. B. No. 197 Page 632
As Introduced
(INDIVIDUALS) OR MODIFIED OHIO TAXABLE
INCOME (TRUSTS) OR OHIO TAXABLE INCOME
(ESTATES)
B More than $26,050 but not more than $360.69 plus 2.75% of the
$100,000 amount in excess of $26,050
C More than $100,000 but not more than $2,394.32 plus 3.688% of the
$115,300 amount in excess of $100,000
D More than $115,300 $2,958.58 plus 3.75% of the
amount in excess of $115,300
(b) For taxable years beginning in 2024 and thereafter: 18386
18387
18388
1 2
A OHIO ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME LESS TAXABLE TAX
BUSINESS INCOME AND EXEMPTIONS
(INDIVIDUALS) OR MODIFIED OHIO TAXABLE
INCOME (TRUSTS) OR OHIO TAXABLE INCOME
(ESTATES)
B More than $26,050 but not more than $360.69 plus 2.75% of the
$100,000 amount in excess of
$26,050
C More than $100,000 $2,394.32 plus 3.5% of
the amount in excess of
$100,000
(4)(a) In the case of individuals, the tax imposed by this 18389

S. B. No. 197 Page 633
As Introduced
section on taxable business income shall equal three per cent of 18390
the result obtained by subtracting any amount allowed under 18391
division (A)(4)(b) of this section from the individual's taxable 18392
business income. 18393
(b) If the exemptions allowed to an individual under 18394
division (A)(3) of this section exceed the taxpayer's Ohio 18395
adjusted gross income less taxable business income, the excess 18396
shall be deducted from taxable business income before computing 18397
the tax under division (A)(4)(a) of this section. 18398
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this division, in 18399
August of each year, the tax commissioner shall make a new 18400
adjustment to the income amounts prescribed in divisions (A)(2) 18401
and (3) of this section by multiplying the percentage increase 18402
in the gross domestic product deflator computed that year under 18403
section 5747.025 of the Revised Code by each of the income 18404
amounts resulting from the adjustment under this division in the 18405
preceding year, adding the resulting product to the 18406
corresponding income amount resulting from the adjustment in the 18407
preceding year, and rounding the resulting sum to the nearest 18408
multiple of fifty dollars. The tax commissioner also shall 18409
recompute each of the tax dollar amounts to the extent necessary 18410
to reflect the new adjustment of the income amounts. To 18411
recompute the tax dollar amount corresponding to the lowest tax 18412
rate in division (A)(3) of this section, the commissioner shall 18413
multiply the tax rate prescribed in division (A)(2) of this 18414
section by the income amount specified in that division and as 18415
adjusted according to this paragraph. The rates of taxation 18416
shall not be adjusted. 18417
The adjusted amounts apply to taxable years beginning in 18418
the calendar year in which the adjustments are made and to 18419

S. B. No. 197 Page 634
As Introduced
taxable years beginning in each ensuing calendar year until a 18420
calendar year in which a new adjustment is made pursuant to this 18421
division. The tax commissioner shall not make a new adjustment 18422
in any year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment 18423
would be less than the amount resulting from the adjustment in 18424
the preceding year. 18425
(B) If the director of budget and management makes a 18426
certification to the tax commissioner under division (B) of 18427
section 131.44 of the Revised Code, the amount of tax as 18428
determined under divisions (A)(1) to (3) of this section shall 18429
be reduced by the percentage prescribed in that certification 18430
for taxable years beginning in the calendar year in which that 18431
certification is made. 18432
(C)(1) The tax imposed by this section on a trust shall be 18433
computed by multiplying the Ohio modified taxable income of the 18434
trust by the rates prescribed by division (A) of this section. 18435
(2) A resident trust may claim a credit against the tax 18436
computed under division (C) of this section equal to the lesser 18437
of (a) the tax paid to another state or the District of Columbia 18438
on the resident trust's modified nonbusiness income, other than 18439
the portion of the resident trust's nonbusiness income that is 18440
qualifying investment income as defined in section 5747.012 of 18441
the Revised Code, or (b) the effective tax rate, based on 18442
modified Ohio taxable income, multiplied by the resident trust's 18443
modified nonbusiness income other than the portion of the 18444
resident trust's nonbusiness income that is qualifying 18445
investment income. The credit applies before any other 18446
applicable credits. 18447
(3) Any credit authorized against the tax imposed by this 18448
section applies to a trust subject to division (C) of this 18449

S. B. No. 197 Page 635
As Introduced
section only if the trust otherwise qualifies for the credit. To 18450
the extent that the trust distributes income for the taxable 18451
year for which a credit is available to the trust, the credit 18452
shall be shared by the trust and its beneficiaries. The tax 18453
commissioner and the trust shall be guided by applicable 18454
regulations of the United States treasury regarding the sharing 18455
of credits. 18456
(D) For the purposes of this section, "trust" means any 18457
trust described in Subchapter J of Chapter 1 of the Internal 18458
Revenue Code, excluding trusts that are not irrevocable as 18459
defined in division (I)(3)(b) of section 5747.01 of the Revised 18460
Code and that have no modified Ohio taxable income for the 18461
taxable year, charitable remainder trusts, qualified funeral 18462
trusts and preneed funeral contract trusts established pursuant 18463
to sections 4717.31 to 4717.38 of the Revised Code that are not 18464
qualified funeral trusts, endowment and perpetual care trusts, 18465
qualified settlement trusts and funds, designated settlement 18466
trusts and funds, and trusts exempted from taxation under 18467
section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. 18468
(E) Nothing in division (A)(3) of this section shall 18469
prohibit an individual with an Ohio adjusted gross income, less 18470
taxable business income and exemptions, of twenty-six thousand 18471
fifty dollars or less from filing a return under this chapter to 18472
receive a refund of taxes withheld or to claim any refundable 18473
credit allowed under this chapter. 18474
Sec. 5747.062. As used in this section, "transferee" has 18475
the same meaning as in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code, and 18476
"recipient" includes a transferee. 18477
(A)(1) Before making any other deduction required by 18478
Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, the state lottery commission 18479

S. B. No. 197 Page 636
As Introduced
shall deduct and withhold an amount equal to four per cent of 18480
the payment from each lottery prize award payment that is of an 18481
amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of 18482
the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue 18483
Code, as amended. 18484
(2) On or before the tenth day of each month, the state 18485
lottery commission, and each transferee required to deduct and 18486
withhold amounts pursuant to section 3770.072 of the Revised 18487
Code, shall file a return and remit to the tax commissioner all 18488
amounts deducted and withheld pursuant to this section during 18489
the preceding month. 18490
(3) On or before the thirty-first day of January of each 18491
year, the state lottery commission, and each transferee required 18492
to deduct and withhold amounts pursuant to section 3770.072 of 18493
the Revised Code, shall file with the commissioner an annual 18494
return, in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner, 18495
indicating the total amount deducted and withheld pursuant to 18496
this section or section 3770.072 of the Revised Code during the 18497
preceding calendar year. At the time of filing that return, the 18498
state lottery commission or transferee shall remit any amount 18499
deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year that 18500
was not previously remitted. 18501
(4) The state lottery commission, and each transferee 18502
required to deduct and withhold amounts pursuant to section 18503
3770.072 of the Revised Code, shall issue to each person with 18504
respect to whom tax has been deducted and withheld by the 18505
commission or transferee pursuant to this section or section 18506
3770.072 of the Revised Code during the preceding calendar year, 18507
an information return in the form prescribed by the 18508
commissioner. 18509

S. B. No. 197 Page 637
As Introduced
(B)(1) Division (B)(1) of this section does not apply to 18510
persons classified for federal income tax purposes as 18511
associations taxable as corporations. 18512
Amounts withheld pursuant to this section or section 18513
3770.072 of the Revised Code shall be allowed as a credit 18514
against payment of the tax imposed pursuant to section 5747.02 18515
of the Revised Code upon the lottery prize award recipient, upon 18516
a beneficiary of such a recipient, or upon any investor in such 18517
a recipient if the recipient is a pass-through entity or 18518
disregarded entity, and shall be treated as taxes paid by the 18519
recipient, beneficiary, or investor for purposes of section 18520
5747.09 of the Revised Code. The credit is available to the 18521
recipient, beneficiary, or investor even if the commission or 18522
transferee does not remit to the tax commissioner the amount 18523
withheld. 18524
(2) Division (B)(2) of this section applies only to 18525
persons classified for federal income tax purposes as 18526
associations taxable as corporations. 18527
Amounts withheld pursuant to this section or section 18528
3770.072 of the Revised Code shall be treated as a credit 18529
against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5733.06 of the 18530
Revised Code for the tax year immediately following the date on 18531
which those amounts are deducted and withheld, upon the lottery 18532
prize award recipient, upon a beneficiary of such a recipient, 18533
or upon an investor in such a recipient if the recipient is a 18534
pass-through entity or disregarded entity, and shall be treated 18535
as paid by the recipient, beneficiary, or investor on the date 18536
on which those amounts are deducted and withheld. The credit is 18537
a refundable credit and shall be claimed in the order required 18538
under section 5733.98 of the Revised Code. The credit is 18539

S. B. No. 197 Page 638
As Introduced
available to the recipient, beneficiary, or investor even if the 18540
commission or transferee does not remit to the tax commissioner 18541
the amount withheld. 18542
(3) Nothing in division (B)(1) or (2) of this section 18543
shall be construed to allow more than one person to claim the 18544
credit for any portion of each amount deducted and withheld. 18545
(C) Failure of the commission or any transferee to deduct 18546
and withhold the required amounts from lottery prize awards or 18547
to remit amounts withheld as required by this section and 18548
section 3770.072 of the Revised Code shall not relieve a 18549
taxpayer described in division (B) of this section from 18550
liability for the tax imposed by section 5733.06 or 5747.02 of 18551
the Revised Code. 18552
Sec. 5747.063. The requirements imposed under this section 18553
are in addition to the any applicable municipal income tax 18554
withholding requirements under section 718.031 of the Revised 18555
Code. As used in this section, "sports gaming proprietor" and 18556
"sports gaming facility" have the same meanings as in section 18557
3775.01 of the Revised Code. 18558
(A)(1) If a person's patron's winnings from casino gaming 18559
or from sports gaming any of the following are an amount for 18560
which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is 18561
required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as 18562
amended, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor the 18563
applicable person shall deduct and withhold Ohio income tax from 18564
the person's winnings at a rate of four per cent of the amount 18565
won: 18566
(a) A permit holder, with respect to winnings from pari- 18567
mutuel wagering on horse racing; 18568

S. B. No. 197 Page 639
As Introduced
(b) A video lottery sales agent, with respect to winnings 18569
from a video lottery terminal; 18570
(c) An internet gambling operator, with respect to 18571
winnings from internet gambling; 18572
(d) A casino operator or management company, with respect 18573
to casino winnings; 18574
(e) A sports gaming proprietor, with respect to winnings 18575
from sports gaming, except as otherwise provided regarding a 18576
type C sports gaming proprietor by rule of the state lottery 18577
commission adopted under section 3770.03 of the Revised Code. A 18578
person's amount of winnings from casino gaming shall be 18579
determined each time the person exchanges amounts won in tokens, 18580
chips, casino credit, or other prepaid representations of value 18581
for cash or a cash equivalent. The casino operator or sports 18582
gaming proprietor 18583
(2) The person conducting the withholding shall issue, to 18584
a person patron from whose winnings an amount has been deducted 18585
and withheld, a receipt for the amount deducted and withheld, 18586
and also shall obtain from the person additional information 18587
that will be necessary for the casino operator or sports gaming 18588
proprietor person conducting the withholding to prepare the 18589
returns required by this section. 18590
(2) If a person's winnings from casino gaming or sports 18591
gaming require reporting to the internal revenue service under 18592
division (A)(1) of this section, the casino operator or sports 18593
gaming proprietor also shall require the person to state in 18594
writing, under penalty of falsification, whether the person is 18595
in default under a support order. 18596
(B) Amounts deducted and withheld by a casino operator or 18597

S. B. No. 197 Page 640
As Introduced
sports gaming proprietor under this section are held in trust 18598
for the benefit of the state. 18599
(1) On or before the tenth day of each month, the casino 18600
operator person conducting the withholding shall file a return 18601
electronically with the tax commissioner identifying the persons 18602
patrons from whose winnings amounts were deducted and withheld, 18603
the amount of each such deduction and withholding during the 18604
preceding calendar month, the amount of the winnings from which 18605
each such amount was withheld, the type of casino gaming or 18606
sports gaming that resulted in such winnings, and any other 18607
information required by the tax commissioner. With the return, 18608
the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor person 18609
conducting the withholding shall remit electronically to the 18610
commissioner all the amounts deducted and withheld during the 18611
preceding month. 18612
(2)(a) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall 18613
maintain a record of each written statement provided under 18614
division (A)(2) of this section in which a person admits to 18615
being in default under a support order. The casino operator or 18616
sports gaming proprietor shall make these records available to 18617
the director of job and family services upon request. 18618
(b) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor person 18619
conducting withholding under this section shall maintain copies 18620
of receipts issued under division (A)(1) (A)(2) of this section 18621
and of written statements provided under division (A)(2) of this 18622
section and shall make these copies available to the tax 18623
commissioner upon request. 18624
(c) (b) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor 18625
person conducting withholding under this section shall maintain 18626
the information described in divisions division (B)(2)(a) and 18627

S. B. No. 197 Page 641
As Introduced
(b) of this section in accordance with section 5747.17 of the 18628
Revised Code and any rules adopted pursuant thereto. 18629
(3) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of 18630
January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor person 18631
conducting withholding under this section shall file an annual 18632
return electronically with the tax commissioner indicating the 18633
total amount deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar 18634
year. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor person 18635
conducting the withholding shall remit electronically with the 18636
annual return any amount that was deducted and withheld and that 18637
was not previously remitted. If the identity of a person patron 18638
and the amount deducted and withheld with respect to that person 18639
patron were omitted on a monthly return, that information shall 18640
be indicated on the annual return. 18641
(4)(a) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor 18642
person described in division (A)(1) of this section who fails to 18643
file a return and remit the amounts deducted and withheld is 18644
personally liable for the amount deducted and withheld and not 18645
remitted. The commissioner may impose a penalty up to one 18646
thousand dollars if a return is filed late, if amounts deducted 18647
and withheld are remitted late, if a return is not filed, or if 18648
amounts deducted and withheld are not remitted. Interest accrues 18649
on past due amounts deducted and withheld at the rate prescribed 18650
in section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. The commissioner may 18651
collect past due amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and 18652
interest thereon by assessment under section 5747.13 of the 18653
Revised Code as if they were income taxes collected by an 18654
employer. 18655
(b) If a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor 18656
person described in division (A)(1) of this section sells the 18657

S. B. No. 197 Page 642
As Introduced
person's casino facility or , sports gaming facility, or track 18658
or otherwise quits the casino or sports applicable gaming 18659
business, the amounts deducted and withheld and any penalties 18660
and interest thereon are immediately due and payable. The 18661
successor shall withhold an amount of the purchase money that is 18662
sufficient to cover the amounts deducted and withheld and 18663
penalties and interest thereon until the predecessor casino 18664
operator or sports gaming proprietor produces either a receipt 18665
from the commissioner showing that the amounts deducted and 18666
withheld and penalties and interest thereon have been paid or a 18667
certificate from the commissioner indicating that no amounts 18668
deducted and withheld or penalties and interest thereon are due. 18669
If the successor fails to withhold purchase money, the successor 18670
is personally liable for payment of the amounts deducted and 18671
withheld and penalties and interest thereon, up to the amount of 18672
the purchase money. 18673
(C)(1) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of 18674
January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor person 18675
conducting withholding under this section shall issue an 18676
information return to each person patron with respect to whom an 18677
amount has been deducted and withheld during the preceding 18678
calendar year. The information return shall show the total 18679
amount deducted from the person's patron's winnings by the 18680
casino operator or sports gaming proprietor person conducting 18681
the withholding during the preceding calendar year. 18682
(2) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of 18683
January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor person 18684
conducting withholding under this section shall provide to the 18685
commissioner a copy of each information return issued under 18686
division (C)(1) of this section for the preceding calendar year. 18687
The commissioner may require that the copies be transmitted 18688

S. B. No. 197 Page 643
As Introduced
electronically. 18689
(D) Amounts deducted and withheld shall be allowed as a 18690
credit against payment of the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of 18691
the Revised Code and shall be treated as taxes paid for purposes 18692
of section 5747.09 of the Revised Code. This division applies 18693
only to the person patron for whom the amount is deducted and 18694
withheld. 18695
(E) The failure of a casino operator or sports gaming 18696
proprietor person described in division (A)(1) of this section 18697
to deduct and withhold the required amount from a person's 18698
patron's winnings does not relieve the person patron from 18699
liability for the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised 18700
Code with respect to those winnings. And compliance with this 18701
section does not relieve a casino operator or sports gaming 18702
proprietor person described in division (A)(1) of this section 18703
or a person patron who has winnings from casino gaming or sports 18704
gaming from compliance with relevant provisions of federal tax 18705
laws. 18706
(F) The commissioner shall prescribe the form of the 18707
receipt and returns required by this section. The director of 18708
job and family services shall prescribe the form of the 18709
statement required by this section. 18710
(G) The commissioner may adopt rules that are necessary to 18711
administer this section. 18712
Sec. 5747.08. An annual return with respect to the tax 18713
imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and each tax 18714
imposed under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code shall be made by 18715
every taxpayer for any taxable year for which the taxpayer is 18716
liable for the tax imposed by that section or under that 18717

S. B. No. 197 Page 644
As Introduced
chapter, unless the total credits allowed under division (E) of 18718
section 5747.05 and divisions (F) and (G) of section 5747.055 of 18719
the Revised Code for the year are equal to or exceed the tax 18720
imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, in which case no 18721
return shall be required unless the taxpayer is liable for a tax 18722
imposed pursuant to Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. 18723
(A) If an individual is deceased, any return or notice 18724
required of that individual under this chapter shall be made and 18725
filed by that decedent's executor, administrator, or other 18726
person charged with the property of that decedent. 18727
(B) If an individual is unable to make a return or notice 18728
required by this chapter, the return or notice required of that 18729
individual shall be made and filed by the individual's duly 18730
authorized agent, guardian, conservator, fiduciary, or other 18731
person charged with the care of the person or property of that 18732
individual. 18733
(C) Returns or notices required of an estate or a trust 18734
shall be made and filed by the fiduciary of the estate or trust. 18735
(D)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(1) 18736
(b) of this section, any pass-through entity may file a single 18737
return on behalf of one or more of the entity's investors other 18738
than an investor that is a person subject to the tax imposed 18739
under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. The single return 18740
shall set forth the name, address, and social security number or 18741
other identifying number of each of those pass-through entity 18742
investors and shall indicate the distributive share of each of 18743
those pass-through entity investor's income taxable in this 18744
state in accordance with sections 5747.20 to 5747.231 of the 18745
Revised Code. Such pass-through entity investors for whom the 18746
pass-through entity elects to file a single return are not 18747

S. B. No. 197 Page 645
As Introduced
entitled to the exemption or credit provided for by sections 18748
5747.02 and 5747.022 of the Revised Code; shall calculate the 18749
tax before business credits at the highest rate of tax set forth 18750
in section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for the taxable year for 18751
which the return is filed; and are entitled to only their 18752
distributive share of the business credits as defined in 18753
division (D)(2) of this section. A single check drawn by the 18754
pass-through entity shall accompany the return in full payment 18755
of the tax due, as shown on the single return, for such 18756
investors, other than investors who are persons subject to the 18757
tax imposed under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. 18758
(b)(i) A pass-through entity shall not include in such a 18759
single return any investor that is a trust to the extent that 18760
any direct or indirect current, future, or contingent 18761
beneficiary of the trust is a person subject to the tax imposed 18762
under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. 18763
(ii) A pass-through entity shall not include in such a 18764
single return any investor that is itself a pass-through entity 18765
to the extent that any direct or indirect investor in the second 18766
pass-through entity is a person subject to the tax imposed under 18767
section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. 18768
(c) Except as provided by division (L) of this section, 18769
nothing in division (D) of this section precludes the tax 18770
commissioner from requiring such investors to file the return 18771
and make the payment of taxes and related interest, penalty, and 18772
interest penalty required by this section or section 5747.02, 18773
5747.09, or 5747.15 of the Revised Code. Nothing in division (D) 18774
of this section precludes such an investor from filing the 18775
annual return under this section, utilizing the refundable 18776
credit equal to the investor's proportionate share of the tax 18777

S. B. No. 197 Page 646
As Introduced
paid by the pass-through entity on behalf of the investor under 18778
division (I) of this section, and making the payment of taxes 18779
imposed under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. Nothing in 18780
division (D) of this section shall be construed to provide to 18781
such an investor or pass-through entity any additional deduction 18782
or credit, other than the credit provided by division (I) of 18783
this section, solely on account of the entity's filing a return 18784
in accordance with this section. Such a pass-through entity also 18785
shall make the filing and payment of estimated taxes on behalf 18786
of the pass-through entity investors other than an investor that 18787
is a person subject to the tax imposed under section 5733.06 of 18788
the Revised Code. 18789
(2) For the purposes of this section, "business credits" 18790
means the credits listed in section 5747.98 of the Revised Code 18791
excluding the following credits: 18792
(a) The retirement income credit under division (B) of 18793
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 18794
(b) The senior citizen credit under division (F) of 18795
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 18796
(c) The lump sum distribution credit under division (G) of 18797
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 18798
(d) The dependent care credit under section 5747.054 of 18799
the Revised Code; 18800
(e) The lump sum retirement income credit under division 18801
(C) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 18802
(f) The lump sum retirement income credit under division 18803
(D) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 18804
(g) The lump sum retirement income credit under division 18805

S. B. No. 197 Page 647
As Introduced
(E) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 18806
(h) The credit for displaced workers who pay for job 18807
training under section 5747.27 of the Revised Code; 18808
(i) The twenty-dollar personal exemption credit under 18809
section 5747.022 of the Revised Code; 18810
(j) The joint filing credit under division (E) of section 18811
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 18812
(k) The nonresident credit under division (A) of section 18813
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 18814
(l) The credit for a resident's out-of-state income under 18815
division (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; 18816
(m) The earned income tax credit under section 5747.71 of 18817
the Revised Code; 18818
(n) The lead abatement credit under section 5747.26 of the 18819
Revised Code; 18820
(o) The credit for education expenses under section 18821
5747.72 of the Revised Code; 18822
(p) The credit for tuition paid to a nonchartered 18823
nonpublic school under section 5747.75 of the Revised Code. 18824
(3) The election provided for under division (D) of this 18825
section applies only to the taxable year for which the election 18826
is made by the pass-through entity. Unless the tax commissioner 18827
provides otherwise, this election, once made, is binding and 18828
irrevocable for the taxable year for which the election is made. 18829
Nothing in this division shall be construed to provide for any 18830
deduction or credit that would not be allowable if a nonresident 18831
pass-through entity investor were to file an annual return. 18832

S. B. No. 197 Page 648
As Introduced
(4) If a pass-through entity makes the election provided 18833
for under division (D) of this section, the pass-through entity 18834
shall be liable for any additional taxes, interest, interest 18835
penalty, or penalties imposed by this chapter if the tax 18836
commissioner finds that the single return does not reflect the 18837
correct tax due by the pass-through entity investors covered by 18838
that return. Nothing in this division shall be construed to 18839
limit or alter the liability, if any, imposed on pass-through 18840
entity investors for unpaid or underpaid taxes, interest, 18841
interest penalty, or penalties as a result of the pass-through 18842
entity's making the election provided for under division (D) of 18843
this section. For the purposes of division (D) of this section, 18844
"correct tax due" means the tax that would have been paid by the 18845
pass-through entity had the single return been filed in a manner 18846
reflecting the commissioner's findings. Nothing in division (D) 18847
of this section shall be construed to make or hold a pass- 18848
through entity liable for tax attributable to a pass-through 18849
entity investor's income from a source other than the pass- 18850
through entity electing to file the single return. 18851
(E) If a husband and wife file a joint federal income tax 18852
return for a taxable year, they shall file a joint return under 18853
this section for that taxable year, and their liabilities are 18854
joint and several, but, if the federal income tax liability of 18855
either spouse is determined on a separate federal income tax 18856
return, they shall file separate returns under this section. 18857
If either spouse is not required to file a federal income 18858
tax return and either or both are required to file a return 18859
pursuant to this chapter, they may elect to file separate or 18860
joint returns, and, pursuant to that election, their liabilities 18861
are separate or joint and several. If a husband and wife file 18862
separate returns pursuant to this chapter, each must claim the 18863

S. B. No. 197 Page 649
As Introduced
taxpayer's own exemption, but not both, as authorized under 18864
section 5747.02 of the Revised Code on the taxpayer's own 18865
return. 18866
(F) Each return or notice required to be filed under this 18867
section shall contain the signature of the taxpayer or the 18868
taxpayer's duly authorized agent and of the person who prepared 18869
the return for the taxpayer, and shall include the taxpayer's 18870
social security number. Each return shall be verified by a 18871
declaration under the penalties of perjury. The tax commissioner 18872
shall prescribe the form that the signature and declaration 18873
shall take. 18874
(G) Each return or notice required to be filed under this 18875
section shall be made and filed as required by section 5747.04 18876
of the Revised Code, on or before the fifteenth day of April of 18877
each year, on forms that the tax commissioner shall prescribe, 18878
together with remittance made payable to the treasurer of state 18879
in the combined amount of the state and all school district 18880
income taxes shown to be due on the form. 18881
Upon good cause shown, the commissioner may extend the 18882
period for filing any notice or return required to be filed 18883
under this section and may adopt rules relating to extensions. 18884
If the extension results in an extension of time for the payment 18885
of any state or school district income tax liability with 18886
respect to which the return is filed, the taxpayer shall pay at 18887
the time the tax liability is paid an amount of interest 18888
computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of 18889
the Revised Code on that liability from the time that payment is 18890
due without extension to the time of actual payment. Except as 18891
provided in section 5747.132 of the Revised Code, in addition to 18892
all other interest charges and penalties, all taxes imposed 18893

S. B. No. 197 Page 650
As Introduced
under this chapter or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code and 18894
remaining unpaid after they become due, except combined amounts 18895
due of one dollar or less, bear interest at the rate per annum 18896
prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code until paid or 18897
until the day an assessment is issued under section 5747.13 of 18898
the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. 18899
If the commissioner considers it necessary in order to 18900
ensure the payment of the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the 18901
Revised Code or any tax imposed under Chapter 5748. of the 18902
Revised Code, the commissioner may require returns and payments 18903
to be made otherwise than as provided in this section. 18904
To the extent that any provision in this division 18905
conflicts with any provision in section 5747.026 of the Revised 18906
Code, the provision in that section prevails. 18907
(H) The amounts withheld pursuant to section 5747.06, 18908
5747.062, 5747.063, 5747.064, 5747.065, or 5747.071 of the 18909
Revised Code shall be allowed to the ultimate recipient of the 18910
income as credits against payment of the appropriate taxes 18911
imposed on the ultimate recipient by section 5747.02 and under 18912
Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. As used in this division, 18913
"ultimate recipient" means the person who is required to report 18914
income from which amounts are withheld pursuant to section 18915
5747.06, 5747.062, 5747.063, 5747.064, 5747.065, or 5747.071 of 18916
the Revised Code on the annual return required to be filed under 18917
this section. 18918
(I) If a pass-through entity elects to file a single 18919
return under division (D) of this section and if any investor is 18920
required to file the annual return and make the payment of taxes 18921
required by this chapter on account of the investor's other 18922
income that is not included in a single return filed by a pass- 18923

S. B. No. 197 Page 651
As Introduced
through entity or any other investor elects to file the annual 18924
return, the investor is entitled to a refundable credit equal to 18925
the investor's proportionate share of the tax paid by the pass- 18926
through entity on behalf of the investor. The investor shall 18927
claim the credit for the investor's taxable year in which or 18928
with which ends the taxable year of the pass-through entity. 18929
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow any credit 18930
provided in this chapter to be claimed more than once. For the 18931
purpose of computing any interest, penalty, or interest penalty, 18932
the investor shall be deemed to have paid the refundable credit 18933
provided by this division on the day that the pass-through 18934
entity paid the estimated tax or the tax giving rise to the 18935
credit. 18936
(J) The tax commissioner shall ensure that each return 18937
required to be filed under this section includes a box that the 18938
taxpayer may check to authorize a paid tax preparer who prepared 18939
the return to communicate with the department of taxation about 18940
matters pertaining to the return. The return or instructions 18941
accompanying the return shall indicate that by checking the box 18942
the taxpayer authorizes the department of taxation to contact 18943
the preparer concerning questions that arise during the 18944
processing of the return and authorizes the preparer only to 18945
provide the department with information that is missing from the 18946
return, to contact the department for information about the 18947
processing of the return or the status of the taxpayer's refund 18948
or payments, and to respond to notices about mathematical 18949
errors, offsets, or return preparation that the taxpayer has 18950
received from the department and has shown to the preparer. 18951
(K) The tax commissioner shall permit individual taxpayers 18952
to instruct the department of taxation to cause any refund of 18953
overpaid taxes to be deposited directly into a checking account, 18954

S. B. No. 197 Page 652
As Introduced
savings account, or an individual retirement account or 18955
individual retirement annuity, or preexisting college savings 18956
plan or program account offered by the Ohio tuition trust 18957
authority under Chapter 3334. of the Revised Code, as designated 18958
by the taxpayer, when the taxpayer files the annual return 18959
required by this section electronically. 18960
(L) If, for the taxable year, a nonresident or trust that 18961
is the owner of an electing pass-through entity, as defined in 18962
section 5747.38 of the Revised Code, does not have Ohio adjusted 18963
gross income or, in the case of a trust, modified Ohio taxable 18964
income other than from one or more electing pass-through 18965
entities, the nonresident or trust shall not be required to file 18966
an annual return under this section. Nothing in this division 18967
precludes such an owner from filing the annual return under this 18968
section, utilizing the refundable credit under section 5747.39 18969
of the Revised Code equal to the owner's proportionate share of 18970
the tax levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code and 18971
paid by the electing pass-through entity, and making the payment 18972
of taxes imposed under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. 18973
(M) The tax commissioner may adopt rules to administer 18974
this section. 18975
Sec. 5747.12. (A) If a person entitled to a refund under 18976
section 5747.11 or 5747.13 of the Revised Code is indebted for 18977
any of the following, the amount refundable may be applied in 18978
satisfaction of the debt: 18979
(1) To this state for any tax, workers' compensation 18980
premium due under section 4123.35 of the Revised Code, or 18981
unemployment compensation contribution due under section 4141.25 18982
of the Revised Code; 18983

S. B. No. 197 Page 653
As Introduced
(2) To the state or a political subdivision for a 18984
certified claim under section 131.02 or 131.021 of the Revised 18985
Code or a finding for recovery included in a certified report 18986
that has been filed with the attorney general pursuant to 18987
sections 117.28 and 117.30 of the Revised Code; 18988
(3) For a fee that is paid to the state or to the clerk of 18989
courts pursuant to section 4505.06 of the Revised Code; 18990
(4) For any charge, penalty, collection cost, or interest 18991
arising from a debt listed in divisions (A)(1) to (3) of this 18992
section. 18993
(B) If the amount refundable is less than the amount of 18994
the debt owed under division (A) of this section, it may be 18995
applied in partial satisfaction of the debt. If the amount 18996
refundable is greater than the amount of that debt, the amount 18997
remaining after satisfaction of the debt shall be refunded. If 18998
the person has more than one debt listed in division (A) of this 18999
section, any debt subject to section 5739.33 or division (G) of 19000
section 5747.07 of the Revised Code or arising under section 19001
5747.063 or 5747.064 of the Revised Code shall be satisfied 19002
first. 19003
(C) Except as provided in section 131.021 of the Revised 19004
Code, this section applies only to debts that have become final. 19005
(D) The tax commissioner may charge each respective agency 19006
of the state for the commissioner's cost in applying refunds to 19007
debts due to the state and may charge the attorney general for 19008
the commissioner's cost in applying refunds to certified claims. 19009
(E) The commissioner may promulgate rules to implement 19010
this section. The rules may address, among other things, 19011
situations such as those where persons may jointly be entitled 19012

S. B. No. 197 Page 654
As Introduced
to a refund but do not jointly owe a debt or certified claim. 19013
(F) The commissioner may, with the consent of the 19014
taxpayer, provide for the crediting, against tax imposed under 19015
this chapter or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code and due for 19016
any taxable year, of the amount of any refund due the taxpayer 19017
under this chapter or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code, as 19018
appropriate, for a preceding taxable year. 19019
Sec. 5747.20. This section applies solely for the purposes 19020
of computing the credit allowed under division (A) of section 19021
5747.05 of the Revised Code and computing income taxable in this 19022
state under division (D) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code. 19023
All items of nonbusiness income or deduction shall be 19024
allocated in this state as follows: 19025
(A) All items of nonbusiness income or deduction taken 19026
into account in the computation of adjusted gross income for the 19027
taxable year by a resident shall be allocated to this state. 19028
(B) All items of nonbusiness income or deduction taken 19029
into account in the computation of adjusted gross income for the 19030
taxable year by a nonresident shall be allocated to this state 19031
as follows: 19032
(1) All items of compensation paid to an individual for 19033
personal services performed in this state who was a nonresident 19034
at the time of payment and all items of deduction directly 19035
allocated thereto shall be allocated to this state. 19036
(2) All gains or losses from the sale of real property, 19037
tangible personal property, or intangible property shall be 19038
allocated as follows: 19039
(a) Capital gains or losses from the sale or other 19040

S. B. No. 197 Page 655
As Introduced
transfer of real property are allocable to this state if the 19041
property is located physically in this state. 19042
(b) Capital gains or losses from the sale or other 19043
transfer of tangible personal property are allocable to this 19044
state if, at the time of such sale or other transfer, the 19045
property had its physical location in this state. 19046
(c) Capital gains or losses from the sale or other 19047
transfer of intangible personal property are allocable to this 19048
state if the taxpayer's domicile was in this state at the time 19049
of such sale or other transfer. 19050
(3) All rents and royalties of real or tangible personal 19051
property shall be allocated to this state as follows: 19052
(a) Rents and royalties derived from real property are 19053
allocable to this state if the property is physically located in 19054
this state. 19055
(b) Rents and royalties derived from tangible personal 19056
property are allocable to this state to the extent that such 19057
property is utilized in this state. 19058
The extent of utilization of tangible personal property in 19059
a state is determined by multiplying the rents or royalties 19060
derived from such property by a fraction, the numerator of which 19061
is the number of days of physical location of the property in 19062
this state during the rental or royalty period in the taxable 19063
year and the denominator of which is the number of days of 19064
physical location of the property everywhere during all rental 19065
or royalty periods in the taxable year. If the physical location 19066
of the property during the rental or royalty period is unknown 19067
or unascertainable by the nonresident, tangible personal 19068
property is utilized in the state in which the property was 19069

S. B. No. 197 Page 656
As Introduced
located at the time the rental or royalty payor obtained 19070
possession. 19071
(4) All patent and copyright royalties shall be allocated 19072
to this state to the extent the patent or copyright was utilized 19073
by the payor in this state. 19074
A patent is utilized in a state to the extent that it is 19075
employed in production, fabrication, manufacturing, or other 19076
processing in the state, or to the extent that a patented 19077
product is produced in the state. If the basis of receipts from 19078
patent royalties does not permit allocation to states or if the 19079
accounting procedures do not reflect states of utilization, the 19080
patent is utilized in this state if the taxpayer's domicile was 19081
in this state at the time such royalties were paid or accrued. 19082
A copyright is utilized in a state to the extent that 19083
printing or other publication originates in the state. If the 19084
basis of receipts from copyright royalties does not permit 19085
allocation to states or if the accounting procedures do not 19086
reflect states of utilization, the copyright is utilized in this 19087
state if the taxpayer's domicile was in this state at the time 19088
such royalties were paid or accrued. 19089
(5)(a) All lottery prize awards paid by the state lottery 19090
commission pursuant to Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code shall 19091
be allocated to this state. 19092
(b) All earnings, profit, income, and gain from the sale, 19093
exchange, or other disposition of lottery prize awards paid or 19094
to be paid to any person by the state lottery commission 19095
pursuant to Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code shall be allocated 19096
to this state. 19097
(c) All earnings, profit, income, and gain from the direct 19098

S. B. No. 197 Page 657
As Introduced
or indirect ownership of lottery prize awards paid or to be paid 19099
to any person by the state lottery commission pursuant to 19100
Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code shall be allocated to this 19101
state. 19102
(d) All earnings, profit, income, and gain from the direct 19103
or indirect interest in any right in or to any lottery prize 19104
awards paid or to be paid to any person by the state lottery 19105
commission pursuant to Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code shall 19106
be allocated to this state. 19107
(6) Any item of income or deduction which has been taken 19108
into account in the computation of adjusted gross income for the 19109
taxable year by a nonresident and which is not otherwise 19110
specifically allocated or apportioned pursuant to sections 19111
5747.20 to 5747.23 of the Revised Code, including, without 19112
limitation, interest, dividends and distributions, items of 19113
income taken into account under the provisions of sections 401 19114
to 425 of the Internal Revenue Code, and benefit payments 19115
received by a beneficiary of a supplemental unemployment trust 19116
which is referred to in section 501(c)(17) of the Internal 19117
Revenue Code, shall not be allocated to this state unless the 19118
taxpayer's domicile was in this state at the time such income 19119
was paid or accrued. 19120
(7) All winnings from charitable gaming, pari-mutuel 19121
wagering on horse racing, lottery gaming, internet gambling, 19122
casino gaming, or sports gaming conducted in this state shall be 19123
allocated to the state. 19124
(C) If an individual is a resident for part of the taxable 19125
year and a nonresident for the remainder of the taxable year, 19126
all items of nonbusiness income or deduction shall be allocated 19127
under division (A) of this section for the part of the taxable 19128

S. B. No. 197 Page 658
As Introduced
year that the individual is a resident and under division (B) of 19129
this section for the part of the taxable year that the 19130
individual is a nonresident. 19131
Sec. 5751.01. As used in this chapter: 19132
(A) "Person" means, but is not limited to, individuals, 19133
combinations of individuals of any form, receivers, assignees, 19134
trustees in bankruptcy, firms, companies, joint-stock companies, 19135
business trusts, estates, partnerships, limited liability 19136
partnerships, limited liability companies, associations, joint 19137
ventures, clubs, societies, for-profit corporations, S 19138
corporations, qualified subchapter S subsidiaries, qualified 19139
subchapter S trusts, trusts, entities that are disregarded for 19140
federal income tax purposes, and any other entities. 19141
(B) "Consolidated elected taxpayer" means a group of two 19142
or more persons treated as a single taxpayer for purposes of 19143
this chapter as the result of an election made under section 19144
5751.011 of the Revised Code. 19145
(C) "Combined taxpayer" means a group of two or more 19146
persons treated as a single taxpayer for purposes of this 19147
chapter under section 5751.012 of the Revised Code. 19148
(D) "Taxpayer" means any person, or any group of persons 19149
in the case of a consolidated elected taxpayer or combined 19150
taxpayer treated as one taxpayer, required to register or pay 19151
tax under this chapter. "Taxpayer" does not include excluded 19152
persons. 19153
(E) "Excluded person" means any of the following: 19154
(1) Any person with not more than one hundred fifty 19155
thousand dollars of taxable gross receipts during the calendar 19156
year. Division (E)(1) of this section does not apply to a person 19157

S. B. No. 197 Page 659
As Introduced
that is a member of a consolidated elected taxpayer. 19158
(2) A public utility that paid the excise tax imposed by 19159
section 5727.24 or 5727.30 of the Revised Code based on one or 19160
more measurement periods that include the entire tax period 19161
under this chapter, except in the following circumstances: 19162
(a) A public utility that is a combined company is a 19163
taxpayer with regard to the following gross receipts: 19164
(i) Taxable gross receipts directly attributed to a public 19165
utility activity, but not directly attributed to an activity 19166
that is subject to the excise tax imposed by section 5727.24 or 19167
5727.30 of the Revised Code; 19168
(ii) Taxable gross receipts that cannot be directly 19169
attributed to any activity, multiplied by a fraction whose 19170
numerator is the taxable gross receipts described in division 19171
(E)(2)(a)(i) of this section and whose denominator is the total 19172
taxable gross receipts that can be directly attributed to any 19173
activity; 19174
(iii) Except for any differences resulting from the use of 19175
an accrual basis method of accounting for purposes of 19176
determining gross receipts under this chapter and the use of the 19177
cash basis method of accounting for purposes of determining 19178
gross receipts under section 5727.24 of the Revised Code, the 19179
gross receipts directly attributed to the activity of a natural 19180
gas company shall be determined in a manner consistent with 19181
division (D) of section 5727.03 of the Revised Code. 19182
(b) A heating company that became exempt from the excise 19183
tax imposed by section 5727.30 of the Revised Code on May 1, 19184
2023, shall not be an excluded person for tax periods beginning 19185
on or after July 1, 2023. 19186

S. B. No. 197 Page 660
As Introduced
As used in division (E)(2) of this section, "combined 19187
company" and "public utility" have the same meanings as in 19188
section 5727.01 of the Revised Code. 19189
(3) A financial institution, as defined in section 5726.01 19190
of the Revised Code, that paid the tax imposed by section 19191
5726.02 of the Revised Code based on one or more taxable years 19192
that include the entire tax period under this chapter; 19193
(4) A person directly or indirectly owned by one or more 19194
financial institutions, as defined in section 5726.01 of the 19195
Revised Code, that paid the tax imposed by section 5726.02 of 19196
the Revised Code based on one or more taxable years that include 19197
the entire tax period under this chapter. 19198
For the purposes of division (E)(4) of this section, a 19199
person owns another person under the following circumstances: 19200
(a) In the case of corporations issuing capital stock, one 19201
corporation owns another corporation if it owns fifty per cent 19202
or more of the other corporation's capital stock with current 19203
voting rights; 19204
(b) In the case of a limited liability company, one person 19205
owns the company if that person's membership interest, as 19206
defined in section 1706.01 of the Revised Code, is fifty per 19207
cent or more of the combined membership interests of all persons 19208
owning such interests in the company; 19209
(c) In the case of a partnership, trust, or other 19210
unincorporated business organization other than a limited 19211
liability company, one person owns the organization if, under 19212
the articles of organization or other instrument governing the 19213
affairs of the organization, that person has a beneficial 19214
interest in the organization's profits, surpluses, losses, or 19215

S. B. No. 197 Page 661
As Introduced
distributions of fifty per cent or more of the combined 19216
beneficial interests of all persons having such an interest in 19217
the organization. 19218
(5) A domestic insurance company or foreign insurance 19219
company, as defined in section 5725.01 of the Revised Code, that 19220
paid the insurance company premiums tax imposed by section 19221
5725.18 or Chapter 5729. of the Revised Code, or an unauthorized 19222
insurance company whose gross premiums are subject to tax under 19223
section 3905.36 of the Revised Code based on one or more 19224
measurement periods that include the entire tax period under 19225
this chapter; 19226
(6) A person that solely facilitates or services one or 19227
more securitizations of phase-in-recovery property pursuant to a 19228
final financing order as those terms are defined in section 19229
4928.23 of the Revised Code. For purposes of this division, 19230
"securitization" means transferring one or more assets to one or 19231
more persons and then issuing securities backed by the right to 19232
receive payment from the asset or assets so transferred. 19233
(7) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a pre- 19234
income tax trust as defined in section 5747.01 of the Revised 19235
Code and any pass-through entity of which such pre-income tax 19236
trust owns or controls, directly, indirectly, or constructively 19237
through related interests, more than five per cent of the 19238
ownership or equity interests. If the pre-income tax trust has 19239
made a qualifying pre-income tax trust election under division 19240
(EE) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code, then the trust and 19241
the pass-through entities of which it owns or controls, 19242
directly, indirectly, or constructively through related 19243
interests, more than five per cent of the ownership or equity 19244
interests, shall not be excluded persons for purposes of the tax 19245

S. B. No. 197 Page 662
As Introduced
imposed under section 5751.02 of the Revised Code. 19246
(8) Nonprofit organizations or the state and its agencies, 19247
instrumentalities, or political subdivisions. 19248
(F) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (F)(2), (3), 19249
and (4) of this section, "gross receipts" means the total amount 19250
realized by a person, without deduction for the cost of goods 19251
sold or other expenses incurred, that contributes to the 19252
production of gross income of the person, including the fair 19253
market value of any property and any services received, and any 19254
debt transferred or forgiven as consideration. 19255
(1) The following are examples of gross receipts: 19256
(a) Amounts realized from the sale, exchange, or other 19257
disposition of the taxpayer's property to or with another; 19258
(b) Amounts realized from the taxpayer's performance of 19259
services for another; 19260
(c) Amounts realized from another's use or possession of 19261
the taxpayer's property or capital; 19262
(d) Any combination of the foregoing amounts. 19263
(2) "Gross receipts" excludes the following amounts: 19264
(a) Interest income except interest on credit sales; 19265
(b) Dividends and distributions from corporations, and 19266
distributive or proportionate shares of receipts and income from 19267
a pass-through entity as defined under section 5733.04 of the 19268
Revised Code; 19269
(c) Receipts from the sale, exchange, or other disposition 19270
of an asset described in section 1221 or 1231 of the Internal 19271
Revenue Code, without regard to the length of time the person 19272

S. B. No. 197 Page 663
As Introduced
held the asset. Notwithstanding section 1221 of the Internal 19273
Revenue Code, receipts from hedging transactions also are 19274
excluded to the extent the transactions are entered into 19275
primarily to protect a financial position, such as managing the 19276
risk of exposure to (i) foreign currency fluctuations that 19277
affect assets, liabilities, profits, losses, equity, or 19278
investments in foreign operations; (ii) interest rate 19279
fluctuations; or (iii) commodity price fluctuations. As used in 19280
division (F)(2)(c) of this section, "hedging transaction" has 19281
the same meaning as used in section 1221 of the Internal Revenue 19282
Code and also includes transactions accorded hedge accounting 19283
treatment under statement of financial accounting standards 19284
number 133 of the financial accounting standards board. For the 19285
purposes of division (F)(2)(c) of this section, the actual 19286
transfer of title of real or tangible personal property to 19287
another entity is not a hedging transaction. 19288
(d) Proceeds received attributable to the repayment, 19289
maturity, or redemption of the principal of a loan, bond, mutual 19290
fund, certificate of deposit, or marketable instrument; 19291
(e) The principal amount received under a repurchase 19292
agreement or on account of any transaction properly 19293
characterized as a loan to the person; 19294
(f) Contributions received by a trust, plan, or other 19295
arrangement, any of which is described in section 501(a) of the 19296
Internal Revenue Code, or to which Title 26, Subtitle A, Chapter 19297
1, Subchapter (D) of the Internal Revenue Code applies; 19298
(g) Compensation, whether current or deferred, and whether 19299
in cash or in kind, received or to be received by an employee, 19300
former employee, or the employee's legal successor for services 19301
rendered to or for an employer, including reimbursements 19302

S. B. No. 197 Page 664
As Introduced
received by or for an individual for medical or education 19303
expenses, health insurance premiums, or employee expenses, or on 19304
account of a dependent care spending account, legal services 19305
plan, any cafeteria plan described in section 125 of the 19306
Internal Revenue Code, or any similar employee reimbursement; 19307
(h) Proceeds received from the issuance of the taxpayer's 19308
own stock, options, warrants, puts, or calls, or from the sale 19309
of the taxpayer's treasury stock; 19310
(i) Proceeds received on the account of payments from 19311
insurance policies, except those proceeds received for the loss 19312
of business revenue; 19313
(j) Gifts or charitable contributions received; membership 19314
dues received by trade, professional, homeowners', or 19315
condominium associations; payments received for educational 19316
courses, meetings, meals, or similar payments to a trade, 19317
professional, or other similar association; and fundraising 19318
receipts received by any person when any excess receipts are 19319
donated or used exclusively for charitable purposes; 19320
(k) Damages received as the result of litigation in excess 19321
of amounts that, if received without litigation, would be gross 19322
receipts; 19323
(l) Property, money, and other amounts received or 19324
acquired by an agent on behalf of another in excess of the 19325
agent's commission, fee, or other remuneration; 19326
(m) Tax refunds, other tax benefit recoveries, and 19327
reimbursements for the tax imposed under this chapter made by 19328
entities that are part of the same combined taxpayer or 19329
consolidated elected taxpayer group, and reimbursements made by 19330
entities that are not members of a combined taxpayer or 19331

S. B. No. 197 Page 665
As Introduced
consolidated elected taxpayer group that are required to be made 19332
for economic parity among multiple owners of an entity whose tax 19333
obligation under this chapter is required to be reported and 19334
paid entirely by one owner, pursuant to the requirements of 19335
sections 5751.011 and 5751.012 of the Revised Code; 19336
(n) Pension reversions; 19337
(o) Contributions to capital; 19338
(p) Sales or use taxes collected as a vendor or an out-of- 19339
state seller on behalf of the taxing jurisdiction from a 19340
consumer or other taxes the taxpayer is required by law to 19341
collect directly from a purchaser and remit to a local, state, 19342
or federal tax authority; 19343
(q) In the case of receipts from the sale of cigarettes, 19344
tobacco products, or vapor products by a wholesale dealer, 19345
retail dealer, distributor, manufacturer, vapor distributor, or 19346
seller, all as defined in section 5743.01 of the Revised Code, 19347
an amount equal to the federal and state excise taxes paid by 19348
any person on or for such cigarettes, tobacco products, or vapor 19349
products under subtitle E of the Internal Revenue Code or 19350
Chapter 5743. of the Revised Code; 19351
(r) In the case of receipts from the sale, transfer, 19352
exchange, or other disposition of motor fuel as "motor fuel" is 19353
defined in section 5736.01 of the Revised Code, an amount equal 19354
to the value of the motor fuel, including federal and state 19355
motor fuel excise taxes and receipts from billing or invoicing 19356
the tax imposed under section 5736.02 of the Revised Code to 19357
another person; 19358
(s) In the case of receipts from the sale of beer or 19359
intoxicating liquor, as defined in section 4301.01 of the 19360

S. B. No. 197 Page 666
As Introduced
Revised Code, by a person holding a permit issued under Chapter 19361
4301. or 4303. of the Revised Code, an amount equal to federal 19362
and state excise taxes paid by any person on or for such beer or 19363
intoxicating liquor under subtitle E of the Internal Revenue 19364
Code or Chapter 4301. or 4305. of the Revised Code; 19365
(t) Receipts realized by a new motor vehicle dealer or 19366
used motor vehicle dealer, as defined in section 4517.01 of the 19367
Revised Code, from the sale or other transfer of a motor 19368
vehicle, as defined in that section, to another motor vehicle 19369
dealer for the purpose of resale by the transferee motor vehicle 19370
dealer, but only if the sale or other transfer was based upon 19371
the transferee's need to meet a specific customer's preference 19372
for a motor vehicle; 19373
(u) Receipts from a financial institution described in 19374
division (E)(3) of this section for services provided to the 19375
financial institution in connection with the issuance, 19376
processing, servicing, and management of loans or credit 19377
accounts, if such financial institution and the recipient of 19378
such receipts have at least fifty per cent of their ownership 19379
interests owned or controlled, directly or constructively 19380
through related interests, by common owners; 19381
(v) Receipts realized from administering anti-neoplastic 19382
drugs and other cancer chemotherapy, biologicals, therapeutic 19383
agents, and supportive drugs in a physician's office to patients 19384
with cancer; 19385
(w) Funds received or used by a mortgage broker that is 19386
not a dealer in intangibles, other than fees or other 19387
consideration, pursuant to a table-funding mortgage loan or 19388
warehouse-lending mortgage loan. Terms used in division (F)(2) 19389
(w) of this section have the same meanings as in section 1322.01 19390

S. B. No. 197 Page 667
As Introduced
of the Revised Code, except "mortgage broker" means a person 19391
assisting a buyer in obtaining a mortgage loan for a fee or 19392
other consideration paid by the buyer or a lender, or a person 19393
engaged in table-funding or warehouse-lending mortgage loans 19394
that are first lien mortgage loans. 19395
(x) Property, money, and other amounts received by a 19396
professional employer organization, as defined in section 19397
4125.01 of the Revised Code, or an alternate employer 19398
organization, as defined in section 4133.01 of the Revised Code, 19399
from a client employer, as defined in either of those sections 19400
as applicable, in excess of the administrative fee charged by 19401
the professional employer organization or the alternate employer 19402
organization to the client employer; 19403
(y) In the case of amounts retained as commissions by a 19404
permit holder under Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code, an amount 19405
equal to the amounts specified under that chapter that must be 19406
paid to or collected by the tax commissioner as a tax and the 19407
amounts specified under that chapter to be used as purse money; 19408
(z) Qualifying distribution center receipts as determined 19409
under section 5751.40 of the Revised Code; 19410
(aa) Receipts of an employer from payroll deductions 19411
relating to the reimbursement of the employer for advancing 19412
moneys to an unrelated third party on an employee's behalf; 19413
(bb) Cash discounts allowed and taken; 19414
(cc) Returns and allowances; 19415
(dd) Bad debts from receipts on the basis of which the tax 19416
imposed by this chapter was paid in a prior quarterly tax 19417
payment period. For the purpose of this division, "bad debts" 19418
means any debts that have become worthless or uncollectible 19419

S. B. No. 197 Page 668
As Introduced
between the preceding and current quarterly tax payment periods, 19420
have been uncollected for at least six months, and that may be 19421
claimed as a deduction under section 166 of the Internal Revenue 19422
Code and the regulations adopted under that section, or that 19423
could be claimed as such if the taxpayer kept its accounts on 19424
the accrual basis. "Bad debts" does not include repossessed 19425
property, uncollectible amounts on property that remains in the 19426
possession of the taxpayer until the full purchase price is 19427
paid, or expenses in attempting to collect any account 19428
receivable or for any portion of the debt recovered. 19429
(ee) Any amount realized from the sale of an account 19430
receivable to the extent the receipts from the underlying 19431
transaction giving rise to the account receivable were included 19432
in the gross receipts of the taxpayer; 19433
(ff) Any receipts directly attributed to a transfer 19434
agreement or to the enterprise transferred under that agreement 19435
under section 4313.02 of the Revised Code; 19436
(gg) Qualified uranium receipts as determined under 19437
section 5751.41 of the Revised Code; 19438
(hh) In the case of amounts collected by a licensed casino 19439
operator from casino gaming, amounts in excess of the casino 19440
operator's gross casino revenue. In this division, "casino 19441
operator" and "casino gaming" have the meanings defined in 19442
section 3772.01 of the Revised Code, and "gross casino revenue" 19443
has the meaning defined in section 5753.01 of the Revised Code. 19444
(ii) Receipts realized from the sale of agricultural 19445
commodities by an agricultural commodity handler, both as 19446
defined in section 926.01 of the Revised Code, that is licensed 19447
by the director of agriculture to handle agricultural 19448

S. B. No. 197 Page 669
As Introduced
commodities in this state; 19449
(jj) Qualifying integrated supply chain receipts as 19450
determined under section 5751.42 of the Revised Code; 19451
(kk) In the case of a railroad company described in 19452
division (D)(9) of section 5727.01 of the Revised Code that 19453
purchases dyed diesel fuel directly from a supplier as defined 19454
by section 5736.01 of the Revised Code, an amount equal to the 19455
product of the number of gallons of dyed diesel fuel purchased 19456
directly from such a supplier multiplied by the average 19457
wholesale price for a gallon of diesel fuel as determined under 19458
section 5736.02 of the Revised Code for the period during which 19459
the fuel was purchased multiplied by a fraction, the numerator 19460
of which equals the rate of tax levied by section 5736.02 of the 19461
Revised Code less the rate of tax computed in section 5751.03 of 19462
the Revised Code, and the denominator of which equals the rate 19463
of tax computed in section 5751.03 of the Revised Code; 19464
(ll) Receipts realized by an out-of-state disaster 19465
business from disaster work conducted in this state during a 19466
disaster response period pursuant to a qualifying solicitation 19467
received by the business. Terms used in division (F)(2)(ll) of 19468
this section have the same meanings as in section 5703.94 of the 19469
Revised Code. 19470
(mm) In the case of receipts from the sale or transfer of 19471
a mortgage-backed security or a mortgage loan by a mortgage 19472
lender holding a valid certificate of registration issued under 19473
Chapter 1322. of the Revised Code or by a person that is a 19474
member of the mortgage lender's consolidated elected taxpayer 19475
group, an amount equal to the principal balance of the mortgage 19476
loan; 19477

S. B. No. 197 Page 670
As Introduced
(nn) Amounts of excess surplus of the state insurance fund 19478
received by the taxpayer from the Ohio bureau of workers' 19479
compensation pursuant to rules adopted under section 4123.321 of 19480
the Revised Code; 19481
(oo) Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of 19482
section 5751.091 of the Revised Code, receipts of a megaproject 19483
supplier from sales of tangible personal property directly to a 19484
megaproject operator in this state for use at the site of the 19485
megaproject operator's megaproject, provided that the sale 19486
occurs during the period that the megaproject operator has an 19487
agreement with the tax credit authority for the megaproject 19488
under division (D) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code that 19489
remains in effect and has not expired or been terminated, and 19490
provided the megaproject supplier holds a certificate for such 19491
megaproject issued under section 5751.052 of the Revised Code 19492
for the calendar year in which the sales are made and, if the 19493
megaproject supplier meets the requirements described in 19494
division (A)(13)(b) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, the 19495
megaproject supplier holds a certificate for such megaproject 19496
issued under division (D)(11) of section 122.17 of the Revised 19497
Code on the first day of that calendar year; 19498
(pp) Receipts from the sale of each new piece of capital 19499
equipment that has a cost in excess of one hundred million 19500
dollars and that is used at the site of a megaproject that 19501
satisfies the criteria described in division (A)(11)(a)(ii) of 19502
section 122.17 of the Revised Code, provided that the sale 19503
occurs during the period that a megaproject operator has an 19504
agreement for that megaproject with the tax credit authority 19505
under division (D) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code that 19506
remains in effect and has not expired or been terminated; 19507

S. B. No. 197 Page 671
As Introduced
(qq) In the case of amounts collected by a sports gaming 19508
proprietor from sports gaming, amounts in excess of the 19509
proprietor's sports gaming receipts. As used in this division, 19510
"sports gaming proprietor" has the same meaning as in section 19511
3775.01 of the Revised Code and "sports gaming receipts" has the 19512
same meaning as in section 5753.01 of the Revised Code. 19513
(rr) Amounts received from any federal, state, or local 19514
grant, and amounts of indebtedness discharged or forgiven 19515
pursuant to federal, state, or local law, for providing or 19516
expanding access to broadband service in this state. As used in 19517
this division, "broadband service" has the same meaning as in 19518
section 188.01 of the Revised Code. 19519
(ss) Receipts provided to a taxpayer to compensate for 19520
lost business resulting from the train derailment near the city 19521
of East Palestine on February 3, 2023, by any of the following: 19522
(i) A federal, state, or local government agency; 19523
(ii) A railroad company, as that term is defined in 19524
section 5727.01 of the Revised Code; 19525
(iii) Any subsidiary, insurer, or agent of a railroad 19526
company or any related person. 19527
(tt) An amount equal to the fee imposed by section 3743.22 19528
of the Revised Code billed to the purchaser, collected by the 19529
taxpayer, and remitted to the fire marshal during the tax 19530
period, provided that the fee is separately stated on the 19531
invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the 19532
purchaser of 1.4G fireworks in this state.; 19533
(uu) In the case of amounts collected by an internet 19534
gambling operator from internet gambling, amounts in excess of 19535
the operator's internet gambling receipts. As used in this 19536

S. B. No. 197 Page 672
As Introduced
division, "internet gambling" and "internet gambling operator" 19537
have the same meanings as in section 3771.01 of the Revised Code 19538
and "internet gambling receipts" has the same meaning as in 19539
section 5753.01 of the Revised Code. 19540
(vv) Any receipts for which the tax imposed by this 19541
chapter is prohibited by the constitution or laws of the United 19542
States or the constitution of this state; 19543
(vv)(ww) Receipts from fees imposed under sections 128.41 19544
and 128.42 of the Revised Code. 19545
(3) In the case of a taxpayer when acting as a real estate 19546
broker, "gross receipts" includes only the portion of any fee 19547
for the service of a real estate broker, or service of a real 19548
estate salesperson associated with that broker, that is retained 19549
by the broker and not paid to an associated real estate 19550
salesperson or another real estate broker. For the purposes of 19551
this division, "real estate broker" and "real estate 19552
salesperson" have the same meanings as in section 4735.01 of the 19553
Revised Code. 19554
(4) A taxpayer's method of accounting for gross receipts 19555
for a tax period shall be the same as the taxpayer's method of 19556
accounting for federal income tax purposes for the taxpayer's 19557
federal taxable year that includes the tax period. If a 19558
taxpayer's method of accounting for federal income tax purposes 19559
changes, its method of accounting for gross receipts under this 19560
chapter shall be changed accordingly. 19561
(G) "Taxable gross receipts" means gross receipts sitused 19562
to this state under section 5751.033 of the Revised Code. 19563
(H) A person has "substantial nexus with this state" if 19564
any of the following applies. The person: 19565

S. B. No. 197 Page 673
As Introduced
(1) Owns or uses a part or all of its capital in this 19566
state; 19567
(2) Holds a certificate of compliance with the laws of 19568
this state authorizing the person to do business in this state; 19569
(3) Has bright-line presence in this state; 19570
(4) Otherwise has nexus with this state to an extent that 19571
the person can be required to remit the tax imposed under this 19572
chapter under the Constitution of the United States. 19573
(I) A person has "bright-line presence" in this state for 19574
a reporting period and for the remaining portion of the calendar 19575
year if any of the following applies. The person: 19576
(1) Has at any time during the calendar year property in 19577
this state with an aggregate value of at least fifty thousand 19578
dollars. For the purpose of division (I)(1) of this section, 19579
owned property is valued at original cost and rented property is 19580
valued at eight times the net annual rental charge. 19581
(2) Has during the calendar year payroll in this state of 19582
at least fifty thousand dollars. Payroll in this state includes 19583
all of the following: 19584
(a) Any amount subject to withholding by the person under 19585
section 5747.06 of the Revised Code; 19586
(b) Any other amount the person pays as compensation to an 19587
individual under the supervision or control of the person for 19588
work done in this state; and 19589
(c) Any amount the person pays for services performed in 19590
this state on its behalf by another. 19591
(3) Has during the calendar year taxable gross receipts of 19592

S. B. No. 197 Page 674
As Introduced
at least five hundred thousand dollars; 19593
(4) Has at any time during the calendar year within this 19594
state at least twenty-five per cent of the person's total 19595
property, total payroll, or total gross receipts; 19596
(5) Is domiciled in this state as an individual or for 19597
corporate, commercial, or other business purposes. 19598
(J) "Tangible personal property" has the same meaning as 19599
in section 5739.01 of the Revised Code. 19600
(K) "Internal Revenue Code" means the Internal Revenue 19601
Code of 1986, 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended. Any term 19602
used in this chapter that is not otherwise defined has the same 19603
meaning as when used in a comparable context in the laws of the 19604
United States relating to federal income taxes unless a 19605
different meaning is clearly required. Any reference in this 19606
chapter to the Internal Revenue Code includes other laws of the 19607
United States relating to federal income taxes. 19608
(L) "Calendar quarter" means a three-month period ending 19609
on the thirty-first day of March, the thirtieth day of June, the 19610
thirtieth day of September, or the thirty-first day of December. 19611
(M) "Tax period" means the calendar quarter on the basis 19612
of which a taxpayer is required to pay the tax imposed under 19613
this chapter. 19614
(N) "Agent" means a person authorized by another person to 19615
act on its behalf to undertake a transaction for the other, 19616
including any of the following: 19617
(1) A person receiving a fee to sell financial 19618
instruments; 19619
(2) A person retaining only a commission from a 19620

S. B. No. 197 Page 675
As Introduced
transaction with the other proceeds from the transaction being 19621
remitted to another person; 19622
(3) A person issuing licenses and permits under section 19623
1533.13 of the Revised Code; 19624
(4) A lottery sales agent holding a valid license issued 19625
under section 3770.05 of the Revised Code; 19626
(5) A person acting as an agent of the division of liquor 19627
control under section 4301.17 of the Revised Code. 19628
(O) "Received" includes amounts accrued under the accrual 19629
method of accounting. 19630
(P) "Reporting person" means a person in a consolidated 19631
elected taxpayer or combined taxpayer group that is designated 19632
by that group to legally bind the group for all filings and tax 19633
liabilities and to receive all legal notices with respect to 19634
matters under this chapter, or, for the purposes of section 19635
5751.04 of the Revised Code, a separate taxpayer that is not a 19636
member of such a group. 19637
(Q) "Megaproject," "megaproject operator," and 19638
"megaproject supplier" have the same meanings as in section 19639
122.17 of the Revised Code. 19640
(R) "Exclusion amount" means three million dollars 19641
beginning in 2024 and six million dollars beginning in 2025. 19642
Sec. 5753.01. As used in Chapter 5753. of the Revised Code 19643
and for no other purpose under Title LVII of the Revised Code: 19644
(A) "Casino facility" has the same meaning as in section 19645
3772.01 of the Revised Code. 19646
(B) "Casino gaming" has the same meaning as in section 19647

S. B. No. 197 Page 676
As Introduced
3772.01 of the Revised Code. 19648
(C) "Casino operator" has the same meaning as in section 19649
3772.01 of the Revised Code. 19650
(D) "Gross casino revenue" means the total amount of money 19651
exchanged for the purchase of chips, tokens, tickets, electronic 19652
cards, or similar objects by casino patrons, less winnings paid 19653
to wagerers. "Gross casino revenue" does not include either of 19654
the following: 19655
(1) The issuance to casino patrons or wagering by casino 19656
patrons of any promotional gaming credit as defined in section 19657
3772.01 of the Revised Code. When issuance of the promotional 19658
gaming credit requires money exchanged as a match from the 19659
patron, the excludible portion of the promotional gaming credit 19660
does not include the portion of the wager purchased by the 19661
patron. 19662
(2) Sports gaming receipts or internet gambling receipts. 19663
(E) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 3772.01 of 19664
the Revised Code. 19665
(F) "Slot machine" has the same meaning as in section 19666
3772.01 of the Revised Code. 19667
(G) "Sports gaming facility" and "sports gaming 19668
proprietor" have the same meanings as in section 3775.01 of the 19669
Revised Code. 19670
(H) "Sports gaming receipts" means the total gross 19671
receipts received by a sports gaming proprietor from the 19672
operation of sports gaming in this state, including any 19673
promotional gaming credit, as defined in section 3775.01 of the 19674
Revised Code, less the total of the following: 19675

S. B. No. 197 Page 677
As Introduced
(1) All cash and cash equivalents paid as winnings to 19676
sports gaming patrons; 19677
(2) The dollar amount of all voided wagers. 19678
(3) Receipts received from the operation of lottery sports 19679
gaming on behalf of the state under sections 3770.23 to 3770.24 19680
and 3770.25 of the Revised Code. 19681
(4)(a) On and after January 1, 2027, but before January 1, 19682
2032, ten per cent of the promotional gaming credits wagered by 19683
patrons; 19684
(b) On and after January 1, 2032, twenty per cent of the 19685
promotional gaming credits wagered by patrons. 19686
As used in division (H) of this section, "promotional 19687
gaming credit" has the same meaning as in section 3775.01 of the 19688
Revised Code. When issuance of a promotional gaming credit 19689
requires money exchanged as a match from the patron, the 19690
deductible portion of the promotional gaming credit does not 19691
include the portion of the wager purchased by the patron. 19692
(I) "Table game" has the same meaning as in section 19693
3772.01 of the Revised Code. 19694
(J) "Taxpayer" means a casino operator subject to the tax 19695
levied under section 5753.02 of the Revised Code or , a sports 19696
gaming proprietor subject to the tax levied under section 19697
5753.021 of the Revised Code, or an internet gambling operator 19698
subject to the tax levied under section 5753.022 of the Revised 19699
Code. 19700
(K) "Tax period" means one twenty-four-hour period with 19701
regard to which a casino operator is required to pay the tax 19702
levied by section 5753.02 of the Revised Code and one calendar 19703

S. B. No. 197 Page 678
As Introduced
month with regard to which a sports gaming proprietor is 19704
required to pay the tax levied by section 5753.021 of the 19705
Revised Code or an internet gambling operator is required to pay 19706
the tax levied by section 5753.022 of the Revised Code. 19707
(L) "Gross internet gambling revenue" means the total 19708
gross receipts received by an internet gambling operator from 19709
the operation of internet gambling in this state, including any 19710
promotional gaming credit, as defined in section 3771.01 of the 19711
Revised Code, less winnings paid to wagerers. 19712
(M) "Internet gambling," "internet gambling operator," and 19713
"internet gambling management company" have the same meanings as 19714
in section 3771.01 of the Revised Code. 19715
Sec. 5753.021. (A) For the purposes of funding the 19716
education needs of this state, funding efforts to alleviate 19717
problem sports gaming, and defraying the costs of enforcing and 19718
administering the law governing sports gaming and the tax levied 19719
by this section, a tax is hereby levied on the sports gaming 19720
receipts of a sports gaming proprietor at the rate of twenty 19721
following applicable rate: 19722
(1) Ten per cent of the sports gaming receipts received by 19723
a proprietor from the operation of a sports gaming facility; 19724
(2) Twenty per cent of the any other sports gaming 19725
receipts received by the a proprietor from the operation of 19726
sports gaming in this state. 19727
(B) The tax imposed under this section is in addition to 19728
any other taxes or fees imposed under the Revised Code. 19729
Sec. 5753.022. (A) For the purpose of funding the needs o f 19730
this state, funding efforts to alleviate problem internet 19731
gambling, and defraying the costs of administering the tax 19732

S. B. No. 197 Page 679
As Introduced
levied by this section, a tax is hereby levied on the internet 19733
gambling receipts of an internet gambling operator or internet 19734
gambling management company at the following applicable rate: 19735
(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) of 19736
this section, thirty-six per cent of the internet gambling 19737
receipts received by the operator or management company from the 19738
operation of internet gambling in this state; 19739
(2) If the internet gambling operator contracts with an 19740
internet gambling management company under section 3771.05 of 19741
the Revised Code and the same person does not own or control at 19742
least fifty per cent of both the internet gambling operator and 19743
the internet gambling management company, forty per cent of the 19744
internet gambling receipts received by the operator and the 19745
management company from the operation of internet gambling in 19746
this state. 19747
(B) The tax imposed under this section is in addition to 19748
any other taxes or fees imposed under the Revised Code. 19749
Sec. 5753.03. (A) For the purpose of receiving and 19750
distributing, and accounting for, revenue received from the tax 19751
levied by section 5753.02 of the Revised Code, the following 19752
funds are created in the state treasury: 19753
(1) The casino tax revenue fund; 19754
(2) The gross casino revenue county fund; 19755
(3) The gross casino revenue county student fund; 19756
(4) The gross casino revenue host city fund; 19757
(5) The Ohio state racing commission fund; 19758
(6) The Ohio law enforcement training fund; 19759

S. B. No. 197 Page 680
As Introduced
(7) The problem casino gambling and addictions fund; 19760
(8) The casino control commission fund; 19761
(9) The casino tax administration fund; 19762
(10) The peace officer training academy fund; 19763
(11) The criminal justice services casino tax revenue 19764
fund. 19765
(B) All moneys collected from the tax levied under section 19766
5753.02 of the Revised Code shall be deposited into the casino 19767
tax revenue fund. 19768
(C) From the casino tax revenue fund the director of 19769
budget and management shall transfer as needed to the tax refund 19770
fund amounts equal to the refunds certified by the tax 19771
commissioner under section 5753.06 of the Revised Code and 19772
attributable to the tax levied under section 5753.02 of the 19773
Revised Code. 19774
(D) After making any transfers required by division (C) of 19775
this section, but not later than the fifteenth day of the month 19776
following the end of each calendar quarter, the director of 19777
budget and management shall transfer amounts to each fund as 19778
follows: 19779
(1) Fifty-one per cent to the gross casino revenue county 19780
fund to make payments as required by Section 6(C)(3)(a) of 19781
Article XV, Ohio Constitution; 19782
(2) Thirty-four per cent to the gross casino revenue 19783
county student fund to make payments as required by Section 6(C) 19784
(3)(b) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution and as provided in 19785
section 5753.11 of the Revised Code; 19786

S. B. No. 197 Page 681
As Introduced
(3) Five per cent to the gross casino revenue host city 19787
fund for the benefit of the cities in which casino facilities 19788
are located; 19789
(4) Three per cent to the Ohio state racing commission 19790
fund to support the efforts and activities of the Ohio state 19791
racing casino control commission to promote horse racing in this 19792
state at which the pari-mutuel system of wagering is conducted; 19793
(5) Two per cent to the Ohio law enforcement training fund 19794
to support law enforcement functions in the state; 19795
(6) Two per cent to the problem casino gambling and 19796
addictions fund to support efforts of the department of mental 19797
health and addiction services to alleviate problem gambling and 19798
substance abuse and related research in the state under section 19799
5119.47 of the Revised Code; 19800
(7) Three per cent to the casino control commission fund 19801
to support the operations of the Ohio casino control commission 19802
and to defray the cost of administering the tax levied under 19803
section 5753.02 of the Revised Code. 19804
Payments under divisions (D)(1) and (3) of this section 19805
shall be made by the end of the month following the end of the 19806
quarterly period. The tax commissioner shall make the data 19807
available to the director of budget and management for this 19808
purpose. 19809
Money in the Ohio state racing commission fund shall be 19810
distributed at the discretion of the Ohio state racing casino 19811
control commission for the purpose stated in division (D)(4) of 19812
this section by the end of the month following the end of the 19813
quarterly period. The commission may retain up to ten per cent 19814
of the amount transferred to the fund under division (D)(4) of 19815

S. B. No. 197 Page 682
As Introduced
this section for operating expenses necessary for the 19816
administration of the fund. 19817
Payments from the gross casino revenue county student fund 19818
as required under section 5753.11 of the Revised Code shall be 19819
made by the last day of January and by the last day of August of 19820
each year, beginning in 2013. The tax commissioner shall make 19821
the data available to the director of budget and management for 19822
this purpose. 19823
Of the money credited to the Ohio law enforcement training 19824
fund, the director of budget and management shall distribute 19825
eighty-five per cent of the money to the police officer training 19826
academy fund for the purpose of supporting the law enforcement 19827
training efforts of the Ohio peace officer training academy and 19828
fifteen per cent of the money to the criminal justice services 19829
casino tax revenue fund for the purpose of supporting the law 19830
enforcement training efforts of the division of criminal justice 19831
services. 19832
(E)(1) The tax commissioner shall serve as an agent of the 19833
counties of this state only for the purposes of this division 19834
and solely to make payments directly to municipal corporations 19835
and school districts, as applicable, on the counties' behalf. 19836
(2) On or before the last day of the month following the 19837
end of each calendar quarter, the tax commissioner shall provide 19838
for payment from the funds referenced in divisions (D)(1) and 19839
(3) of this section to each county and municipal corporation as 19840
prescribed in those divisions. 19841
(3) On or before the last day of January and the last day 19842
of August each year, the commissioner shall provide for payments 19843
from the fund referenced in division (D)(2) of this section to 19844

S. B. No. 197 Page 683
As Introduced
each school district as prescribed in that division. 19845
(F) The director of budget and management shall transfer 19846
one per cent of the money credited to the casino control 19847
commission fund to the casino tax administration fund. The tax 19848
commissioner shall use the casino tax administration fund to 19849
defray the costs incurred in administering the tax levied under 19850
section 5753.02 of the Revised Code. 19851
(G) All investment earnings of the gross casino revenue 19852
county student fund shall be credited to the fund. 19853
Sec. 5753.031. (A) For the purpose of receiving and 19854
distributing, and accounting for, revenue received from the tax 19855
levied by section 5753.021 of the Revised Code and from fines 19856
imposed under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code, the following 19857
funds are created in the state treasury: 19858
(1) The sports gaming revenue fund; 19859
(2) The sports gaming tax administration fund, which the 19860
tax commissioner shall use to defray the costs incurred in 19861
administering the tax levied by section 5753.021 of the Revised 19862
Code; 19863
(3) The sports gaming profits education fund, which shall 19864
be used for the support of public and nonpublic education for 19865
students in grades kindergarten through twelve as determined in 19866
appropriations made by the general assembly. 19867
(4) The problem sports gaming gambling fund. 19868
(B)(1) All of the following shall be deposited into the 19869
sports gaming revenue fund: 19870
(a) All money collected from the tax levied under section 19871
5753.021 of the Revised Code; 19872

S. B. No. 197 Page 684
As Introduced
(b) The remainder of the fees described in division (G)(2) 19873
of section 3775.02 of the Revised Code, after the Ohio casino 19874
control commission deposits the required amount in the sports 19875
gaming profits veterans fund under that division; 19876
(c) Unclaimed winnings collected under division (F)(E) of 19877
section 3775.10 of the Revised Code; 19878
(d) Any fines collected under Chapter 3775. of the Revised 19879
Code. 19880
(2) All other fees collected under Chapter 3775. of the 19881
Revised Code shall be deposited into the casino control 19882
commission fund created under section 5753.03 of the Revised 19883
Code. 19884
(C)(1) From the sports gaming revenue fund, the director 19885
of budget and management shall transfer as needed to the tax 19886
refund fund amounts equal to the refunds certified by the tax 19887
commissioner under section 5753.06 of the Revised Code and 19888
attributable to the tax levied under section 5753.021 of the 19889
Revised Code. 19890
(2) Not later than the fifteenth day of each month, the 19891
director of budget and management shall transfer from the sports 19892
gaming revenue fund to the sports gaming tax administration fund 19893
the amount necessary to reimburse the department of taxation's 19894
actual expenses incurred in administering the tax levied under 19895
section 5753.021 of the Revised Code. 19896
(3) Of the amount in the sports gaming revenue fund 19897
remaining after making the transfers required by divisions (C) 19898
(1) and (2) of this section, the director of budget and 19899
management shall transfer, on or before the fifteenth day of the 19900
month following the end of each calendar quarter, amounts to 19901

S. B. No. 197 Page 685
As Introduced
each fund as follows: 19902
(a) Ninety-eight per cent to the sports gaming profits 19903
education fund; 19904
(b) Two per cent to the problem sports gaming gambling 19905
fund. 19906
(D) All interest generated by the funds created under this 19907
section shall be credited back to them. 19908
Sec. 5753.032. (A) For the purpose of receiving and 19909
distributing, and accounting for, revenue received from the tax 19910
levied by section 5753.022 of the Revised Code, the following 19911
funds are created in the state treasury: 19912
(1) The internet gambling revenue fund; 19913
(2) The internet gambling tax administration fund, which 19914
the tax commissioner shall use to defray the costs incurred in 19915
administering the tax levied by section 5753.022 of the Revised 19916
Code. 19917
(B) All money collected from the tax levied under section 19918
5753.022 of the Revised Code shall be deposited in the internet 19919
gambling revenue fund. 19920
(C)(1) From the internet gambling revenue fund, the 19921
director of budget and management shall transfer as needed to 19922
the tax refund fund amounts equal to the refunds certified by 19923
the tax commissioner under section 5753.06 of the Revised Code 19924
and attributable to the tax levied under section 5753.022 of the 19925
Revised Code. 19926
(2) Not later than the fifteenth day of each month, the 19927
director of budget and management shall transfer from the 19928
internet gambling revenue fund to the internet gambling tax 19929

S. B. No. 197 Page 686
As Introduced
administration fund the amount necessary to reimburse the 19930
department of taxation's actual expenses incurred in 19931
administering the tax levied under section 5753.022 of the 19932
Revised Code. 19933
(3) Of the amount in the internet gambling revenue fund 19934
remaining after making the transfers required by divisions (C) 19935
(1) and (2) of this section, the director of budget and 19936
management shall transfer, on or before the fifteenth day of the 19937
month following the end of each calendar quarter, amounts to 19938
each fund as follows: 19939
(a) Ninety-nine per cent to the general revenue fund; 19940
(b) One per cent to the problem gambling fund created 19941
under section 5753.031 of the Revised Code. 19942
Section 2. That existing sections 109.32, 109.572, 119.12, 19943
121.95, 131.02, 173.121, 718.031, 959.05, 1309.109, 1711.09, 19944
1716.21, 2915.01, 2915.02, 2915.06, 2915.061, 2915.07, 2915.08, 19945
2915.081, 2915.082, 2915.09, 2915.091, 2915.092, 2915.093, 19946
2915.094, 2915.095, 2915.10, 2915.101, 2915.11, 2915.12, 19947
2915.13, 2915.14, 2915.15, 2923.121, 2927.21, 2933.51, 3123.89, 19948
3123.90, 3517.091, 3763.01, 3769.01, 3769.03, 3769.031, 3769.04, 19949
3769.041, 3769.05, 3769.06, 3769.07, 3769.071, 3769.072, 19950
3769.08, 3769.082, 3769.083, 3769.084, 3769.085, 3769.087, 19951
3769.089, 3769.0810, 3769.09, 3769.091, 3769.10, 3769.101, 19952
3769.12, 3769.13, 3769.131, 3769.14, 3769.20, 3769.201, 3769.21, 19953
3769.22, 3769.25, 3769.26, 3769.27, 3770.01, 3770.02, 3770.03, 19954
3770.05, 3770.06, 3770.07, 3770.071, 3770.072, 3770.073, 19955
3770.08, 3770.10, 3770.13, 3770.21, 3770.24, 3770.25, 3770.99, 19956
3772.01, 3772.02, 3772.03, 3772.031, 3772.04, 3772.062, 3772.07, 19957
3772.09, 3772.091, 3772.10, 3772.13, 3772.131, 3772.15, 3772.16, 19958
3772.17, 3772.18, 3772.23, 3772.31, 3772.37, 3772.99, 3774.01, 19959

S. B. No. 197 Page 687
As Introduced
3774.02, 3774.03, 3774.04, 3774.09, 3775.01, 3775.02, 3775.03, 19960
3775.06, 3775.09, 3775.10, 3775.11, 3775.13, 3775.99, 4301.03, 19961
4301.58, 4303.17, 5701.11, 5747.01, 5747.02, 5747.062, 5747.063, 19962
5747.08, 5747.12, 5747.20, 5751.01, 5753.01, 5753.021, 5753.03, 19963
5753.031, and 5907.18 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 19964
Section 3. That sections 3769.02, 3769.021, 3770.23, 19965
3772.25, 3775.16, and 5747.064 of the Revised Code are hereby 19966
repealed. 19967
Section 4. (A)(1) Notwithstanding any contrary provision 19968
of this act, during the period beginning on the effective date 19969
of this section and ending on December 31, 2026, all of the 19970
following apply: 19971
(a) The Attorney General, and not the Ohio Casino Control 19972
Commission, has the authority to regulate bingo and games of 19973
chance conducted by charitable organizations and to regulate 19974
sweepstakes terminal devices, in accordance with the provisions 19975
of Chapters 2915., 3768., and 3777. of the Revised Code, as 19976
amended and enacted by this act. 19977
(b) The Attorney General has the sole authority to issue, 19978
deny, suspend, or revoke licenses under those chapters and to 19979
adopt, amend, or rescind rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised 19980
Code with respect to those matters. 19981
(c) All fees received under Chapters 3768. and 3777. of 19982
the Revised Code, as enacted by this act, shall be deposited in 19983
the state treasury to the credit of the charitable law fund 19984
established under section 109.32 of the Revised Code. 19985
(2) As soon as practicable after the effective date of 19986
this section, the Attorney General, in cooperation with the Ohio 19987
Casino Control Commission, shall issue guidance to persons who 19988

S. B. No. 197 Page 688
As Introduced
currently hold licenses issued under Chapter 2915. of the 19989
Revised Code, as it existed immediately before the effective 19990
date of this section, explaining the transition of authority 19991
required by this act. 19992
(3) On January 1, 2027, the authority to regulate bingo 19993
and games of chance conducted by charitable organizations and to 19994
regulate sweepstakes terminal devices is transferred from the 19995
Attorney General to the Ohio Casino Control Commission. All 19996
records of the Attorney General with respect to the regulation 19997
of those matters shall be transferred to the Commission. The 19998
Commission is successor to, and assumes the obligations of, the 19999
Attorney General with respect to the regulation of those 20000
matters. 20001
(B) Any valid license, endorsement, registration, or 20002
certificate issued by the Attorney General under Chapter 2915. 20003
of the Revised Code before January 1, 2027, remains valid 20004
according to the terms of the license, endorsement, 20005
registration, or certificate and is considered to be a license, 20006
endorsement, registration, or certificate issued by the Ohio 20007
Casino Control Commission under Chapter 3768. or 3777. of the 20008
Revised Code, as applicable. 20009
(C)(1) All rules of the Attorney General with respect to 20010
bingo and games of chance conducted by charitable organizations 20011
and with respect to sweepstakes terminal devices that are in 20012
effect immediately before January 1, 2027, and that are not in 20013
conflict with the requirements of this act, continue in effect 20014
until rescinded or amended by the Commission. The Director of 20015
the Legislative Service Commission shall renumber rules adopted 20016
under Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code to reflect the transfer 20017
of authority to Chapters 3768. and 3777. of the Revised Code, as 20018

S. B. No. 197 Page 689
As Introduced
amended by this act. 20019
(2) Any rules that are pending before the Common Sense 20020
Initiative Office or the Joint Committee on Agency Rule Review 20021
on January 1, 2027, that were proposed by the Attorney General 20022
under Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code, as that chapter existed 20023
immediately before the effective date of this section, shall be 20024
treated as having been proposed by the Ohio Casino Control 20025
Commission under Chapter 3768. or 3777. of the Revised Code, as 20026
applicable. 20027
(D) Any business commenced, but not completed, by the 20028
Attorney General on January 1, 2027, with respect to the 20029
regulation of bingo and games of chance conducted by charitable 20030
organizations or the regulation of sweepstakes terminal devices 20031
shall be completed by the Commission in the same manner, and 20032
with the same effect, as if completed by the Attorney General. 20033
No validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or 20034
liability is lost or impaired by reason of the transfer required 20035
by this section. 20036
(E) On and after January 1, 2027, wherever the Attorney 20037
General is referred to in any law, contract, or other document 20038
with respect to the regulation of bingo and games of chance 20039
conducted by charitable organizations or with respect to 20040
sweepstakes terminal devices, the reference shall be deemed to 20041
refer to the Commission. 20042
(F) No action or proceeding pending on January 1, 2027, is 20043
affected by the transfer, and any such action or proceeding with 20044
respect to the regulation of bingo and games of chance conducted 20045
by charitable organizations or with respect to sweepstakes 20046
terminal devices shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of 20047
the Commission. In all such actions and proceedings, the 20048

S. B. No. 197 Page 690
As Introduced
Commission, on application to the court, shall be substituted as 20049
a party. 20050
Section 5. (A)(1) Notwithstanding any contrary provision 20051
of this act, during the period beginning on the effective date 20052
of this section and ending on March 30, 2026, all of the 20053
following apply: 20054
(a) The State Racing Commission continues to exist in 20055
accordance with the versions of sections 3769.02 and 3769.021 of 20056
the Revised Code that were in effect immediately before the 20057
effective date of this section. 20058
(b) The State Racing Commission, and not the Ohio Casino 20059
Control Commission, has the authority to regulate horse racing 20060
and pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing, in accordance with the 20061
provisions of Chapters 3769. and 3772. of the Revised Code, as 20062
amended by this act. 20063
(c) The State Racing Commission has the sole authority to 20064
issue, deny, suspend, or revoke permits and licenses under 20065
Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code, as amended by this act. 20066
(d) The Ohio Casino Control Commission may adopt, amend, 20067
or rescind rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code with 20068
respect to horse racing and pari-mutuel wagering on horse 20069
racing. The State Racing Commission may adopt, amend, or rescind 20070
rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that are not in 20071
conflict with the rules of the Ohio Casino Control Commission. 20072
(e) All fees received under Chapter 3769. of the Revised 20073
Code, as amended by this act, shall be deposited in the state 20074
treasury to the credit of the State Racing Commission Operating 20075
Fund (Fund 5650). 20076
(2) The State Racing Commission shall take all necessary 20077

S. B. No. 197 Page 691
As Introduced
actions to allow permit holders to begin accepting pari-mutuel 20078
wagers on horse racing over the internet, in accordance with 20079
Chapters 3769. and 3772. of the Revised Code, as amended by this 20080
act, as soon as practicable after the effective date of this 20081
section. 20082
(3) As soon as practicable after the effective date of 20083
this section, the State Racing Commission, in cooperation with 20084
the Ohio Casino Control Commission, shall issue guidance to 20085
persons who currently hold permits and licenses issued under 20086
Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code, as it existed immediately 20087
before the effective date of this section, explaining the 20088
transition of authority required by this act and the other 20089
requirements of this act that apply to those permit holders and 20090
licensees. 20091
(4) On March 31, 2026, the State Racing Commission is 20092
abolished. All records of the State Racing Commission shall be 20093
transferred to the Ohio Casino Control Commission, and all of 20094
its other assets and liabilities shall be transferred to the 20095
Ohio Casino Control Commission. The Ohio Casino Control 20096
Commission is successor to, and assumes the obligations of, the 20097
State Racing Commission. 20098
(B) Subject to Section 8 of this act, any valid permit or 20099
license issued by the State Racing Commission before March 31, 20100
2026, remains valid according to the terms of the permit or 20101
license and is considered to be a permit or license issued by 20102
the Ohio Casino Control Commission. 20103
(C)(1) All rules of the State Racing Commission that are 20104
in effect immediately before March 31, 2026, continue in effect 20105
until rescinded or amended by the Ohio Casino Control 20106
Commission. 20107

S. B. No. 197 Page 692
As Introduced
(2) Any rules that are pending before the Common Sense 20108
Initiative Office or the Joint Committee on Agency Rule Review 20109
on March 31, 2026, that were proposed by the State Racing 20110
Commission shall be treated as having been proposed by the Ohio 20111
Casino Control Commission. 20112
(D) Any business commenced, but not completed by the State 20113
Racing Commission or the Director of that agency on March 31, 20114
2026, shall be completed by the Executive Director of the Ohio 20115
Casino Control Commission in the same manner, and with the same 20116
effect, as if completed by the State Racing Commission or by the 20117
Director of that agency. No validation, cure, right, privilege, 20118
remedy, obligation, or liability is lost or impaired by reason 20119
of the transfer required by this section. 20120
(E) Subject to the lay-off provisions of sections 124.321 20121
to 124.328 of the Revised Code, all of the State Racing 20122
Commission's employees are transferred to the Ohio Casino 20123
Control Commission on March 31, 2026, and retain their positions 20124
and all of the benefits accruing thereto. 20125
(F) On March 31, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, 20126
the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer the cash 20127
balance of the State Racing Commission Operating Fund (Fund 20128
5650) to the Casino Control Commission Fund (Fund 5HS0). Upon 20129
completion of the transfer, Fund 5650 is abolished. The Director 20130
shall cancel any existing encumbrances against appropriation 20131
item 875604, Racing Commission Operating, and reestablish them 20132
against appropriation item 955321, Operating Expenses. The 20133
reestablished encumbrance amounts are hereby appropriated. 20134
(G)(1) On and after March 31, 2026, wherever the Director 20135
or the State Racing Commission is referred to in any law, 20136
contract, or other document, the reference shall be deemed to 20137

S. B. No. 197 Page 693
As Introduced
refer to the Executive Director or the Ohio Casino Control 20138
Commission, whichever is appropriate. 20139
(2) On or after March 31, 2026, the trustees of the 20140
Thoroughbred Horsemen's Health Fund and the trustees of Harness 20141
Horsemen's Health and Retirement, Inc., respectively, shall 20142
amend the articles of incorporation and bylaws of those 20143
corporations to change any reference in those documents to the 20144
State Racing Commission to refer instead to the Ohio Casino 20145
Control Commission. 20146
(H) No action or proceeding pending on March 31, 2026, is 20147
affected by the transfer, and any such action or proceeding 20148
shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the Executive 20149
Director or the Ohio Casino Control Commission. In all such 20150
actions and proceedings, the Executive Director or the Ohio 20151
Casino Control Commission, on application to the court, shall be 20152
substituted as a party. 20153
Section 6. (A)(1) Notwithstanding any contrary provision 20154
of this act, during the period beginning on the effective date 20155
of this section and ending on March 30, 2026, all of the 20156
following apply: 20157
(a) The State Lottery Commission, and not the Ohio Casino 20158
Control Commission, has the authority to license and regulate 20159
video lottery sales agents, video lottery sales agent employees, 20160
and video lottery technology providers and to regulate the 20161
operation of video lottery terminals, in accordance with the 20162
provisions of Chapters 3770. and 3772. of the Revised Code, as 20163
amended by this act. 20164
(b) The State Lottery Commission has the sole authority to 20165
issue, deny, suspend, or revoke video lottery sales agent, video 20166

S. B. No. 197 Page 694
As Introduced
lottery sales agent employee, and video lottery technology 20167
provider licenses. 20168
(c) The Ohio Casino Control Commission may adopt, amend, 20169
or rescind rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code with 20170
respect to the regulation of video lottery sales agents, video 20171
lottery sales agent employees, video lottery technology 20172
providers, and the operation of video lottery terminals. The 20173
State Lottery Commission may adopt, amend, or rescind rules 20174
under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that are not in conflict 20175
with the rules of the Ohio Casino Control Commission. 20176
(d) All fees received under Chapter 3770. of the Revised 20177
Code, as amended by this act, shall be deposited in the state 20178
treasury to the credit of the State Lottery Gross Revenue Fund 20179
established under section 3770.06 of the Revised Code. 20180
(2) As soon as practicable after the effective date of 20181
this section, the State Lottery Commission, in cooperation with 20182
the Ohio Casino Control Commission, shall issue guidance to 20183
video lottery sales agents, video lottery sales agent employees, 20184
and video lottery technology providers, explaining the 20185
transition of authority required by this act and the other 20186
requirements of this act that apply to those persons. 20187
(3) On March 31, 2026, the authority to license and 20188
regulate video lottery sales agents, video lottery sales agent 20189
employees, and video lottery technology providers and to 20190
regulate the operation of video lottery terminals is transferred 20191
from the State Lottery Commission to the Ohio Casino Control 20192
Commission. The State Lottery Commission retains the authority 20193
to conduct video lottery terminal games in accordance with the 20194
provisions of Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, as amended by 20195
this act. All records of the State Lottery Commission with 20196

S. B. No. 197 Page 695
As Introduced
respect to the licensing and regulation of video lottery sales 20197
agents, video lottery sales agent employees, and video lottery 20198
technology providers and the regulation of the operation of 20199
video lottery terminals shall be transferred to the Commission, 20200
except as otherwise necessary to facilitate the conduct of video 20201
lottery terminal games by the State Lottery Commission. The Ohio 20202
Casino Control Commission is successor to, and assumes the 20203
obligations of, the State Lottery Commission with respect to the 20204
licensing and regulation of video lottery sales agents, video 20205
lottery sales agent employees, and video lottery technology 20206
providers and the operation of video lottery terminals. 20207
(B) Subject to Section 8 of this act, any valid video 20208
lottery sales agent, video lottery sales agent employee, or 20209
video lottery technology provider license issued by the State 20210
Lottery Commission before March 31, 2026, remains valid 20211
according to the terms of the license and is considered to be a 20212
license issued by the Ohio Casino Control Commission. 20213
(C)(1) All rules of the State Lottery Commission with 20214
respect to the licensing and regulation of video lottery sales 20215
agents, video lottery sales agent employees, and video lottery 20216
technology providers and the operation of video lottery 20217
terminals, other than rules with respect to the conduct of video 20218
lottery terminal games, that are in effect immediately before 20219
March 31, 2026, continue in effect until rescinded or amended by 20220
the Ohio Casino Control Commission. 20221
(2) Any rules that are pending before the Common Sense 20222
Initiative Office or the Joint Committee on Agency Rule Review 20223
on March 31, 2026, that were proposed by the State Lottery 20224
Commission under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, as that 20225
chapter existed immediately before the effective date of this 20226

S. B. No. 197 Page 696
As Introduced
section, with respect to the licensing and regulation of video 20227
lottery sales agents, video lottery sales agent employees, and 20228
video lottery technology providers and the operation of video 20229
lottery terminals, other than rules with respect to the conduct 20230
of video lottery terminal games, shall be treated as having been 20231
proposed by the Ohio Casino Control Commission. 20232
(D) Any business commenced, but not completed, by the 20233
State Lottery Commission on March 31, 2026, with respect to the 20234
licensing and regulation of video lottery sales agents, video 20235
lottery sales agent employees, and video lottery technology 20236
providers and the operation of video lottery terminals, other 20237
than with respect to the conduct of video lottery terminal 20238
games, shall be completed by the Ohio Casino Control Commission 20239
in the same manner, and with the same effect, as if completed by 20240
the State Lottery Commission. No validation, cure, right, 20241
privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability is lost or impaired 20242
by reason of the transfer required by this section. 20243
(E) On and after March 31, 2026, wherever the State 20244
Lottery Commission is referred to in any law, contract, or other 20245
document with respect to the licensing and regulation of video 20246
lottery sales agents, video lottery sales agent employees, and 20247
video lottery technology providers and the operation of video 20248
lottery terminals, other than with respect to the conduct of 20249
video lottery terminal games, the reference shall be deemed to 20250
refer to the Ohio Casino Control Commission. 20251
(F) No action or proceeding pending on March 31, 2026, is 20252
affected by the transfer, and any such action or proceeding with 20253
respect to the licensing and regulation of video lottery sales 20254
agents, video lottery sales agent employees, and video lottery 20255
technology providers and the operation of video lottery 20256

S. B. No. 197 Page 697
As Introduced
terminals, other than with respect to the conduct of video 20257
lottery terminal games, shall be prosecuted or defended in the 20258
name of the Ohio Casino Control Commission. In all such actions 20259
and proceedings, the Ohio Casino Control Commission, on 20260
application to the court, shall be substituted as a party. 20261
Section 7. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 20262
contrary, on or after the effective date of this section, the 20263
Director of Budget and Management shall make budget and 20264
accounting changes to implement the transfer of duties, 20265
functions, and programs to the Ohio Casino Control Commission as 20266
described in this act, including administrative organization, 20267
program transfers, renaming of funds, creation of new funds, 20268
transfer of state funds, and consolidation of funds. 20269
(B) The Director may, if necessary, cancel or establish 20270
encumbrances or parts of encumbrances in fiscal years 2026 and 20271
2027 in the appropriate funds and appropriation items for the 20272
same purposes and for payment to the same vendor. Such 20273
encumbrances are hereby appropriated. If necessary for the 20274
continued efficient administration of gambling regulation as 20275
provided in this act, the Director of Budget and Management may 20276
transfer appropriations between the Ohio Casino Control 20277
Commission, the Attorney General, the State Racing Commission, 20278
and the State Lottery Commission to continue levels of program 20279
services and efficiently deliver state funding to those 20280
programs. 20281
Section 8. (A) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of 20282
this act, an individual who holds any of the following licenses 20283
as of the effective date of this section is considered to hold a 20284
key gaming employee license under section 3772.13 of the Revised 20285
Code or a gaming employee license under section 3772.131 of the 20286

S. B. No. 197 Page 698
As Introduced
Revised Code, as applicable, until the original license expires: 20287
(1) A totalizator company management supervisory employee, 20288
totalizator company employee, or mutuel employee license issued 20289
by the State Racing Commission under Chapter 3769. of the 20290
Revised Code; 20291
(2) A video lottery sales agent employee license issued by 20292
the State Lottery Commission under Chapter 3770:2 of the Ohio 20293
Administrative Code; 20294
(3) A key employee license or casino employee license 20295
issued by the Ohio Casino Control Commission under Chapter 3772. 20296
of the Revised Code; 20297
(4) A sports gaming occupational license issued by the 20298
Ohio Casino Control Commission under Chapter 3775. of the 20299
Revised Code. 20300
(B) The term of any license described in division (A) of 20301
this section that expired not more than ninety days before the 20302
effective date of this section, or that would have expired 20303
within one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this 20304
section, is extended by one hundred eighty days. 20305
(C) If, as of the effective date of this section, an 20306
individual holds two or more licenses described in division (A) 20307
of this section, the existing term of each license is extended 20308
through the latest expiration date of any such license the 20309
individual holds, as extended under division (B) of this section 20310
if applicable. 20311
(D) After a license described in division (A) of this 20312
section expires, the licensee is required to hold a single key 20313
gaming employee license issued under section 3772.13 of the 20314
Revised Code or a single gaming employee license issued under 20315

S. B. No. 197 Page 699
As Introduced
section 3772.131 of the Revised Code, as applicable, in order to 20316
perform the licensee's duties. 20317
(E) The Ohio Casino Control Commission, in cooperation 20318
with the State Racing Commission and the State Lottery 20319
Commission, shall issue guidance to licensees to facilitate the 20320
operation of this section. 20321
Section 9. (A) The Executive Director of the Ohio Casino 20322
Control Commission shall designate a launch date for internet 20323
gambling that is as soon as practicable after the effective date 20324
of this section and not later than March 31, 2026. No person 20325
shall offer internet gambling in this state before the launch 20326
date. 20327
(B)(1) The Executive Director of the Ohio Casino Control 20328
Commission shall set a series of deadlines by which a person 20329
must apply for an internet gambling license under Chapter 3771. 20330
of the Revised Code, as enacted by this act, and meet all other 20331
requirements for the license, in order to begin operating under 20332
the license on the launch date. 20333
(2) If a person applies for an internet gambling license 20334
after the application deadline, the Commission is not required 20335
to review the application in time to issue the person a license 20336
before the launch date. If a person applies for an internet 20337
gambling license on or before the application deadline, but 20338
fails to meet any other requirement for the license by the 20339
applicable deadline to do so, the Commission is not required to 20340
issue the person a license before the launch date. 20341
(C) During the period beginning on the effective date of 20342
this section and ending on October 1, 2027, all of the following 20343
apply: 20344

S. B. No. 197 Page 700
As Introduced
(1) At the request of an applicant for an internet 20345
gambling license under Chapter 3771. of the Revised Code, as 20346
enacted by this act, the Executive Director of the Ohio Casino 20347
Control Commission may issue a provisional internet gambling 20348
license of the applicable type to the applicant, so long as the 20349
applicant has submitted a completed application for the license, 20350
including paying the required application fee. The Commission 20351
may prescribe by rule the requirements to receive a provisional 20352
internet gambling license, including additional application and 20353
license fees. 20354
(2) In evaluating a request for a provisional internet 20355
gambling license, the Executive Director may consider the 20356
applicant's apparent eligibility for an internet gambling 20357
license under Chapter 3771. of the Revised Code, as enacted by 20358
this act, including whether the applicant has previously 20359
undergone a suitability investigation similar to the 20360
investigation the applicant must undergo to receive the internet 20361
gambling license. 20362
(3) The Executive Director shall determine the period for 20363
which a provisional internet gambling license is valid, provided 20364
that the period shall not exceed three months. The Executive 20365
Director may renew a provisional internet gambling license for 20366
one additional period not to exceed three months. 20367
Section 10. (A) The amendment and enactment by this act of 20368
sections 718.031, 3123.89, 3123.90, 3770.071, 3770.072, 20369
3770.073, 3772.37, and 5747.063 of the Revised Code applies to 20370
amounts deducted and withheld from winnings from pari-mutuel 20371
wagering on horse racing, video lottery terminal gaming, casino 20372
gaming, and sports gaming on and after March 31, 2026. 20373
(B) The amendment by this act of section 5753.021 of the 20374

S. B. No. 197 Page 701
As Introduced
Revised Code applies to sports gaming receipts received on and 20375
after the first day of January after the effective date of this 20376
section. 20377
Section 11. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of 20378
division (F) of section 3772.02 of the Revised Code, as amended 20379
by this act, the change in compensation required by this act 20380
under that division first applies to a member of the Ohio Casino 20381
Control Commission when the member begins a new term as a member 20382
of the Commission on or after the effective date of this 20383
section. 20384
Section 12. The General Assembly, applying the principle 20385
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 20386
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 20387
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 20388
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 20389
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 20390
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 20391
as presented in this act: 20392
Section 119.12 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 20393
33 and S.B. 21 of the 135th General Assembly. 20394
Section 3772.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 29 20395
of the 134th General Assembly and both H.B. 49 and H.B. 132 of 20396
the 132nd General Assembly. 20397
Section 3772.99 of the Revised Code as amended by both 20398
H.B. 32 and H.B. 49 of the 132nd General Assembly. 20399
Section 5747.01 of the Revised Code as amended by both 20400
H.B. 101 and S.B. 154 of the 135th General Assembly. 20401